
Sweet Revenge
Romance Novel by Kat Von Wild
This book contains sexual content that is suitable for mature audience only.  Published at Smashwords.com and Copyright 2019 by Kat Von Wild  This eBook is licensed for your personal enjoyment only and strictly fictional.  All persons, places or incidences are creative endeavors of the author.  This eBook may not be re-sold or given away to other people.
Look for other titles by Kat Von Wild on your e-reader or at http://www.smashwords.com/profile/view/KatVonWild
Devious deceptions can lead a woman to do things she never imagined.  With a new life all planned out, a new business to grow, her past still haunts her.  Every scorned woman loves a bit of sweet revenge and with only one thing on her mind, Calista is about to find out what better things there are to concentrate on.  One tall, dark, and handsome just might make her revenge worth the forgetting. 
Table Of Contents
Chapter One
Chapter Two
Chapter Three
Chapter Four
Chapter Five
Chapter Six
Chapter Seven
Chapter Eight
Chapter Nine
Chapter Ten
Chapter Eleven
Chapter Twelve
Chapter Thirteen
Chapter Fourteen
Chapter Fifteen
Chapter Sixteen
Author Notes
Other Available Books

If there is one thing women know how to do, it’s revenge.  Mix revenge with a man that can make a woman change her mind with every orgasm he gives her, and Calista might keep coming back.  Things get heated between the sheets, while revenge is being served with a carnal twist to the ex that did her wrong.
Small business entrepreneur, Calista Miller, recently had her life shattered by extreme measures.  Best friend and husband don’t mix, and when they do, divorce is served up with a heaping platter of sweet revenge.  A fresh start with some calculated cold hard cash was Calista’s for the taking.  Will she screw it up by getting muddled in a sandpit of vengeance, or will one sexy stranger named Blake Jones, make her realize that her new life is sexually satisfying enough to forego the agony of retaliation.
Once a coffee shop owner in the Utah suburbs, Calista now finds herself in the middle of small-town Kansas, making new lifelong friends, while wondering if she could ever truly trust women again.  However, once they seek out her help for revenge on those that have done them wrong, in ways that the law should handle, she sees the camaraderie beginning in her new life.  It isn’t until a few strong women show her how revenge is not the way to a satisfying life, does Calista start to see a future without a thought to her ex.
Her list of revenge ideas was long but what started to motivate her in a positive way was the list of her ‘new life’ check list.  In a rush to get out of town, with her ex tied up to their old bedpost – naked, Calista’s sex with a stranger gets box checked on her newfound freedom bucket list.  She had no idea that it would bring her face to face with the man, daily, challenging her to rethink where her energy is best spent – revenge or between the sheets pleading oh yes, like that.  With the new stranger’s sexual suggestive ways, and hardworking hero reputation, will it stop at a one-night stand, or two, and will their last kiss goodbye, really be just that – the last kiss.
If ex’s turn into oh my god yes’s, what could be so wrong with a new life as a divorcee?
Chapter One
There’s no looking back now baby.
With one last look in her rearview mirror, Calista’s glaring bright blue eyes and ash blonde hair glanced at her reflection, as she settled back in her seat.  The vision of her white picket fenced covered in yellow climbing roses, situated in front of her perfectly manicured yellow and white house, left her with a sudden queasiness of confusion as she sat in the driveway with her car directed towards the street.  She shook that raw emotional attachment to her house aside as she knew the right thing to do was what she had planned for far too long and that was to move far away and fast.  Now that she had her lying cheating husband tied up in their old bed, she felt a rising bravado she needed to pull away from the scenario she once thought was forever.  Listening to the howling pleas from her ex from the upstairs bedroom window as her car window was rolled down, she smiled to herself thinking this was just the tip of the iceberg revenge she wanted to seek.
She pushed the up button for her window, turned up the volume of her satellite radio station to hard rock, put her black cat eye sunglasses on her face, and put her car in reverse.  
The pleading sounds of his voice replayed in her head as she drove down the street that she had driven on for so many years as a faithfully married woman.  “Calista!  Please!  I beg of you.  This is not funny.  You can’t leave me here, naked, tied up to our bed.  Can you?  Calista?”
But she could, and she did.
The divorce papers were signed and filed, the house was sold, the furniture – what she had not sold, the movers would take to his new place, and their son who recently graduated from high school was taking planned time off before college to travel through Europe.
This wasn’t some fly by night incident.  Nope.  Calista knew from the moment she married her husband that his wandering eye might be a problem.  However, she was raised to rear her man like she should rear her child; keep them in line when they stray.  But this time he had strayed just a little too close to home for her liking. 
From the moment she caught on that an affair was stirring between her husband and supposedly best friend, she took measures into her own hands.  She plotted, schemed, and did things her upper class Ivy League Society mother would never approve of – God rest her soul.  It must have been the genes from her fly by night biker father that Calista never met, that caused her to act so callously, then again, cheating on their marriage with her best friend, behind her back, revenge came easy.
Dressed in only a black tee shirt, dark casual jeans and black kickass boots, she had her medium length long blonde hair up in a ponytail, however her painted face for alluring sex with the ex was still on her face.  She left the black negligee on the bed as a reminder for Clay and dressed as fast as she could to get out of their old bedroom before he could talk her into letting him out of the handcuffs – boy he had tried in the few minutes it took for her to get dressed.
The minute she dropped her silver Honda CRV off at the dealership that was buying it from her, she had a plan to put in motion mixed with a full steam of revenge putting her on the fast track to a new life.  
The Car Mart that offered her a written bid for her CRV was only blocks away.  The Uber ap on her phone was going to arrange for her to be picked up as soon as she put in the request time.  The check should already be cut.  She only had papers to sign and then she would have the Uber car take her to her storage lot, where her truck she paid cash for, sat loaded with all her boxed up personal belongings along with her new cell phone.  There was no way Clay was going to track her down after she just did what she did, at least not in the immediate future.  Although, their son Cole, would eventually need to contact her.  But at least for the first few days, until she got her bearings in her new life, she wanted no way for that man, or her ex best friend, to find her.  No way.
She turned into the Car Mart parking lot and turned her car off.  The female buyback agent she was dealing with was currently standing out front smoking a cigarette.  This was not the first time she sold a car to Car Mart, as it made getting a new car so much easier than trying to sell herself.  She knew the drill; it would be quick and painless.  And in just a few hours, she would have her new truck out of storage loaded with what little she wanted to bring from her old life to her new one.
Her new life included a check list of revenge, all the way to success marked as - make them regret the day they betrayed you darling.  First up was getting settled into her new place, a loft apartment above her newly acquired coffee shop – two states away.  Then came making the business successful along with a few personal upgrades.  All the while, tormenting her betrayers with occasional revenge strategies that could never, would never, be linked back to her.
Somewhere on that list of get it done, you’re a free woman now, was to have reckless abandoned sex with total strangers.  The kind of sex where you meet a man, in a bar or bookstore, she did not care, and you make an irresistible flirtatious offer.  That was something her high society upbringing never allowed her to do, and now that her time had come, she was going to do those wicked things she never got to, before it was too late.
At thirty-nine, Calista had found the life of a doting wife and mother, along with being a successful coffee shop owner, quite content.  Sure, she had thought something exciting was missing from her life, but then again, didn’t a lot of older adults feel that way.  Life had rolled on, sometimes with uphill struggles and midlife battles, only to be tampered down with a success here or there.  That all changed the moment she caught her best friend Stephanie, kissing her husband Clay, at a five-star hotel in the heart of downtown.  Making out like two long lost lovers seeing each other for the first time.  Everything in her life stopped at that moment.  She felt as if she just jumped out of the roller coaster cart and fell flat on her face, all the way down to the ground while internally screaming – no...
It might have taken her a few years to gather her bearings, two of them to be exact as she made plans in secrecy to take him for all she could before divulging the tormenting secret.  In those two years, Calista had often hoped that Clay would come around and dump Stephanie, all the while she had hoped Stephanie would get run over by a train, or maybe a large trash truck – now that would be spectacular.  Neither of those lovely ideas took place.  Instead, she made plans, sold everything off she could without anyone noticing.  Jewelry that Clay gave her for gifts through the years, valuable antiques she bought whenever her sad mood struck her and she over shopped, a rare coin collection that her grandfather gave her, and her alone, after her wedding, telling her that if she ever needed some get out of town cash, the coins were worth more than she could imagine, which they were.  She put all her money in her Aunts account, and started planning a new life, one she would execute the day the papers were signed.  She had always been a planner, but these plans she made, she would have given everything up for Clay to admit his wrong doings and promise to never do it again.
The moment Clay admitted to the affair, with Stephanie by his side, as if they were proud of their accomplishments, Calista no longer cared about forgiveness or working it out.  Her entire mindset reared its ugly head and drove as fast as it could down the highway named Revenge.
Calista found that turning forty soon had its benefits and its faults, however, being just shy of her actual fortieth birthday, she had to wonder if she could have done a better job of keeping her marriage intact?  One singular word mentally echoed out into the hollows of her now empty storage unit; ‘nah’.
With her black F-150 truck loaded with only ten large boxes of personal items, most of them new clothes she bought for herself the first year after the affair started, she was ready to head to her new place.  Therapy shopping had always been an escape of hers, but shopping for clothes that you were not even going to wear until the divorce was done, somehow had felt even more gratifying while charging them to your soon to be ex-husband’s credit card and telling him that you bought him a new business suit or two in his closet.  Luckily for her, he was never good at paying attention to those kinds of things.
The drive to her new place in Darling Kansas was going to be long.  She had every intention of driving straight through.  Sitting next to her twelve pack of Monster energy drinks was a brown envelope; it held the keys to her new apartment and lease papers.  She had never met the landlord but when she bought the coffee shop business from the previous owner with her Aunt, over a year ago, she inquired about the empty place upstairs.  After a quick look around, it held all the bare bones of a fun brick industrial looking loft and back then had hoped it would still be available by the time she rolled into town and claimed her coffee shop.  Luckily for her, it was.
With the business signed over to her silent corporation from her Aunt, the apartment was ready to move in, and the previous coffee shop owner had only a few months left on her commitment to run the place until she could move here and be settled in.  It was time for her to stake her claim in Darling, Kansas, and make a fresh start with her life.
Part of her new life was a huge slice of pie called revenge.  Part two of her revenge plan needed to be set into motion.  Clay had to be wondering if she was going to send someone to untie him.  Which, she was.  She closed the storage door, grabbed the no trace disposable cellphone, and she dialed in the local police department for her house. 
“Nine one one, what is your emergency?”  A calm female voice answered.
“Is this the Salt Lake City Utah emergency?”
“Yes mam, what is your emergency?”
“This is Joan Fraser at 4219 Elm Street and I just noticed a strange man breaking into a house across the street that just sold.  I think he’s in the upstairs master bedroom.  I just saw him in the window a moment ago.  Strange man, brown hair, slender build, average height.  He’s wearing a business suit.”  Calista calmly offered up as she snickered to herself; he was wearing a business suit before she convinced him that sex one last time with his ex was a great idea.  Which he was totally agreeable to until she slipped handcuffs onto him that were attached behind the metal post of their bed.  Luckily for Calista, her neighbor Joan was happy to back her up but not actually put the call in.  If only she could be there to see the look on his face as the cops come into their old house to discover a naked man on their old bed – the bed she left him in the settlement because Stephanie was bold enough to tell her that they had sex on it, more than once.
Just about the time the police show up, a courier was going to show up at her ex best friend’s business, a whole in the wall art gallery that she ran downtown.  In the courier package, held a video on a sim card of their consensual sex along with dated photographs, slick glossy eight by tens of sex they had over the last three years.  There was enough proof there to let Stephanie realize that all she really is to Clay is another piece of ass.  He liked the thrill of the play, the allure of chasing a married woman, the ability to screw two women at once, but what he probably would not like is the actual commitment that Stephanie was expecting out of him when the dust settled.  And now that he had to pay an alimony check to Calista every month for a large portion of his income, Calista could bet that Stephanie was regretting her decision to sleep with a married man for the last time.
After hanging up the disposable cell phone once she was reassured that the police were on their way, Calista avoided answering anymore questions.  That was what her neighbor Joan was for.  Joan had always disliked Clay from the minute they met over fifteen years ago when they moved into that house.  The cute adorable upscale suburbia home, yellow with white trim and the complete white picket fence.  It was cottage adorable, but now it felt like a horror show.  Although, to be honest with herself, there were some incredible memories in that house and neighborhood, it was just that Clay and Stephanie’s affair tarnished most of those incredible memories.  Calista could only imagine how many times those two stole away for a kiss or more.
The moment the sim card was out of the cellphone and on the highway, Calista knew there was no tracing the call back to her.  Or so she hoped.  That was why over a year ago, she found evidence that Clay had been stealing from the bank he works for.  That proof alone, was used as a negotiation for making the divorce end in her favor.  Not to mention the fact that she threatened him that if anything happened to her, the information would get to his employer at the bank.
There was a long list of revenge she was going to take from this moment on that could never be linked back to her, but for now, the biggest two pieces of the divorce puzzle just got put in their place.
Sometimes you must give people a taste of their own medicine.
Chapter Two
One sip, then two.
The coffee shop was just like she left it, one year ago when her Aunt Caroline and herself visited the current owner to enquire about purchasing it for Calista’s future.  Darling was a small to mid-size town in the heart of the states, yet it was growing at an increased rate over the last few years.  Which, not that the middle of flat lands had always been her ideal place to settle down for a bit, but it was a short half day drive from where her Aunt, who was like a mother to her, lived.  This business was the closest productive coffee shop available, and it made sense, at the time, because starting from scratch was too much to deal with. 
The town’s base of clients would be middle class like herself, well at least like she is now.  Clay and she had done well for themselves, and she had been raised by a rich mother, but her father, biological father whom she never met, was a low income man, or so her mother had said several times; which put Calista in the mindset of she is middle class, not upper class, not poor due to her retirement fund, but just where all the folk she liked to hang with was at – normal class as she commonly joked about it.
Business seemed average, but it could be better.  She had a plan to spruce the place up, change the name, spark the town’s interest a bit in her business and perhaps a bit in her.  She had plans of select promotions to the ones that would most likely frequent her shop.  For her, it really wasn’t so much about making a ton of money, but more about making a success of the shop.  This was going to be her business, her home, for the next few years until she reached her goal of over a million dollars in her retirement, which she was getting close, and then after that, she had visions of finding a nice non-cheating man to settle down with and perhaps, travel around the world together.  Seeing as her goal was to do this by fifty-five, she still had a bit of saving to do, however, if the stock market stayed bullish, and all her other investments paid off, the last two hundred and fifty thousand she got from her share of the house, was going into investments.  She has always been a saver by all means, and a spender when pissed off.  Clay had pissed her off, and boy did she spend while still married to him, but that tab was on their marriage expenses.  Now she would save, and make do with a lot less, putting her closer to her retirement goals.  Taking two steps at a time to get there if she could.
By five o’clock in the evening, the next day, she had pulled into the back of her now closed coffee shop, only stopping for a few hours rest at a Travel Inn.  She had felt exhaustion in her bones, yet the excitement of a new life was marching her forward.  She wanted to do all she could tonight, and then wake up tomorrow with absolute good intentions of a new life.  The coffee shop was closed by three so, Calista was glad to wait until tomorrow to introduce herself to the staff and get her feet wet with the business.  As she pulled into the alleyway, where the entrance to the loft apartment was just up a set of industrial metal stairs, she saw the two guys she hired off Craigslist.
She parked the truck after reversing it towards the stairs.  She got out and offered out her hand to introduce herself to both of the young teenage men.  “Shaqeem and Malek Forest?”
“Yes mam.”  Both of them spoke up while taking turns to shake her hand gently.
“I’m Calista Miller.  The new owner of the coffee shop, but also the new renter up those stairs.  I promised you that I would pay you forty each to move the boxes from the truck to the apartment.  You cool with that?”
“Yes mam.”  They both spoke up again with big white straight I’ve already done the braces teeth smiles beaming in contrast to their darker skin.  She put their age somewhere around late teens, and by the work wanted ad in the local Craigslist listing she had a feeling she might need their help at the shop every so often.  Their reference of their mother as the bank manager checked out when she called her a few days ago.
“Awesome.  Listen, tomorrow, I’ve got a furniture delivery that will be coming in that I could use help with.  You said you live close to here.  Mind if I call or text you when that comes in?  I need the furniture brought upstairs and three things need to be put together, the boxes broken down and taken to the recycle place.  Twenty an hour each?  Interested?”  Calista offered up. 
This time, their yes mam held much more enthusiasm.  By the time they got the boxes up and cash in hand, Calista had learned they attended high school just down the street, their dad managed the Ace Hardware two blocks over and their sister who just turned sixteen was graduating early with honors and was accepted into an elite IT school for gifted programmers.  They had talked her ear off, hauling the heavy large boxes up the stairs, for which she had struggled to get in her truck with a dolly and ramp.  
She looked around the empty industrial loft style apartment and imagined how just a few simple female touches, and a lot of long luxurious draping, and the place would be hip, to her anyways.  For now, she was hungry, and her cooler of snack foods held no appeal.  She wanted a meal and a beer or two, and decided to hit the place she saw just on the edge of town coming in; it was a bit out of the way back but a place where no one might ask too many questions, seeing as she did not have all her answers in place – but she would soon.
Finnigan’s neon green light was flashing on and off for a few seconds as if to say stay away, but Calista knew that it meant the neon sign repair man needed to come out soon.  The parking lot held about fifteen or so trucks, and several small two and four door cars.  All in all, about forty cars wrapped around the painted dark green sided building.  She decided to park towards the back with the other trucks.
The moment she walked into the pub, she found an empty bar stool off to the right side of the main bar, not too far from the lady’s room, and far enough from the regular tables, she felt she would have a nice view of the room for people watching; something she found soothing over the last year of her chaos.
The brunette female bartender greeted her with a big smile, sparkling cider brown eyes, thick lashes, full thick lips that sounded out a sincere greeting as she laid the bar coaster down on the counter.  “What can I get you?”
Calista had always been a wine drinker, something her and Stephanie shared a passion about.  She briefly let the memories of their planning wine country tours steal a few brain cells while she cleared her throat and replied with her new drink.  “Honey whiskey, ginger ale with a twist of lime, on the rocks.”
“Coming right up love.”  The cheerful charisma of the waitress lingered after she smiled at her and turned to make her drink.  There was an instant connection, friend connection, one that she would proceed with utmost caution as any female friend of late had let her down.
Calista tapped her fingers on the counter.  She still had on the same clothes from yesterday, her hair was down and still held a bit of wave to the curls she had put into it for the seduction of Clay.  However, her makeup had faded, and her mascara was starting to flake that caused her to blink one of her eyes.  That blinking must have made the older drunk gentleman three seats over on the bar think that she wanted him to come to her.
“Sho, howza bout I buyz youz a drink?”  He slurred with a bit of alcohol and cigarette to his breath.
Calista gave him a flat line smile and replied with ease.  “I’m meeting someone here.”
He slurred something out and got up, while leaving his glass stein of beer on the counter and headed to the men’s bathroom.
Calista slid his beer mug a few seats back where he had been sitting hoping he would forget all about her when she got back.
“Who you meeting, darling?”  The bartender asked as she put her drink on the coaster.
“Anyone but him.”  She joked back.
“I hear ya.  Hungry?  We’ve got a club sandwich special, homemade chicken noodle soup, or some great hamburger specials.”  She slid a menu on the bar top towards her.
“Yes!”  The enthusiasm filled her voice as she had eyed the shelled peanuts on the bar as something that she might consider eating just to get food in her.  “Starved actually.  Just drove straight through from Utah since yesterday.  I’ll take the club sandwich special.”
“Chips or fries?”
“Chips.  No, fries.”  Calista answered smiling.  “Sorry, a bit lagging on decision making these days.”
“I hear ya.  Want a small cup of soup until the sandwich is ready?  On the house.  Jackie, by the way.”
“Calista.”  She offered her hand to the woman.  The moment they shook hands, something about the woman seemed familiar and friendly.  This was a good sign to her new life.  She hoped.
Jackie quickly turned, keyed in her order to her computer, walked to the back soup and salad bar, poured some chicken noodle soup into a cup, placed it on a plate with a spoon and a few packages of crackers.  When she returned, she set it down and smiled while taking the towel bar off her shoulder and wiping the spot where drunk man’s beer had settled for a brief moment.
“What part of Utah are you from?”  She asked gingerly.
“Salt Lake.  But I’m now a Darling resident.  Just bought the coffee shop down on main; going to live in the apartment above for a while.  Just making new roots.”  Calista offered up with enthusiasm.
Her eyebrows raised, and a smile crept up as she flipped the towel back over her shoulder and put one hand on her hip.  “What’s wrong with the old roots?”
“Lying cheating ex-husband and ex-best friend.”  Calista whispered out as she took a packet of crackers and crumbled them before opening onto her soup.  Jackie’s eyes opened wide in surprise and sorrow as Calista took her first spoonful of soup.  The chicken broth full of flavor mixed with homemade noodles left her with a feeling of home, her old home, her old homemade soup she made for her ex-husband and son so many times on cold winter nights.  Today, it felt homey.  It was as if this was her first meal in a new place and she would remember it.
“Ouch.”  Jackie offered up while watching Calista approve of the homemade soup.  “Best leave those two to their own accord.  Karma will take care of them.”  She turned her attention to a new couple that just came up to the bar.
As Calista ate her meal, she thought about what Jackie said. There was no way in hell she could just let those two go live their life, free of any agony like they imposed upon her.  She had her initial revenge, and it was sweet.  However, she had a Pinterest private board full of revenge ideas she was going to let loose on those two, one month at a time.  It was her revenge of the month idea.  Each month, both of them, at different times, would get a different revenge that they could not connect back to her.  This way, their son Cole, would not get upset, and Stephanie was such a believer in Karma that she might think that the shit was happening to her for betraying her best friend.
By drink three, her meal was mostly eaten, and the pub was losing its dinner crowd for its midweek evening drinkers, Calista knew she should stop drinking, however her new choice of drink was feeling smooth to her mood and her internal defense of they were small glass servings let her decide to order a last one.  “One more, and then I’ll call it quits and head to my new empty apartment.”  Calista offered her empty drink in the air to Jackie.  They had been chatting on and off.  Jackie was a single mom of a little boy and had a little experience with revenge on an ex-boyfriend that left her for another woman while pregnant; that woman shot him dead.  Come to find out he was married all along – so three women scorned and one man down.  After he got killed, Jackie decided to take the high road that Calista did not see herself traveling.
The moment her last ordered drink was placed in front of her, the sound of a man’s thick timbering voice filled the air in a greeting fashion to other patrons.  She turned to see a man with dark brown hair, cut short, and a very nice muscular build, give a wave to another guy leaving with a woman out the door.  The second he turned to the bar, he looked straight at her and smiled.  His smile turned her insides to mush.  She looked away and took a sip of her drink while mentally rethinking about the image of the man she just exchanged glances.  His features were that of a strong man with a presence, and by the way people reacted to him, he appeared to be well liked, and well known.
With three more sips underway, Calista watched him out of the corner of her eye as he sat at the bar one seat away, telling Jackie what he wanted to drink.  She felt this undeniable pull of attraction to him.  Firm muscles, nice jawline, light green eyes, she thought.  She glanced quickly and then back to her drink.  She took a long sip.  He had a distinct smell of some manly like soap, not a heavy cologne but a musky clean smell.  She took another sip thinking how just his presence next to left her with sexually stirred feelings.
Calista set her glass down and took a deep breath in while her mind went to a dark place – sex with a stranger.  But how did she go about it?
Within seconds he turned to her and smiled while staring at her.  The moment she glanced up from her drink that she kept holding with her hands wrapped around the glass as if it was a safety thing, she looked at him and smiled.
“Blake Jones.”  He offered his hand.
She looked at his large hands and saw the hands of a man that used his hands for living.  “Cali.”  She offered back her old nickname she used to go by without a confirmation of her last name, besides, Jones was probably a fake last name.  The moment she took his hand in hers, she felt it, something tingly, sexy, or her fourth drink was getting her tipsy in less than two hours.
Jackie set his cut glass drink on the counter, gave them both a smile and turned to help another customer.  She was getting busy, and Calista knew she should be heading back to her new place.
She watched him take a sip of his drink, which looked to be a Jack and Coke.  He had strutted into the bar like he owned the place but was dressed casually in jeans and a black tee shirt like herself.  His work boots told her that he probably did some kind of construction for a living, thus the large strong hands, ones that she began to mentally envision cupping her breasts, while his mouth dribbled kisses on her neck, and his naked body was pressing against her.  She cleared her throat and turned to glance around.  She saw the entrance to the lady’s room that was darker than the rest of the place, with a sign pointing to the storage room.  She mentally did a thought of sex with a stranger in a storage room, on a crowded week night at a bar – wondering if that was even conceivable from herself?
“What are you drinking?”  He asked her as she glanced back at him with heavy breathing after mentally envisioning the man stripping her naked, and passionately brought her to orgasm.
For a brief second, she swore he asked what was she thinking, sex of course, but then realized he said drinking.  She raised her eyebrows and looked down at her glass still half full while clearing her throat; she felt nervous sexual energy between them, the kind she had not experienced since she had her first time back in high school – Clay had not been her first and would not be her last.  A wicked smile curled her lips and she replied.  “Honey whiskey and ginger ale.”
“Um, a whiskey woman.  I like that.  Jack is my guy.”  He winked.
He was flirting with her, or so she thought.
“You from around here?”  He asked her.
“Utah.”  She replied with a smile still tingling on her face as she kept envisioning his lips, manly lips, sucking on her tit, her neck, her wet spot between her legs which was only getting wetter the longer he looked deep into her blue eyes as if he too was envisioning what she was mentally experiencing.
She watched him take a long sip of his drink that emptied half of his short crystal glass.  He waved to Jackie and caught her attention.  “Two more.”  He signaled at his and Calista’s glass.  Her glass had plenty left, and was her last drink, however, she did not want to be rude.
“So, Utah?  How’s your day been?”  He drawled out in a sexy matter of fact kind of way which caused her body to tingle.  She supposed that he thought calling her Utah instead of Cali was cute.  Perhaps he forgot her name.
“Cali?”  She offered with a smile.
“I remember.”  He drank back the last of his drink and set it down with a smile that said, darling I can make you one happy woman.
She glanced over his body and then back to his eyes.  His physique was fit, manly fit, with broad shoulders, trim waist, nice legs by what she could tell with the way his jeans filled out.  He was flirting, and she really had no desire to rush back to an apartment where she had planned on pumping up an air mattress and rolling out a sleeping bag as her bed for tonight.
“Well, Kansas…”  She teased back.  “My day has been productive, how about yours?”  
“Can’t say it’s been bad, had better, but then it’s only Wednesday and I am more of weekend kind of guy.”  He casually tossed out while looking over her body once more.
Jackie approached them with two drinks and a huge smile.  They both nodded their heads to Jackie and tossed out a ‘thanks’ in unison as she turned to walk away.
Calista took a long sip of her drink and thought, Uber could drive her home.  The moment her empty glass set on the countertop; his hand reached over to touch hers.  “Save my seat.  I need to grab something.  Please don’t leave.  I’m not done talking to you.”  His last sentence drawled out slow and sinful, just like the mental orgasm she could only imagine he could give her.
He took a big sip of his new glass of whiskey and drank most of it back.  When he set his glass down, his eyebrow raised, his eyes glanced over her body, and he smiled that wicked smile that warmed her insides.  He turned from getting up from his stool and she watched him walk towards the back-storage room, because the men’s bathroom was on the other side of the bar.
She reached for her new drink, slammed it back with a huge gulp, and then shivered from the rush of the alcohol.  She waved her credit card at Jackie and had a decision to make.
The moment Jackie approached her with a smile, she had a feeling something was up.  “Blake’s got it.”
“He does?”
“Yeah.  I know him.  He owns part of this bar.  You can thank him in the storage room, where he is most likely grabbing a bottle of Jack to take home.  Big weekend fishing trip.  Leaves tomorrow and won’t see the guy back until Sunday.  Does it all the time.”
I guess Blake doesn’t work that much, Calista thought to herself.  “I should go thank him.”  She stood up and wavered for a second while a slightly buzzed smile creased her face.
“You should.”  Jackie smiled back and then turned to help a customer.
Calista grabbed her purse and pulled a ten out to tip on the counter.  She turned herself towards the direction of where she knew Blake to be, but wondered, if he kissed her, would she kiss back.  Staring in his direction, she remembered the way his words rolled off his tongue like a flirtatious invitation, the way his eyes roamed her body, he was interested.  It felt good to have a man want her this way, and if sex with a stranger got checked off her list, well so be it.
The ladies room was on the way.  She stopped in there to pee and freshen up, wasting a few minutes.  If he was still in there, she would thank him with a kiss.  If he wasn’t, she would pass by him, and wish Kansas, aka Blake, a good evening.
The moment, the heavy storage door opened, the sound of two men talking filled the room.  They both stopped and turned to look at Calista.  Blake’s green eyes traveled her body again like he was undressing her.  
“I’m sorry.  Jackie told me to come back here and thank you.”  She stumbled out not quite sure how to handle this situation.
“See you Sunday night Blake.”  The short round gray haired man padded him on the shoulder and then turned to leave the room.  “Night miss.”
“Good night.”  She offered up not quite sure what to think or say.
Blake held up a travel size bottle of Jack Daniel’s Honey Whiskey.  “I was having a hard time finding this.”
She took a few steps inside and blinked.  “Jackie said you got my meal, and drinks.  However, I am happy to pay you back.”
“Nonsense.”  He offered her the bottle of honey whiskey and nodded his head as if to say take it.
“Thanks.”  She slipped it into her black shoulder bag and stood there unsure as to what to do next.
He turned to a large stack of thick cardboard boxes of alcohol behind him and took one off to set on the floor and then he turned.  “You’re welcome.  Sorry, I thought I said that, but I guess my mind was elsewhere.”
She raised her eyebrows and frowned.  “I completely understand.”
He took a step towards her which landed within inches of her body.  Sexual heat stirred within her as his fingers went under her chin and lifted her head up to look into his eyes.  “Do you?”
Do I what?  Calista rambled inside her head while not replying with her voice, instead she opened her mouth hoping his lips would drop to hers.
The moment they did, her purse slipped off her slumped shoulder and her hand caught it to set on the floor, all the while his hands wrapped up into her hair, his lips still pressed and pursuing her to deepen the kiss.  The moment she let her hands wrap up behind his head, the kiss deepened.  Their tongues touched, the whiskey flavors exchanged and twirled in a magical dance.  Their breathing became heavy and their lips parted for only a second to reconnect with just a twist of each other’s head.
She liked the feel of his hand on her neck, the way his smell filled her nostrils, the slight buzz of alcohol causing her to not feel so cautious anymore, instead allowing her mind to wander to the possibility of naked sultry sex as her hands yearned to touch other parts of his body.  
She felt her hands reach for his shirt, her fingers flitter over his stomach muscles which twitched for just a second.  As soon as she had his shirt off with his help, he was reaching for her black tee shirt and it only took him seconds to have it over her head and on the floor next to his.  Leaving her in a black lace bra that unclasped in the front, and one very sexy well-muscled man in front of her half naked.
Their kissing went back to passionate senseless need and desire when laughter from outside the storage room roared with a female crackle.  Blake pulled away and put his finger up.  “Hold that thought.”  He took quick strides to the storage door and locked it with a click to the side.  He turned back to Calista who by now was wondering how far she really wanted to take this.  One long hard look at his upper naked body, his muscles, the curve of muscles that indented at his hips, something Clay never had, she let out a stuttered breath and realized - all the fucking way.
Within seconds, he had her backed up against the stack of heavy cardboard boxes.  He was kissing her neck and sliding his fingers around her left breast to find her bra clasp.  Her nipples hardened with excitement at his lingering touch.  Her bra was unhooked, his hot wet mouth found her taut nipple as her head tilted back, her eyes went upwards in pleasure and a moan escaped her mouth to match her feelings.  Thank fucking God, a man built to make her moan.  A slow easy “yes…” hissed out of her lips in a sultry vibration. 
The moment some cool air rushed over her wet licked nipples, she turned attention from the ceiling of the storage room to the side of Blake’s head that was now licking and sucking on her neck as his hot breath sounded excited; his manly presence wet her core.  
She craved this, wanted it, hell it was top of her new life bucket list.  Complete stranger, those words dangled in her brain.  He was part owner of the bar, not a complete stranger.  People seemed to know him well, but it’s a fair size town, how much would their paths cross?  However, that fear faded fast as her shoes and jeans were now being worked off her at a pace of a hungry man.  His lips kissed her belly, her inner thigh, and then gently kissed her recently tended pussy, all bald and smooth for her seduction for Clay, was now actually being touched and kissed by a man she knew for only a brief few words.  Yet, the way his fingers parted and licked her for a brief second, she did not care about Clay, about Stephanie for that matter, she just cared about careless fun sex with a stranger – in the storage room of a bar?  Then again, beggars can’t be choosers.
“Blake?”  She heard her voice betray her as her mind wrapped around the fact that she was in a sexual fantasy of sultry touch while completely naked in front of a stranger.  Her next words surprised herself as it made Blake smile.  “Fuck me.”
He stood back up from bringing her pleasure between her legs as he mustered out the words with a cocky smile.  “I intend to.”  He pulled a condom packet from the back pocket of his jeans and tossed it on the stack of heavy cardboard boxes behind her.  
As he started to remove his shoes and jeans, she toyed with him.  “Come prepared often?”  It was as if her mind and mouth were not working together.
“Not really.  Compliments from Randy.”  His shoes banged against a box off to the side as his jeans were being pushed down.
“Randy?”  Her breath sounded lustful as she caught her first glimpse of his well-built legs; legs that were sturdy, full of muscle and nothing like Clay’s pigeon legs she always thought he had.
“Yeah.  The guy that just left, the owner.”  Those words filled the room but not Calista’s ears, because her eyes were now on the nice size of Blake’s cock, and he was rolling the condom on while her legs spread on their own.
The was a mere second pause between them as he stood before her, hard cock, muscled body, a few years younger than her but that was not important.  What was important was the way her mind thought of nothing but sex and lust for the first time in over three years.  She was leaning naked against a stack of boxes in a storage room, legs slightly open, mouth practically drooling, eyes glazed over with lust, and all she wanted to do was beg for this man’s mercy with throws of passionate yes and more oh yes.
His first move was to kiss her again, kiss her senseless while his one hand held her face, his other hand lingered over her body, between her legs, touching her wetness and then dipping in.
She felt herself cave from his touch of his finger inside her, his lips kissing her neck now, his mouth sucking and moving over the sensitive area under her ear.  His heavy lustful breathing feeling her ears as she heard another passionate moan escape her lips.  It was a moan of pent up frustration, a nasty divorce, betrayal and anger, that wanted to scream out and escape, yet, instead, a soft heavy stuttered sigh mixed with an ‘oh yes’ sound filled her ears.  She was not in control of her body – Blake was.
The moment he stopped kissing her, his finger left her, his hands dropped to her ass and with slight bent knees he picked her up and placed her on the box.  “Perfect.”  He announced to no one but himself.  She had to wonder, the minute he walked in the room, was he scouting for the best place to have sex?  Who cares, she internally mustered as he was back to kissing her, placing himself between her parted knees, and letting his hands have their fill of her body.
“Fuck me, Blake.”  She moaned into his ear; her eyes barely closed as a vision in her mind whirled with erotic fantasy come true as the sensation of how all this risky sex felt.  Although the door was locked, she had never had sex in a public place before.  After tonight, she could check two things off her list.
His lips left hers as his hand placed itself just under her butt cheek, while his right hand grabbed his cock and guided it into her.  With the movement of his hands pulling her in and up onto him, they both moaned out in pleasure from the sensation.
There was no talking, thinking, just heavy breathing, touching, from both of them, as his thick hard cock slid in and out of her wet pussy.  All the while, the only sound other than the distant patrons on the other side of the door, was a distinct clinking of glass shifting in the box beneath her as he leaned against the boxes for leverage, competing with their heavy breathing of satisfaction.
She felt her breasts gently slide against his chest as she started to lean backwards a bit, causing her head to tilt back as her pleas of more pleasure left her lips.  She cast a glance up into his eyes that were now focused on her but fighting the urge to come first.  His pace quickened; his arm muscles were beginning to bulge from the work of holding her average frame.  The weight of his body slamming against her, touching sensitive parts of her, and the fact that she was doing something so sultry and sinister on her first true night of freedom, made her mouth plead and beg for more.
“Oh my god, Blake, yes, please, yes, like that, I need this.”  She burst out with a plea as her brain shut off, her toes curled while the magical electric currency woman know and love as orgasm, something she had not felt in a very long time – pulsed through her veins like the sweet elixir she craved.
With only a few more push pull strides of his cock, he slammed against her, groaned out a sound resembling a hissing yes, before his sweaty forehead rested against hers, curling a bit of his body away from her.  That was when she heard him whisper something that made her smile.  “I like Utah, you’re pretty fucking spectacular.”
A light laughter filled her lungs and escaped her mouth in a careless fun filled way.  It was joined by Blake’s manly chuckle.  They had accomplished something she never thought she could or would do.  And in her lifetime, she always wondered, what it would be like; now she will never wonder again, only crave it over and over.
In the short time that it took for both of them to regain their composure, in a bit of awkward silence, they got dressed.  Blake handed her purse to her and pointed to the back door off to the side.  “I don’t know if you want to go back out front.  I take it that head shaking thing means no.”
She laughed softly with a smile curled upon her lips.  “Not really.  Although, it’s a quaint little pub I’ll never forget.”
“Let me walk you to your car.”  He offered.
“Truck.”  She replied quickly.
He shrugged his shoulders as if to say potatoes, pah-ta-toes.
She watched him unlock the storage room door and grab his cellphone out of his pocket.  He texted something quickly and then slid the phone back in his back pocket.  His hand touched the small of her back, leading her to the back door.  “I’ll follow you out Utah, I’ve got this thing to get ready for.  Jackie knows the storage room is available if she needs to restock.”
She motioned her head in acknowledgement.  She didn’t think heavy conversation was needed.  He wore a condom, she was willing, and quite frankly very able.  He thought she was from Utah, and if he ever stopped in her coffee shop, he would find out that she was now Kansas.
Nothing surprised her more when he turned her around at her truck, dropped another kiss on her as if to say he could go again, which she could easily have done, however the wear and tear of divorce and driving had taken its toll.  When he pulled away, with her head still in his hands, he asked her in a serious tone.  “You okay to drive?”
“I’m good Kansas.  Keep it sexy.”  She put her two fingers on her lips, kissed them, and then pressed them to his.  The moment she saw him staring her direction in her rearview mirror, as he watched her drive away towards town, she smiled with complete and utter satisfaction.
Parting is such sweet sorrow.
Chapter Three
My, oh my, what do we have here?
Calista had just enough energy to blow up the small twin air mattress with the foot pump, which felt like it took forever, open the box that had her new pillow and blanket, and set her alarm on her phone.  She went down for the count, fast asleep, in her clothes, makeup still on, and didn’t even brush her teeth.  She felt every inch of exhaustion.
Unfortunately, five hours later, she woke with an amazing amount of energy to get her life unpacked and on track.  She had a lot to do, and sleeping was the last thing on her mind.  Although, sleeping with the stranger, Blake Jones, now that held some serious appeal.  Fortunately, she was hoping there were plenty more of those Blakes ambling around town for her to have adventures with.  The town wasn’t huge, but it wasn’t so small that everyone knew each other’s business.  It was the perfect size to kick off her new life, and if she kept her wits about herself, it would be her home for many years to come.  A home, far, far away from Clay and Stephanie.
As for her son, Cole, he had plans to travel when he wasn’t in college, so maybe he will travel her way a couple times a year.  Sure, she missed him, but she had raised him to be independent, and that meant her not depending on him for her emotional needs.  He had always had a wandering soul that loved exploring.  Now was his time to explore the world before exploring the college experience.  Clay and she had saved up for this, seeing as they agreed to only having one child.  Her upbringing had allowed her a bit of travel and worldly experience before settling into her first year of college.  Meeting Clay and marrying him, by her second year of college, had not been the plan but a baby on the way and full-time schooling, was supported by her mother’s ample wealth.  Calista had wanted every opportunity for her son that she had and more.  Besides, the nasty divorce and peculiar circumstance Clay had put them in, any distraction for the both of them was good.  Although, she did miss her son dearly.  Perhaps a quick text to let her only son know how much she missed and loved him would make her feel better.
Calista had packed a box of kitchen essentials and some basic food.  Enough to make herself a bowl of oatmeal and coffee.  It was only five am and the new employee meeting was at ten.  She had five hours to kill, a body invigorating itself while thinking of her new life, almost like an adrenaline booster, and one certain revenge she needed to pull off.
Clay had mentioned that he was moving into Stephanie’s house.  What Clay and Stephanie did not know is that two years ago, when they were still oblivious that she knew all about them, she put Stephanie’s thermostat ap on her iPhone, along with her garage ap, and her security system.  After she got her new cellphone number, she had everything transferred to her new phone.  If Stephanie had not changed her passwords, which there was a very good chance she had not as she didn’t want to be bothered with that tedious task, then Calista was going to turn the air conditioner on in her home, when it was only fifty degrees outside.  She was going to open and close the garage, a few times, which should set off the security system.  She made a fresh cup of coffee, sat on the wide wood planked window ledge under the eight-foot industrial windows that looked out to the edge of town.  The sun wasn’t even up yet, so she stared out into the black darkness as she opened the ap and started her evil deeds.  
The thermostat ap showed the heat was on.  She turned it to air conditioning and dropped the interior temperature that was showing seventy degrees to sixty-two.  She took a sip of coffee.  She clicked on the garage ap.  She hit open and watched a display that the garage was opening.  She smiled and laughed at herself.  She waited for the alarm to go off on the security ap, but that ap would not work correctly.  She went to shut the garage door back down and nothing happened.  It was four am back in Utah, she was sure that maybe it was an ap error.  She closed the ap out, reopened it and then she tried again, and it closed this time.  She took a deep breath and wondered, why was she even bothering with this, what if they thought it was an ap error and not her.  She opened and closed the garage one more time and then realized that without being there to see their reaction, it wasn’t as much fun.  Back when the two were dating behind her back, she did stuff like this all the time, playing the innocent bystander while one or the other was trying to figure out why weird things happened to them.  That had been fun.  Being far away and not even sure if they were there, not so much fun.
She took another sip of coffee and decided to check todays weather in Darling, Kansas.  High of seventy-two with a cool front coming in the evening.  She opened her notes, read through the employee’s names to remind herself.  Milly Rockford was the previous owner and still the acting owner slash manager.  Benjamin Hit was the main baker, followed by three other employees that helped with baking, store front and overall store maintenance – Sally, Melissa, Carl.  She made a note to pull records to find out last names of the other three and put their contact information into her cellphone before the end of the meeting.
With her first cup of coffee down, she wanted to walk around the place again.  When she was last here, the place needed a good cleaning.  However, now it had been cleaned up to sparkle, which made her feel better about her landlord.  She found her tape measure and began to walk around measuring windows for drapes and taking notes.  By the time she made it up the large wooden industrial stairs to the small enclosed room, which was probably once an open loft before, she realized that with her migraine issues, she would need a dark place to hole up and unwind.  She opened the door to the enclosed loft and realized it was a lot smaller than she remembered and having to run down those stairs every night to go to the bathroom was a bit too far.  This would be the glamour walk-in closet she always dreamed of having.  Noting the size, she put long mirror and chandelier on her list of things to buy.
In the space under the loft, there was those large eight-foot windows.  They did a decent job of holding out the cold, but it was the light that concerned her.  When she had a migraine, she needed it dark, other than that, she loved having natural light flood in her place.  She measured the area, the windows, and then noticed a few things, like outlets, and an exposed wire that needed fixing.  Not a big deal; she could do it herself but having a landlord to fix things was a lot easier.  
She realized last night that the old small tub was replaced with a much nicer soaking tub.  The sink pedestal that was there before had a small white cabinet and white base sink along with the fact that the toilet was new.  Not that the old stuff was old, but it wasn’t a bathroom she could be proud of.  She opened her notes and typed in a few things the bathroom would need to make it sparkle a bit; she wanted to make it girly and spa like.
She had four hours to go.  She figured that she would take a quick shower, and while her hair dried, she would at least get unpacked what she had time for.  
Five minutes to ten in the morning and Calista was walking down the metal steps in a pair of black leggings, black ankle boots, burgundy tunic poplin top, her blonde hair up in a twist with curls framing her face.  She had her iPad and cellphone along with her small laptop in a black leather bag with silver studs around the top.  The air was still a bit cool, but she was going to be inside, meeting everyone, taking notes, setting up shop so to speak.
The moment Calista walked in the back door, Milly and Benjamin greeted her.  They looked to be ordering baking supplies.  
“Good morning, Calista.  I see you arrived alright.  Benjamin, this is the new owner Calista Miller I informed all of you about.”  The silver haired lady with arthritis in her hands gestured like a game show host to Benjamin.
“Good morning, Miss Miller.”  The short skinny oriental man, who looked nothing like a typical baker who would be a bit overweight from eating his own cooking, held out his hand to introduce himself.  He had a Cajun accent that flooded Calista’s brain with memories of a trip to New Orleans when she was younger.
“Good morning.”  Calista replied as Milly set a hand on her back and a motion of her other hand palm out to the front area of the coffee shop as if to lead her that way.
“Everyone else is out front.  Melissa and Carl must leave in a half hour, but Sally will be here all day.  As soon as Benjamin is done getting his order in, he’ll be out for the meeting, and then he does all his baking in the early hours, so he’ll be leaving after the meeting.”  Milly offered up in explanation as the two walked from the kitchen area to out front where the customers are.  Milly walked Calista to a small set of tables pushed together where there was a small set up of morning food for everyone to nibble on.
“Help yourself to something to drink.  Gang, this is Calista Miller, your new owner and manager once I finish out in a few weeks.  Calista this is Sally, your full-time staffer, like Ben.”  A very thin brunette somewhere under the five-foot-high stood up and offered her hand.  Her brown eyes had a twinkle and her grip told Calista that she might be small, but she was a worker.
“And this is Carl.  He’s a part or full-time guy. Whichever you need him for.  He takes college courses at night, so I never try to have him open.”  Up stood a very tall sturdy built looking young man, all of maybe twenty.  He still had teen acne on his face and an awkward stance as if he wasn’t quite used to his large frame.  He shook Calista’s hand and smiled without a word.  Calista figured he was shy.
Milly laid a hand on Melissa’s shoulder and stood behind her.  “This is my sister’s granddaughter Melissa.  She works part time, most of the time, but in a pinch, she’ll pick up extra hours.”  The heavy set young twenty something brunette with green eyes held up her hand to shake Calista’s without getting out of her seat.  As their hands touch, Melissa’s phone dinged with a text.  She quickly smiled and mouthed a hello, and then reached for her phone to read her message.  Whatever text came in, it must have been funny as Melissa had a huge smile on her face.
“Good morning everyone.”  Calista offered up and then sat down at the table just as Benjamin came in to sit down.  With everyone including Milly sitting down, Calista started to hand out a small packet to each employee.  One that had a few minor changes to Milly’s pay and compensations.  It stated the corporation’s agenda and that once Milly retired, she would be searching for a full-time manager to work coinciding with herself.  As she started to talk and explain the packet, several customers ambled in while talking.  If Calista had not known better, town chatter was out about a new owner and some looksie-loos were coming in to check her out.  Although, she might just be assuming this, however, they were more interested in glancing her way, while Milly got up to help them.
As Calista continued to go over benefits with the employees that worked full time, several more customers came in and Benjamin kept looking at his watch.  “Benjamin, why don’t you write down your contact info here on this legal pad for me.  You and I can arrange a time to spend some time together.  I can help with baking as needed, but I believe it’s clear in the package, I am a hands-off manager in that sense.  As for the rest of you, please write your information after Benjamin and then in the next few days we will spend some one on one time together.  Sally, if you wouldn’t mind, helping Milly get caught up with the customers and then you can come spend a few minutes with me since you’re on the clock.  Carl and Melissa, I’ll pay you for the full hour for the meeting, but if you have questions, my door is always open, or should I say, my cellphone is always on hand.  Milly will still be acting manager for a while as I integrate myself into the café.  Any questions?”  Calista offered up as if she was begging them not to, at least not at the present second as a few more customers just walked in.
Calista observed Benjamin’s rush to get out of there, she hoped he wasn’t put off by her in any way.  Baking was not her favorite thing to do and losing a baker would be a huge set back.  As Carl scribbled his name hurriedly, he jumped up to help Milly and Sally as there was a custom bakery order he needed to get out of the kitchen’s deep storage refrigerator.
It was in that moment, that Calista realized, this little coffee café she looked at a year ago, seemed a lot busier than she remembered, which was good.  She also observed Melissa, busy texting on her phone and eating, yet she had not put her information down on the yellow legal pad.  “Melissa.  If you would not mind.”  She pushed the pad with a pen on top of it, in front of Melissa, practically nudging her cellphone to the side.
The young gal plastered a sarcastic sure thing look on her face.  She scribbled fast and then slide the pad back to her while looking for her next direction.  
“You can go.”  Calista offered.  “Unless, that is, that you have questions.”
“Nope.  Milly told me all about you when you bought this place a year ago.  I’m going to run.  Carl said he would close for me today.  I have plans tonight.”
“Enjoy.”  Calista offered up casually as she reached for the legal pad to slide into her black bag.  It was as if Melissa could not have bolted out of the café fast enough, causing Calista to make a mental note to be on watch for her.
Within seconds, the café settled down, and Carl was leaving, Benjamin was gone out the back door to go buy supplies, and Milly and Sally were sitting at the table telling Calista about the locals catching wind there was a new owner at the café.
As the two women talked to her instead of asking her a million questions, which was a big relief, she felt her mind ease up from anxiety over what today’s meeting might have gone like - bonkers, instead it felt right.  Calista knew that she had spent most of her adult life planning, because that is what she is, a planner.  Her plans to save her marriage failed, but as her plans to divorce, divert money to her later needs and now revenge, she realized it ate up so much of her energy that she would rather divert that to making her new coffee shop successful, instead of focusing on revenge.  Not that she was going to give that all up.  However, a quick flash of Blake Jones naked body filled her mind as a sly slow smile creased her lips of the delicious memory of the man.  Her first night in Darling had been a major success in that sense.  As for sleeping on an air mattress, her back was tingling with a slight pain of a rib out.  Sitting, listening to the two women talk to her, Calista knew that her new place that she was going to call home, was going to be just what she needed.
Shortly after the coffee shop was closed, Calista walked up the metal stairs at a quarter to four.  The meeting with the staff went well, she thought to herself.  She could see how once Milly officially retired, she would need to hire two part-time or one full time, because she had no intentions of being there every day.  The place was big enough and busy enough to keep two full time staffers, a full-time baker, two part-time, and herself.  None of the part time staff gave her the first impression of management material, but then again, she was learning to doubt her first impressions over the years.  Stephanie’s first impression was besties for life; now she looked back and wondered how she missed all the signs.
Opening her apartment door, she realized that her bed and new furniture could not come quick enough.  She almost wished she had a place ready to just step into fully furnished and she would have just put her own embellishment on.  Yet the moment she closed the door to see the sunset through her main area windows she realized that the view, the feel of the place, had a vibe she could really get into.  Clay would never have lived in a place like this, and that was what made it so much more attractive.  A few more days until her furniture was here and set up would not kill her.  She stretched her back thinking how the air mattress could do some damage.  As she opened the fridge and grabbed a bottle water, she realized that grocery shopping was top on her list.  Then she laughed to herself, thinking just below her, she owned a coffee and café shop that had pretty much had a fully stocked refrigerator in it.  She would raid the stores fridge until she got her big shopping trip in.
With a water bottle in hand, iPad on her lap, and cellphone on the ledge next to her ass, she decided that she wanted Chinese for dinner.  She placed an order online and then her cellphone rang with an unknown number just as she was about to call her Aunt Caroline.  “Calista Miller?”
“Is this the new tenant above the café on main?  I got your text but I’m a bit detained at the moment.  Mind if I swing by later to take a look at the list you texted me?”  A man’s voice that sounded familiar but had an irritated edge to it drawled out his questions as if he was not sure who she was.  
Calista had signed the lease with a female under a corporation name.  She was beginning to have second thoughts about the landlord being easier rather than she just taking care of things herself.  She thought of all the years of trying to get Clay to do some man things around the house and how it ended up being easier to hire someone or learn to do it herself.  Same went for her coffee shop back in Utah, he had never helped with anything there.  She smiled into her phone as she replied nonchalant.  “No hurry.”
“You sure?  I could be there in a bit, it’s just…”  His voice trailed off as if he wanted to say something.
“Absolutely.  If I don’t answer, let yourself in, I have food being delivered and then I am going to take a long hot bath.”  A mental vision of soaking with some lavender scented bath salts, a hot tea, and some soft music had her mind twirling happily with how life was so much easier now that she was divorced and only truly responsible for herself.  Although, after last night’s sultry fun, an occasional strong set of arms to wake up in would be nice.  Just not all the rest of the ridiculousness that came with being with men.  She smiled to herself thinking about her new free of men life.
“Sounds good.”  His voice brought her back to reality as he spoke out and then hung up without saying goodbye.  
Calista put the phone number in her contact list as landlord as he never introduced himself.  Not a big deal, once the few things on the list got fixed, she saw no reason to have the man come by for the little things.
All day she had been taking a few moments to put things in various online shopping carts for her place.  Online shopping carts like Amazon, Wayfair, and Overstock were overflowing with necessities.  She wanted as much of her new life to be filled with new items as much as possible. She ran through her Wayfair and Amazon carts one last time and hit purchase, whereas her Overstock cart she was wavering between two almost identical items and told herself to make up her mind and hit the purchase button after dinner.  Twelve hundred dollars later, curtains, cushions, small furniture and some décor were going to be shipped here in the next week.  She decided that she needed to drive over to the Walmart on the other end of town to buy bath accessories and kitchenware.
While glancing over her list of things she needed to purchase, a flashback to the finalizing of the divorce crept into her mind.  Clay had told her to keep all household items as they really had no monetary value as he put.  But they did.  Twenty years of living together, hosting dinner parties with elegant dinnerware, china, crystal and elegant furnishings, she knew the value of everything he did not want to quibble over.  So instead of keeping really any of it, she had a huge successful, I’m divorce estate sale.  Perhaps it had been foolish in the sense she would never have gotten the monetary value of what she paid for everything, but she wanted to start her new life fresh; no china dish or serving platter was going to bring up memories of the past.  Everything she came here with was nothing that associated her with Clay.  So that meant an entire new life starting from scratch, but she was ready for it.  A smile creased her lips upwards as she remembered the only thing that she left in the house for the new homeowners was their old Ethan Allen four poster bed, mattress, and bedding.  She had no need for it; that is other than her exit plan with Clay that day.
In the meantime, she had the basics to get by, but having the closet setup was a must as her boxes of clothes were everywhere.  She had found a rope to make a makeshift clothes line and hung up five outfits for the next few days.  She grabbed her cellphone, texted the Forest boys and asked if they could meet her at the shop after school to discuss putting up a closet organizer for her.  Her phone dinged with a yes.  That was her signal to take a break in planning and organizing.  Food would be delivered soon, and she wanted to take a bath after she ate.  She moved her air mattress makeshift bed setup to the room under the loft.  She found a small lamp that was left in the small closet in the now bedroom, along with a small fan.  She plugged the little silver lamp with no shade in and the lightbulb was good.  A bit bright, but she could see better in there now.  
Half hour slipped by her almost like a minute in time as a loud solid knock came at her door.  “Just a minute.” She hollered out.  In all the moving and unpacking, she had taken off her burgundy poplin top and slipped on a black tank top that was now a bit dirty.  She grabbed her wallet out of her purse and opened her door without looking through the peephole.  There standing in front of her was Kansas, aka Blake, the complete stranger from the bar she had sex with last night.  With her eyes opened wide as her mouth formed a complete O, the man of great talents spoke out just what she was feeling.
“My of my!  What do we have here?  Utah?”  Standing before her in a dark flannel shirt opened to a very dirty looking navy tee shirt, with his hands in his pockets of his worn denim jeans, was a man with a smile of desire on his face as his eyes were scanning her body like it was an engine he wanted to start up.
Calista blinked her eyes a few times, before answering.  “Kansas?”
“You’re a bit shy of Utah darling?”  His voice sounded like he was taunting her, teasing her to submission.  “I guess it’s my lucky day.  You’re my new tenant?”
She shook her head yes as her mouth softly whispered out in shock.  “I guess so.”
They both stood there silent for a mere few seconds.  The air felt calm and almost warm like or was it the electricity between them heating them up.  The only sound was their breathing while their eyes held contact until a small red four door car pulled up to the bottom of her stairs.  A magnetic lighted sign on top of the car told her that her food was here.  “Sorry.  Come in.  That’s my food I just ordered.” 
She stepped aside while he took a few steps inside.  As soon as he went pass her, she practically ran down the stairs to meet the driver.  She handed him the cash and told him to keep the change as he handed her the warm brown paper bag of food.  As soon as she made it back up the steps by running, she thought of how awkward this entire situation felt.  The moment she walked inside, he was standing there looking like a rough around the edges cowboy with his dark brown hair unruly and his flannel shirt open to the mud on his shirt and a look on his face of how can I satisfy you darling.
With a huge breath released as she closed the door, she set the bag of food on the counter and turned to look the man in the eyes.  “So!  You’re my landlord?”  This time she put a tone of excitement mixed with certainty in that statement.  A certainty that she might need to find a few more reasons for her sexy landlord to come around.
“You can say that.  And you’re not in Utah anymore?”  He quizzed.
“You can say that.”  She casually tossed the statement back at him while her lips smiled, and her eyes just examined his body while she set her food delivery on the counter next to where he was standing.  Last night at the bar he was a clean cut, hardworking guy, kind of look.  Tonight, he looked like he had been working hard.  Then she remembered Jackie saying he had plans to be fishing.  “Fish not biting?”  She added.
“Oh, they’re biting alright, but I’m not fishing.  Family thing.”  He looked down at himself before looking back to her with a smile.  “I’ve been known to be a dirty kind of guy, but this is my nephews doing.  I was going to head home and shower first, but I figured once I did that, I might not want to come all the way back here.”  He let out a breath and shook his head as if to say no, while he let out a slow low whistle.  When he finished, he said the words again.  “My oh my, you are a surprise.  You were not who I was thinking I would be coming over to visit.”
She cocked her head with a half-smile and shoulder shrug.  “Well, it’s me.  Listen, you can come back tomorrow or while I’m gone at work the rest of the week during the day.  I was just about to eat and…” 
He interrupted her with a smile and sultry draw to his sentence.  “Take a bath.  Naked.”  
She raised her eyebrows and laughed with her face.  She could tell he was flirting with her.  Thing was, there were no curtains, no bed and no stack of boxes to have sex.  Her place was out. And it wasn’t like he was asking her to have sex, but the way he was looking at her, she knew when a man wanted her.  In only her black tank top and black leggings, she felt his eyes roam every square inch of her body.  Just as she was about to say something, he turned around and surveyed the room.
“Living large here Utah?  Got plans for furniture?”  He turned back around to look her body up and down while his lips smiled the words, sex.
“Yes.  I do.  Can I offer you some Chinese for dinner?”  She was starving and had not eaten a thing all day other than her oatmeal and one muffin from Ben’s fresh batch of cooking.
He patted his belly.  “Nope.  I’m full.  Sister fed me meatloaf and mashed potatoes.  Look, I don’t have any tools with me.  I just wanted to take a quick look at the list you sent me and make sure we agree on what needs to be done.”
“Oh.  Okay.”  She heard the deflation in her own ears.  What was she expecting?  A follow up to last night’s rendition?  She walked to the frayed wire and motioned for him to follow.  By the time she showed him the few things on her list, she noticed his body language had changed.  He went from let me bang your box again, to don’t keep the light on for me kind of guy.  She let her mind think of other things like all that she had to do while she followed him to the door, listening to him talking about swinging by to fix the things in the next day or two.
He opened the door to outside which caused a sudden rush of cooler air to blow in.  He turned and looked at her as if he was going to say something but stopped himself.  Instead, he wrapped her face up in his hands and started to kiss her until her knees felt weak.  The moment the cold air rushed over her wet lips, she was ready for more, drag him inside more, do it on the air mattress more, but instead, he said this.
“I don’t mix business with pleasure.  And you are pleasure, but now you’re business.”  He let out a huge breath of air and shook his head from side to side.  “Damn Utah, I haven’t stop thinking about you since you drove away last night.  But I’ve got these rules.”  He took a step back on the metal platform landing as a huge cold wind blew Calista in the body, causing her to wrap her arms around herself to warm her bare arms and to protect herself from a man turning her down before she asked.
“I’m good, Kansas.”  She joked with a sensual smile curling her lips, while her heart pinched with a sadness that this could not be something more so fast, so quickly after her divorce.  A rebound man like this could do her some good.  Instead, she stepped backwards and said her goodnights.  “See ya around Blake.”
Her hand was on the door and about to close it when his right foot went inside the doorway jam and his right hand put his palm on the door.  “I suppose we will.”
She smiled and started to slightly push the door against his hand.  His foot withdrew, and his hand lowered as his husky voice sang out.  “Thanks for the memories, Utah.”
With the door shut, Calista leaned against it with a huge smile on her face.  “Thanks for the memory, Kansas.”  She whispered out with her back against the heavy metal door.  Things in Kansas were just getting good, business or not, her stranger was no stranger, and she liked the feeling she got just thinking about him.  Now if only she could make him see that business and pleasure do mix well. 
Rebounding is a blast when you got the right man.
Chapter Four
I’m not a bitch but a survivor of unfortunate events.
“Cole, darling, how’s France?”  Calista blew into her caramel macchiato and then adjusted her listening ear buds in each ear while her son appeared agitated on his skype video.  Calista had situated herself in the quietest corner of the coffee shop in a worn brown leather chair that was due for replacement, which was on her list for her remodel.  Her mind was on her shop, and Blake, but her brain told her to focus on her son who had a mad look on his face at the present moment while he was staring at her from her laptop.
“I’m in the UK.  Plans changed.  I sent you my new itinerary.  But I guess you were busy tying dad’s naked body to your old bed.”  His voice was clipped with irritation, although she thought a small smile might have creased his lips by the change in tone in his voice.  She knew he felt loyal to both parents; they both loved him and raised him right.  Asking for loyalty to one or the other was difficult and yet, he took the divorce quite well.  Or maybe, Europe was his way of escaping the realities of what new adult responsibilities would unfold for him.
She gave him a meek oops I’m sorry look and glanced around the practically empty coffee shop. It was the lull time where sales indicated they were always much slower.  She had two on staff at all times and had just posted an ad for a mature adult to do opens from five am to ten am, part time.  She could do it, but a part of her wanted the freedom to work on promoting the shop, handling all billing and payroll, and then taking the rest of her time to just enjoy life.  This shop supported five employees including the owner before her.  If it was up to her, she would make the shop support a few more, including her work, so that she was free to travel.  However, this wasn’t Salt Lake City, Utah, this was Darling Kansas, a fraction of the size and economy.
“Hey!”  She chimed up with excitement.  “I saw your pictures from Ireland.  Way cool.  You know I wanted to take us there on a vacation before you got too old, you know too cool for your parents.  Maybe someday we could go back there, together, as mom and son.”
His smile was conveyed in his voice as he chimed out.  “I’m never too cool for you mom.  That would be nice.”
A moment of silence sat between them as they smiled at each other into their laptop cameras.  Cole in some cheap looking hotel or hostile, and her in the back-corner spot of her café where she could see the incoming customers and the Melissa at the countertop who was slowly cleaning the glass case in front of her.  She was on top of her let go list if she didn’t find a way to work a bit harder around the place.  She jotted a note on her legal pad to have a talk with her before next pay date.
“Hey mom?”  Cole spoke up first.  As he did, the front door chimed with a customer.  Calista looked up over her laptop and saw the man that left her with a senseless kiss last week, and a warning that he did not mix business with pleasure.  It was as if he gave her a good-bye kiss, when all she wanted was to drag his ass into her apartment, into the building he owned, and replay their scene, or something similar, from the bar that first night they met.
Cole’s voice talking to her serious broke her trance with Blake who stopped just inside the door and looked her directly in the eye.  “Promise me you’ll lay off the revenge shit with dad and Stephanie.  Dad says he wants to make a go of this with her.  This is his second chance and you did something to try and screw it up.  Although, he won’t tell me what.”
She turned her attention away from Blake, and back to Cole with squinted eyes glaring while her sensual smile turned into a lopsided tight-lipped frown while thinking about Clay and Stephanie.  She could just bet that Clay would not tell Cole what it was she did.  “Sorry.  Look, I’ve got someone that just showed up for an interview.  I emailed you my new cell number.  Don’t share it with dad.  I’ll look at your email.  Let’s talk longer tomorrow.   I’ve got to get back to work.”
“Promise me mom.”  Cole’s voice pleaded as her eyes were drifting back to Blake smiling at Melissa.  Was he flirting with her?  A mental grr growled inside of Calista’s brain while a soft sensual smile placed itself on her lips strictly out of memory of how the man’s lips felt on hers.
Melissa’s voice softened to a flirtatious whisper as she announced the store’s new name.  “Welcome to Dioltas Hide Out Café.”  
Blake shot a glance towards Calista with a questioning look on his face over the name.  Obviously, this was the first time he had heard there was a name change.  The new sign was on order and would be out front in the next few days, that is unless the manufacturer gives her another delay.  
Calista casted a sensual smile in Blakes direction but then he turned and answered a question from Melissa in what looked to be a flirtatious manner.  Not that she thought he might, do anything with Melissa.  She was young and frumpy looking, although the young probably did not matter to a man.  A huge sigh exited her lips as she looked back to her laptop.
“What, honey?”  She softly spoke out as she looked back at her camera.
“Mom, you are obviously distracted.  Where are you anyways?”  Cole asked with concern until some pretty brunette popped into the background behind him on camera and his laughter informed Calista that they were more than friends
“Sorry.”  See whispered knowing full well that she had to tell Cole about the coffee shop, well at least where she was living, and not that she owned it just yet.  That would be too soon.  She did not want him to know about all the planning and conniving she had schemed before the divorce, not until many years from now. 
“Look, I promise, no more tricks.”  She whispered as she placed her hand on the top of her laptop about to close it.  She could not believe herself.  For once, she was more interested in a man other than her son or husband.  She loved Cole with all her heart, but it was time for him to go be his own person while she picked up the muddled broken heart his father shattered, and standing at the counter, now flirting with twenty something Melissa was the man her mind could not shut down on.  Business or not, pleasure was on her brain.
Cole’s voice broke her focus on Blake with an exasperated tone.  “Where are you living now, mom?”
“Kansas.”  She said it loud enough that Blake stopped smiling at Melissa handing him his coffee, and turned to look at her with an intent gaze of what?  Sexual lust or irritation?  Curiosity or desire?  Good lord, she was an internal mess of questions.  If he had not kissed her the way he did when they last saw each other, she might have believed his words of not mixing business with pleasure.
“Mom!?”  Cole shouted in both question and excitement.
“What?  I really do have to go.  I’ll text you tomorrow as scheduled?”  She smiled and then clicked off skype and shut her laptop down just as Blake stood in front of her, sexy in his dark denim jeans, light blue Henley shirt with enough buttons open she knew the muscles that lay beneath.  His brown hair had been tousled by the wind that was outside.  Fall was in full swing and leaves were tossing everywhere outside in the wind.
“Kansas?”  Blake questioned with authoritative tone.
She turned her head towards Melissa staring at them but kept her eyes focused on Blake.  She glanced for a mere second at Melissa and then back to Blake.  “Melissa, can you go do those dishes in back.”  It wasn’t a question but a request, however the girl could not seem to take her eyes off the two of them, Blake standing over her, and her sitting in the brown leather café chair, laptop on the table in front of her, and the sexual tension in the air.
“Now, please?”  She practically hissed at the young adult child.
With a puff of air to show exasperation, Calista stood up.  She had on a nice pair of dark denim boot cut jeans, her brown leather three-inch heeled designer boots and a very nice snug fitting dark green cashmere sweater that she bought herself two Christmas’s ago.  A long dangling silver and light green stone necklace hung from her neck.  Blake reached out and touched the necklace in his fingers before he looked back into her eyes.
“Melissa?”  Calista motioned to the back room with her head as she hissed her name in question over her shoulders before looking back at Blake and staring directly into his light green eyes.
The young brunette bolted to the back in frustration.  Calista did not know what was worse, the young help, or her sexual frustration around Blake.  He let go of her necklace and smiled.  “You have a nice day Kansas.”
She raised an eyebrow.  The other day he called her Utah right before he kissed her and now, she was Kansas.  Was this his way of stating their relationship, whatever it was?
She watched him turn and reach for the door before she practically stammered out.  “Hey, Blake?  The stove upstairs isn’t working, and the hot water is barely hot.”
He stopped with the front door to her coffee shop open and turned with the door handle in hand.  The wind from outside blew some fall leaves inside as he spoke out with certainty.  “I’ll be by later to fix that.”  His eyes glanced over her body like he was saying he would fix her need for another sweet orgasm, putting his business rules aside.  Then he turned and walked out of the door as if he did not have a single sexual frustration lingering in the air, but boy did Calista.
What better way to work out that frustration than to startup operation ROE – Revenge on ex’s.  Calista had promised that she would not pull anymore dirty tricks on Clay and Stephanie to Cole – or did she?  It didn’t matter, because Calista had waited a long time to make this happen, the saving, the planning, the proposition that he leaves Stephanie – which he didn’t, so she pursued other legal matters in her own hands, all the while calculating what her next moves were.  Cole was a man now, and he might be mad at her if she got caught at what she was about to do, however she had no intentions of getting caught. 
Operation ROE started all the way back to the day she saw Stephanie and Clay making out like two horny teenagers in the parking lot of the downtown hotel.  She watched them get in their cars and drive away, while she sat in hers with the prescription from her doctor for a yeast infection.  She felt physically miserable, but mentally she was shattered into a million pieces that day.  A yeast infection, meh, a woman gets over that quickly anymore, but a marriage with an affair with your best friend, that is a lifetime of pain and sorrow.  
Calista got revenge every chance she could.  She poured clay mixture down Stephanie’s pipes month one, flushed as many condoms as she could month two, broke a few sprinkler heads, oh on accident of course, and poked holes in the water line to the water heater so that a slow leak gradually flooded the basement one night while Clay and her both happened to be out of town.  By the time the plumber’s bill was more than a cost of a vacation in the Bahamas, by end of year one, Stephanie still had no idea who or what was causing this.  Calista did, and she made Stephanie think she was going crazy by convincing her that the plumber was out to cheat her with odd excuses on plumbing repair.  As for Stephanie’s husband at the time, he was so oblivious to everything going on around him that the affair came as a complete shocker to him.  
By year two of the cheating, Calista got sneakier.  By now she was really hoping Clay would tire of Stephanie and she could approach him about marriage counseling while vacationing somewhere tropical, instead, she watched the two get sneakier with their planned hotel visits, stolen kisses on baby cam’s nobody knew were placed at both houses, and a hired professional detective to put everything on paper or digital image, so that come time for when she asked for a divorce, Clay could make his choice.  Unfortunately, his choice was Stephanie, although Calista was sure he might have changed his mind once he could not get out of negotiating the fact that since they were married for twenty years as of that year, he had to pay a lifetime maintenance fee, as she had made her coffee shop appear as it did not pay her much of a salary compared to his.
Now, after all of that, Calista felt somewhat settled.  Sure, she missed Cole, but it was his time to spread his wings – in Europe and hopefully after that, off to full time college.  That was what Clay and she agreed on and saved for.  She had a new life, in a new town, with a new business, and now that things were falling into place, she still had a check list of ROE to complete.
First up, update social pictures and status from divorced to single and searching.  She had professional modeling pictures taken before leaving Utah.  Some just great shots of her out golfing, fishing, and drinking a coffee.  All with the intent to look as if someone else caught her in a glamorous moment looking twenty pounds lighter, with perfect hair, makeup and outfit.  Then there was the boudoir photo shoot.  Now she was not planning on posting any pictures of herself in the nude, but classy, well styled seductive pictures, those she was going to post.  Some of the pictures, she had emailed to close friends back in Utah, who promised to post at her request.  Those who were in the know after the separation, came out of the forest of long forgotten friends and offered up if there was anything that they could do for her.  Her neighbor was the first, as it turned out Clay was not a well-liked guy.
With a click or two, photos would be posted across several joint acquainted social networks of both Clay and Stephanie’s.  She could only hope Clay has a ping of regret while Stephanie felt threatened, she could lose Clay back to Calista.  Not that she would take him back, yet she wanted the fear instilled in her anyways.  Clay on the other hand, she knew if she allowed him, he would climb back into a hotel bed with her in a split second.  She knew her ex-husband well, and as she was posting pictures and looking quickly over to ones that were recent of Clay and Stephanie, she realized her mind was screaming at her, ‘you’re better off now!’ 
Somehow that smart voice screaming in her head did not stop her next move; the well paid photoshop pics of both Clay and Stephanie, looking quite a bit heavier and pale in pictures that had them looking worse for wear.  The time was now for those friends to receive those pictures to post on their accounts as well.  This way, it didn’t look like Calista was exacting the revenge, but the lot of friends they all used to socialize with on occasions.
Calista got up from her last hour of ROE activity and wanted a bottled water.  The moment she grabbed it from the cooler, a few patrons came in, and Melissa was still in back.  With her best hostess voice, she introduced the new store name and took care of her customers.  Everyone was friendly and curious who the new owner was, which gave her thought as to how to not just promote her store, but also about who she was and why she selected Darling Kansas as her new home.  She would call her old friend Tally, who worked PR magic for a living.  Have her come up with a blimp to have published in the local paper, and online in social media.  Maybe hire a local photographer to take some pictures of the coffee shop with its new name, but perhaps after she did the closed for the Thanksgiving holiday makeover she had planned.
There was so much to do on her list for the shop and decorating her apartment, that ROE was losing its appeal, especially since she could not be there to witness her secretive revenge or see their reaction like she used to.  Those small moments of crazy reaction from Clay and Stephanie had kept her sane as the plan of divorce was working into motion.  However, Blake was not losing any appeal to her.  He was sexually rendezvousing in her brain, her sultry dreams at night, taking up every bit of space he could.  Just as one customer mentioned his name as the person about some local town news, her body tingled with excitement.  With just the mentioning of his name Calista felt the stroke of her dying coals being brought back from just an ember to a red hot fire of sexual need and desire.  That was not part of her new life plan – or was it?  It certainly would make life more interesting.
Once the small late day rush was gone and closing time was in an hour, Melissa finally showed up from the back room.  “Ben’s on his way by.  He said he has to get all of tomorrow’s baking done early tonight.  I was wondering if you wouldn’t mind if I grab some of the two-day old stuff to take home.  Milly usually throws out in wrapped clear plastic bags and hangs on the trash bin in the alley for any homeless or local takers.  I need to head out early, I’ve got an interview at the Target for holiday help, which by the way, I was hoping you don’t mind working me around their schedule, you know, give me a few less hours?”
Calista gave her a flat lined smile and no emotion on her face as she spoke.  “That’s fine.  We can review your schedule tomorrow.”  She paused with a weak smile and then added, “Good luck with your interview.”  Mentally she already had fired the gal, if it weren’t for the fact she was related to Milly.  However, the schedule would reflect her lack of desire to work, not just next week, but the many weeks to follow.  She had decided that by the new year, Melissa had to be permanently replaced, but first she would have a heart to heart talk with her tomorrow, just to show she was trying to keep her on; for Milly’s sake. 
As Calista watched Melissa, take her time gathering her purse and coat, she pulled her old iPad out of her brown leather laptop bag.  She finger-pressed an ap for photo sharing that they once shared pictures between.  She added the two hundred images of artfully edited images of pictures of herself and Clay naked from one hot sultry summer night just months ago to the account, naming them Stephanie pic 1, Stephanie pic 2, and so on.  She clicked order pictures under Stephanie’s online photo account and billing, all to be sent to her house.  She smiled as Melissa went to the back room for a second and came back thinking how Stephanie most likely forgot about the account.  Calista had already removed her credit card information and account billing, so that the favor could not be returned in kind.  In that singular moment of waiting for Melissa to gather her stuff, clock out and leave, Calista revealed in the evil planning and internal laughing about revenge and she hit her order button for Send Them Poop dot com.  In that order, she requested that a large pile of poop be placed under Stephanie’s four door Camry in her driveway, in the next week.  At a cost she thought worth it.  She paid the extra for the stinky stuff.  Stephanie was a freak about her driveway and her car.
By the time Melissa was finally getting on her coat, Calista had placed an order on Stephanie’s amazon account that she still had the password and log in to, for a case of Depends adult underwear.  To add a check off and done to her all things shitty list to do to Stephanie, she had one last thing to do, but she was saving that for when Clay and Stephanie moved into their new place.  She clicked her old iPad to shut down, slid it in the laptop bag, and pulled out her new iPad, one that neither Clay nor Stephanie knew her id or passwords to.  She flipped it over to the engravement she had put on herself when she bought it, ‘to freedom’.  It was in the moment her fingers slid over the words, she realized her freedom came at a heartbreak price, but she was not broken.
As soon as the glass door closed on Melissa’s round bottom, Calista put a note in her phone to basically cut Melissa’s hours until Melissa is on the bottom of her schedule – which usually meant her employee was about to be fired.  She had lazy employees in all her years of ownership, but Melissa was a master of doing absolutely nothing for the last twenty minutes of her paid time at the shop tonight.  Instead, as Calista did her revenge, she watched Melissa flitter around pretending to work, almost making it harder on oneself to not work, rather than work.  She knew she had to train these employees like her old store, but she had hoped to do it a small bit at a time.  With only three weeks left on the contract with Milly, the previous owner, she knew she had to step up her game, promote the business, bring in quality mature workers who wanted and needed hours.  In the meantime, two more late day customers were walking in.  Calista knew what to do without even thinking about it.  She could make a stranger feel like her best friend, and a customer leave her store feeling like this was their coffee shop.  She was good at this and this was the thing in life she enjoyed calling her lot in life.
Her new-found freedom just found its wings.
Chapter Five
The mirror of a man’s heart is in his actions.
Blake Jones was mystified by what changes had taken place in his life in the last few years.  First, his fiancé left him for another man, a wealthier man, or so she thought.  Then, his sister got into a car accident, leaving her in a wheelchair permanently.  That was after she found out her husband was cheating on her and got a woman pregnant.  The car accident was caused by her drinking too much at the very bar he used to own, but now his buddy Randy owned most of it until he could pay him the rest of the money – Blake was still part owner.  While dealing with his absentee fiancé, crippled sister, and helping with her divorce with two small boys to still take care of, Blake had to bury his brother in-law Pete, who was shot by girlfriend number three with her daddy’s shotgun.  Girlfriend number two to Pete, was Blake’s old high school acquaintance Jackie, who Pete also left a child with.  Jackie was out of work and six months pregnant when Pete got killed.  Jackie had no idea that Jenny was his sister since she was living in Kansas City ever since graduating high school, and she had never met Pete for a date in Darling.  All of that was just a few years ago; life was settling down, that was until the night Utah sat at his bar and begged him to make her a very happy woman.
Life had been difficult, but he had it under wraps.  His plan moving forward was to help raise Pete’s kids as a fulltime uncle with Jenny.  They took Pete’s life insurance policy and formed a business.  They bought up real estate when the market was in dire straits, Blake took care of the properties and collected rent, and now that things were back up and booming, they were selling off land and buildings for a nice profit as they saw fit.  Jenny gave Jackie a hundred thousand, of the two-million-dollar life insurance policy she had on Pete.  Blake tried to convince Jenny to give her more, and for Jackie to take more, which she wouldn’t, but Jackie was happy just to get a job at his bar.  Both women had guilt and anger over what happened that he often felt torn between them, helping them, until he finally got them to see that together, they made a better team.  It took a long time, but Jackie and Jenny were now best friends, raising kids together, and laughing every time they went to visit the woman in jail that shot Pete.  Turns out, the woman that had shot him while he was with another woman.  Oddly the three women formed a bond, while Blake, got social update pictures of his ex-fiancé with some older rich guy.  He figured it best to never let her know his net worth now, or she might try to come back into his life, which he did not need.  He was happy taking long fishing weekends alone, playing uncle to his nephews, and not putting himself in a position of a broken heart anytime soon.
He knew that he had been missing that feeling a special someone can put in a man’s life.  Nothing is better than waking up naked next to a woman you made love to the night before.  He missed that.  But he did not want the drama that went with it.  So, for now, it was hook ups on social aps or short-lasting relationships with women that did not live in his town.  Which was hard, seeing as Darling had doubled in size the last few years and new eligible women had asked him out, yet he didn’t want a relationship with someone that didn’t work out being too close to home.  With each swipe type meetup in a different town, he felt emptier on the inside as he was not willing to share any part of his life with these strange women. 
Maybe it was the fact he finally finished building his ranch.  He had a decorator known for her industrial farmhouse décor furnish his new home.  This was his new place, built by his design, everything had his touch on it; no ex-fiancé bought this or that, that he had come home to every night and stare at.  No trace of the previous single life turned engaged that went horribly wrong.  He had built his place with pride, yet every night as he sat on his rustic designed deck with natural waterfall and large stone firepit, watching the sunset, he yearned for a woman to be there with him – a mature no strings attached woman.  He was sure that was what him and his new home needed, a no drama, no strings attached, wealthy woman.  He scoffed at his own thinking while shaking his head in a no fashion.  “Needle in a haystack, boy.”  He mumbled to himself while walking and thinking.
Yet, today, stopping in to get a coffee at his favorite coffee shop, there was Utah – aka Calista.  Yes, he remembered her name, but somehow calling her by the state she said she was from, it kept it less personal.  The thing that they did in the storage room, that was fun, and very personal.  Fun for him, and by her reaction, a well desired fun for her.  In the past, his quick hookups always moan, yes like that, or god yes, but the fact that she clearly stated that she needed it, well, that was his first clue she was a woman in need.  Which, he did not need in his life.  No matter what her story was, he was not ready to be a part of it.  Not yet.
Finding out that Utah was his new renter in the empty apartment above his favorite coffee shop, minor hiccup.  However, knowing she is a Kansas now, Darling Kansas at that, it could cause an issue if she turns out to be a crazy stalking new woman in town that just wants his services, not that he wouldn’t mind servicing her again.  Her body was rocking, not to mention the fact that it was nice to find someone who just, like that, no questions or commitment asked of him, was willing and able.  Real nice.
Blake tossed his empty coffee cup into the trashcan outside his architecture office a few doors down from the coffee shop.  He unlocked the doors and stepped inside.  He was a business of two, Jenny and himself.  However, most days she worked from home handling all the mundane business stuff while allowing her to hang with the kids when they were not in school.  He just liked having an actual office away from home, seeing as this was one of his own buildings he bought back before all the chaos began.  It was as if the place had become his professional man-cave.  It was a place he designed industrial art products out of metal and wood in the back area, while maintaining a very manly looking professional front office, antique drafting table and all.  He designed his first home that he had built for himself in this office, Jenny’s handicap home to fit her new needs, and the place he designed ideas just for fun.  His architectural degree wasn’t being put to too much use these days, but it was the place that made him feel like he was contributing to himself and this town in a way he knew best how to.
The moment he sat on the antique wood stool and set his hands on the empty wooden worn smooth drafting table, he thought of Calista.  Her outfit she was wearing did not seem like something an employee would wear.  Maybe she was just using their wi-fi?  Although a flash of her instructing Melissa, made him wonder, was she the new manager Milly talked about a month ago.  He shook his head to himself thinking how so much had changed in the last year and he just had no desire to keep up with the town gossip.  Although, now that he was remembering, her mouth moved with words, but he wasn’t listening.  Instead he was envisioning that very mouth on his hard cock, sliding it in and out, looking up at him with her intense blue eyes and blonde hair.  That look on her face that told him that they were just beginning to have fun.  He chuckled to himself as his hands roamed over the feel of worn smooth wood of his architect desk.
He started to wonder, if they would be crossing paths often.  He mentioned that business and personal did not mix when he met her at his rented loft the other night, but then the kiss he left her with, told him, maybe his hard-fast rules could be broken, at least one more time.  A quick mental question flashed in his mind, ‘would one more time be enough to get her out of your system?’
‘Pfft.’ Blake made an internal puffing sound.  She probably just wanted him to come by again and finish off that kiss with another mouth moaning orgasm, which held some appeal as just the thought of it had him semi hard.  That stove worked fine last time he checked, and as far as the water heater, he might have forgotten to turn the temp back up after the last short-term tenant left about three months ago, since then, he was thinking of selling the place, or making it into an office as the light in the main area was incredible due to the unobstructed views of the western horizon.  
A text from his sister Jenny dinged on his phone.  He pulled it out of his back pocket and set it on the metal strip on the bottom of the drafting table to lay it flat in front of him.  ‘Milk, eggs, and a pound beef.  Home for dinner?’
He didn’t live there, but he sure did spend a lot of dinners there with her and the boys.  She was probably on her way to get them from school and he was planning on eating at Finnegan’s with Jackie and her four-year-old son Mack.  Jackie had a new guy she wanted him to meet, and get a background check on.  He texted Jenny back.  ‘I’ll get groceries for dinner to eat tomorrow.  Eat at Finney’s tonight.  Jackie wants us to meet a new guy she’s hooked up with.  No better way to break him in.”
His phone dinged again.  ‘Great plan.’
Jenny had a wheelchair disability van with a driver that would take her during most day hours wherever she needed to go, and on call for evenings.  However, Blake just liked doing things for her to make her life easier.  It wasn’t like he had a nine to five hard working job thanks to her; it was more of a luxury job that benefited from Pete’s death.  Not that he had wished this on Pete, he had always thought of him as a bit of a roaming eye type of guy, but he would have rather they divorced.  Pete and he had been drinking buddies, shooting pool, catching fish, and messing around mechanically when the house needed to be the woman’s place.  Be that as it may, Blake knew from his upbringing that he had to step up and be the man for everyone involved.  All the more reason, Kansas, did not need to commandeer his time with drama.  Because if there was one thing he could sniff out, it was drama.
The grocery store by Jenny’s house was his first stop a little after four. He had his hand cart filled with two breads, two dozen eggs, the beef – two pounds because he never understood why she asked for a pound at a time.  He was about to grab two one-gallon milks by the handle out of the dairy case into his right hand, when he heard a familiar voice.
“Hey Kansas?”  Calista stood there with her very full grocery cart of all thing’s household and kitchen pantry essentials.  Stocking up for the winter for three, plus occasional parties, was an old habit; she was shopping for one now and at the looks of her shopping cart she was not doing so well as she had obviously over shopped.
Blake grabbed the milk and turned with his body towards her.  He glanced at the way her tight-fitting sweater was drawing his eyes to the curves of her body.  He glanced at the necklace she was wearing that he touched earlier.  It gave him thoughts of touching that necklace on her naked body.  He tried not to smile when he replied.  “Evening Kansas.  Got a party you shopping for?”
She blushed as she thought he might have caught her staring at his bulge between his pants, if she did not know better, she was noticing that he appeared to be semi hard.  “No.  Just an old habit dying hard.  I like stocking up early for the winter season.  Farmer’s Almanac states this will be a cold snowy winter.  Utah had some serious cold winters but I’m in Kansas now.”
“You don’t say.”  He joked with her and could not help smiling at her cute little ways of checking him out and sending body language signals that would land them right back in that storage room, naked, doing the bang the box of bottles game.  He liked that game.  Would not mind doing that game again.
“Any hoot, you look like you’re ready to check out.  Thanks for stopping by my new coffee shop.”  She smiled and started to continue towards the yogurt section.
“Yeah.  Good evening.”  He started to walk away and then realized what she just said.  She, owned the coffee shop?  The one he had been going to for years.  He noticed a name change, and a lease change was mentioned by Jenny, but he had not realized that a new owner was finally taking over his beloved coffee stop.  He shook his head side to side.  He’d be damned if she went and made it all frilly.  It had looked the same for the last ten years since Milly opened it.  He knew Milly had talked about selling it, but he had to wonder was Calista just a transitional owner or was his favorite bang the box of bottles blonde going to be in his life – day after day?
He set his milk jugs on the conveyor belt as the young male teenage cashier asked how his day was going.  “Huh, yeah great, and yours?”  Blake asked, not really caring but just trying to be nice.  In his normal unique charisma, he plastered a smile on his face while his mind ticked away at the idea of Utah, now Kansas, was going to be in his life in a passing permanent passion and not in the one night stand I am attracted as hell to this stranger sitting at my bar woman.  He joked with the guy about the last Chiefs game being a blowout, while his mind flashed sultry images of Calista under his control in the back-storage room of his bar.  Then he paid his bill and turned to head outside to what looked like small snowflakes.  A flash of Calista’s sexy lips making conversation about the Farmer’s Almanac like it was a sexual deed flashed in his brain as he mentally spoke to himself with a smirk on his face.  ‘Maybe Kansas was right.  Maybe, it was going to be a cold snowy winter.  Maybe she’d be willing to be his naked snow bunny and play games in his bed with the fire crackling against a full-blown snow storm?’
“Why, Blake Jones, looks like the smiley bugs taken a bite out of you.”  A familiar voice passed him in greeting as he looked down to see his first-grade teacher walking into the store with a head shake.  
“Have a lovely day, Miss Kent.”  He voiced over his shoulder as he took his steps towards his truck.  If he had stopped to acknowledge her fully, he might be there long enough to see Calista ring up that cart full of groceries, and that was not on his evening agenda. Nothing could ruin a man’s imagination of naked snow bunny play like your first-grade teacher.  With a bit of bulk between his step, and a smile still on his face, he opened his truck by remote and realized it was going to be a long cold winter if he didn’t figure out a way to get Calista out of his every sexual thought during most of his day.
Blake took the groceries items into Jenny’s.  No one was home.  She probably had already headed over to the bar for dinner.  Jenny’s boys liked to play pool before the real pool players showed.  They were probably hungry, and Jenny was most likely talking to some of the staff.  It had been a long journey of AA meetings and visits to the bar without drinking before he felt confident that she had figured out how to handle the memories from the accident.  Finnigan’s had been their place as a family.  Slowly, it was becoming that again.
The restaurant bar atmosphere seemed calm, while the boys were filling their plate with everything but salad from the salad bar, Jenny was talking about tenant agreements, a property inquiry and something else, but Blake had his mind on the last time he was here with her, Calista.  Right in his back-storage room, he had ravished the woman into an incredible orgasm only to follow up with a successful feeling for the evening.  It was the first time in a long time that it felt that good, and that was why Jenny’s talking went in one ear and out his other.  Only Calista’s image of her naked body in the production of pleasure kept flashing through his mind.  However, the moment Jackie walked in with her date, a small part of Blake made him puff his chest out and give a firmer than normal handshake.  It was his big brother act, that probably didn’t need to be displayed, but all the same, Blake felt the need.  His attention got turned around to the real reason he was here tonight, to protect his friend’s best interest – not to date another loser like his dead brother in-law Pete.
“Blake, Jenny, this is Conner.  Conner, this is Blake, his sister Jenny, and my bestie, her two boys Colton, and Drake.”  Jackie proudly announced her adoptive family to her date.
“Pleasure.”  Connor offered out with a sincere smile.
Blake sized the man up in under five seconds by accessing his looks first.  The man had darker skin, brown eyes, a slight curl to his thick dark hair.  His hands were big and had a few calluses on them, along with the fact that his feet matched Blake’s size thirteen shoe, or so it seemed.  He wore plain jeans and a blue flannel shirt, which was about dress up code for these parts.  His smile had sincerity to it, as did the way he looked at Jackie like he won the lottery.  For now, he’ll pass, Blake thought to himself.  
Jenny, the smaller, feminine version of Blake, started right up asking questions and laughing with the new couple.  There was no mistaking that Blake and Jenny were sisters, and no mistaking that Jackie could easily pass as a taller, darker version of Jenny.  They looked like family and felt like it as well, and that was all Blake needed.  Not some newcomer from Utah with her soft pouty lips, flirtatious blue eyes, and soft blonde hair.  Not some erotic mature sexual energy she put off every time their eyes met.  Not the way her hands devoured him with her touch, her soft purring sounds of pleasure, and not, not the way she made him want to put all standards of business and pleasure don’t mix out for the wind to blow away.
Blake cleared his throat and asked Jackie where her son was at.  Not really listening to her explain that he was at the babysitter for the night.  He half listened to Conner talk about how he managed a local refinery, how Jackie’s new red highlights really looked great and then finally, without warning, the conversation turned to the new Dioltas Hide Out Café.  The very place that was owned, by the very woman, who was sexually occupying his mental space with ideas of how to make her moan in pleasure while everyone sat around talking casually.  The coffee shop was the last place he wanted to talk about.
Blake waved his hand in the air for the waitress attention.  He needed a drink.  Just one, which he usually did not drink in front of Jenny at the bar, but just the fact that the one person who rattled his balls with her bare hands, name was being mentioned while he was out with his family.
“I heard she is a divorcee?”  Jenny quizzed Blake.
“Blake met her, the other night, actually her first night here, isn’t that right?  Blake?”  Jackie had a snarky tone of amusement to her voice.  He turned and looked at the two women as if he did not hear a word they were saying.  
“Conner?  You a Chiefs fan?”  Blake offered for a distraction.
“Since birth.”  Conner bolted with pride.
The two men kept the conversation around football and local weather, while Blake affectively ignored Jackie and Jenny who carried on the conversation between themselves, luckily only mentioning Calista’s name one more time.  Blake heard himself repeat the farmer’s almanac quote from Calista and his cock flinched.  Just thinking about the woman constantly had him filled with a desire that he needed to work out of his system.
The night could not move on fast enough for Blake as he finally escaped the bar to head home after resolving a few issues for Randy.  He felt exhausted.  To be exact, exhaustion from thinking about box banging a certain blonde.  He continued to scrap some snow and ice off his platinum silver GMC Denali truck windows.  The family had gone home by six thirty while Jackie was heading out to the movies with Conner.  He replayed his entire bizarre day in his head, and all he could conclude was that he needed answers.  The sooner the better.
Before he knew it, he was staring up at the metal stairway, in the alley behind the coffee shop, that led to Calista’s apartment.  Long ago, there was an interior door and stairs that led down to the empty hallway between the building next to the coffee shop.  However, it got bricked over and Blake thought how it might be nice of him to unbrick it so that she had inside stairs to walk up and down, that led her out to the front street.  The empty building next store had an interior door in its loft that also took those stairs.  Architecturally, it could be done, but it was not something he would tend to right now.  Watching Jackie, all happy and giddy on her date, made him realize that he had not been on a date in over six months.  A real date, not a social hook up.  He thought about pulling his phone out and swiping for a local hook up, instead, he climbed the metal stairs, feeling his legs getting heavier with each step.  What lies beyond the metal door at the top, was an enticement he was not sure he could handle to turn away.  However, business and pleasure never mixed well – like oil and water.  
Calista listened to the knock on her steel back door while her mind had been trying to forget all about Blake.  The moment she looked through the peephole and saw him standing there in his Carhart denim jacket, snow falling lightly around him and an intense look on his face, she hesitated in opening the door.  “Just a minute.”  She hollered over her shoulder as she grabbed her dark purple jersey knit robe that had been draped on a chair by the door.  She tied it at the waist, tight.  All she had underneath was just a navy-blue tank top and gray jersey knit pajama shorts.  No underwear, no bra, and denying that after seeing him, twice today, that she had a few new naughty thoughts about her Kansas man.
The minute she opened the door, while mumbling that she forgot about asking him to stop by, he seemed irritated.
He stood just inside of her door, after she closed it.  He looked around and noticed that in a very short time, the woman had a chandelier up hanging from the twenty-foot ceiling rafters.  There were heavy rich looking gray velvet type curtains over the eight-foot windows; they were closed.  A lot of salt wood looking furniture, mixed with some industrial farm house pieces that looked like the stuff the designer put in his house.  She had a lot of dark purple and gray tones everywhere, faux led candles that were lit, and fur pillows in gray and cream.  Large one’s piled on the floor, small ones all over a decent looking L shaped dark gray couch.  Her entire place was an open loft floor plan, but she had some kind of seriously expensive looking dark curtains, that were closed in the area that was the bedroom of ten-foot ceilings.  Above that area was a small closet storage area with a set of stairs he designed and put there.  It gave the open floor plan an option of small bedroom upstairs enclosed, or large closet and bedroom downstairs.  He was afraid to ask what was behind the thick dark curtains in what he was sure was the bedroom.
Calista took his silence and staring as a compliment.  She had outdone herself in decorating the place in such a short time.  Thankful for quick delivery of her decorating items and quick work of her teenage hired handymen.  The Forest boys had spent several days after school, hanging curtains with their dad’s expertise, putting together furniture, picking up supplies and decorative orders from a shipper that came in but was too big or heavy for her to bring up.  They pulled it all together day by day.  In fact, she wasn’t totally sure until the boy’s mother Tanesha stopped by to see the progress and covered her mouth with her dark hand while tears dribbled down her cheeks.  Her two boys had been talking for days about what they had been doing for her, and how it got them thinking about starting their own home fix up business.  She mentioned that until then, they thought Xbox gaming was their future after high school.
Calista finally spoke up to Blakes look of astonishment.  “Let me take your coat. Would you like a hot tea?”
“Huh, what?”  Blake turned his attention back to her.  His eyes trailed from the place her robe tied, up her body, stopped at the perky nipples poking out of the robe, and then up to her eyes.
“You got a minute for a hot tea?  I just got out of the shower and was thinking about a hot tea and a movie.”  She smiled while her hand was out to take his coat.
“No.  I can’t stay.”  He shook his head no as his hands wanted to not only take his clothes off but hers as well and find out what was behind those thick dark curtains that were drawn.  “Wait?  The water heater.  You told me it wasn’t working.”
“I got it fixed, the temperature needed to be turned up, but there is a leak.  Slow drip.  I emptied the tank this morning, a lot of rust gunk came out of the hose. I think it might need a new water heater soon.  Other than that, the stove is shot.  Not that I cook a lot. I had bought a convection microwave and I picked up a hot plate at the hardware store, but yeah, no stove.”
“Let me take a look.”  Blake turned his attention to the stove first. 
As Blake messed around with the stove, first by testing buttons, then by pulling out from the wall to make sure it was plugged in, Calista felt her nipples peak with excitement.  His body in motion, even with clothes on, peeked her sexual interest even though his resounding words of business and pleasure don’t mix echoed in her brain.  She mentally scoffed at that idea and reminded herself that she had ample years of the dating scene to conquer.  Although, her mind could do nothing but think about how nice it would be to find a man like Blake to pass time with when she wasn’t busy with the shop, and with passing time, she was thinking about the sexual pleasure kind of time.  She leaned back against the wall, folding her arms under her breasts, and smiled down at Blake who just cast a strange glance up her way.
Blake had to wonder, was the seductive way she just positioned herself so that her robe opened to maybe nothing underneath on the bottom and her cleavage calling to him like a canyon he wanted to explore with his tongue.  He quickly got up from his knees after closing the lower stove drawer and towered over her body that was only inches away.  He paused because his body wanted to untie that robe and fuck the ever-living pleasure out of the woman looking up at him with blinking blue eyes.  Instead, he turned and went to the kitchen sink to wash his hands, not that they were dirty, just that he needed a moment of distraction, and cold water might do the trick.
Blake spoke out over the running water.  “Sure thing, it’s toast.  Not a huge expense, I might have a good working one over in my storage center for all my rental buildings.”  A place that was stocked with his industrial art furniture, appliances, and anything associated with remodeling and repair.  
He turned and could not help but softly smile at Calista as he dried his hands on her purple kitchen towel that had been set next to the sink.  He walked by her and motioned with his hand towards the utility closet.  “I’ll take a look at the water heater.”  It was due, he knew that, but had kind of put it on the bottom of list of things he needed to do; now it got moved to the top, but this was a job for a local handyman named Larry Stiles.  He just did not think being in this woman’s apartment, with her dressed like that, sex in a robe, it was like she had just done her hair and makeup for him, although she looked good at the grocery store, and even better naked on a stack of liquor boxes.  Holy shit, he needed to get out of there.
“I told you.”  She chimed up cheerfully as he turned from being on his knees to look at the leak on the water heater closet.  She handed him a hot tea, which he took out of politeness, but he was not going to stay.
The smell of cinnamon spice tea filled his nose.  She was looking at him over her gray coffee cup with words on the side, that said, ‘Fill Me Up’.  Holy shit, he imagined his cock filling her up.  He set his hot tea on a wood and metal coffee table he wouldn’t mind knowing where she bought it.  He shook his head no.  He needed to get out of there before he did decide to take his cock out and stick it in her hot warm places.
Calista set her tea down on the table next to his and reached out for his hand.  She could not deny the feel of his hand in hers was alluring, but the resistance to hold her hand told her that he was uncertain as to why she grabbed at his hand.  She smiled at him and tugged.  “Come on.  Let me give you a quick guided tour around.  I bet the place looks a bit different.  The Forest boys worked for me the last week and half, getting the place together.  I could hardly sleep until I got the place in order.  The café is next.  Over the holidays.  I have a slight remodel for the place.
He dropped her hand and she turned to him while he gave have her a raised eyebrow flat smile look. 
“Don’t worry.”  She teased with a smile that almost spoke out like, hey, Blake, come stick your cock in my mouth and I’ll let you plant your face between my legs.  Or so he thought to himself.  He shook his head and listened to her mouth moving and talking, although the words were not completely registering.  
“I’ve owned a coffee shop before; all my remodels have received great appreciation.  I actually, thought about being a decorator once, but my mother insisted a degree in business was in accord while I raised my son.  My business degree made me a coffee shop owner back in Utah.  Although, I could have been a coffee shop owner without one.  Business degree that is.  It was just a choice back then, more or less, my mother’s choice, but I followed through with it, even though my heart was really into helping people and decorating.”  Without even a single deep breath she continued talking more out of nervousness, rather than chattiness.  “To the right, is the dining table for four that can expand to seat eight.  Not that I really know eight people that might want to eat here yet, at least not until I get a stove.”  She laughed.  “Upstairs is my dressing room.”
Blake remained silent while she walked up the stairs in only her skimpy robe, purple fuzzy socks and a happy go lucky gal kind of look on her face, as he followed her thinking only of stripping her naked on the stairs he built.
The moment he walked into the small room of ten by ten feet, he felt a waft of female energy breeze over his body.  It was well lit.  Another hanging chandelier, a large cream-colored plush chair with a matching ottoman.  Those fuzzy pillows everywhere, mixed with the same grays and purples as accents.  Floor to ceiling leaning mirror, and more clothes, shoes and accessories than he needed to see.  The only thing that held its appeal was a lingerie bag from a well-known retailer sitting on the floor, and some lacey things placed on the floor next to it.  He let go of her hand and turned to walk down the stairs while talking over his shoulder.  “It’s nice.  Really.  Listen, I’ve got a guy that will call you.  Larry Stiles the local plumber.  My business has a contract with him.  Sorry, but I’m running late.”  
He was already at the bottom of the stairs.  The moment he turned to see her standing at the top of the stairs with a hurt look he half smiled.  “Sorry.  Quickly, show me the rest.”
She practically ran down the stairs in a flittering fashion, causing her robe to expose some short shorts underneath.  Good lord, he needed to get out of there before he took the robe and everything else off her body while begging for a fashion show of lingerie down those stairs.
She pulled hard and fast on the thick dark gray curtains.  As they rolled on o rings to the side, there was purple sheer material everywhere.  She pulled a set aside on o rings and in the room, was another chandelier, dimmed to a very soft warm light.
Blake stood there, staring at a huge king size bed.  No light was peeking in anywhere.  It was dark out, but usually this space had some filtered outdoor street light coming in.  The room was a deep dark dungeon of sex lounge look, purple, gray, creams, fur, pillows, candles – everywhere.  There was a huge rectangular ottoman that looked like a couch without sides, and in that instant, his cock was hard, his mouth watered for her naked skin and for the first time around a woman in a long time – he was utterly speechless.
Calista spoke up first.  “So that’s basically it.  I have a huge writing desk that once it’s delivered, the boys need to put together, but that’s going in front of the front windows out there, facing to the street and beautiful horizon view.  Shoot, if I live here long enough, I might inquire about buying the building.” She thought he might like her décor job, but then again, he was just staring at her bed.  She wanted his opinion but sensed something was extremely rigid in him tonight.  It was as if was on guard.
He turned to her and looked her straight in the face.  “I own the building, and this apartment.  That might be hard to buy seeing as I have no plans on selling it, which reminds me, how come your name is not on the lease for this or the coffee shop?”
She was taken aback by his sudden frosty demeanor.  She closed her robe with her right hand as if to protect her heart and felt her eyes water.  “Okay.  I guess I did not know you owned it.  The paperwork stated JBJ Enterprises owns this and my shop.  My corporation, CCM, leases both.  First C is for my Aunt Caroline who was more of a mother to me than my deceased mother.  The other two initials, obviously stand for Calista Miller.”
It was in that moment, that memories flooded her, emotional ones and her eyes watered and her nose ran.  She wiped an eye before he could see the tear that was about to fall, and she sniffed her nose.  “Sorry, allergies.”  She turned away from him and looked at her place.  She was proud of her design and all the hard work the Forest boys did on her place.  So what if she could not buy it, she would call it home as long as Blake let her lease it.
“Sorry.”  His apologetic voice whispered out, while his large hand landed on her shoulder trying to turn her.  When she finally did, he stopped resisting.  He pulled her body to his, letting his lips drop to hers, pursuing her hot wet mouth that tasted of a salty tear.
She fought him at first, but then her body succumbed to his desire expressed in his kiss.  
He felt the need to kiss and hold her as long as he could, because he was not going to take it any further than that.  He did not have a condom and he knew he had to stop.  By the time he did, she was trying to get his coat off as her robe had fallen slowly off her shoulders.
“I can’t.”  He stopped her and stepped backwards a step as he considered her confused pained face.  “Look, I have a personal thing. I don’t mix business with pleasure, and you darling are business.  You and your CCM corporation could cause me some serious issues if things went…”  He paused not sure what the right word to use would be.
“I see.”  Calista’s instant defense took over.  Her head went high, while her robe fell the rest of the way off.  Her nipples were poking out of her navy blue ribbed tank top, as her mouth issued words of dignity her body did not feel.  “I appreciate you stopping by.  If you can just share the plumbers contact with me, I’d appreciate it greatly.”  She turned to her shoulder bag that still had his whiskey travel size bottle in it, that was setting on the couch next to where they stood.  She reached in, grabbed a calling card with the corporation name and phone number.  
He stared at the card.  It was all there in print, her corporation information and the local PO box he knew, his was there too.  
He stuffed the card in his back pocket and wanted so badly to say I’m sorry and then strip her naked, fuck her until she thanks him for what she needed so badly on her new boudoir bed décor.  Instead, he frowned and looked down before looking at her; she had a distant hard edge to her face now.  For the best, he told himself.  He had digits of a willing blonde in town, that he could get a quick relief with, thinking it was Calista and no one would be the wiser.
By the time Blake left her loft, the chill from the outside air, stayed inside.  As she poured herself a tall glass of red wine, her phone dinged with a text from his cell, sharing a contact.  She accepted the contact and put Blake’s cell phone number in her phone under his corporation name.  Then in name she put Kansas – giving the man a sense of stranger’s name again.  She opened her sleep aid prescription pills, took two instead of one, with a large swallow of wine.  She figured she would call the plumber in the morning; she was in no mood now.  Which got her next plan in action.
She was tired of men ruining her mood.  She had worked hard on this place and it looked spectacular.  The moment she had Blake in her apartment she wanted to strip him naked and fuck his brains out, no commitment or drama.  Having him this close, tasting his lips, his tongue mixing with hers, she was beyond horny.  Instead, he had to go all “I don’t mix business with pleasure’.  She let his words in his voice repeat in her head while she practically gulped her wine down and poured another glass.  She clicked her phone’s Bluetooth and sultry music poured out of the hidden speakers in the main area.  She dimmed the lights and reached to turn the heat up, which was included in the rent.  She was going to heat this place up.  She walked to her closet upstairs, wine glass in hand.  She looked around her dressing room and imagined a naked Blake sitting on the cream chair, hard cock, begging her to come to him.  She slipped her tank top off over her head, pulled her pajama shorts off, and dressed in a pure silk lavender knee length slip.  By the time she was walking back downstairs, to refill her wine, vibrator in her other hand, she had the perfect movie to watch in mind, and it was not some women’s life time movie show. 
Snuggled on her couch, soft cream fur blanket under her, female mixed with male orgasmic moans coming from her tv, she set her refilled wine glass on the wood coffee table, leaned back into a set of pillows and hit the on button of her personal pleasure toy.  
Really, who needs a man, when you got contract labor and a vibrator.  
Chapter Six
Redhead Seeks Revenge
As Calista sat in the beauty shop chair at Darlings local main hair styling salon, where all that is anyone in Darling went, she had a mission.  Dioltas Hide Out was doing okay, but she wanted to get out and socialize with the types that would get business to her coffee shop.  What better place than the main beauty shop in local downtown Darling, two blocks from her coffee shop, one block from the police station and right by the high school where those teenagers with disposable income needed to start frequenting more often.
The gal that was supposed to give her some fall color lowlights was running behind with her previous client.  Nothing new, Calista was used to that.  After spending an hour this morning talking to Larry Stiles the plumber aka older man flirt, she left him talking to himself in her apartment to fix the two things that needed fixing, the stove and the water tank.  After last night, she was fixed good and happy with two orgasms, before crashing hard, naked on her couch, with the heat blasting her place at seventy-five degrees all night long.  She chuckled internally thinking about the heating bill Blake was going to get; but she knew she would probably be more reasonable with the heat after last night.
She blocked out her entire day to run around town and hand out her promotional cards.  The beauty shop card was every fifth coffee free with twenty-percent off all lunch items.  Rarely, did a hair dresser frequent a coffee shop before nine am.  It would be more likely for a late lunch run that she would see the employees from this shop.  The police station, she wanted to hand out cards for fifty-percent off every purchase as long as they wore their uniform in the coffee shop.  This would give her place better security.  The previous owner Milly had several break ins, and one robbery the year before she bought it.  The last stop was the local high school DECA club where they are to hand out punch cards for every tenth drink is free under five dollars in exchange for her speaking to the class about running a small business.  If there was anything, she knew well, it was teens, and there was a good chance they’d make this a hangout if they felt welcome.  She had the new digital register set up to help her counter help with all her promotions she had planned.
By the time her new hairdresser gal, Remi, was ready to do her hair, she had her mind going a million different directions but somehow always ending with the kiss Blake left her with.  It was passionate yet, withholding, as if he wanted to tell her that yes, as she already knew, he was an incredible lover, but that he was not hers – but then again, she had not been trying to give him the available vibe.  If anything, she held her head high and backed down when he turned her down.  But that kiss he left on her yesterday, that made her think of a million and one different things about Blake.
“Calista?” Remi called out in question.
This was her second trip to see the gal, but she must have forgotten who she was.  She needed to get to know her, ask her questions about herself so that she would remember her.  She did a great job on the trim last time, that she was ready to explore a bit of fall colored lowlights to spark up her October mood.  Weather was changing – why shouldn’t she?
“How’s your day going?”  Remme chimed out as she wrapped the black cape around Calista and clipped it in back.  She began to run her fingers through Calista’s hair which felt heavenly.
“Good.  And yours?”  Calista replied while looking at the slender dark-haired girl in the mirror.  She had some shade of dark blue streaked through her black hair.  Her dark brown eyes had quite the makeup job on it, only someone of youth could easily pull off.  Her pale skin had a slight sunless tan look to it, which their spray tan specials were prominently promoted on the shop front window.  She looked to be in her mid to late twenties and the tattoo of two names on her wrist made her think they were kids but could be something else.
“I’m a bit tired.  Late night last night.  I went to the pub on the edge of town.  Finnegan’s.  Two for one shots and large happy hour buffet.  I am working through a bad break up.”  Remi’s voice lowered to a sad tone on her last few words and then she forced a happy smile on her face while looking at Calista through the mirror in front of them.
The bar, Calista remembered well.  Her first night in town and she decided to recklessly check off shag a stranger off her list.  That stranger, Blake, was now her landlord, and someone she could not get off her mind even though she wanted to as a break from men might do her some good.
“Do you know the place?”  Remi asked, which broke the mental image of Blake plastering her against the storage room wall, kissing her, taking her clothes off, and then the moment when he lifted her onto some heavy-duty box with something glass in it and began to stroke his cock in and out, causing the glass to jingle – that memory was broken by Remi’s voice asking if she knew the place.
“Uh, yeah.  Decent place, I guess.”  Calista answered as Remi dropped her hands to her shoulders.
“We should go there sometime, ya know, gal’s night out.  Now, what are you thinking?  Appointment notes stated fall colored lowlights.  I love this color of blonde by the way.  It appears to be natural?”  Remi’s voice held a note of sadness while she asked Calista, practically a stranger, to go hang out with her at a bar.  
Calista had to wonder, she knew her age of thirty-nine did not always look thirty-nine, on most days, she was called out for looking mid to early thirties.  But she was new in town and making friends was in her top agenda.
“I’d love that.”  Calista quickly chimed out while glancing up in the reflection of Remi in the beauty chair mirror.  “So, I was thinking fall colored lowlights.  Maybe some red, some caramel.  But while I was sitting out front, I saw this picture of a woman in a soft reddish blonde hair and thought, damn that is pretty.”
Remi smiled in the mirror at her and pulled a section of her hair up in her hand and then out.  “Low lights or red colored highlights for the fall is like on every woman’s check list right now.  Not many women, can pull off that shade of red, but you can.  It would look spectacular.  If you don’t like it, my last half of my day is empty, we can always change it and I’ll only charge you half the cost of new color for the second color.  Sound good?”
The thing was, Calista did not have all day to play beauty shop.  She had a huge list of things to do and a quick color job was one of them.  Could she really pull it off, a complete color change, versus some low lights in her soft light blonde colored hair?  Did she have the time?  She looked at Remi in the reflection of the mirror and gave her answer with a very wide smile and a nod of her head.
Two hours later, Remi was done styling her hair and then turned her into the mirror for the first time.  She looked at the soft red strawberry blonde before her.  Her blue eyes popped, her smile spread as she looked a bit vixen and a whole lot of someone different than the blonde hair woman that she had been all her life.  She ran her fingers through her hair and played with it.  Remi had done a great job.  This was her color, at least until winter.  Then she wanted to go with streaks of light blue on the underside that only showed when the wind blew her hair, or she wore it up.  She had seen it on a Toni and Guy ad in the hair color book out front and thought, now that would be daring.
Remi stood behind her, bent a bit so her head was above hers.  “You like it?  I mean, because I love it.  I want to take a picture of you and put it on my social feed.  I can get some new business with this color.”
“Sure.  Why not?  Just, please mention the coffee shop.  You know, as business promo.  I’d appreciate it.”  Calista answered with a huge smile on her face.  She could only see a sexy woman, who did not look sad after being recently divorced, looking back at her.  If this color looked great on a few other women and gave them the idea to come change their color, why not.  
Just as Remi stood up and turned to take a few steps away from the chair Calista was sitting in, standing behind her just a few feet away, was Blake, staring at her reflection in the mirror.  She had no idea why he was standing there; it wasn’t like he knew that she had an appointment today, but the look on his face was totally unreadable.  If he was attracted to her before, was he now.  Did he not like redheads?
Calista smiled at him and waved.  It was the moment he looked blankly at her staring, then turned to walk straight out of the store, that she did not care if he liked red heads or not.  But she did.  An imaginary image of a newspaper headline popped in her head.  Redhead seeks revenge.  She wafts that image out of her brain with an imaginary swat.  It wasn’t revenge she was seeking on Blake, but one of his sensual hungry man kisses that led to things that only made her moan.
She let out a huge sigh and thought to herself that if he didn’t like it, so what.  She would go find a new stranger to check off her list.  Seeing as Blake turned out to not be a stranger at all, but a man she saw almost every day around town, in her shop, and then when she had apartment issues, which in the beginning it was a lot.  But watching him walk away, little headlines of revenge popped in her head.  A loud metal clank sounded out, bringing her back to reality as another hairdresser’s color bowl dropped on the ground.  It was in that moment, that Calista realized all this revenge was not getting her the satisfaction it once did, and Blake, she did not want revenge, she wanted him – all of him, deep inside of her and more than once.  That thought curled her lips into a very satisfied looking smile.
Calista’s day carried on with comments from complete strangers regarding how beautiful her hair color looked on her.  It put an extra pep in her step and a smile around everyone she greeted for the rest of the day.  Everyone she handed discount cards to acted as if she was doing them a favor, instead of what she feared, which was them not wanting an outsider, of Darling that is, pushing their business on them.  Darling had a small town feel but was not the typical small-town size.  It had been growing rapidly in the last few years and from what she could tell, if you have some major players in the retail in town, they will come.  Most of the surrounding towns were much smaller, so maybe running a few ads in those local papers, might bring out of town patrons to her coffee shop when they came in town to stock up at the brick and mortar retailers that were not in their small town.
Back inside her place after a long day of promoting, she tossed her shoes off at the bottom of the stairs to her upstairs loft.  She thought about changing, but there was a good chance she wanted to stop at happy hour at Finnegan’s.  Not to see Blake, although that would be a benefit, but to see Jackie who caught up with her as she was walking out of the police station.  They had talked briefly about her hair, and Jackie convinced her to come put a flyer up at the locales bulletin board wall at the bar.  She already had a few pre-designed, so printing one out and going there sounded like a hell of a better plan than being alone in her loft.  Not that she didn’t love it, now that it was almost done, but she liked to keep busy, planning, listing, running, and when the silence settles in, so does the sadness over her ended friendship and marriage.  Most days it was easy, but there were those days, when the dishes were done so to speak, that she would sit for a moment in silence and think, never in a million years did I think this would be my life.  Wine tours with Stephanie, Europe traveling with Clay and Cole, and most importantly a life with love, happiness and family all surrounding her.  This new life was panning out, but the loneliness crept in one inch at a time when she was home alone.
The day had been warm but checking out the five-day weather forecast on her cellphone, a cold spell was moving in tonight.  She sat down on her sofa with her feet tucked under her, setting her cellphone off to the side, while she checked out the mail that she picked up from the post office, one piece at a time, tucking each white envelope behind the other.  When she was done, she tossed the stack of mail on her salt oak coffee table and sighed.  She would just make a few notes for tomorrows itinerary and then run up to her dressing room, find a warmer top to wear, slip on some sexy but sensible black boots in case of snow, and head out to the bar where the fresh memories of Blakes naked skin tingled against hers.
Her cellphone buzzed with a text and picture from Jackie.  In the picture, Jackie was holding up a napkin with a pen written message that stated, get your butt over here.  Her text simple read, ‘Redhead contest – winner, winner, gets a free chicken dinner.’  That caused a huge smile to spread on Calista’s face.  She got up off her couch, set her cellphone on the charger as she mentally contemplated what fun outfit to wear to Finnegan’s.
Just as she was about to ascend the stairs to her dressing room, a hard knock resounded at her outside door.  She turned to walk towards thinking who could that be?
“Calista, it’s Blake.”  His serious voice caused her to stop in motion.  Was he here to give her a hard time about the red hair, the fact that she accidentally dialed his cellphone and hung up after he left the hair salon, although she knew it wasn’t an accident, just her fingers wanting what her heart could not?  
She took a deep breath and hollered out.  “Just a minute.”  She looked down at the soft blue tunic silk top she had been wearing all day.  It looked fine.  She fingered the long-beaded necklace she was wearing and thought about the last time he touched her jewelry like he wanted her naked wearing it.  She fluffed her fingers through her hair and took a deep inner breath to get her confidence up just as she reached for the door to unlock and let the man in that had her on a yo-yo over what?  Whatever this thing was they had going on.
So, with a cockiness to her tone, she opened the door, leaned against the doorway seductively and teased out.  “What is it Kansas?  Business or pleasure?”  
She watched his large hand set itself palm flat against her door above hers and asked.  “May I come in for a second?”  He sounded all business, so she took a step aside.
With her breast peeking through her V-neck tunic length blue top, her nipples poking out past her white bra showing the darkness of the outline of her nipple and her simple black leggings just begging him to strip them off, Blake stepped in the apartment and did not answer those questions with a word but a lip searing kiss of the tongue twisting kind.  He was quickly figuring out he had no control around the woman, trouble or not, he wanted to be in her – deep.  The red hair only made it more so.
Somewhere or somehow, Blake had the door closed and Calista out of her soft blue tunic top.  He had his hands full of her breasts before he breathed out his first words. “Why the red?”  
His mouth was pulled away from hers.  His light green eyes appeared bright and shiny as he looked deep into her blue eyes for an answer.  Her breathing was so heavy she could barely answer.  “Why not?”  She whispered as her hands began to tug at the dark navy-blue shirt he had on.  The buttons were tight in their spot and she wanted to just rip the shirt off, buttons popping and all.
He looked deep into her eyes and hesitated before his mouth rushed back to hers.  His kiss held passion and frustration.  The rush to be in her was the hardest desire he would have to forego.  For now, he wasn’t thinking, he just showed up at her back door, wanting nothing more than to run his fingers through her new red hair, stroke every inch of her naked skin and slide his rock-hard cock inside of her, but instead he had to stop before that.  He had to have control, he reminded himself internally, while his hands and mouth were touching every bare inch of skin that he could get his hands on.
It took only a few steps, once he picked her up and she wrapped her legs around him fully clothed, before he had her lying flat on her back, on her big plush L shaped couch.  This couch with all of its pillows and blankets, all fuzzy and fur, it felt so girlie, yet so sexy with her laying on it looking up at him as if she was mentally pleading with him to fuck her, yet this time, unlike the last time, she said nothing.  She didn’t beg, plead or ask.  She just looked at him with desire and a softness to her smile that told him she wanted this.  He wanted it too, but he knew he had to stop himself before he went completely inside of her.  He would pleasure her, tell her that he has a loss of control but that his business and pleasure rules still stand.  This was just him, coming here, to taste her.
Before Calista could say anything, or wanted to say anything, she was looking up at the man she just could not get out of her head.  This is just sexual fun, she repeated over and over in her head.  You don’t know anything about him, really.  She told herself internally.  However, the moment he had her completely naked, while he was still dressed, and his tongue was dancing around her skin with his hot wet mouth teasing her, pleasing her and making her moan soft pleasuring sounds, she was lost.  Her will versus her desire was battling it out.  She wanted his tongue lashing he was teasing her with, but she wanted his hard cock in her.  God, she could only hope that he brought a condom.  Her body moved in reaction to his touch, his tongue, his fingers sliding in and out of her hot wet pussy while he looked up at her licking her clit.  She looked up to her ceiling, away from his glance of satisfaction as he ate at her pussy, filling her with his fingers, and making her think that this was just what?  
She told herself to stop thinking about the what and enjoy the now.  She raised her hips a bit in reaction to his mouth.  She let her hands hold her breasts as her fingers toyed with her hard nipples.  Her new red hair had a section that had fallen across her face a bit as she turned her head sideways during a long drawn out intensity that caused her to bite her lip and keep her from screaming.  
It was in the second that her body shook with a tremor of delight, that her lips could no longer bite back what she needed to scream.  “Oh my.  Fucking.  God.  Blake!”  She screamed his name; her fingers grabbed his dark brown hair and shoved his face hard into her pussy as she literally felt her entire body become a tingling sensation of electricity.  
He had her good.
It was quiet for a minute as the world around her, her world, tried to regain a bit of consciousness.  He was kneeling one leg on the couch between her legs, one hand on her knee, wiping his mouth with the inside his shirt he never took off and looked down at her.  She got the distinct feeling that perhaps, this was all that was going to happen.  She sucked in and breathed out a deep stuttering breath before asking.  “Can I return the favor?”  Not that she was a cock in mouth gal all the time, but she loved to make a man happy, hoping he would finish off inside of her.
His eyes said it all.  He had a smile of satisfaction on his face that he made her happy and the huge bulk under his dark denim jeans, told her he wanted more.  
“I had not planned this.”  He smiled and winked, acting causual.  “I did not come prepared.”  He stood up and took a step back.  
She leaned up on her elbows, letting her new red hair cascade down behind her as she closed her legs and bent her knees to lean them sideways.  “I can take care of you.”  She offered softly.  Knowing full well that she wanted his entire hard cock inside of her wet pussy and not just in mouth but if this got them this far, maybe next time they could play the bang the box game.
“I shouldn’t have come.”  He offered quietly as his demeanor changed suddenly.  
Calista watched his facial reactions that started to show a bit of defense begin to return; a signal he had given her before clearly stating that this was as good as it was going to get for now.  Someone, somewhere, had hurt him.  Because no normal man would do the things he does to her and refrain.  What business and pleasure did he mix before that caused him to be so cautious?  She blinked hard and fast to keep tears from falling that she felt stinging the backs of her eyes.  She raised herself up and grabbed a large grey feather pillow, setting it in front of her, like a shield, while quizzing him.  “Maybe you shouldn’t have but you did.  Come.  And I came.  And I am just offering the return favor.”  Her voice was not the sexy sultry vixen she wanted to sound like.  Her tone was deceiving her over her hurt.
“Calista?”  Blakes voice sounded out in questioning as he took a step back and looked at his surroundings as if he just realized what he had done, where he was, where he placed her before he slid his large muscular fingers in her, his mouth planted firmly between her legs.  “I…I don’t think I can do this.”
She stood up and had a firm grip with her right hand on the pillow that was still covering a part of her body.  “What is this?”  She seethed in slithering tone.
“This.”  He motioned to the couch, and then looked towards her bedroom where it called to him like a siren in the night.  “Us.  Sex.  Casual sex.  I don’t do casual sex.  I mean I do, I guess I don’t do casual sex with people I have to do business with.”
She dropped the pillow from her body but kept a grip with her right hand as the large pillow rested half on the couch and half against her now standing next to the couch.  “And why not?”  She smiled but it wasn’t a heartfelt smile, nor was it a come let me lick your cock smile.  It was a what the fuck smile.
“Do you?”  He asked with an inquisitive look on his face.
“Hard to say.”  She jutted out.  “Seeing as you’re the first business associate that I might even consider.  But hell, if I take my business elsewhere, who’s to say.  I just might.  I’m a free woman after all and I like sex.”  And then for added measure right before she threw the pillow at his head as hard as she could she added a sting to her tone.  “With or without men!”
No surprise.  He dodged the pillow and then took a step back.  With a calm voice he kept stepping back while talking.  “You are my renter.  I own your lease on your coffee shop and I think incase things went, I don’t know, crazy, then this might not be the best for both of us.”
She followed him with her eyes as he walked backwards and slowly turned her naked body towards him.  Her head high, her eyes wide and a fuck you tone to her voice.  “Well, I’m not crazy but you most certainly must be, because when a woman like myself, asks a man if he wants a blow job, he does not turn it down.”  She blinked hard to keep the tears back while her jaw tightened, and white lights started to dance around her head.  Her euphoria of her orgasm was gone, and a nasty migraine was tapping on her head.  She watched his jaw clench and release a few times before his soft voice echoed out into her home, actually, his building and her temporary home, but it was the place she wanted to call home by staying here a long time.
He cleared his throat and looked away as he spoke with guilt.  “I’m sorry.  It’s all my fault.  I have no control around you.”
He started for the door as her voice pleaded out.   “But why then?  We are grown adults.  If this is business, why can’t we make it just business?”  She could hear her own words clawing at the room, begging for salvation, wanting him to change his mind and in doing so, give up her own dignity, just to have a few great orgasms.  The old her would have thought she was crazy, then again, she lived the last few years of her life with two people that meant so much to her, just treat her as if she was no one.  Just as Blake was treating her now.  That she was just business he had a hard time keeping his hands off of.  Where was her dignity now?  She wondered as a tear fell down his face.
He started to say something but stopped at the sight of her tears and wavering in her voice as she pleaded to him, naked in front of him.  “Just go.  I don’t want to do this.  Just go.  I don’t like fighting.”  
She turned and walked into her bedroom.  The last image he saw of her was her sensuous naked body tempting him to follow while she closed her dark thick curtains behind her.  How he wanted to just go back in there, strip off his clothes, let her wrap her sweet juicy mouth around his cock and then slide it in her hot wet pussy until she withered from another orgasm.  Instead he softly talked to the air.  “I am sorry Calista.  It’s me. Not you.  I am truly, truly, very sorry.”  He cleared his throat and offered up what he could not promise.  “I won’t do it again.”
“Never say never.”  She whispered out, not even sure if he heard, but he did.
Blake heard the three words that sounded so pitiful.  He knew who hurt him, but what or who hurt her.  Jackie and Jenny had been mentioning things they heard, but he was not one to listen to rumors.  Those were things he usually tuned out.  The minute he closed her door and started down the metal steps, which each step felt like a cement block for his foot was landing on each metal grated step, he knew he had done something so stupid, so selfish tonight.  What was wrong with him?  Two consensual adults having sex, he swipes that way once in a while.  But Calista, after that first night they met and more, he knew, something about her, some alluring sexual part of her called to him, made him yearn for her, want her in more ways than sex – and that scared the ever-living shit out of him.
Blake’s heart pinched, and his mind reeled with the question – what had he just done?  He walked to his truck, started it up, without thinking he drove straight to his bar, where Jackie took one look at him and glared.  She must know.
“Just an iced tea tonight Jackie.  And the number three burger special.”  He adjusted himself on the barstool as Jackie leaned forward with a grimace on her face.
“A little-known fact – Jack!”  She said the name as if it was a mix of his name and you are a fucking asshole.  She continued.  “Not everyone is caught up in the Blake Special.  Some women might fall head over heels in love with you because I guess they think you’re sexy.  I know you for the kind human being you are, as for sexy – not my type.  As for Calista, that woman has her shit together.  Especially after everything she’s gone through.  She is sweet!  She is kind!  She is funny!  And, if I was a lesbian, she would be top of my got to get me some of that list.  You are one stupid asshole!”  She turned away as if she was going to help another patron that just sat down a few stools away, then she turned back towards Blake glaring, marched right back in front of him, leaned back over the counter towards him and sounded out her thoughts through a whispering seething noise that caused Blake to feel a pinch of pain behind his eyes.  “Not to mention the chemistry I caught onto the moment you two looked at each other.  She’s not some fly by night, I will leave you for an older richer man.  If anything, her finances match yours, or at least as close as any woman in this town might get to.”  She stood back up and glared at him.  “One Jackass burger special coming up.”
Blake was left speechless as Jackie walked over to her computer monitor to put in his order.  By the time she put his iced tea on a coaster in front of him, she seemed a bit calmer, so he thought he might try his hand at asking.  “Did she call you?”  He quizzed as Jackie turned to help another customer.  
By the time she walked by him, she hissed at him as she walked back and forth from behind the bar counter. “I texted her.”
She went and helped another customer and when she walked back by him with a glare she mouthed ‘asshole’ and walked by.  Blake rolled his eyes and could only imagine what caused Jackie to text her and when the hell did his kind of sister become bff’s with Kansas.  Holy shit, this was not the kind of mess he wanted to roll around in.  All the better he just leaves this situation alone.
His jackass special as Jackie called it was slapped down in front of him and a bottle of ketchup was smacked against the bar top next to his plate.
“Listen, Jackie.”  He started up with his soft toned voice he used to comfort his sister a million times.  “Things are complicated for me right now.”
She put her arms across her chest and made a humph sound.  “Not really all that complicated Blake.  As you and I are here right now, millions of people across the world are getting their hearts broken one way or another.  To not love is a loss.  To not pursue love is a tragedy.  I remember you telling me that one time.  Thing is, Calista is a fun mature woman that yes, she too got her heart broken, but she chose to move here and make a new life.  Perhaps she wasn’t thinking something like this would happen so fast to her, but then again, she said she’s not looking for serious right now.  She was supposed to come here tonight and win the redhead contest.  By the way, you get to judge and hand out the prize.  So, stick around a bit.”  She walked away before he could say a word.
As Blake ate his hamburger, he contemplated texting Calista, but his pride stopped him.  Or maybe it was the fact that if she forgave him, he would do something mean and replay the entire incident again.  He figured no communication was best for now.  Until he could get himself on track.  
When Jackie finally had a moment to stop back by him, she was less pissed off.  “By the way, Calista did not say anything to me.  She just texted she wasn’t feeling so hot and could not make it.  However, I just saw her an hour before that, and she was doing great.  Then, I happened to swing by the hardware shop and happened to take the alley way and saw you coming out of her place.  When I called her, she sounded sad and when I asked her, she said she was, but it was nothing I needed to be concerned about.  This is me, putting two and two together.  You and her,” she finger-motioned sex, “that first night you met, in the back room.”  She wildly motioned to the back room.  “Then, knowing you Blake Jones, you couldn’t get enough of the woman.  Remi is here tonight and said she thinks somethings up by the way you two were looking at each other at the salon.  Jenny said you talk about her a lot but then stop.  Whatever is going on in that brain of yours you better figure it out.  If it’s just sex, then let it be that.  If it’s more, you might be pleasantly surprised, seeing as Jenny and I have done a little digging on the woman.  But we are not telling you what.  Just that we approve.  So, pull that head of yours out of your arsh.”  She giggled as she always used the word ‘arsh’ instead of ass as a form on parental cussing.
“Jesus...”  He drawled out in exasperation. 
“Oh, he’s not gonna help you if you keep this shit up.  Go do some good humanity thing, like you always do, and leave the poor woman alone, otherwise, man up and ask her out on a real date.”
“It’s none of your business, Jackie.”  He said it jokingly but as soon as he saw her reaction, he realized she had not taken it that way.  Ever since she became a mother, her fun joking side took a back seat more often than not.  
“Is it, Blake?  Because I think you know it is.  You are like a brother, an uncle to my son, but as a sister, I feel it is time to move on.  An older, wiser woman, would do you some good.”  She paused at his reaction to the words older and then added.  “Who cares if she’s a few years older, she doesn’t look it.”  
Blake interrupted her before she can say anything more.  “I don’t care about age.  Hell, besides age between men and women these days is a far different thing than in our parent’s time.  It’s me, not wanting to deal with her, and her recent baggage.  I just want a nice quiet life, nice quiet wife.”  He stammered knowing himself, that he was asking for the impossible.
“Do you, Blake?”  She teased and started to walk away before turning to look at him with a solid bit of advice.  “Nobody, and I do mean nobody, has a nice quiet anything – we all come with baggage, yourself included.  Ask yourself if your life would look better with her in it or out of it?  Sounds like she keeps following your lead.  Besides…”  Jackie drew out the last word with a teasing smile.  “I think you like you some bit of crazy darling.  I truly do.”
Blake just shook his head no as he laughed softly while smiling at Jackie walking away.  Her words echoing in his head, were starting to sound true.
“I think you like you some bit of crazy darling, I truly do.”
Chapter Seven
Women unity in mind is more powerful than a solar plant.
Calista cleared her throat while standing in front of group of twenty or so woman, plus or minus, that were here to experience Dioltas Hide Out Book Night.  Dressed in a deep burgundy tunic sweater top, black leggings and her knee high dark brown boots, she felt comfortable and confident about herself.  Tonight she offered free coffee, and complimentary baked goods as an enticement for the socially promoted women’s only book club.  It was like a reading club, but instead, others brought recent best sellers in excellent condition to be exchanged or auctioned off, with proceeds going to the Holly Clinic off Route twenty-two.  The Holly Clinic, as Calista had come to find out, was a health clinic that turned its extra building that wasn’t being used into a day space for homeless women and children only.  They were not permitted for a full homeless shelter, but a place during the day, where someone who needed it, homeless or not, but mostly homeless used it, for a shower, fresh meal, child care, and a computer to send out resumes or look for listings for affordable housing, which did not seem to be too much of.  
She cleared her throat in front of the crowd of women.  “Welcome to Dioltas Hide Out Coffee Shop, easier to just say Dioltas, but you get my drift.”  She chuckled with a warm-hearted sound she missed hearing from herself.  She looked around and smiled while thinking to herself, this, she missed this, being around other possibly likeminded women who were gathering together, not to get drunk or sell products, but to exchange thoughts and ideas.
Calista’s idea was to gather once a month, however, the turnout was better than she had hoped, and there was already chatter amongst the women before she announced the start of the event, that these women wanted to do something that made a difference.
“Yes.  You in that lovely red sweater, where did you get that?”  Calista started off the meeting by taking questions from several raised hands, which had not been her plan, instead, she wanted more of a casual open discussion, books exchanged, the rest auctioned off from which she had bought several just published best sellers from Amazon prime earlier this week to be placed in her store, but instead, decided to auction off for the cause.  What she had not expected was large book bags full of great books.  Tonight, was going to make a difference, she was sure.
“Several amongst us want to know, why the name change to Dioltas Hide Out?  Not Darling Hide Out, or just The Hide Out Café?”  She smiled and raised her hand again.
“Yes?”  Calista asked with a smile to the same woman she just asked her question from.
“The sweater, Tully’s Thrift Store on Main.  It’s five blocks from here.  She buys from estate auctions all over the world and then eBay’s them.  If you’re lucky, you get to buy before it sells on eBay.  It’s a rare vintage label in perfect condition.”
Calista raised her eyebrows and formed her mouth in a hmm formation.  “Is Tully here?”
A slender woman in her early twenties stood up.  She was ravishing looking.  She had on a vintage sweater of pale pink, which played nicely against her darker complexion, and dark denim jeans with some type of custom embroidery about the front pocket stitching.  She looked to be Indian ethnicity with her thick dark black hair perfectly flat and shining.  Either way, her brown eyes sparkled, her smile was wide, and her voice had a singer note to it.  “I’m Tully.  Sorry, I wasn’t expecting a sales pitch.  I think everyone here knows me but you.  We should talk sometime and get to know one another, but for now, I am dying to know – what is the meaning behind Dioltas?”
Calista’s eyes grew big with surprise.  She had not expected everyone to catch on to the name so fast.  She thought she was clever, but these smart women knew better.  Dioltas in Irish meant revenge.  With her strong Irish lineage on both her parents’ side, it seemed a fitting name.  Perhaps, her personal revenge should not have seen its way all the way to Kansas from Utah and put into her coffee shop, but at the time it seemed awesome, right now she was doubting herself.
“Uhm, wow!”  Calista started and then cleared her throat before taking a deep breath.  “Short version is so much easier than the long version, but before I do that, please understand that tonight is about raising awareness for the Holly Clinic, which a new friend just told me about the other day.  Thank you, Jackie from Finnigan’s Pub.”
A slight round of clapping filled the room.  Jackie stood up and then motioned for everyone to be quiet.  Because like most of these women, she wanted to know why the name revenge in the café.
“Okay.”  Calista started.  “I’ll tell you the short version.  The one where I look totally innocent.  The long version with details will come years down the road, after I feel I can trust you and perhaps several drinks of whiskey.”
“What kind of whiskey?”  Someone shouted from the group.
“Yeah, how many bottles to make you tell.”  Someone else shouted.
Calista giggled.  “Not many, but I’m was not going to answer that.”  She cleared her throat and fast blinked her eyes for a second.  “In the big picture of things, my new friends, I picked Darling Kansas.  I don’t know why.  Maybe it was the name, the place far away from where I came, or maybe it was the feeling I got when I came here with my Aunt, who is like my mother to me, and we bought this coffee shop almost a year ago, at the same time I served my soon to be ex-husband with divorce papers.  When I came here, the town spoke to me.  And believe you me, I wanted to be one of those women that got divorced silently while sneaking off to a tropical local, but something happened when I came here.  I can only describe it as my soul found music.  Strange, but true.”
She raised her eyebrows from looking down at her shoes, letting her lips press hard together as she realized she had a very captivated audience.  It would be so easy for her to start crying right now.  Tell her entire sob story to all these women, who she was sure most of them would console her, however she was over the consoling part, on to the revenge part and if she needed to explain her decision to name the café coffee shop Dioltas, so be it.
A deep breath in and Calista started her brief explanation.  “Three years ago, my best friend, whom we raised sons of the same age and were close friends themselves, decided, with my husband, that they should get caught having an affair.  But they did not know that I knew.  For two years, I calmly, cautiously calculated my revenge and escape from a marriage I kept hoping he would decide she was not the better choice.  In the end, financially I won.  However, they are currently buying their first place together as we speak.  I thought of revenge as an end to the means, however, that slowly changed.  The two boys are no longer friends.  My son has lost what hero status he stamped on his father and replaced it with the image of a middle-aged man gone awry.  I, on the other hand, had decided that revenge comes in many forms.  Seeking revenge on someone is…”  she paused and then said it, “fucking satisfying, pardon my French.”
The room lit up with laughter as all faces had been staring at her with sympathy.  She had not wanted tonight to be about her, so she quickly ended the explanation.
“However, the best revenge is to seek higher ground, burn that bridge and not look back or go back, find what makes you happy, make a list and check it often putting yourself on top, which I have for a change.  At forty, I am a mother of one son who is traveling Europe and plans to come back and get a masters in college.  He is healthy, happy and well adjusted.  That was my accomplishment for the last twenty years.  As for my marriage, there were good times, great times and several memories now marred by the two exes’ in my life.  I wanted revenge that felt like I had arrived.  I am in the best shape of my life physically or at least I haven’t felt this good since my twenties.  I hired a nutritionist, a personal trainer for those two years the two were cheating behind my back, thinking a better body, a happier me and he will choose me.  When he didn’t, I still won.  I look and feel good.  I wanted a business that made people feel good.  Serving coffee and baked goods, in a warm friendly atmosphere while spending some of my time giving back to society, with events like tonight, that is my revenge.  I tell myself every day that I felt lost in the chaos I called divorce that I’m back baby.  I’m back to the me I was before I met those two, and I am back to putting myself first, making lists and checking them off with success and plans.  And that in a nutshell is why I named this place Dioltas Hide Out instead of the other suggestions.  I guess I wasn’t thinking totally clearly yet.”  She chuckled.
Someone spouted out.  “You’re forty?”
Another woman chimed in.  “Seriously, thirty-five maybe at most, but where’s the gray hair?  The wrinkles, the midlife weight.”
“Ladies, tonight is not about me.  However, liposuction and Botox can be a good friend to keep in the emergency bag.  Seriously, nothing like a bit of revenge in the looks department to help a gal out.  This long hair, it’s a weave, the red hair – for the first time I might add, is compliments of Remi at Darling Hair Salon, these boobs, had a boob job in my twenties, because I was flat as a board.  This face, it saw a facial at the spa a lot during those two years that lying cheating, you know what kept telling me that he was late night at the office.  But I digress.”
“No.  Tell us more.”  Someone shouted.
“How about if you come back for the next monthly meeting and auction for the Holly Clinic.  It will be close to Christmas by then and we will be wrapping spa packages to give to the women who visit the clinic and small toys for the kids.  Food donations will be taken as well.  In the meantime, Jackie, if you would not mind taking over as this is your idea after all, I need to run upstairs to my apartment, I forgot I left my curling iron on with the excitement of getting ready.”
As Jackie stood up and came front and center, Calista found it hard to keep her composure with a smile on her face.  What she just did, what she just talked about, was now three years of hard pain staking heartbreak that she had only talked to a therapist about, but after tonight, obviously not enough.  She felt things she had tucked deep inside of herself, hoping it would only eek out at the time most convenient for herself.  Tonight, was not it.  Those questions were hard to answer, even if she only gave the short version.  The long version was painful and full of memories where she was not at her best.  
Calista took the cold metal steps to her apartment one hard step at a time.  Light snow had fallen and even with the metal non-slip tread, in her heeled dress boots, she needed to realize that she had to wear nonslip shoes on the stairs, and just change into her dress boots or shoes once down the stairs.  A small thing to deal with as the winter snow season approached, but she was tough, and she was creative, and damn it she was not going to cry until she had a tissue under her eyes to catch the tears.
The minute she opened her apartment door, she realized that she was not the one that had turned most of the lights on.  She stepped inside cautiously and looked around.
“Oh hey!”  Blake came around the corner with a metal tool in his hand and a look on his face that he was happy to see her.  
If Calista remembered correctly, the last time he left, they broke off, whatever it was that was going on between them, just as he suggested that what was going on between them did not keep going on.  In that brief second, his sexy smile made her forget that she was about to come up here to cry.
“Uh, hey?”  She softly whispered out but kept staring at him as if he was a nice plate of desert that kept morphing into a pile of spiked nails.  Her internal vision of wanting to eat him up versus the dangerous vision of what he kept doing to her.  She really did not need this right now.
“Sorry.”  He offered up gingerly.  “Jackie mentioned the thing going on downstairs tonight.  Kind of cool of you to offer your shop.  Listen, I never finished fixing those few little things on that list you texted me.  I know we, I mean I, kind of ended the other night with I’ll just send someone over to finish, but I figured, you know, that I should just do it while you are not here seeing as I’m not busy or anything and anyways, I left you some flowers over there on your table with an apology note.  That is if you can read my handwriting.”  He chuckled softly remembering how the blonde he dialed up last night had not worked out like he planned.  There had not been a good substitution for Calista, but he still wanted to keep this as friends, for now.  He had been harsh that night, and this was the only way he really knew how to apologize.
Her eyes opened wide while her mouth licked her lips with desperate need to kiss him.  In that moment, tears started to fall.
Blake could have shot himself with a forty-five.  What the hell was he doing getting involved or apologizing to a weepy dramatic woman.  But he had been known to be a great shoulder to cry on, a hugger of all champs, and a means to the end of sadness – which usually ended in sex.  
He wrapped his arms around her tight and kissed the top of her head.  “It’s only flowers and an apology.”  He teased.
She pulled out of his hug a bit too quickly for his liking, which bothered him tremendously.
Calista held her head high, although it felt incredible, his hug would lead her to more despair she could not handle right now.  I am a strong woman, she told herself internally before softly speaking out to Blake who seemed put off with her distance.  “It’s not that.  Sorry.  I just had a moment downstairs.  It’s nothing really.  I guess you caught me off guard.  I was coming up here to cry for a second, get it all out, regain my composure and freshen up.  Jackie is heading up the entire thing.  I just got caught off guard.”  She turned to the decorative mirror she had put by the door.  Wiped her eyes with her fingers and then took a few deep breaths as she plumped her curled red hair with her fingers.
Blake looked at his feet as he spoke out.  “Sorry.”  He knew that feeling all too well about finding composure after a breakup.  Jackie had given him an assumed reason for Calista’s moving here.  That was the main reason, he just did not see this going anywhere.
Calista turned and smiled.  “It’s nothing really.  I guess I’m just bummed everyone knows my real age.  That, and the fact that those clever women figured out Dioltas meaning.  Listen.  Lock up when you leave.”  She slipped her cute heeled boots off and slipped on her black Sorel Winter ankle boots she had set under the table by the door.
As she closed the door, she faintly heard the question that matched Blakes confused look on his face.  Either he was confused about her age, concerned, or the name Dioltas?
By the bottom of the steps her phone dinged with a text from Blake.  “Revenge? Huh? Age?”
She texted back.  “Forty as of last night.  Thanks for the birthday gift.”
He did not text back.  Perhaps it was in his apology note, she really did not care at the moment, because if she had stayed in her apartment a second longer, she was going to find a way to convince that sexy fix it landlord of hers to strip his clothes and hers and bring her revenge satisfaction delight – which meant more than one happy o was coming out of her body.
Sometimes a woman must hold her head high and move on.
Chapter Eight
Breaking up is hard to do.
Blake checked his list for things to fix note for Calista’s’ apartment.  He gathered his tools into his toolbox.  He wanted out of there before, she got back.  The coffee shop said she was expected to be most of the day running errands.  He left last night without finishing.  It wasn’t her age that bothered him.  He had been with older woman.  Calista did not look forty and if he had known it was her birthday, he might have let the business thing go for some personal birthday pleasure.  It was the fact that she was just starting to get her life together after a bad divorce and friend break up.  He did not want to be hurt by being the rebound guy again.  Not to mention she lived and ran a business in his buildings.  He knew that just keeping this thing between them as business associates was best.  The problem was that he wanted nothing more than to strip her naked and make love to her like a real man knows how, over and over, waking up in the morning naked and satisfied.  That was something his mind thought he was ready for, but not his heart.
Just as Blake turned from locking the apartment door, he felt something in his awareness of his surroundings.  As he turned, there at the bottom of the stairs looking up at him like a red headed sinful treat, was Calista.  He loved blondes, but the red on her gave her an edge look that spoke volumes in the naughty department.  Her lips curled up in a sinful manor as she stood at the bottom of the stairs looking up at him.
“My oh my, what have we here?”  She teased and started to walk up the stairs.
“Just finishing up.  You should be good to go.”  He replied coolly, as if her presence didn’t make him rock hard between his legs.  He tried to act casual as he took a few steps down the metal steps.
Each step they took, they looked at each other, drawing closer, Blake wondered why he was so hard edged about not mixing business with pleasure, then he remembered his ex-fiancé used to be his renter in a shop, which led to a disastrous heartbreak when she dumped him.  Every time she called him for repair, it was like a knife to his heart.  Nothing made him happier than to see her shop close for good.  Well not exactly, not seeing her around town, that made him find a way to get over his heartbreak.
Calista stood in the middle of the stairs blocking Blake from going any down further.  She smiled up at him with a naughty thought she kept to herself.  Her day had been a great success on the errand front.  She wanted to freshen up and head into the café for the rest of the day.  Her intentions were to not fly over the employees like a mother hen but keep them guessing as to when she will stop in, maybe keep them on their toes.  But right now, the way Blake was looking down at her from one step ahead, him blocking her from going up, she wanted nothing more than to take him back up into her bedroom for a midafternoon delight.  “Blake!”  Her excitement was in her whisper of his name.
“Calista…”  He drew her name out like a long shattering orgasm.
They both took a deep breath, took a step to the side and faced each other on the metal stairs, same step, looking at each other.  Blake reached up and gently pushed a long strand of red hair out of her eyelash that the wind just blew in.  She smiled at him and then her phone rang with Cole’s ringtone.
“It’s my son.  I have to get this.”  She grabbed her cellphone out of her shoulder bag as Blake continued down the stairs without a word goodbye.
As he sat inside his truck watching the apartment door close behind Calista, he thought to himself, a son.  She has a son.  He had not even thought of that being a part of his life.  He only thought of having her to himself, no strings attached.  But there were strings, plenty of baggage, and this was what he did not want in his life.  His sister and her kids were his family.  His desires could take a backseat for now.
Just as he started up his truck, the café shop back door opened, and Milly ambled out to wave him down.  He pushed the window button down and looked at the gray-haired woman that he bought his coffee from for as long as he could remember.
“Blake.  Glad I caught you.  I just called Calista, but her phone went to message.  We’ve got a problem.  With the plumbing.  Mind taking a minute to see what happened.  I was just about to see if Calista was upstairs.”
Blake turned his truck off and climbed out of his truck.  “I just saw her as I was leaving her place to finish fixing a few things.”
“Uh huh.”  Milly smiled at Blake while he rolled his eyes with a smile.
“Seriously, Milly.  You know me.”  He slipped his keys in his pocket, opened his back door and grabbed his small tool bag out.
“Uh huh.”  She smiled again with insinuation.  Blake was going to let it go for now.
“So, what’s wrong?”  Blake asked as he followed the old woman back inside the café.
Calista sat with her phone to her ear while listening to her son but thinking of the interaction that Blake and she had earlier as they passed on the alley staircase.  “I know mom!”  His crackling voice sounded exasperated, while trying to hide the tears.
“I’m not saying I told you so, but… ok, maybe it sounds that way and lord knows I hated that when others said that to me during your father’s and I’s divorce…”  her apologetic voice was quickly interrupted.
“This is not about you and dad mom!”  He practically screamed into the phone before disconnecting.
He was mad.  She could get that and if him yelling at her over his girlfriend dumping him then she would hold strong.  Although, he was right; this was not about her divorce to his father, this was about life throwing a wrench in his plans, or more like a whack upside the head – she should know.
She had a sense this was coming.  He decided to go off with two friends and tour Europe, and typical in fashion for Cole, he thought his girlfriend Katie should be waiting for him.  He was so much like his father some days, she wanted to scream.  In fact, sitting here, staring at her now silent phone, she could only imagine what was going through his mind.  In that instant, a migraine pierced her forehead and she set her phone down, walked into her bedroom, shut the curtains, and began a ritual she knew so well.
In the darkness of her room, she had closed her eyes, and tried to listen to the sound of her breath slowly adjusting to a rhythm.  What Cole was going through was nothing compared to finding out your best friend was sneaking around behind your back with your husband.  What was harder, was keeping it a secret, until she had proof that was without a doubt for the lawyer, along with a financial plan that she set into motion the day she found out.  
Outside of her room, she heard her phone ring and then stop.  She heard a ding from a text, and then another.  If it was Cole, she would call him back as soon as the Excedrin Migraine medicine kicked in, but for now, she had to breath and focus.  Her pain was not his.  She knew he was resilient and in two weeks, Cole would be out bar hopping in Dublin with his two buddies and there would be a girl.  For all she knew, maybe Katie had already figured out that his year in Europe meant for him that she stay solid and faithful, while he could taste all of the female flair in foreign countries.  Cole was his father, she knew that, and did not try to rationalize her own son.  Someday when he got married, she would have to keep her mouth shut and fingers crossed that he finds the one woman that he will not want to cheat on.  
As for Clay, he cheated before the marriage, during without proof, but along came Stephanie and she never would have thought that her best friend since Cole was born would be the one that he cheated on her with.  They shared so much raising their boys together, that she never would have dreamed of Stephanie and Clay doing what they were doing behind her back.
Thinking about it was not making the migraine go away, it was making it worse.  Her cellphone ringed again from the other room and then stopped.  Another ding sounded out and if she wasn’t stricken with the worse migraine in a long time, she would have conjured up the strength to go get her phone, bring it back into her darkened room and answer it, if it was Cole.
She rolled over onto her side, pushed her extra decorative pillow between her knees while reaching for the soft lush lavender throw blanket that she laid on the empty king size bed side.  The side that she shared with Clay for twenty-two years.
She felt her mind start to slow, realizing she was in such a better place now.  With Cole in Europe, he would get over this breakup with his friends, she just needed to stop talking to him about her failed marriage, and just listen to him until this too shall pass.  
Calista let her mind start to relax and thought about positive things.  Life had been getting better day by day.  The coffee house was making a great profit, which was part of her plan.  Her Aunt Caroline was doing great on her last Viking cruise; the social updates had brought her comfort.  The women in town seemed friendly every day that went by.  And then there was Blake, her mind always seemed to wander back to the man the enticed her with just a look.  He was like no other man she had been around.  He evoked feelings from just the memory of him, yet she knew that sometimes damaged people hurt people.  Was Blake that kind of guy?  Or was he so badly damaged his heart just would not let him fall in love again?  Calista did not want to be with a man who couldn’t be in love unconditionally.  Physically they were a match, but emotionally, perhaps they both still had a lot of healing to do.
Her phone dinged with a text again, but the sound was faint as her breathing and memories of sex with Blake was beginning to lull her into a restful state of napping.  She was never great at totally falling asleep, but a fifteen-minute nap, especially when a migraine hit, she was the boss at that.
Moments later, a feeling of someone sitting on her bed stirred her to slowly awaken.  However, the instant a large manly hand set itself on her shoulder, she bolted straight up in bed and began to scream while her hands where flying in the dark, trying to fend off whoever it was.  
“Calista?  It’s me, Blake.”  He removed his hand from her and got up from her bed.  He tossed her phone onto the bed next to her and then turned to reach over and turn on her small lamp next to her bed.  “I’ve been calling and texting you.  You didn’t answer and then when I knocked, I got worried.  Listen, a pipe burst at the café.  Larry is fixing it right now, but I thought you might want to know, it wasn’t a break, it was intentional.  Somebody fucked with your plumbing and I thought you might want to come see for yourself.”
She rubbed her eyes but kept a glare on her face as if to fend off his sexual energy that was causing her insides to turn with lusting heat.  He had awoken her from a sex dream, one where he was the major player in it, and she was being incredibly satisfied and about to scream out his name.  Thank goodness, she didn’t.  Standing now before her, he looked not like the man in her dreams that was licking her to utter pleasure, but like the man who had told her more than once that he did not mix business and pleasure.
She rubbed her eyes and grabbed her cellphone to look at it without saying a word to him.  There were several texts and calls from both Blake and the two gals working at the café.  As far as her son calling her back, not a word.  He hung up because he was pissed, and he wanted an apology from her first.  As usual, she would do it, but deep down, she could only hope that his buddies would get him through this, as she had her own battle to fight still, two actually, her sexual attraction to Blake that would do her no good, and the revenge she wanted to continue instilling on the two people that made her life a living hell for two years – Stephanie and Clay.
Blake cleared his throat and raised an eyebrow at her as he was expecting an answer from her.
“Sor…” she stopped herself from saying the entire word – sorry.  It was the one thing she knew she had to stop doing, apologizing for everything, when really, she did not need to apologize for him letting himself into her apartment that she rented from him.  “Wait a minute here.”  She rolled off her bed, set her decorative pillows back in place along with the lavender fur throw on the bed just right, and turned towards him wanting nothing more than to strip the man down naked and have crazy passionate no emotions attached sex with him.
“Come down, don’t come down.  I just thought you might want to see what Larry pointed out to me.  Pipe is getting fixed, but it wasn’t a bad pipe but an intentional break, so the cost is on you.”
She grabbed his arm and applied a grip hold to his bicep which was thick with muscles that Clay never had.  “Did you…”  She stopped midsentence as the touch of his skin under her hand did things to her no man had ever done.  It was a primal feeling of lust and need pulsing through her hand, carrying it through her body, making her nipples peek out.
He raised an eyebrow at her and looked down to her.  “You might want to tell the girls to quit getting so excited when you touch me.”  
His light laughter and motion to pull his arm out of her grasp left her feeling sexually frustrated mixed with altogether ready to scream.  He was walking out of her bedroom, leaving the curtains open behind him which led in a flood of noontime daylight.  She squinted her eyes and put her hands over her nipples.  Sure enough, the little traders, they had poked through her white tee shirt and white bra.  But how could he tell in the darkness of her room with only the small lamp on behind her.  Then again, she probably woke up with them that way from the dream she had been having.  Either way, he always seemed to get the last laugh when it came to her sexual frustration with him.  She mentally put buying padded bras on her list of things she needed to cope with being around the man.  Another bottle of whiskey, padded bras, dark sunglasses – to avoid eye contact, and zipper for her lip.
She reached for her navy cardigan sweater she had tossed on her bed before laying down.  Slipped it over her head.  It was in that moment she realized she had taken her jeans off to lay down.  She had been standing in front of Blake, half naked and he did nothing to make her completely naked.  She was not the type of woman to throw herself at a man.  She wanted him, sure, she thought to herself as she slipped her dark denim jeans back on.  She wanted him bad, she thought to herself by the time she had her keys and cellphone in her bag and was locking her door behind her.  But having him and wanting him were two separate things.
By the time, she made it down the metal stairs to the alleyway, the back door of the café was open, and Larry was packing his tools away into his white plumbing van.  Blake was in his truck and some thin young blonde was sitting in the passenger seat.  She turned her attention away from Blake and tried to focus on what Larry was saying to explain the intentional damage done to her plumbing in the cafe.  “What’s up Larry?’
“Well, as far as I can tell, someone cut your main waterline in two places so that as soon as the water was turned on this morning, the pipe would burst open.  Basically, flooding your kitchen area.  However, whoever did it, knew what they were doing.  They knew that the water would take the pressure down but not off so that your gals working this morning would not catch on right away, until the water started flooding out from behind the storage closet and out into the main part of your back-kitchen area.  Pretty sneaking if you ask me.  I mean if you’re going to cut pipes and have them leak, that’s how I would do it.”
As Larry kept explaining, Blake finally drove off down the alley passing them, at a speed one only takes off in to either show off, or show they are pissed.  He couldn’t be that pissed.  It’s only water, the building is brick and what’s a little drywall repair and mop up?
“Well, I’m sorry Larry.  I don’t know why one of the girls didn’t come get me first.”  She offered up wanting to mentally bang her head with flat palm because she had no reason to apologize.
“Oh, that’s alright.”  He lifted his shop vacuum up into his white work van full of plumbing repair essentials and then reached for a double carbon copy old style receipt book.  “I guess you could have saved yourself some money, ya know, mopping the water up but here’s my bill.”  He handed his handwritten bill to her but without letting it go as her fingers touched it to grab.  “Although, if we could do some kind of exchange, I could say, lessen the bill, or forget it all together?”  He quizzed while they both had their hands on the bill for his labor.
She felt her migraine kick back up.  Larry had been picking her up since the morning she called him about her apartment.  He is ten years older, and nowhere near the type of man she liked.  she would pay the bill.  She frowned and raised an eyebrow to toy with him a bit, let him down easy, and then write him a check.  “Larry?  I thought we talked about this.  I’m taking a break from men right now.”
He let the bill go out of his hand and looked down at his feet while slightly laughing.  “Oh no.  Nothing like that.”  He started up.  “See.”  He started to whisper.  “My sister is Alice.  The one you helped last week with her cheating boyfriend.  Well, word has gotten out that Revenge Coffee Shop, sorry Dioltas Hide Out Cafe, is not just a high energy drink place where you get a kick start for you day, but a secret club of women that are plotting revenge and taking action.”
She stopped him right there.  “Why Larry?”  She put her right hand over her heart and chimed out some sweet southern charm accent.  “I do declare.  I have no idea where you get your information from.”  She teased with a wink and then tucked his bill into her bra for a flirtatious kick.  She watched his eyes wander there to the crest of her boobs for a second and then looked back into her eyes.
“No.  No not that.  Although, you know if you want to take me up on a date, I’d be open to it.”  He started up.  “Honestly, I’m not sure what all it is that you women do late at night?  Drinking coffee or drinking whiskey, but Alice did mention that you were the best at plotting revenge.  See I’ve got this buddy of mine, well he was a friend, and he has been running his mouth off behind my back about how I lie about the fish that I catch.  Now, it’s gotten to the point where I almost punched him the other night.”
She decided to stop him right there.  Revenge on a friend, for twisting the truth and telling tales, not her forte, but revenge of a friend if he slept with his girlfriend, that she would help with.  She put a hand on his shoulder and looked him in the eye with a tilted head.  “Larry?  You know I went through a really bad divorce, right?”
“Yes.  Alice told me.”
“And you know that word has gotten out that I may or may not have, swear on my mother’s grave I will never admit to, a bit of revenge on my ex-husband and ex best friend who hooked up with my husband.  And I may have made some mild suggestions under the influence of Jack to the women.”
“Who’s Jack?”  He spat out fiercely with a tone of jealously.
She laughed lightly and pulled her cellphone out of her back pocket as it had just dinged with a text.  “Jack Daniels; the whiskey.  Excuse me one second Larry, I need to reply to this text.”  She quickly texted back to Sally at the front counter of her café.  ‘Yes, I will be there in a sec.’  “Sorry.  Girls are wondering if I am going to make it in to check on things.  I guess this is what I get for hiring some young gals to serve coffee and energy drinks.  As you were saying?”  She tried to confuse him with the conversation.
“No.  You.  We’re saying?”  He was still interested in her service.
“Ok.  Yes.  Listen.  I am good, no great, at serving up a dish of revenge.  However, it sounds to me like something else is bugging your friend and he’s reflecting his negativity on you, maybe knowing how nice you are that you won’t do or say anything, when really, his back-stabbing lies could have underlining meaning of something else altogether.  Best to just take him out fishing, toss back a few beers and then confront him.  If that doesn’t work, then come find me, will pull a number on him.”  She laughed half meaning it, half wondering why she let this revenge thing get so far.  Then again, she did name her business with revenge in the name, she just did not think the folks of Darling would catch on so quick.  Perhaps she really needed to examine internally what she wanted out of all of this.  Darling was to be a fresh start, not a replay of her last few years which were lonely and full of anguish.
“Listen, I’ll get you a check and drop it in the mail, or if you like I can just send you an electronic payment?”  She offered.
“Actually, if you want, no, never mind.  Listen, mail me a check.”  He finally stammered out.
As she walked into the back doors of her café, she was pretty sure that Larry wanted to switch the bill for date night and as of right now, that was not going to happen.  Money was not a problem, she made damn sure of that, and if she got to the point where she had to exchange labor work for sex or dates, she would just cash in on some retirement.  
The minute she reached the front counter, Sally was on her like lightening.  “Listen, Calista, I am really sorry.  I think Jimmy might have saw me punch in the code to get in the back door one night and after, you know our ugly break up and my revenge you suggested I do to him.”  She paused before continuing, looking distraught and meek before speaking up again.  “I might have told him that you gave me the ideas, and well, he might have decided a little payback was necessary.”  She rambled the last sentence out so fast that Calista knew.  Sally had not kept her mouth shut about who gave her the ideas for revenge and Sally was back with Jimmy.  Go figure.  Never trust someone to do your dirty work.  Things had to change.  She was no longer going to give these women ideas, she was going to make them take a pact, come up with the ideas themselves, and perhaps she might need to convince a few, like she did Larry, to try the higher road first. It was in that moment, the flashback of conversations she had several times with Jackie suggesting the high road was the only road that led to victory, did she wonder why she mistook youth for ignorance.  If anything, the proof that Jackie and Jenny, now best friends, and a hell of a lot richer after Pete died, did something so incredibly difficult, yet the reward paid off.
Calista let out a huge sigh of exasperation, as her mind whirled over Sally’s situation, Larry asking for advice, that she reminded herself that she was just going to keep her chin up around town, and silence worked better than helping others to dig deep up the dirt.  People could burn their own bridges with a torch.  It was as if this was the moment she realized all of the revenge she sought will never bring her satisfaction from the disaster, however a sexual moment with Blake, as frustrating as all of this has become, was the one thing that did bring her some satisfaction, even if most of her satisfying moments were imaginary in her sleep.
Sally’s voice echoed in the distance next to her about the idea she gave her on how to quickly disassemble Jimmy’s motorcycle, so it would not run, might have not been her best idea on revenge.  Men do not like you messing with their toys.  Luckily for Sally a customer walked in that she had to go help, while Calista churned in her mind that a long talk with Sally was overdue, but it had to be done in private, for now a word to the wise was needed.
Calista grabbed herself a cinnamon streusel muffin with a pair of metal tongs and set it on a small white china plate so that she could heat it up for thirty seconds in the microwave.  She waited until the customer was rung up and walking out the front door before saying anything.  “Listen Sally.”  She started up and stopped while she opened the microwave and then shut it.  As soon as she hit the add thirty second button and turned, Sally had a scared look on her face.  “I can only assume what you were doing coming in three Friday nights ago at three am.  Perhaps sex in the back area of my café versus your car or his truck was a great idea, seeing as you both live at home with your parents, but nothing goes on here I don’t know about, for the most part, and I was young once too…”  She paused and thought about the punishment and decided to take the high road.  “I think if, from now on, with Jimmy or not, don’t bring men in here late at night, and for God sake after I change the code on there tonight, do not, do you hear me, do not let anyone know the code.”  She watched the scared frantic twenty something motions her head up and down in agreement that what she did was not such a great idea and she would do what Calista said.
“Now.”  Calista started to continue as she pulled her muffin out of the microwave and then decided she needed a grapefruit red bull to go with it, she reached for the cooler while she kept talking.  “I think, that if you just tell Jimmy that you actually came up with the idea yourself, he might not decide to seek any further revenge.”  She offered up.
Sally shook her head no while looking at her feet and whispering, I guess.
Calista took that as a sign that Sally might be scared of Jimmy and her inner momma bear took over.  She set her red bull and muffin on the counter next to where they were standing and lifted the young woman’s chin up with her fingers while looking into her eyes.  “Has Jimmy ever hit you, threatened you?”  She whispered up in fierce confidence.
“No.  Nothing like that.”  Sally offered but Calista did not believe her entirely.
“Then why are you afraid to tell him it was your idea?”  Calista frowned and reached for her red bull and cracked the top open.  As soon as she took her first long sip, the pungent grapefruitness of the energy drink shook her senses a bit.  She needed a jolt after dealing with Cole earlier and then Blake, freaking Blake who was always on her mind and she needed to do something about that.
“Well.”  Sally started and then stopped.
“Well what darling?”  Calista offered up.
“Well, I kind of think that maybe things with making up were just temporary as I think he might be texting, you know her, the other woman?”  Sally offered up like it was a question.
Calista took in a deep cleansing breath.  She breathed it out and took another large sip of her energy drink.  She had been thinking that maybe this revenge bit was getting out of hand.  It was time for her to dole out a bit of relationship advice.  “Do you want to be with Jimmy?”  She asked.
Sally shrugged her shoulders and then turned to the front door dinging as a new customer just arrived.  
“I’ll take that as an unsure.  Real quick and listen up good.  Nothing gets a man more freaked out than if he thinks a woman is going to dump him or replaces him with another man.  If you want Jimmy, and talking to him doesn’t seem to work, then break up and be seen with another man.  He will want you back.  But if you don’t want to date him anymore, and telling him that you want space doesn’t work, because I have no idea how it works for you generation, each one is different, but then make yourself unavailable.  If he keeps dating that other chick behind your back, break up.  Simply put.”
“But Jimmy doesn’t work that way.”  She meekly peeped out and then turned to go help the customer that was just reaching the counter.
Calista sat down at corner table that positioned her to face most of the store with no one behind her.  She reached for her red bull drink and finished it off.  She got up and went to the complimentary refill coffee station, tossed her can in the recycle bin and reached for one of the many ceramic coffee mugs stacked up with sayings on them.  Today, it was the black mug with the words Wicked on it in gold script.  She was feeling wicked.  Wicked about Blake and a bit jealous of the woman in his truck, but she needed to get over that.  Wicked about getting a little dirt on Jimmy and figuring out what Sally really wanted.  ‘Jimmy doesn’t work that way’, kept echoing in her brain.  The one thing she could not stand is a man who used himself as a physical persuasion to what a woman does not want.  If Jimmy so much as had laid a hand on Sally, there was some serious revenge coming his way - and nobody was going to know about it. 
With only a half hour of mental evil planning, Milly walked in with a look on her face that told Calista, she was done.  She had overheard from the others that when she sold the place over a year ago to Calista’s Aunt Caroline, she had hoped to be done then, but since not too many offers were as good as CCM Corporation, then she decided to hang in there.  She only had about another week before the Thanksgiving holiday closing.  Calista had a feeling that today was her last day.
“Calista, do you mind if I talk with you.  In private.”  The aging woman smiled at her flatly.
Calista stood up from where she had been sitting and motioned that they head to the small five by five foot, one desk, two chairs stuffed in, office in the back kitchen area.  “Sure, what’s on your mind?”
Milly did not reply but rather grabbed a coffee cup with the snow flakes and poured a fresh cup with hazelnut creamer.  “I think this requires a cup or two.”  She laughed.
Calista refilled her own cup with decaf and sugar free salted caramel creamer.
 As soon as Milly sat in the only small wooden chair opposite of the desk chair, she took a deep breath and started right up.  “I have been wanting to talk to you.  I really need to just finish up.  Take a break.  My sister invited me on a cruise in Europe and I have wanted to go visit her for quite some time.  This Thanksgiving being the start of it.  I guess what I am asking is that I need to quit early.  I really want this and seeing as you have the place totally under wraps, making better profit in a week than I do in a month.  Although I think you are the star of all the attention.  Folks come in here to see you, and with you flittering in and out at all hours of the day, they come back more than once to catch your attention.  Your advice.”  She chuckled.  “Which by the way, this small town that grew out of its britches, is still a small town.  Let me give you a bit of advice.  Stop handing out revenge ideas.  Change the café name to something else before the sign you ordered goes up and makes it a more permanent damage on a café that I have built up from nothing and made it my life for the last twenty years.  I don’t mean to sound harsh.”  She stopped talking while Calista had a flat lined smile on her face, a returning migraine, and a realization that Milly, twenty-five years older than her was right in most sense of her meanings.  Deep down she knew it, she just had not really thought things would progress so fast.  In the heat of her revenge design over three years ago, she had not stopped to think that putting this kind of negative energy out into the world, might bring it right back to her.  Broken pipes and all.
“Please.”  Calista offered up softly while wanting to beg her to just shut up, instead she reached across the desk with a folder she already had in place.  It was an exit package.  It gave Milly the final payment two weeks ahead of time.  It gave her a gold star card that allowed her free coffee and tea any time she wanted.  It had a questionnaire in it along with a business card, from the local hometown journalist that had wanted to do an exit story on her.  And most importantly, it had a thank you card for all that she had done for Calista over the last year while she worked out her divorce.  
Calista cleared her throat while Milly asked.  “What’s this?”
“This is me saying thanks.  It is me saying absolutely, I understand.  And by what you just said, I have a lot of thinking do to before next week’s remodel over Thanksgiving.  I’ll give it serious thought.  I will, because you know this town better than me.”
“Well this was easier than I thought.”  She took the envelope in her lap and opened it to look inside.
“The final payment is in there.  I even tossed in a bit of a bonus as things have been going so well.  I would greatly appreciate you doing that newspaper article like we discussed.  I guess just keep it about you and not the new place would be perfect.  I hope you come around often to see the place after your visit with your sister.  In the meantime, please leave me a phone number where I can reach you if I have any more questions.”
“Before I forget.”  Milly stood up and held the yellow legal letter sized envelope under her arm.  “If you want Blake, you need to know his past and he needs to know yours from you.  If you have it in you to be patient with him, you will find he is one of the good guys that’s been hurt.”
“I’ll keep that in mind.”  Calista ended the conversation with a hand to show her out of the office and walked her to the front so that she could say her goodbyes to the staff that was on hand for the day.
Having, wanting, and needing are completely different beasts.
Chapter Nine
Don’t harsh on my holidays.
Calista did not know what was worse, the fact that Sally admitted that Jimmy had pushed her around a time or two, smacked her once extremely hard that it left a mark on her cheek for a few days, or the idea that Sally was saying he was not all that bad.  What Sally did not know, is that Calista did some digging on Jimmy and his dirt ran deeper than she could assume Sally knew.  Jimmy had a rap sheet at twenty-two.  He had been charged with rape, twice, but the charges were dropped.  He had stolen as a minor and once as an adult, always getting probation.  The stealing didn’t bother Calista’s much as the later charges she had read, it was the fact that one of the women he raped at eighteen, was now missing.  She wasn’t from Darling, Kansas, she was from Mexico and nobody seemed to care.  But Calista did.
The night was growing dark and Calista had just pulled up to her extra storage just outside of Darling.  She punched in her code to the Public Storage facility and watched the large black wrought iron gate begin to open.  As she drove her truck inside, she followed the alley between the storage units all the way to the back and far right.  She had picked that unit intentionally.  She parked her truck in front of the door and sat there asking herself, ‘is what you are about to do right, or wrong’?  
She did not have an answer for that, maybe a conscious, but after Sally did not show up to work last night, it did not take long for Calista to find out.  Jimmy had hit her after she broke up with him, and then forced himself on her.  Sally would not talk too much to her about it, so she let it go.  Or so everyone thought.  Leaving Sally at the hospital while her family surrounded her to support her, Calista felt something inside of her break.  
A degree of protectiveness had been growing over Sally ever since her first day of owning her shop.  Day by day, Sally felt like the daughter she never had.  She discovered the young woman’s vulnerabilities to the world and felt a need to protect her where her parents seemed to be failing.  Even while watching Sally’s face bruised to tenderness, her mother was asking her what she did to set him off.  Sally’s father seemed meek and scared against Jimmy’s well-known bully type family.
Calista did what she could by spreading word to those that might be able to help, but until Sally choose to press charges, Jimmy would be a free man and that bothered Calista the most.
A sense of loss of control was arising in Calista and she hated that feeling.  Between Cole not returning her calls, Clay putting an announcement on Facebook that Stephanie and him just got engaged, she was feeling like a raging bull.  A couple of customers had come in this week with snarky remarks to her about the name of her café.  She figured a few might not like it, but at the time, she thought it was clever.  On top of her crappy last few days, she had not seen Blake once, which she wasn’t sure why, but it upset her.  He was like her coffee fix.  Five minutes of flirt and visual could do a lot for a woman.  Cole, she knew would call her soon.  He had a temper like his father.  As for Clay, she should have removed him from her Facebook friends.  She had not gotten confirmation that this was real, or a tease to get back at her like revenge.  It had eaten her up for a day, but as she sat in her truck, thinking now, it was time to stop wasting her energy on Clay and Stephanie.  They ate up three precious years of her life with anger, deceit and she needed to just let karma do its thing on those two.  As for the café name, Milly was right, she would do something to make it correct; yet that was the last thing on her mind right now.
Blake. What to do about Blake?  She thought to herself and then got out of her truck with no clear answers in her brain other than to just ask the man for another night of fun.  Not that he seemed interested lately.
Inside the storage unit, was a small pull string florescent light.  Calista pulled it and looked around.  There, under the light, was the Kawasaki Ninja 300 in black with red accents that she had bought from a guy on Craig’s List, for cash, a few days ago.  She had plans for that bike at one point.  Plans to drive by and blow Stephanie’s brains out late one night, but she smothered that idea out with the image of herself in orange and twenty to life years wasted on that bitch.  However, buying the bike, dreaming of her plan, and doing nothing was actually therapeutic.  Her back up plan was to wait until summer and maybe take it on a scenic drive, not that Kansas was the most idyllic place for motorcycle drives, but she had thought of taking it up to South Dakota or maybe back through Colorado.  Back in high school, she had a friend that taught her drive one, before he taught her a lot of other fun things that involved sexual activity.  She mentally felt herself feel better with those memories.
She walked around the bike and thought how the bike’s original revenge plan of killing Stephanie was just a thought, and she never really planned on using it.  The VIN was removed, the bike had never been plated.  What she was about to do could very well land her in jail – if she got caught.
Instead of freaking out about it, she thought, putting the bike in her truck and covering it for its drive back to her loft – not illegal.  Putting on a man’s foam muscle Halloween costume on under an extra-large black hoodie and men’s jeans and work boots – not illegal.  Putting on a full-face helmet while going out for a drive with costume attire on – not illegal, however driving the un-plated motorcycle - illegal.  Carrying a nine-millimeter Glock with the serial number off of it, not being registered to carry, and taking said gun on her ride – illegal.  But what would really get her into trouble – was what she planned to do with the gun and Jimmy.
With the bike ramp out of storage and now placed on the back of her truck, she wasn’t even sure if she could get the bike in the back of her truck, but she was going to try.
As soon as her storage was closed and locked, Calista knew there was no going back, but she still had time to think about all of this.
No sooner did she get five minutes from where she wanted to situate the bike, Cole called.
“Hey Cole!  How’s it going?”  She chimed with enthusiasm even though her hands were shaking, and her mind was reeling with how stupid all of this was, not even knowing she could go through with it but just planning it, participating in it to as legal as she could, felt gratifying but at any moment, she was going to freak out if she took it any further.
“Not much mom.  I’m back in the states.  I stop by dad’s new place, but I don’t think there is room for me to be staying there.  It’s a two-bedroom condo downtown, and the other room is an office.  Brian is off at college in Cali.  I’m currently couch surfing at a friend’s place and well, I thought about driving out to stay with you, but you said it’s a tiny apartment above a café…”  his voice was questioning but he was not asking for what it is he wanted…yet she knew her son.
“Okay?”  Her voiced trailed out shaky to her own ears as she knew her thoughts should be on her son’s needs and not her own need for revenge.  She took a deep breath and began talking slowly and as calm as she could muster.  “So, yeah.  I guess with you taking off to Europe for the year during the final of the divorce, neither one of us thought about where you might live when you get back?”  She left the sentence off as if it was a question.  When Cole first found out about the divorce, he was a senior in high school and there was no getting any resolution out of him as to what his future held other than traveling through Europe and college as soon as he got back.  When he left for Europe, she decided she would deal with his living arrangements when he got back, knowing full well, Stephanie and Clay would not put a second thought into it.  Stephanie’s son Brian was going to college in California and as far as the plan was, at least what little she had found out, was he was staying there and not coming back to Utah.  
“So, I was wondering?”  He started again but ended the question with no question, which always drove Calista nuts.
“What?”  She could hear the clipped tone in her voice as she was officially irritated with all things male at the current moment.  Blake and the blonde he drove away with the other day and then nothing more from him, Jimmy and his inability to leave Sally alone, Larry and his insistence they just try a date, and Clay who never put his son first, only his dick – and now Cole, who needed his mom to think for him when really at nineteen, he needed to think for himself for a change.
“Well… I kind of spent all that I had saved for Europe, in Europe, so, I could use a loan to get a place.  I’ve got a line up on a job and a roommate.”  He eked out as she could now hear the sounds of the bar that he was probably sneaking into with a fake ID.
“Sure.  Two grand enough?  Listen sweetheart, I am glad you are back and yes if you want to visit soon, I would love that, but I have to go.  I’ll transfer the money into your account as soon as I am not driving.  About ten minutes ok?”
“Thanks mom!  Love you!  You’re the best!”  He practically sang out so fast that she knew that he was excited to be living on his own.  Twenty was young but not too young to have your first live out of parent’s experience.  He had saved his entire youth for the travel around Europe before settling into college.  She had put a lot of thought into this very scenario and realized as soon as the divorce papers were signed, and Clay was handcuffed to their old bed, in their soon to be old house, that as soon as Cole came back from Europe, it might be best that he did not live with either of them, until the smoke cleared - from the bridge that connected their marriage had blown up. Figuratively speaking.
After talking briefly with Cole, instead of driving the motorcycle to park in the dark abandoned parking lot, next to an old abandoned building, in a seedier part of town, she found herself pulling up to the alleyway of her coffee shop.  She put her truck in park and realized that her life had been one hell of a crazy ride the last four years.  Stressful – yes, but more so, five years ago, she never would have imagined her life as it is now.
As she sat with her truck off, in the dark, she remembered her life five years ago.  Stephanie and she had weekly barbeques or dinners planned together with the entire family.  Cole and Brian appeared to be good friends, many different interests, but the closeness of the families had kept the two boys growing up like brothers.  
Sure, Calista had wanted more kids, and so did Stephanie – or so she said, but the cards were not dealt in their direction.  By the time, the boys were in middle school, Calista really felt that as parents they had everything going as planned; retirement on track – check, her owning her own coffee shop close to home – check, business successful – check, Stephanie was a great best friend and like a sister – check, Clay and their love life was average but good – check, Clay’s career was taking off – check, Cole’s plan to travel Europe savings plan building from part time work after high school – check.  Life was pretty damn good – or so she thought.
As quickly as the happy memories flooded in, the bad ones took over.  The original notion that Clay was cheating on her.  The fact that she found ways to keep her head buried in her coffee shop business while Stephanie would accuse her of not spending time with her.  Stephanie had become needy, her marriage was crumbling apart, their family get togethers turned into monthly not weekly, and Clay spent a lot of time away from the house when she was home.  Then, the moment she happened to catch the two kissing in the parking lot outside a luxury hotel downtown, she remembered the anger, the frustration and the immediately planning of revenge.  Which she got.
She spent one full year planning her exit plan from their marriage without a soul knowing what she was up to.  She feigned a womanly organ issue with her husband to avoid having sex with him, not that he really seemed that interested.  She cashed in what she could and hid it in a separate bank account under her aunt’s name, with her permission.  She sold anything of value in the house on Craig’s List under her aunts account.  She made plans to sell the coffee shop, but still work there the last year of their marriage; she sold it to her aunt for next to nothing, who then sold it once the divorce was final.  In other words, she found financial ways to scar Clay, and it was worth every penny.  She bought Dioltas Hide Out Coffee Shop – formally known as Darling Coffee Shop, under her aunt’s name.  
Once the divorce was final, all financial reversals from her aunt to her was slowly, methodically, reversed back to her private off shore account.  As far as Clay knew, she got a deal on a rundown coffee shop far away from him and Stephanie.  That was why she bought it – to move away and start fresh.
She let her mind remember back to the last few months of their marriage, trying counseling first at her request, then a financial advocate, before the lawyers finally stepped in.  As far as Stephanie’s husband Darwin was concerned, he did not fight her, as he was already unemployed and decided to move in with his parents until he got back on his feet.  A hard thing to do when you are just turning forty.  Calista felt bad for him, but then again, he had never been close to her and always took Clay’s side on things.  Perhaps if he had been a bit nicer, she might have advanced noticed him when things were getting bad.
Calista blinked her eyes open from the darkness of her truck, to adjust to the bright overhead alley light that illuminated her back door to her café and the stairs to her apartment above it.  She frowned at the flash of memories of revenge she got on those two.  At the time, it felt so sweet, but in passing the relief to be out of the marriage was what she cherished most.  Her new life was really shaping up, so why was she so eager to seek revenge on a man that could land her in jail?  Why did she want to harm him, when deep down she knew that hurt people, hurt people.  She was starting to feel like a not hurt person.  There was nothing she could do about Jimmy but help Sally recover.  In that moment, she realized her thoughts dissolved in to thin air like dust in the wind.
She grabbed her black duffle bag of manly costume items, opened her truck door and decided to go inside and get something to eat to calm her nerves.  She was now sure that she did not want to go through with all of this.
The moment she set her bag down on the kitchen back counter, she forgot to lock the back door behind her because her mind was on transferring the money to Cole before he freaked out and called her back angry and fearful that she changed her mind.  She pulled her phone out of her purse and clicked the bank ap.  Within in a minute, the money was transferred from her savings account to his checking.  He was down to under a hundred dollars, so she knew it was necessary to give him this money.  She also knew the chances of him paying her back were ten to none.  
She opened the black duffel bag and pulled out the foam muscle man Halloween costume and set it on the metal baking table.  She laid the black hoodie, black bike helmet with a black flip down sun shade on it next to the hoodie, and then laid the Glock next to that.  She pulled out the men’s jeans and work boots that she was going to wear. She set the jeans on the 9mm Glock and the work boots on the floor.  She stared at all of it and wondered what she was thinking?
She frowned and heard her phone ding with a text.  Clay set a thumbs up emoticon and a heart.  She knew her son well.  He would find a job, work, and eventually get going on his college classes, but after the divorce and the last two years of hell at their house, he had needed that year off to travel.  Hell, she needed the year off to travel, but instead, revenge had become her normal, and her coffee shop was starting to feel like home – at least as best that it could.
The sound of someone knocking on the back door, caused her to jump back and grab one hand to her heart and her other towards the gun on the table.  “Calista?”  She heard a familiar but weary voice echo out from behind the door.
The moment Blake appeared with the black inkiness of the night behind him in the doorway of the back room of the bakery, she realized the man standing there could easily had been Jimmy out to seek revenge on her.  She quickly flipped the hoodie over the gun, but not before she was sure Blake saw it.  They both stood there for a moment, her all dressed in black and him in his usual dark jeans and blue flannel peeking out of his dark gray Carhartt jacket.
“Sorry.  Did I scare you?  I saw the light from the shop seeping out into the alley.  I was just leaving my office and decided to drive by this way…”  He paused and didn’t finish as he started to walk towards her.  He put his hand on the costume.  “Going to a belated Halloween costume party or is this something else kinky I might want to know about?”  he chuckled but she could sense the serious tone in his voice.
“I found it in storage.  It’s my son’s.  He’s kind of built like his dad, a bit scrawny, and he wore it as part of a Halloween costume.”  She quickly verbalized her explanation as her body language screamed out scared and lying.
“I see.”  He answered as his hand laid on top of hers.  “And the gun?”
“Uhm.  Protection.”  She mumbled out.  “I found it in storage too.”
“So, whose motorcycle is in the back of your truck?”  He quizzed as his hand pulled away from hers and he took a step back as if to keep the space between them.
“Mine.  It’s my motorcycle.  It was a whim purchase.”  She looked down where his hand had been on hers and thought how crazy it was that she missed his touch and that from one single touch she no longer wanted to seek revenge on Jimmy.  At least, not in the fashion her crazy frantic brain had come up with.  It was as if she was right back to crazy thoughts like she had before with Clay and Stephanie.  The motorcycle was a purchase to kill Stephanie, as was the gun.  Never thinking in a million years she would do it, but just putting energy into buying it and planning it she felt better.  Now, she wanted to put that energy into making love to Blake, but he seemed severely disappointed in her or at least the look on his face did.
The silence between them grew.  Yet their eyes starred at each other, soft, yearning, wanting to say something, yet each of them did not know what the other wanted to say.  The wind slammed the back door shut and Blake turned briskly as Calista clambered to his back for a second.
“The wind.”  He offered up and turned to hold her in his arms.  “I think we are both are a bit jumpy due to Jimmy, but I got a call about fifteen minutes ago.  He’s in county jail and nobody wants to bond him out.  Has nothing to do with Sally, so maybe some time in jail will do us all some good.”  His fingers lifted her chin up and he lightly kissed her lips.
Calista was the first to pull out from the hug and gentle kiss.  If he thought she could handle another night of Blake turn me on and turn me off, he was wrong.  She felt so very fragile at this particular moment, that all she could do was be strong.  She cleared her throat.  “That’s great news.  Maybe I’ll just lock the gun up in the bakery safe.”
“That would be a great idea.”  He offered up and then glanced at his phone that just dinged.
Calista couldn’t help herself.  “Blondie?”
Blake looked confused.
“You know, blondie from the other day.  She was in your truck after you left here, and I was stuck talking to Larry.”
Black chuckled lightly.  “No, darling, you are the only blondie I’ve been interested in for a while now.”
She smiled and looked down at the bakery table and then up into his eyes.  “Just call me red.”  She teased as her fingers touched and curled a piece of hair, knowing the strawberry blonde had faded into a very soft blonde with a bit of red.  Remi had already called her to set up another appointment for next week.  She was ready to go back to blonde.  Red was a thing, for just a fraction of her life.  She might do it again, but she needed to feel like her old self for a while.
She frowned when she realized he never answered about the blonde in his truck.  “Then who was the blonde?”
Without hesitating he answered with a smile.  “Megan, Jenny’s friend.  Her car broke down out front and was in the coffee shop when all the water commotion happened.  She asked if I could drive her home and her husband would swing by to fix her car after he got off work.”
“Oh.”  She responded and smiled.
“Yeah.”  He replied, and the silence returned.
She sighed.  “I feel better knowing Jimmy is in jail.  Now maybe Sally can focus on getting healthy, mentally and physically.”
“That would be great.”  He answered.
“Blake?”  She quizzed the air with his name.
“I’ve got to run.”  His phone dinged again.
“A date?”  She quizzed feeling out the mere suggestion that he turns her down since she was business, but he was still out looking for pleasure.
“No.  Jackie is having an issue at the bar and Randy is home sick with the flu.  I’ve got to run over there.  Care to join me?”
She wanted to; she really did.  But where would it lead?  And after the week she had, she just wanted to forget about her stupid idea she almost went through with and wake up in the morning thinking a new start was in order.  It was time.  The remodel time was fast approaching, and she needed to just be herself for a while.  No revenge.  No man.  No friends.  Just Calista the friendly coffee lady who knew how to make a customer smile.  She shook her head no.
“I get it.”  He offered with a frown.  “Can I at least help you lock up and walk you to your door?”
She laughed lightly.  “No.  Go.  I’m able to take care of myself.  I’ve got a few things to do in the office and then I promised Remi to meet her at the movies tonight.  I’ll be fine.”
Blake looked long and hard at her, and then to the gun and men’s clothes and back to her.  “I’m sure you will, but I wanted to ask.” 
He sounded as if he wanted to say more but than his phone rang.  “Yeah Jackie.  I am on my way.”  He started for the back door and turned and paused as he hung up on words to Jackie that he was getting in his truck now.  “I want you to know, that I think about you all the time, it’s just not a great time for me right now.”
“Me either.  Take care Blake.”  She offered as he walked out the door.
This time there was no sizzling kiss leading to push and pull, I want you, but I can’t do this.  This time it was concern, friendship, an honest comment that he too thinks about her all the time.  Maybe when things settle down for the both of them, maybe not.  But for now, she had no reason to keep the gun.  Jimmy was in jail, and Stephanie was not worth the bullet or time and energy it would take to carry out her fantasy plan to kill the woman that made her life hell for a while.  It took two to tango on that.  They both deserved each other.  She grabbed the gun, emptied the chamber, letting the bullets fall into the trash.  She reached inside the bad dough trash and grabbed a glob of expanded yeast.  She wrapped a bunch around the gun.  Put the blob of yeast and gun inside a black trash bag and chucked it in the trash.  She then walked over, locked the back door that Blake had closed.  She emptied all the trash cans in the front area onto the trashcan that held the gun.  She flipped off the lights, grabbed a few chocolate chip cookies.  She grabbed a coffee cup in yellow that read ‘morning sunshine’ and filled it with milk from the machine.  She took a quick glance at the men’s costume and clothes and set her late-night snack down.  She grabbed the bundle of clothes and costume, tossed those in the trash as well, and then proceeded to her little bakery office to eat her cookies and milk while ordering office furniture and supplies off Amazon.  She did not have a movie planned with Remi.  She felt like a rebel without a cause.  Then again, sultry images of Blake popped up in her head.
A rebel without a cause can easily be entertained by a sexy man.
Chapter Ten
Side roads lead to spectacular scenery.
The day had finally approached.  Calista took her final plans of the remodel and laid them out on two of the café tables pulled together.  She had an electrician on his way over, the Forest boys for help, and all of her employees were required to work today, two days after Thanksgiving.  She had wanted to do the remodel over thanksgiving, but not everyone else’s timeframe matched hers.
It was a quick two-day remodel.  Most of the bones stayed.  The kitchen was getting a new industrial oven, much to Ben’s pleading, she gave in.  Luckily, she found a buyer for the old one, shearing some of the unexpected cost off the price of a new one.  The main sitting area was to have everything removed as a fresh coat of paint was going up, local artist work for sale was going on one wall, while the rest of the shop was to have new furniture and effective lighting to bring the café a nice touch.  The front counter was to remain the same, with a few minor changes.  Luckily the floor guy worked over thanksgiving eve to get all the old carpet in the main area pulled out, and the laminate flooring installed.
As Sally set up a food and beverage catered table in the kitchen area, Calista glanced over her notes of to-do’s one last time.  On the bottom of the notes, in a female scribbled print was – have an adventure.  She smiled at the handwriting.  She was sure it was either Sally or Jackie, who had been coming around a lot more with Jenny as the three got to know each other.  Jackie had suggested that the local interest in her story of divorce was escalating, perhaps putting some rumors to rest would be best.  However, Calista wondered if it was just Jackie and Jenny with piqued interest, or maybe even Blake, who had been rather cold and distant when she turned down Jenny’s offer to come over for Thanksgiving dinner.  Instead, she made sure the flooring was good, things around the café were ready for the remodel, and then spent over ten hours doing her online shopping – having all of her gifts shipped to the shop, except for Aunt Caroline’s.  She was not up for traveling, during the snowy season, so Calista promised her a visit after the holidays.
With almost everyone there, Calista turned her attention to her cellphone, where a text from an unknown sent a message – have an adventure.  She frowned and deleted it.  Someone was trying to be clever.  She did not know who and she really did not have time to figure it out.  For now, the next forty-eight hours was about the shop remodel.  After that, it was all about the book club fundraiser, and then to follow her plans to spend some time with Cole when he finally came to visit her new business and home.  Her plans didn’t include a man right now, because if it happened, then she would deal with it.  For now, it was forward movement in business and personal inner peace.
A strange comment from Melissa at the end of the remodel sat in the back of her brain while they walked out.  “Going on an adventure soon, I hope?  You know somewhere fun for the holidays?”  Calista shrugged it off but with another unknown text suggesting an adventure, she wondered if someone was toying with her.  Then again, the stress of the remodel and this being her first holiday alone, she internalized that she was being paranoid.
The next morning, the finishing decorative touches were going in the café’s front window box that faced the street, Calista was pleased with it.  A few things she would have done different.  She had a more modern edge she wanted to put on the place, but Darling is a laid-back town, of casual hard-working folks.  So, she settled for the industrial café look that was almost universal in any decorator’s language.  Maybe next year, she’ll change a few more things.
As she turned off the lights, she walked out the back door, hit the new keypad with the new code for her, each employee got their own, and decided that she deserved twenty-four hours of just quiet alone time.  Just as she reached the top of her back alley stairs, her phone dinged with a text.  She waited until she was inside her apartment, door locked behind her, and her work boots off before pulling her phone out of her sweatshirt pocket.  The moment she stared at the words from the third text from the unknown phone number, she felt a bit precautious.  The words – want an adventure – stared up at her from her phone.  She was going to get to the bottom of this.
With her personal laptop open on a secured Wi-Fi line, Calista put the phone number into a paid search engine.  It came back as unknown, prepaid phone.  She let out a sigh of relief.  It was probably Clay trying to get a rise in her.  He used to pull these kind of romantic stunts before, but now, since her operation ROE had gone silent, she almost wondered if he realized that she had moved on.  This could be his way of reaching out, telling her he missed her a bit, and wanted to have some taunting banter.  It would not surprise her one bit.  Yet the thought nagged in the back of her head, she never gave him her new cellphone number and Cole promised not to.
As she sent the unknown texter a message back – I’m on one, thanks – she had a small part of her wonder, could it be a stalker.  She blocked the phone number.  As soon as her cellphone was set on the charger, she unlocked her large writers desk facing the window out to the horizon.  She reached inside the drawer, checked that the newly purchased and registered forty-five caliber gun had bullets, closed and locked the desk drawer, and then set the loaded gun next to her phone as a precautionary measure.  For the time being, she would be extra safe in her steps.
By the next morning, Calista awoke with a sense of adventure on her brain.  Screw whoever was texting her.  Her shop was reopening with grand opening specials, but all her staff was on board except Melissa since she had discussed during the remodel the necessity of cutting her hours to on call as needed due to the conflict of available hours since she took a new full-time job elsewhere.  She had already hired a new a young gal from yoga class to start today. 
It was in the first few hours of the business day, that she could see that her employees had the store handled.  What she needed was a long drive to the closest large-scale town to do some serious shopping, maybe stay at a five-star hotel, and get a massage.  A little get away from Darling you deserve it trip.  There were some things she had been wanting to pick up there at a few specialty shops and the drive and night away would feel nice for a change.
By the time she wandered into the back room, Ben and Sally were laughing and working.  “What a great grand opening day so far.  Everything is running so smooth.  Thanks to you two I felt like I don’t even have to be here.  New gal is working out nicely, don’t you think?”
In unison there were head shakes up and down and words collectively of absolutely, she’s great.  Sally was now acting manager in training, and Ben seemed more willing to hang around and work the front counter from time to time.  He had never truly gotten along with Milly the last two years, as she was always questioning his baking, but Calista’s freedom type management, seemed to work well with him.
“I have to run to Kansas City for the day; I plan to stay the night and be back in a day, possibly two.”  She offered up to the two in a fun mannerism.  “I think you can handle it for the next few days.  I’ll most likely be back late tomorrow, after the shop closes.”
Sally walked over to her and hugged her before casually replying.  “You take all the time you need.  Things are running smooth here, just like you planned.  You deserve some time off to shop.”  
“No problem.”  Ben replied.
“Well that’s settled.  I’ll have my cellphone if needed.  Sally I made you that manager’s binder for just in case situations; it’s on my desk.”  Calista looked to Sally as she shook her head yes.
By the time she was in her truck and one hour into the drive, Calista thought that a white truck with dark windows had been following her ever move.  She still had a little ways to go before getting to her first destination.  She pulled off to a gas station and figured she would see if the truck would follow.
By the time she paid for a red bull and a bag of sunflower seeds, she realized that it was all in her head.  An overactive imagination and a quick realization that maybe all this revenge stuff was turning its ugly head on her.  Once back on the highway, she decided to quit focusing on familiar vehicles and just focus on letting her mind listen to the music and enjoy the decent weather for the drive.
Parking a block away from the second shop she planned to visit in Kansas City, she noticed a white truck behind her again.  It had darkened windows, but it looked like every other construction truck around town.  
As she locked her truck and proceeded to walk towards the store, she grabbed her cellphone out of her purse just as a text sound dinged out.
“Hey lady.  Jenny, Remi and I are wanting to discuss the next holiday book gathering slash fund raiser.”  Jackie’s text read.
Calista quickly typed back.  “I’m in Kansas City shopping.  I’ll be home late.  Tomorrow?”
“We’ll stop by bakery around four after shop is closed.  That work?”
“It should.  See you then.”
Calista slid her cellphone back into her purse and looked around.  The white truck was gone.  It had to be all in her head.  She turned back towards the direction she had been walking before her text and realized she had walked right past the store she wanted to visit.
The minute she walked inside the small specialty boutique her cellphone dinged with a text from Melissa.  She read the text.  “Sally told me you are going to Kansas City.  Are you there now?”
“Yes.  I’m actually in this adorable boutique that has some items I wouldn’t mind selling at the bakery this spring.” Things between them had been civil when she cut her hours, or so she thought.  Melissa had sited she wanted to work full time at Target anyways.  Therefore, a casual text conversation of hey what’s up didn’t seem too unusual at the moment.
“Oh.”  Was all Melissa typed back, but the bubbles that she was still typing were popping up.  So Calista waited.
“How long are you going to be?  In that shop?”  Melissa typed.
Thinking back, Calista had noticed a change in Melissa after the Sally and Jimmy incident.  She had to wonder if something was up, but then she realized the early twenty something probably was bored or just wanted out of the shift she had Sally put her in tomorrow for the extra help.  She quickly texted back.  “For a bit.  Why?  Need something?  You okay to work tomorrow?”
“Yup.”  Then the texting stopped.
Calista starred at her text message for a second.  Was that a yup I need something or yup I can work.  She shook her head physically as she rolled her eyes.  She would be none the happier if that employee quit or went to work elsewhere for her side job money.  She took a deep breath and let it out slowly just a short slender brunette sales clerk came out from the backroom area and asked if she could help her.
Two hours later into her shopping, Calista was wrapping the new burgundy flannel blanket scarf around her neck as the cool air was whipping her hair around.  She was sure she parked her truck on this street right here, but it wasn’t there.  She had walked around the block twice, retraced her steps, and checked her cellphone for the picture she took of where she parked her truck.  It should be here, right here but it wasn’t.  She let out a loud sigh and realized, chances were, her truck was stolen.  To make absolutely sure, she decided to press the alarm button on her key fob while walking around clicking the button to see if her horn alarm would start sounding.  Nothing.  It was official; her car was stolen, and she had a sneaky suspicion who was up to the dirty deed.
While fuming over her stolen car, Calista got off the phone with her insurance agent.  She had two choices, or rather a few choices, but the state of mind of getaway bliss was gone, she did not want to stay at a hotel and get a rental car.  Instead, she texted out to Jackie first, then Jenny and Remi.  She just put it out there that her car was stolen, and she was working on getting back home.  Not but fifteen minutes went by, Jackie and Remi texted back.  To stay put, a ride was on its way.  A warm fuzzy feeling filled her heart thinking of her new friends and how helpful they always seemed.  She decided walking aimlessly around town, she did not want to shop anymore, but to find a salon for a pedicure and perhaps a shoulder massage until whoever it was that was going to get her showed up.  It was over two hours from Darling, so it would be a bit; she texted both gals back – whoever picks me up, there is a Village Inn just inside town off highway – I’ll be there.
Both gals shot a thumbs up text.  Which at the time did not seem suspicious at all?  Both gals had become fast friends just as Calista had taken Remi to hang with Jackie at the bar a few times.  
Trying to make the best of an awful situation, Calista had stopped into a small salon while walking towards the Village Inn.  One mani-pedi later, along with a fifteen-minute shoulder rub, Calista was now sitting at the restaurant just inside town off the highway, checking her phone and wondering who it was that was coming to get her.  She had been there for over an hour; she had already paid her check and handed the waitress a hefty tip explaining she needed to stay a bit longer until her ride shows.  A brunette with purple streaks in her hair was her waitress and she had been all too sweet to listen to her ramble on about her stolen car.  
About twenty minutes after she anticipated it would take for someone to get her, she was doubting her idea to get a ride instead of rental car.  In front of her was the second napkin she was shredding while her waitress had just topped off her fifth cup of coffee.  She let out a huge sigh and thought to herself how she just can’t keep this table much longer.  She was focused on shredding the last bits of her napkin when a familiar voice cleared his throat and joked.  “Your chariot awaits you my lady.”
Calista looked up, shocked to see Blake standing there in front of her at the tables edge.  He was dressed in dark dress slacks and a dark navy patterned button-down collared shirt.  His normal wear and tear boots were nowhere to be found, but a nice pair of men’s dark dress shoes.  Calista tilted her head and slowly breathed out his name in question as if he was a mirage.  “Blake?”
“Yes mam.”  He teased as he offered his hand for her to take to stand up.  The moment she did, she felt a rush of sensation that she tittered a second.  She had been sitting so long, mixed with her angered emotions over her car being stolen, or perhaps it was just the tingling rush of need the moment her hand laid inside of his.  “Long day?”  He added for personable measure.
“You can say that.  I thought Jackie or Remi were coming.  But thanks for driving out to get me.”  She offered in confusion.
“No problem.  I offered.  Do I need to get the check, or did you take care of it already?”  He offered just as the waitress walked up and teased.  
“Well if he ain’t a sight for sore eyes.  I’d be waiting that long too if I had a man like him to pick me up.  Maybe I ought to get my car stolen.  Good luck honey.  I hope you get your car back or at least catch who did it.”  She laughed and walked away.
Blake grabbed the shopping bags by the handles that were sitting in the opposite side of the table and put his other hand to Calista’s back as to direct her towards the front door of the Village Inn and out into the parking lot where his truck was parked.  The moment they were inside of his truck, Calista tried to angle herself to look at him while offering up a polite conversation as he started up his truck and waited for a car to pass to start backing out of the parking lot.  “It was sweet of you to offer, really it is.  I had thought about getting a rental car or just staying in town but part of me just wants to get back home.”
“Well, it’s no problem.  I’m sorry your truck got stolen.  Kind of makes your shopping trip cut short.”  He commented as he pulled out into traffic; acting as if this situation between them was just a normal friendly thing, but Calista knew otherwise.  She wanted to walk on the side of caution as it was a long ride and the fifth cup of caffeine jitters was starting to kick in.
“You can say that.  I mean I made the best of it.  I got a shoulder rub and mani-pedi special while waiting.  Paula my waitress was sweet to talk to.  Overall, I think I know who stole my truck and I don’t want her to think she got the best of me.”  She noticed her speech was in hyper speed.
“Your ex’s?”  He offered up.
“Yes, possibly… but mostly no.  I think Melissa from the shop.  Call it a strange suspicion but she texted me asking strange questions; questions like how long I was going to be shopping.  I don’t know.  It could be a fluke but overall it sucks.  Nothing of value was in my truck.  I had packed an overnight bag with a change of clothes and some of my favorite makeup, but I can replace that stuff easily.  I guess I could easily see my ex-best friend doing a stunt like this.  It isn’t like my hands aren’t dirty with a bit of revenge I pulled over on those two, but honestly I don’t know, or at least I am sure they don’t even know where I am living.”  Calista took a deep breath.  She was talking fast and almost immature like.  She was not this person, well at least she was not this person before the divorce.  Somehow the muddled situation brought out the worst in her and that was the part of her she wanted to leave behind.  If this stolen truck situation would teach her anything, it was to not over react, to deal with the facts, and be glad she wasn’t emotionally tied to that truck.  Just as she was thinking it, she spoke out into the silence in the truck as Blake seemed to be mulling over her last quickly rambled sentences.  “In fact…”  She let out a slow easy breath and started to talk slow and easy.  “I’m kind of glad my truck was stolen.”
A quick side glance from Blake with a raised eyebrow looked her way before he went back to focusing to the green arrow to turn onto the merge lane that would take them up onto the highway.
She laughed lightly and spoke softly, her voice competing with the soft volume of the country music playing on his trucks radio.  “I wouldn’t be spending this quality time with you.”  She practically purred.
A huge grin spread across his lips as he was merging into the far-right lane of highway traffic.
“I hadn’t seen you around much lately.  This is a special treat.”  She chimed up.  “You know a gal needs a visual ever now and then, ya know, business with a side of pleasure.”  She teased watching, waiting for his reaction.
The second his lips curled upwards and a soft looking glance was cast her way before he went back to focusing on the highway, Calista knew he wasn’t at all turned off with her flirtatious tease.  Yet, she was not going to take it too far, too soon.  It was a long drive back to Darling.  Before she said another word, he casually tossed out into the air of the truck.  “I’ve missed running into you.  Things got busy for me.  I kind of feel pulled in multiple directions right now.”
“How so?”  She quizzed.
Blake started to talk casually about helping at the bar and he was really hoping Jackie’s new boyfriend was serious about buying him out to partner up with Randy.  How Jenny and the boys seemed to need his every free moment and then he started to talk about a project he was hired to do but his words drifted off to a lull, so Calista intervened before he sounded like he wanted to shut down.  Just be quiet.  That was not how she wanted this drive to go.
“I hear ya.  About the pulled in multiple directions.  I thought moving here things would quiet down so much that I would be extremely bored all the time.”  She reached out and touched his arm gently with his fingers.  “I honestly do appreciate you coming all this way to get me.  It seems foolish now that I just didn’t get a rental, but I was feeling frazzled about my truck.”  She pulled her fingers away, but not before she noticed his eyes drift to her fingers for a second and then to her eyes with a loving manner.
“It’s no problem.  I really needed the break and the drive gave me time away from the office to think through a few things for work.  And a break from Jenny and the boys.”  He laughed at a memory he must have running through his mind.  “Jenny was the one that insisted I swing out to get you.  She can always sense when the boys are a bit too much for me.”
“One son was busy, and often I had his good friend, my ex best friends’ son, from time to time and it felt exhausting.  I wanted more kids when I was younger but as my business in Utah took off, I had a coffee shop there, a successful one at that, well… I guess I just went about life thinking there was more to life than just having kids.”
“There is, but I regret not having any of my own.”  Blake tossed out casually, but Calista could hear the hurt in his tone.
“So, you don’t want to settle down and have kids soon?”  She quizzed, knowing full well she had no intentions of having another child to raise.  She had been there, done that, and quite frankly not everyone was made for having kids, or at least more than one.  Her mother wasn’t.  Her Aunt never had any.  Her ex-husband would never been able to handle it.  Blake on the other hand, she could see him with several kids and a homely like wife, running a ranch, or coaching a soccer team.  She sighed at her own thoughts that she was not a true fit to his picture of familyhood.
“I did.  Want to settle down.  But that did not work out, then Pete died, and I stepped into the roll of uncle and father for my nephews.  Jenny…”  He sighed deep.  “Jenny was a mess.  She still is rather cold to the idea of another man being her husband, but watching Jackie date Conner seriously, she makes comments about missing a man around the house.  I fill in for some of the duties, but hopefully soon she’ll want to settle down again.”
Calista had to pry, because she wanted to know, was she wasting her time and energy on a man that would break her heart if she wasn’t willing to have another child, not that she thought they were even remotely at that stage of interest, but it was out there in her brain so she asked.  “So are you looking to marry, settle down, have kids of your own?”
Blake laughed.  “Are you asking me to marry you?”
“No.”  She laughed nervously.  “I’m asking you what kind of future you want.  Answer fast and don’t edit it.”
“I want to marry.  I want to wake up naked next to a woman that gets me and doesn’t want to use me for my money.  Has something to contribute to our life.”  He tossed her a glance.  “Sorry, that was a bit forthright.”
“No.  Not at all.  I mean don’t you find that at our age, me forty, you at what thirty-six, Jackie mentioned.  Well that at our age we can’t just play footsie and hope both adults are on the same page.  I for one do not want anymore kids, but if I fall in love with a man that has kids, then I will do my best to be a great stepmom.”
“So you…”  He stopped himself from saying what he was feeling, which was the fact that he had been wondering about; did she want to marry again, settle down?
Calista took the silence as he really didn’t want to talk about this, whatever they were talking about, so she changed the subject.  “I was wondering if you knew anyone that might want that motorcycle I bought.  It was kind of a whim purchase.  I think I’ll put it up for sale.”
“I never did ask you that night, so you know how to ride a motorcycle?”  He quizzed with relief the subject was changed.
“Yes, I do.  It’s been a while.  I think I was not thinking straight when I bought it.  Besides, I like riding on the back of a motorcycle with my arms around a man, focusing on the scenery instead of the road.”
“I’ve got a touring motorcycle.  It’s kind of dusty in my garage under its covers but maybe this summer we can take it for a drive.”
“I’d like that.”
“And yes, I know a guy that buys those kind of motorcycles.  I’ll have him swing by the coffee shop next week.  He’s probably already been in to meet you.  Dale Ferguson.”
“Doesn’t ring a bell, but I have met what feels like half the town in a few short months.  I really like most of whom I meet.  I feel very fortunate to have made some good female friends so quickly.  I was worried about that.”
“What making friends?  You’re a natural.”  He beamed with enthusiasm and reassurance.
“Thanks.  No, I know that.  I mean I love owning a coffee shop because of just that, the social interaction.  It’s the making friends I can trust feeling.  I was truly hurt with what happened to me.  I thought it would take years and fester.  I thought revenge would bring me satisfaction.  Which I won’t lie, when I was doing revengeful things to them and they had no idea it was me, nor did they know that I knew they were cheating behind my back, it felt awesome.  Back then.  It felt great.  But now, I look back and think what a waste of time.  I could have just gone on with my life and not had to be so malicious.  Jackie was right, taking the high road and forgetting about it does feel better.  It releases me from the pain, day by day, I think less and less about it and more about all the possibilities in my life, right here in Darling.”
“Yeah.  Jackie tried that one on me too.  I wasn’t revengeful, but I took a long time to get over the hurt.”
“Are you over her now?”  Calista questioned softly.
“Yes.  But weary.”  He tossed a crooked smile her way and then nervously back to the road as if this too he did not want to talk about.
So jokingly she tossed out.  “If there is anything, and I do mean anything, I can do to help you create new memories, you know in that department, you just let me know.  Because my first night in town is a memory that made me feel like my new life was going to be spectacular.”
“I might take you up on that.”  He teased back.
“That’s settled.  Offer is open.  Now, what kind of car do you think I should get next.  Definitely four-wheel drive.  I need the cargo space for the shop, and I was thinking a metallic silver, not like your truck but a dark metallic shade.  A fuel economy SUV…”  Calista kept the conversation light and inquisitive.  She kept Blake in question about his opinions, his degree in architect, his nephews, his sister, how he started his bar, to how he built up his empire of local real estate.  She kept the conversation off ex’s, away from revenge and hurtful feelings of betrayal and before she knew it, they were driving up a long beautiful gravel road where a nice looking ranch sat up on the hill.  He wasn’t taking her back to her apartment, he had driven her straight to his place, a place that Jackie said he never took a woman to yet.
“I hope you don’t mind but my place is on the way before town and I need to feed my dogs.  How do you feel about staying for dinner?  I can do a mean grilled steak and vegetables.”
Without a second thought, Calista acted casual as she stretched her arms and back while answering politely.  “I would like that.”
By the time two black Shepard dogs were fed and out of their kennel to run around on his fifty acres, Calista had accepted a glass of red wine to toast a cheer to Blakes bottle of bear.  
“A toast to new friends and new experiences.”  Blake offered.
“Cheers.”  Calista chimed out before taking a large sip of wine.  She looked around his place.  On the outside, it was very detailed, landscaped, like he put a lot of pride into his home.  An empty home of people she noted to herself.  One that she never took a woman to before, says a lot about a man casually asking her to come for dinner.
As he set his beer down to pull the steaks and vegetables out of the refrigerator, Calista noticed their taste in décor was very similar, less the purple accent tones.  He liked grays and blues, no cream colors anywhere but on the walls.  As for the furniture they both seemed to like the industrial farmhouse look.  Jenny mentioned he had hired an interior decorator to develop the interior of his place, but she also mentioned some of the furniture in his place, he made himself.  While she sipped on her wine, and Blake talked casually over his shoulder while prepping the food to grill, she let her hands run across a few pieces of furniture she was sure he had made.  One in particular, was stunning.  It was a dining table for twelve and it was made from a unique cut of oak with the wood grains splitting in certain parts that a vibrant blue epoxy filled the veins almost like a river running through it.
“This is gorgeous!”  She spoke out with excitement.  “Did you make this?”
Blake turned to look to see where she was indicating and grinned with pride.  “I did.”
She leaned into the table to examine closer the detail work, putting her in a very precarious situation from Blakes standpoint.  With her backside bent over the end of the table, her upper body towards him, while her silky looking blue blouse she had on that was once under a sweater, hung precariously low in front that he could see her blue lace bra and all at once he was hard.  He turned away just as she looked up to him from looking at the table, her blue eyes piercing him with nothing but sex.  All it would take for him to take her on his handmade table was the word go.
The next thing he felt was her hand on his shoulder asking if she could help.  He heard the words, but his mind was buzzing with naked images of their bodies intertwined and him getting a long overdue orgasm from hers truly.  Just as he turned to answer her, she let her hand down and was reaching for the wine bottle to refill.  It was in that moment that he thought the food could wait, but he could not.
He washed his hands in the sink to contain his feelings, hoping this instinctual need to be deep inside her would pass.  The moment he turned from the sink, dish towel in hand drying his hands, he saw the way she was observing him.  She had a sexy smile on her face, her eyes searching his body with desire, her body language relaxed leaning against the countertop and the glass of wine in her hands was the only thing between them that he could think that he needed to set down on the countertop.
The moment his hand reached for the glass to set aside, their open mouths searched each other, their breathing increased, hands were touching, clothes were being tugged at and Blake had to assure her that this time, this time he was not going to stop at her pleasure, this time he had condoms, a king size bed and deep need to be inside her, not once, but multiple times.
With her shirt practically off and nothing but those darn leggings and blue lace bra, Blake pulled away, to take a moment to speak his intentions.  Calista was working feverishly at the buttons on his dress shirt when he stopped her with his hands cradling her face as he looked down into her blue eyes twinkling with desire.  “Calista?”  He breathed her name in question.  “I’m not stopping this time, not at once, not at all, so if you have a change of heart…”
“Thank God, finally.”  She teased as she pecked his lips with a kiss and then went back to working hard and fast at getting him naked.  He had no idea how sexually frustrated he made her.  Fuck business, it was all about pleasure right now and all the rest they would deal with when they had worked their sexual frustration out of their system.
Standing in his kitchen, her in only her blue lace bra and matching panties, him in a pair of dark boxer briefs with a bulge that made her salivate, they began kissing slower, with more intention, easier breathing.  Her nipples poked through her bra wanting nothing more than his naked chest against hers.  She could feel his bulge pressed up against her, but they were still in his kitchen, still leaning against his counter and she wanted to be completely naked, her laying on her back while he slowly eased into her.  
As if he read her mind, he lifted her up, holding her ass in his hands, pressed her against him as the kiss turned carnal.  Tongues were dancing about, lips were pressed and moist, breathing was elevated, and Calista could not help but echo out her desires the moment their lips parted. “Take me to your room, Blake.”
He gently set her feet to the ground and grabbed her hand in his.
“I want you to fuck me in your bed.”  She teased with a smile while adding for pleasure.  “And not just once.”
A primal look of need and frustrations crossed his face.  He needed this, hell, he wanted it again and again since the first night they did it.  But could he handle what followed, after tonight, after things were supposed to go back to normal.  Jackie’s words echoed in his head like a flash – you like you some bit of crazy.  And maybe he did.  Maybe this was what he needed after all.  Before he knew it, it was her leading the way down the hall to the bedroom he showed her before with a quick – this is my home tour.
The minute they stepped foot into his room, Calista noticed that the sun had far passed set and the window curtains had not been closed, the moonlight was illuminating his room through the floor to ceiling windows plastered on either side of the large double French doors that led outside to his firepit area.  It was in that moment, she realized, this long-awaited venture she had sultry dreams about, were just about to come true.  Their naked bodies intertwined in hot passionate sex, going at it, over and over until they were so sated, this crazy burning desire she always felt for him, might relieve her of the ache she felt for him since their very first night.
With gentle strength he laid her back against his bed with a passionate kiss before standing back up to remove the final part that was keeping him naked.  With his underwear shucked off to the side, a condom from his nightstand tossed onto the bed, Calista with her body angled for him to remove the rest of her lingerie, yet he could wait.  He could kiss and lick every square inch of her, getting her naked, knowing that the moment the condom was on his throbbing cock, and he was sliding inside her wet pussy, he could not stop until he was so deep and sated.  Then she spoke out with a sound of pleading sex.
“Fuck me Blake.  Fuck me good and don’t stop at once.”  
He watched her unclasp her bra and shimmy out of it as his lips started to kiss up her legs, his hands spreading her thighs, stroking her skin until the moment his mouth parted her lips to suck on her wetness.  A serenading moan filled the room with pleasure to his ears.  She was his.  Tonight, he would make her cum more than once.  Tonight, she would sleep naked next to him sated and satisfied; come morning he would put a smile on her face once again.  And if this was as far as they took it, he would know, once again, what it felt like to be deep inside her, but he knew it would cause him to crave her even more.  He could only pray that this thing between them, could just keep going for a while until it didn’t.
All Calista could think about as her fingers clambered into his thick dark hair, pushing his head to press hard against her between her legs, while her mind screamed for her to yell out yes! Yes! Yes!  The only sound that left her body as a tremor took over was his name in question.  “Blake?”
His mouth left between her legs and slowly sated kisses on her belly up to her boobs, sucking each nipple for a second before pulling out to suck the next.  His eyes looked up to hers as his words echoed over and over.  “I’m right here baby, I’m right here.  I’m not done with you yet.”
A smile curled her lips at the thought of what she wanted so badly was going to come next.  The moment his warm skin separated from hers to reach over for the condom, Calista adjusted her body to lean towards him.  Her hand reached out and stroked the naked skin on his chest as he rolled the condom on.  She liked the feel of his muscles underneath her fingers, they way he was smiling down at her and how completely aware she was that this man held more power over her in a short time then in all the years she was married to Clay; that thought scared her a bit but she knew the risk was worth the reward, she just had to be patient.
The moment he positioned his body directly over hers, her legs parted as he slowly sank down to meet skin to skin.  The tip of his cock just at the wetness of her pussy but not going in just yet had her breath labored and her hands pulling at him to push inside of her.  It was her words that drove him in, slow and easy, filling her up with his hard-throbbing cock as she whispered out.  “I need you Blake.  I want you, this, us.  Fuck me Blake.”
Blake wasn’t a talker so much in the sense when he was focused on sex.  He was enjoying the sensation of his cock inside of her, the tightness surrounding him from her recent orgasm, the way her body moved with his, her slight gasping sounds of pleasure and moans of approval as each thrust in and out gently brushed her sensitive clit.  He cast a glance down to her face which showed pure pleasure and a smile.  Her eyes intently looking up to him while her mouth formed sounds of pleasure.  It was the moment she sounded out ‘you feel so good’ that he felt his own shutter of pleasure, the tense of his body, the hold of his breath as he looked upwards and closed his eyes.
As his body relaxed against hers, he felt her slowly roll him off and before he knew it, she was on top of him, looking down at him, her faded strawberry blonde hair cascading down over her shoulders with a look I’ve been happily fucked on her face.  The next thing he heard from her mouth not only stunned him but challenged him to arouse the big guy once again.  “I want more of you Blake.  I want to do this all night long.  Because if all we give each other is tonight, I could do it again, and again, and again….”  Her voice had a teasing laughter to it as her mouth lowered down to his for a passionate kiss.  Her breasts touching his chest and the feel of her pussy on top of him made him mentally aware of how serious this could get.  
He hadn’t had sex like this since his early thirties, with what’s her name before he realized for her it was all about money and not love.  Now with his fingers inside of Calista, her body reacting to his touch to finish her off again, her eyes looking lovingly at him as she moaned and encouraged his touch, all thoughts of painful relationships faded and he felt his cock twitch with the need to be inside of Calista once again.
He was almost afraid to reach inside his nightstand for another condom, but the thought of getting someone pregnant stopped him.  As his body rolled away, his fingers left her hot wet pussy, she rolled towards him and her hand reached out to touch him.
“I just need to suit back up.”  He joked.
Her reaction was a smile and a moan as she curled her body away, opened her legs while her hands fondled her breasts, her fingers toying with her nipples causing them to harden.  He looked at her as he rolled the condom on realizing how sexually content she appeared; how comfortable she seemed with touching her own body.  There was no awkwardness between them, not now and not the first night they met in his bar, which appealed to him more than she’d ever know.  Looking down at her body, he did not see a woman of forty but a healthy sexual woman who appeased his appetite.  It felt like they are a sexual match like none other he had before.  In his youth it was immature sex, but as he aged his desire to do things to a woman to please her was high on his list of satisfaction and right now, she looked satisfied yet wanting more.
The moment their bodies touched with tender stroking and a lingering kiss; Calista knew what she wanted.  She wanted to ride her Kansas cowboy and watch his face as pleasure erupted from his body.  She slowly maneuvered him to where she was sitting on top of him, looking down, her body positioned on him, but he wasn’t in her yet.  She wanted to watch his eyes as she slowly slid on top of his cock.  Wanted to see how he reacted to her slow up and down motion, riding him in pleasure while trying to squeeze another orgasm out of him.
The moment she guided his cock inside of herself, she moaned with pleasure and tilted her head back for a second.  Her hands fell upon his chest muscles as she leaned her head back down and looked into his eyes.  Her body began a rhythmic stroke of back and forth, a slight up and down, a squeeze of her inner muscles and then back and forth.  His hands were on her ass, guiding her to go faster, she could feel his need, his desire building and hers was about to crumble.  Within seconds of unison breathing mixed with moans of pleasure.  Calista shattered.  Her body trembled with an orgasm while her mouth moaned out his name.  “Blake…”
As she fell limp against his body, sweat on their skin mixing with each other, Blake whispered softly into her right ear.  “You are the most incredible woman Calista.”
She let that sentence linger down to her heart. Where she knew she had love to give, big love, sexual love, love that last an eternity, and she wasted it on Clay.  Right now, as her body slowly recovered from their sexual acts, all she wanted to think about was how to make this last – forever.
As her mind whirled, her body withered and rolled to the side of him.  He held her in his arms for several minutes before whispering again, but this time it was typical of a man after sex.  “I’m starving.  You lay there all sexy and I’ll go cook us some dinner.”
As he rolled off the bed and looked down at her, she had rolled off to her belly, put her arms under her head with a smile plastered on her face.  “Sounds great.”  She whispered back, but Blake wondered if by the time he made the dinner on the grill if she would even be awake.
It was in that moment he knew; he was lost to a woman named Calista and there was no going back to just business without pleasure.  Because right now, a million thoughts of how to pleasure her sexually and otherwise were running through his mind.
Sometimes the darkness brings the spectacular, like a shooting star erupting across the night sky just as the clouds dissolve and there is nothing but twinkling stars to tease you.
Chapter Eleven
Talk is over rated.
“Oh Darling, you can’t fix yourself by breaking someone else.”  He whispered into her ear and then his naked arms held her closer to his body.
Calista glanced up at him with her arm draped over his chest.  “You make that quote up or does it belong to someone else?”  She quizzed as she was sure she heard that line before, out of her mama’s mouth when she was little.
“Pinterest.”  He whittled a slow easy smile across his face which caused a perplexed look on her face.  Somehow the fact that he looked at Pinterest amused her.  A man so manly with all his muscles and sexual ways, sitting around with his iPad open to a an ap like that, well it showed his intriguing side that she knew was showing the more she got to know him.
“Pinterest?”
“Yup!  My sister sends me pins all the time.  That quote stopped me from breaking a heart that did not deserve to be broken.
Calista rolled her naked body over to raise herself onto her elbows.  She brushed her hair off to the side and looked down into Blakes eyes.  He had one arm behind his head on top of the pillow.  His other arm was under her where he had her wrapped up in his arms only seconds ago, but now she wanted to look into his eyes.  “Having a younger sister to be responsible for must be amazing?  I’m an only child and wanted a sibling so bad, and then once I became a mom, I wanted another child, but we got busy and truthfully, I wondered a lot, how often I might be a single mother.”  Calista shared that small piece of her past with him to follow up on the previous night’s in depth conversation.
“It’s amazingly awful when you’re a teen, but as we grew up, she was there for me just as much as I feel like I need to be there for her now.  She loves being a mom, and Pete had been a great dad.  Lousy husband, great dad.  I keep hoping one day she’ll meet another man to help her, and then maybe I can…”  His words lingered off and then his tone changed.  “So, your ex wasn’t too faithful then, I take it?”
“No.  I mean, he was discrete, but not until he decided that my best friend was a choice.  It’s not like I totally blame him, or totally blame her, I blame them both equally.  He was always looking, and possibly cheating, I had my suspicions, and she was lonely and needy.”  Calista sighed and laid her head on his chest.  “I don’t want to talk about them.”
Blake didn’t either, but he could tell they both had a lot to talk about at some point.  This position they were currently in, naked, sated, happy, wasn’t going to stay that way.  He had himself wrapped up in a project that consumed all his time, then there was Jenny and Jackie, always needing help with the boys; although Jackie seemed to have Conner to help now.  Things were working out in that area of his life, but Randy always needed help with the bar still.  He mentally shrugged off his responsibilities as his hand instinctively went to Calista’s hair and began to stroke it as her face had settled against his chest.  She was breathing softly but enough so that he could tell she was thinking and not sleeping.  He really wished the conversation had not started, because her cheating husband got him thinking about his cheating fiancé.  Perhaps they were not too different after all, at least when it came to being hurt by someone they loved.
It had been an interesting evening with driving Calista back from Kansas City.  He spent more time listening to her chatter on about the coffee shop back in Utah compared to the one here, her son and his accomplishments and her suspicion that Melissa had something to do with her truck being stolen, but he tried to let her know that cars get stolen all the time.  Although her strange texts and written message had an odd timing.  It wasn’t until he found himself driving her home, his home, that he realized that he wasn’t done spending time with her.
What started as a suggestion that she come inside his home for a home cooked meal and an evening fire with a glass of wine before taking her home, turned into carnal need for lovemaking on his king size bed, from both of them.  Now, as he watched the sun slowly rise through the curtains in his bedroom.  He listened to Calista lightly breathing, a relaxed look on her face had returned, and a soft cast of light against her naked skin that was not under the blanket any longer.  He let his mind reel with a replay of last night’s lovemaking, which it had, felt just like that, love.  There was heated passion, the first time, but more of a slow easy exploring, versus a heated I need this bad kind of feeling the second time around.  It was, as if, she was over the I need it phase, and now it felt more like, dare he think it, a relationship phase.
If Jackie had not called him from the bar, desperate about helping Calista because she had her truck stolen and she needed a ride home.  Why did Jackie call him?  Why did she call him to come get Calista instead of just suggesting she get a rental or stay at a hotel, Although he had to admit, the surprise on Calista’s face when he showed up at the Village Inn as she was sitting at the table shredding napkins and drinking coffee, was worth the drive.  Somehow, Jackie failed to say that it was not her that was on the way, but that she requested him to drive the couple of hours into the big city.  It wasn’t like he made that drive a thousand times before, often a couple times a month, but his visits were usually for a swipe on an ap and quick date, or something for one of the buildings or the bar.  He did not mind the drive, but this time, he had his mind spinning with questions about why he was so eager to jump at the opportunity to rescue Calista.  The last thing he needed was another responsibility.
But on the drive back to Darling, she kept insisting that she pay him for his time, that she really could have gotten a rental.  He recalled her repeating that he understands that she is a very capable woman and could handle her own dramas.  He thought of when she said that Jackie insisted she would be right out and it was no big deal, but on the ride home he asked her if the tearing of napkins would help her get her car back and she looked over to him in his truck with a sinful sexual smile and teased, ‘no but it keeps my fingers busy, that is unless you have another suggestion for keeping my hands from being bored.’.  And boy did a few possibilities popped up in his head, sexual possibilities.  It was from that moment he realized this little side adventure for the day, could not have been any more enticing.
As she had fallen asleep after lovemaking, naked in his arms, he laid there realizing how incredible this felt, yet his guard was not down, and his mind was thinking of ways to approach the topic, about where did they go from here.  This was not a relationship – yet, and it definitely, was not a swipe either.  This was two consensual adults, that more than once now, had sex that made him realize how much he missed having a woman like this, one that he was truly attracted to, to be with, versus a match on an ap and a willing participant for a quick date and a quick whatever.  He was starting to realize as each year passed after his heart was broken, by a woman how he couldn’t even say her name in his head, that he missed this, wanted this, but could he deal with another broken heart?
His mind was stopped with a soft hand stroking his body, in all the places that aroused him.  He gently kissed the top of her head and asked.  “Shower?”  
Her hand stopped, and her body crawled up on top of his.  She looked down into his eyes and had a smile on her face.  “Only if we lather each other up.”
The mere fact that she was just as sexually aroused in the evening as in the morning, told him that she did not have the morning after awkwardness.  She was every bit as interested in him – sexually, as he was her.  He guessed anything more could be dealt with later, for now, he let her take his hand and slowly lead him and his morning wood directly into the master bathroom shower.
Sexually sated and sitting at the handmade dining table, Calista’s cellphone dinged with a text from Sally.  She was at the bakery with Ben and she was handling opening.  Sally assured her that she could stay until closing; for her to take the day off if needed.  It made her smile as she realized, when Sally asked for the manager’s position, she was serious.  It wasn’t until Blake’s voice brought her back to the coffee he was pouring and the question of how she liked her eggs.
This was nice, she thought to herself.  The sex was incredible, better than Clay.  The drive brought them past a level of I want you, you want me, but he won’t mix business and pleasure.  Well, Blake Jones, she internally voiced, you just mixed it quite nice last night and this morning.
“You have a huge smile on your face?”  He teased as he cracked eggs over the frying pan.
“You sure I can’t help?  Sally’s got the café handled.  I was supposed to close and train today, but she wants the manager position so bad, she’s doing everything.”
“No.  I got this.  I cook for my sister and nephews all the time, and vice versus.  She cooks a lot of dinners for me to come by and eat.  We’ve made a great team at this.”  He offered
“It sounds like.  Things always go better when everyone works together.”  Her thoughts were distracted by a ding of her cellphone with another text.  Earlier this morning, while Blake was shaving at the sink after their lovemaking in the shower, Calista had put in an order for a rental car to be sent to the bakery.  She already found a car at a dealership that she ordered by phone.  It would be ready next Monday and until then, she would drive the rental car.
Blake quizzed her.  “Sally?”
“No, rental car place.  They are dropping a rental car off at the bakery in the next two hours. I hate to rush breakfast.”  She suggested that breakfast was the end of their sexual escapade.
She watched Blake slide two over easy eggs onto a plate next to some toast with butter.  She loved the way he looked in the kitchen in front of the stove.  Clay had never been a kitchen helper.  A fraud at the grill as he burned things more often than he cooked them, but he always insisted on being at the grill.  In the kitchen, never one meal was made from that man unless it was heat and eat from a box or can.  Blake on the other hand seemed to move effortlessly in the kitchen.  That, in itself, was a sexual bonus.
As he sat at the table next to her, he asked.  “You mentioned you ordered your car last night while driving home.  That was fast.”
“Eh, I guess I know what works for me and the bakery needs an SUV over the truck I was driving.  You know for specialty cake orders.  I had intentions on selling the used truck anyways.  It served its purpose to move me out here and I hope whoever stole it, it runs out of gas in the worst place.”  She chuckled.  “Or gets a flat.”
Blake was quiet for a second as he finished his bite of eggs with toast before stating something that had been on his mind.  “Often people do bad things for the wrong reasons.  If it was Melissa that stole your truck, perhaps it’s better to get to the bottom of why she did it.  Otherwise, you’ve already made a name for yourself in town on serving up revenge.  Naming the café, the way you did, really didn’t help much.  I think if you keep all of that up, it could get ugly, around town that is.  I don’t like revenge; it only gets things all mucked up.  I guess I’m speaking a bit from my own experiences in life, but as for you darling, you are like the star of Darling that moved here, made a name for herself, made several friends, and in the process of dishing out revenge you made a few enemies.  Enemies are like cancer.  Eating away at your soul. Don’t get me wrong, I understand why you did it with the ex’s but as far as all the people in this town, sometimes just listening to their troubles instead of stirring up the pot, is best.”  He could tell by the look of hurt in her eyes and the way she stopped eating by laying her fork across her barely touched breakfast that she was not okay with his forthrightness.  He frowned a bit out of the corner of his mouth before taking another large bite of eggs.  He looked down at his plate of food, forked up some egg and put it on his toast and then took a bite before looking back up to her eyes.  The hurt was fading but a look of defense had crossed her face.
With a long pause of silence between them, staring into her coffee, Calista finally spoke up.  “Look, I hear what you are saying.  I’m not the one giving advice to the women on revenge.  I might have repeated a few suggestions other patrons have come in and suggested.  Perhaps the name was not fitting, but it is what it is for now.  I’m not going to change it because rumors get out, nor am I going to change.  I haven’t done anything to anyone, well except my exes but quite honestly, I have been so busy the last few weeks that I haven’t done anything to them recently.  However, the folks that ask me, I might have suggested…”  She paused wondering, was she encouraging the few scorned women around town to go about and do their revenge damage.  Sally was really the only one and she really did not think the woman had it in her when she made the suggestions, and she did not like where it led.
Blake watched her pushed her plate away from her, which caused him to not want to eat the rest of his breakfast.  He wondered if he made a huge mistake just now, being straight forward about all of this, when he probably should just let her do what it is she wants to do.  But something deep inside of him, the protector part of him, wanted her to fit in this town, to make things work out, so that maybe they would work out.  Making enemies in this town never went over very well for those who chose to go that route.  It usually ate away at them, making them less happy of a person than they were before.  Calista had this way about her that he loved but he could see how all of this could turn its ugly head, like her having her truck stolen.  He sighed and stood up, put her practically uneaten plate of food onto his and walked them over to the sink.  When he turned back around Calista had a false look on her face like she was pretending to be happy but wasn’t.  Her eyes glanced at him and then away quickly while her mouth had a flat lined smile on it.  He wanted to fix this, all of this, take away any pain she ever dealt with, but he knew that sometimes folks just needed a nudge in the right direction and an ear to listen to their troubles.  
He grabbed his coffee cup and began to open his mouth again against his own will.  “I just think you should take Jenny’s suggestion.  Do an interview for the local paper.  Maybe clear the air.  And when you say the last couple of weeks, did you ever stop to think that maybe you need to move on past what those two did to you?”  He drank a sip of coffee and then poured the rest into the sink.  He picked up his keys and put them in his pocket, which made Calista think he was ready to drive her home.
At this point, she knew the conversation was useless.  He had his opinions, right or wrong she didn’t want to ruin what they just experience in the last twenty four hours with an argument over a name of a shop she really should reconsider, the fact that she had overstepped her eagerness to help women with revenge suggestions, when really, deep down, she knew she should be guiding them towards the high road.  It was the road that was leading her closer to Blake and she liked that idea.  However, he seemed like he turned irritated all of a sudden, wanted to pick a fight, create distance, or find a way to say, it was nice, but this was all that it was.  She chose silence and a friendly smile over replying any more to the conversation.
She grabbed her purse.  Her shopping bags were still in the backseat of his truck.  She felt a bit off when his hand went to her back like he was leading her out of his house.  She let out a huge sigh of relief thinking about all of it and thought better to be silent than continue talking to him about it or god forbid fight over something that just wasn’t worth the energy.  Her sigh got her an inquisitive look on his face.
“Everything alright?”  His voice held concern.
She was completely exhausted.  Her little adventure was over for now.  She needed to go make a list of what her forward plans were, for changing the shop name, the interview, talking to the police about Melissa and her suspicions and first firing the gal, or possibly just take her off the schedule permanently.
“Calista?”  He pleaded out her name in questioned.  He was concerned he just ruined their entire new try at whatever this was.
She looked up from her gaze that had been staring at the front door, not realizing she had stopped in her footsteps and was just standing in the front hallway of Blakes house.
“Yeah?  Sorry.  I’m just exhausted.  Somebody wore me out last night and this morning.”  She teased while her mind whirled with questions about what she was really doing.  Any kind of serious talk was the last thing she wanted.  She wanted to go back to where they were teasing each other’s bodies with touch and no words were spoken.
“Okay.  Sorry.  You seemed upset over what I just said.”  He offered as he slid his gray Carhart coat on over his navy-blue thermal shirt.
She flatlined her mouth and then frowned while shaking her head no.  “Nope.  Just tired.  I’ll give the interview some thought.”  She replied as her mind screamed, no you won’t.
“Shall we go?  You said you needed to get to the shop when the rental car is dropped off?”
“Actually, if you can drop me by apartment, that would be great.”  She smiled flatly.  Her head was starting to feel like a migraine was kicking in.  She needed to take some medicine and lie down in her dark bedroom.
“Sure.”  He stood there quietly.
She grabbed her coat but did not put it on over her black sweater she was wearing.  The day was already warming up and she felt heated from the fire burning inside of her asking herself, what was she doing with all of this – Darling, a coffee shop, a man that was younger, when originally, she thought traveling and sunning on a beach reading books held much better appeal with dealing with divorce.  Then as if a bolt of lightning struck her, she remembered that when dealing with her mother’s death six years ago, she did everything she could to keep busy and engaged.  Was that what she was doing now?
The moment Blake parked his truck in the alley at the bottom of the metal stairs to her place, they both were quiet as they had been the entire drive there.
Calista spoke up first.  “Thanks again for coming to get me.  I guess I just didn’t want to stay in Kansas for the trip I had planned.  Maybe, dinner one night this week?”  She wasn’t sure where all of this was going.  Blake had obviously broken his no relationship with business rule, but they had not talked about it – this budding sexual relationship – and she did not want to start the talking.  She didn’t want him to go back to his no mixing business and pleasure, but she felt off put by his comments earlier.  Her defenses had kicked in and reacted irrational and now she felt embarrassed to try and repair what her attitude had caused, distance between them.  
“That would be nice.  Hey, you want me to come up with you?”  He casually tossed out with a sly grin, as if no irritations had been arising between them since his comment earlier at breakfast.
She turned and looked at him with a flat smile.  One minute he couldn’t get her out of his place fast enough and all of a sudden, he wanted to what?  “I’ve got stuff.  Listen, give me a call.  I owe you dinner.  It’s the least I can do for you picking me up.  I’ll put you down for free coffee in the new computer in the shop.  Refill anytime you want.”  She smiled and then leaned in for a quick peck on the lips.  Before it could turn, whatever this was, into anything more.  She turned, opened the truck door, was out and slamming it while waving bye.  She could not run up those metal stairs fast enough.  Her heart wanted nothing more than for her to invite him up while her head was screaming at her to figure out what it was, she wanted herself.  She knew she felt like an emotional roller coaster around the man.  What she hadn’t expected was her defensive mechanism to a man just giving her good advice.
By the time she was inside, her head pinched, her mind whirled, and spots were dancing around the room.  Just as she dropped her bag, she bent down and grabbed her cellphone out of it.  Two texts came in.  One from Blake – how’s Thursday?  The other one was from a new unknown number, ‘how’s it feel bitch?  Revenge is sweeter when it’s served up cold.’
She could only imagine the threatening texter meant to say because it was cold outside that the revenge of stealing her truck was what – sweet?  She knew from this text that Melissa was behind the truck theft.  She was certain of it.  A flashback to Blakes comments from earlier pinched her brain.  She let out a huge sigh and thought to herself how she will let the police handle it.  She wasn’t going to reply, just block the new unknown caller number again.  Instead of throwing her cellphone and collapsing in tears in her room.  She took a migraine tablet, grabbed a banana off the counter and peeled it back.  After her first bite, she had her clothes off, her bath running with hot water and scented essential oils mixed with bathing salts.  She turned on her music to fill her loft with meditation relaxation mix.  This car theft thing was not going to get the best of her.  Clay and Stephanie were not going to get the best of her.  Blake on the other hand, after last night and this morning, he had taken the best of her and sated her to satisfaction.  Perhaps taking it slow was the course.  He was busy, she was busy, and the holidays always had her preoccupied.
Calista looked at her phone, turned it off for while she sat in her bath soaking.  She had at least an hour before the rental car would be downstairs to drop off her car as promised.  She would work around the shop for a bit, and then once she got things settled, she wanted to come back up here, do some yoga and take a nap.  Because having sex with Blake was far more intense than it ever was with Clay.  She needed to get back into sexual shape, more yoga, more body work like waxing and regular pedicures.  She smiled inwardly thinking how sex with a man like Blake was worth all the extra effort.
Later that day after the café closed, after spending an hour chatting excitedly with Jenny and Jackie about the next fund raiser, as she laid in her room, eyes drifting off to sleep, she realized that silence in the heat of the moment held more power than yelling, acting out or revenge.  From now on, karma can have its way with Clay and Stephanie, and Melissa for that fact, that is if the police haven’t already arrested her.  She was ready to get on with her life.  She texted Blake, be it several hours later from his text, but keep a guy waiting and he’ll wonder.  “Thursday works for me?”  
Unfortunately, his quick reply back felt like a knife to her heart.  “Best not.  Busy week.  Some other time, later this month, maybe.”  This yes no, hot cold, thing they had going on was going to exhaust her.  Was he not the one that asked if Thursday for dinner worked, she screamed in her head?  Just as she was about to turn her phone off, he texted again.  “Sorry.  Really, I am.  Something unexplainable just came up.”
Calista frowned into her cellphone after looking at the picture of naked Blake in the shower that she had taken.  She realized that as two mature adults, that had busy lives, perhaps he really did have a big project come up.  However, she could not help but text something.  “You’ve got to eat sometime.  Just swing by the café someday and meal is on me.” 
Her cellphone dinged quickly with a few texts.  The first one was from Blake – “Will do.  And thanks.”  She had to wonder what he was thanking her for, and then she remembered the previous twenty-four hours.  She could only assume that his inability to commit was a huge part of their attraction going further, perhaps she should take his lead as she could use some time to straighten her own thoughts out.
Just with that thought she clicked on a text from Cole that simple read – “Mom!”  She could text back what, but his mom with an exclamation mark meant a lot of things.  Usually he was mad at her.  She really did not want to deal with her teenage man child.
She turned her cellphone completely off.  No Blake, no Cole, nobody was going to bother her for the next hour.  Blake had a way of turning cold on her just after heating things up.  As far as Cole went, she would always love her son.  He was caught up in a strange time right now.  Being young and dealing with so much is not always easy.  She would call him after her nap.
As her mind whirled back to Blake, while her eyes closed, she thought how she did not want to go chasing some young guy around, playing the yes let’s do it, now let’s not.  She just wanted to make it through the Christmas holiday without a mental break down and come the New Year, maybe she needed to just take a break from Darling, from Blake, and from anything that made her feel any type of emotion.  Her revenge was done.  It was time to repair her soul.
How beautiful it is to stay silent when someone else expects you to be enraged.
Chapter Twelve
Peek a boo, I see you.
“Mom?”  Cole’s voice bellowed out in a questioning tone on the other end of the cellphone.
“Cole?  I thought we were okay texting.  I’m in the café working the counter until my relief staff comes in.”  Calista chimed out quietly as there were a few patrons sitting around the café, drinking and socializing.  The Christmas display with retail gift items patrons can buy was starting to look thinned out, so she jotted a note on a post it and stuck it next to the register – restock retail.
A deep breath of air rushed out as Cole breathed into his cellphone.  “I promised dad that I would just stay here for Christmas and not complicate things by going out to Kansas.  I wouldn’t even be able to stay but a day because I have to work the day after Christmas and what if a blizzard comes.  Airlines, driving, no matter how you look at it, you moving to Kansas really complicates things.”  His voice was rushed, and his explanation seemed legitimate and thought out.
“I understand Cole.  I know, I guess I just needed to feel some distance.  But hey, when you do come, I think you’ll see why I like it here.  Folks are laid back and yet still hip, well at least the peeps your age.  I’m going to miss you.  Maybe, I can come up there for a weekend after the new year.  I’m looking to take a break here as things are going so well.  The shop is actually doing great that I can be a part time employee and travel a bit.  How would that sound?”  She quizzed him with hope.  “Maybe I’ll come your way after the holidays or we could plan a trip for next summer, back to Ireland, like we talked about?”
“That would be easier mom.  And yes, I would love to go back to Ireland.”  He sounded relieved.
“I’m going to be blue for Christmas without you.”  She sang out in a tease to her son.
“Me too, mom.”  He laughed.
The moment they hung up, a middle-aged man with grey temples and a red flannel shirt walked in and Calista barely had time to wipe a tear from her eye.
“Everything okay?”  The customer asked even though she had never met the man before.
“Son can’t make it here for Christmas.”  She chimed up.  “Welcome to Dioltas Hide Out, what can I get you?”
“Well not some revenge, but I’ll take a Winter Breeze coffee, two vanilla bean scones, and that red energy drink.”  The man piped out as he pointed to a monster energy drink in the display case.
Calista smiled.  “Sure thing.”  Inside her head, she was seething over the revenge comment.  The name of her place was not going over like she had planned.  Blakes voice in her brain about changing it, reverberated around.  As she made the man his peppermint white chocolate coffee, she realized that this town was big, yet small.  Rumors were that, rumors, but possibly doing the interview with a spin on a name change, could stop all of that.  It was time to move on, and the revenge was not part of the game anymore.  It was her past, she just wanted a future, maybe with Blake in it as her mind body and soul ached for him, but was he too soon after so much?
The moment she handed the change back to the man, she piped up.  “Have a wonderful day, and Merry Christmas!”
“You do the same.”  He remarked casually before turning to walk out of her shop.
Not two minutes after Sally showed up, Carl showed up too.  The place was busy, and Calista had a scheduled hair appointment later today with Remi that she really did not want to cancel.  When she texted Carl on his day off, he promptly texted back a strong yes with a need for as many hours as possible.  She put notes in her phone to go over a schedule change to make him forty hours through the holidays.  Thinking that should take care of her need for more time off to plan holiday stuff and not to have to call Melissa in, not that she planned to.  However, she wanted the police to do their job before she officially fired Melissa.  Just keeping her off the schedule would please her enough for now.
In the back office of the café, Calista closed the old wooden door.  She had not done a thing to really tackle the organizing of the office.  She had planned to wait until Milly was gone.  She did not want to step on her toes as Milly was still the acting full-time manager.  However, with her feet on the desk, and leaning back in the old wooden office chair, she realized the office was not conducive to how she liked it.  She grabbed a legal pad and pen from the bookshelf next to the desk.  She hit her Bluetooth earpiece to on.  She dialed in the number to the local journalist that Blake had suggested.  While the phone rang, she leaned back in the chair further, and began to scribble notes on how she wanted to set up her café office.
“This is Montgomery?”  The younger woman’s voice answered her cellphone.
“Tessie Montgomery?”  Calista asked.
“The one and only.”  The woman chimed up.
Calista liked her voice.  It was confident, catchy and that had her attention.  She put her feet off the desk, sat upright in the wooden desk chair, set the pad and pen on the desk, and looked at the old outdated John Deere calendar on the opposite wall.  “Miss Montgomery, this is Calista Miller from Dioltas Hide Out Café.  Did I catch you at a good time?”  She offered up.
“I was beginning to wonder when I would hear from you.  Blake’s friend, right?  Listen, if you had not called me today, I was going to track you down.  I’ve got three days to get a story on you and the shop and then it will hit press this next weekend.  Blog by end of day three.  Some folks around here still want their paper to read, buy my blog followers are the bread and butter of this towns unofficial news, if you get my drift.”
Calista laughed.  She really liked this young woman.  She had some ump to her mojo, and that was the kind of women Calista liked at her old coffee shop.  At one point and time, Stephanie was like that, but looking back, she wondered did the ex-friend act like that because that was what she liked?  Maybe Stephanie had no idea who she was.  Maybe Stephanie’s act over the last few years was just a cry for help and Clay took advantage of her?  She shook her head of the thought of the two of them, because that was not her focus anymore.  “I was hoping we could meet soon.  I’ve got a hair appointment in an hour.  What’s your schedule like Miss Montgomery?”
“Call me Tess.  Whose doing your hair?”  Tess quizzed
“Remi at Darling’s Saloon.”  Calista offered.
“I might swing by and ask a few questions then to get started, if you don’t mind.  Then maybe tomorrow around ten, take some shots of the café and the new remodel.  I stopped by a few times, but we seem to miss each other.  Darling Café was a major hangout for me back in high school.  Now, I’m usually out catching stories, and settling in at Finnigan’s in the evening to write.  Jackie and I go way back.  It’s how Blake knows me; in case you’re wondering.”  She offered.
The woman was quick and forward, she would give her that.  As far as Blake, she had wondered, maybe her jealous spike meter went up when she realized that she had sexual attraction to Blake and could not seem to get enough of him.  She answered the woman with a simple tone.  “That’s fine.  If I miss you at the salon, see you tomorrow at ten at the café.”
“Will do.”  Then Tess hung up without another word.  One thing was for sure, Calista quickly realized the gal had that superfast way of thinking and doing.  Something, back in her youth, she charged forth with, but as she got older, a lot more thought went into everything, and she knew she overthought, over planned so much of her life, that maybe, just maybe, the sex with a stranger thing was the turning point she had been looking for.  Then again, she still had a new life to start living, and experiencing.  The old two, Clay and Stephanie, were now a new code word in her brain to avoid – O2.  She scribbled it on the pad and then scratched next to it.  No more O2.  It would be her motto to move forward.
The moment that Calista walked into Darling Hair Saloon, heads turned.  She was sure it had nothing to do with the fact that her red hair that was fading into a soft strawberry blonde that caught the women’s whispers.  It was her, and the café, and that was not something she wanted, but she got it.  She feigned a weak smile, as she slipped her sunglasses up onto her head.  “Calista for Remi.”  She offered up to the high school age receptionist.
“She’s finishing up on a client.  Have a seat.  I’ll let her know you are here.”  The young gal replied.
“Thanks.”  Calista smiled and turned to look for a seat, while half the room of women smiled at her, the other half were shooting daggers.  ‘What did I do now?’  She asked herself as she veered towards the smiling half of the room, who put down their magazines, cellphones, or electronic devices as if they waited on her very first word.
“Good afternoon, Merry Christmas.”  She offered up.  She noticed that some of the woman looked to be waiting for her to sit and say something.
The first woman to speak up was in her twenties.  “I’ve got an appointment to go strawberry blonde like you.  I follow Remi’s tweets, but she couldn’t get me in today.  I love your hair.”
“Thanks.”  Calista offered up with a flat lined smile that she was trying awfully hard to look genuine.
A few of the not so approving side of woman seemed to be glaring at her.
Another woman sitting by her chimed up.  “I heard that you helped Sally with some revenge on that ex-boyfriend of hers?  I heard that you’ve helped a lot of women in this town.”
Calista’s head pinched; her smile flattened more as her brain whirled with thoughts of what have I done.  Then, just as if Blake was in the room with her, she thought, what would Blake say.  She took a deep breath and let the air out before replying.  “I might have said a few things to a few people out of suggestion, but that does not mean I condone revenge.”
“But it’s in the name of your café.  What’s so bad about just keeping it Darling Café?”  A woman from across the room chimed up.
Calista pressed her lips together and realized she had a Chinese fire drill on her hands in the form of multiple independent woman in one tight space called the salon.  This could go south if she did not think before she spoke.  “Darling Café was Milly’s.  I guess when I bought it, I figured I should give it a new name.  As far as the Dioltas part, I’m Irish and well, the meaning of revenge was to start my life fresh doing what I love.  I love serving the community great coffee and fresh baked goods.  Not to mention, energy drinks, because they are women’s Viagra so to speak some days.  As women, we do so much, for so many, and every now and then we need a hideout, a boost, a cup of coffee with girlfriends to work it all out.  That’s all.”
A few mumbled sounds chorused out from the disapproving side sounded out while one older strong voiced woman spoke up.  “I suggest you change the name then.  And stop shuffling out revenge advice and start focusing on your new life.”
“Touché.”  Calista chimed out quickly with as much sweet genuine niceness she could muster.  The woman that just spoke gave a vibe of woman in charge.  She continued with a soft voice.  “A good friend just told me to do the same and I think you both are very smart people.”  She laughed lightly, half out of nervousness, and half because the floor of the room seemed to be all eyes on her.  “What would you suggest I do then?  I mean, I have toyed with just dropping the Dioltas part of the café and calling it the Hide Out, or Darling’s Hide Out, but almost everything in this town starts with that, so I was thinking just Hide out Café?  What do you think?”
The same woman spoke up over the few women that were shaking their heads yes, I think that’s great.  “I think you should be careful in a small town like this.  Too many mistakes, and folks don’t forgive.  Be that as it may, you seemed to be well liked for the most part.  Drop the Dioltas, Hide Out Café is catchy.  If women want advice, inspire them to be more than a plot of revenge.  Karma’s a bitch for a reason, I think she does a pretty bang up job of fixing things after the fact.  Although, there are always a few that need a nudge in Karma’s direction.”  She laughed loudly as if remembering someone or thing, just as several other women followed her lead.  
It was barely a second before the older well-dressed woman with an opinion continued.  “I mean, I heard things, and I could not say that I would not have done some of the same things, but time to hitch your wagon and move on, besides, that Blake isn’t going to be on the market long as soon as he decides he’s not heartbroken anymore.  He’s been shooing off woman left and right for two years now.  Then you walk in town, and the game changed.  It’s obvious.  Although, you’re a year or two older than him.”  She smiled which made Calista laugh inwardly just as Remi walked out.
“Calista.  What’s the rush?  You want to touch up the red?”  She offered up happily as she stood in her all black attire of black leggings, black long sleeve shirt, black cape and a recent hair coloring of jet black making her look a bit dark and devious.
“I’m feeling blue.  Blue for Christmas.”  Calista tossed out there as a few women gasped and two asked out loud.  “All blue or blue highlights.”
Calista turned to them and smiled.  “Back to blonde ladies, but my son just called and said he can’t see me for Christmas, so I was thinking a streak of blue to say I’m sad.”
The older outspoken woman tossed out the comment.  “Blake likes blondes anyway.  Just tell him you’re over the ex and I bet he’s yours.”
Calista raised her eyebrows up, enlarged her eyes as she smiled and turned.  The moment she was in Remi’s salon chair she had to ask.  “Who is that woman?”
“Town’s mayor.  She doesn’t keep quiet about anything.  Blakes family and her family go way back.  So, back to blonde?”
“Yes.”  Calista responded while replaying what just happened in the front room of the salon.
“Blue?  Just a few streaks?”  Remi asked.
“I was thinking, peak a boo blue.  Where it kind of shows but it doesn’t.  What do you think?”  She asked as she watched Remi run her fingers through her hair.
“I think Blake will love it.”  She teased.
Calista laughed and wondered, what was it about Blake and her that made everyone so interested in them all of a sudden.  It wasn’t like they went parading around town flirting.  If anything, it was behind closed doors flirting.  So, was it Blake that was talking, maybe Jackie or Blake’s sister?  Either way, that town mayor had her say, and if she was smart, she would follow some of that advice.
By the time, peek a boo blue blondie, was in her silver SUV, driving around town, she realized that she stuck out a bit.  Everywhere she stopped, folks were already talking a buzz, about the café name change, the blue hair, the new car.  She felt like a fish in a glass bowl.  Her last stop was Tully’s shop.  She had been meaning to stop in for quite some time.  She texted her earlier in the day while getting her hair done, that she needed some unique holiday clothes.  The moment she walked into Tully’s store, she felt like she stepped back in time, to a time where retail seemed as if it catered to a woman’s needs.  There was a large crystal chandelier hanging in the center of a comfortable seating area of plush dark blue velvet loveseats.  Calista noticed small carts of drinks and snacks off to the side, surrounded by several well-dressed displays of metal antique metal seamstress mannequins.
Tully walked out in a burgundy Japanese tea robe; her black Indian hair up with chopsticks and a pair of white Japanese slipper sandals.  She bowed in front of Calista.
The minute she stood up Calista smiled with such sincerity.  “Thank you.  I needed that.  I had a day.”
“I heard.”  Tully offered up.  “You need to follow Tess’s blog.  She’s already tweeted out about you.  Comments from the salon and a photo of you with the new hair.  Calista, she likes you.  She doesn’t do this kind of PR push for nothing.  If she likes you, people in town will like you.  It’s just how it works.  Just go with it.”
Calista swallowed hard.  She was ready to react with anger as Tully started in about Tess blogging about her and whether the town would like her or not if one person did or not, but quickly realized, things might actually work out in her favor.  “Can you tell me her twitter name?”  She asked with cheeriness in her voice, but deep down she was trying to grapple with the simple solution of moving far away, to a small happy town, and not thinking of additional ramifications that could happen if she pissed off the wrong person, smiled incorrectly at someone who runs the rooster cage.  She let out an internal sigh, realizing that the worse that could happen was nothing compared to what she went through the last few years.  If she mucks it up here, she will just start over somewhere else, but how would that be when her mind can only think about a potential future with Blake.
“I just texted you by sharing her all her contact info right before I walked out of here.”  She took the Japanese sandals off and set to the side.  In only her white socks, she shuffled to a rack and uncovered its champagne colored silk sheet off to the side.  “Now, let’s talk holidays.  I pulled your sizes and I’ve got some killer looks here.  Talking, fun around the café, date night with Blake – big question mark here, you can answer that later, also, Holiday party clothes, you got a few of those to go to, and I’ll save the va-va-voom New Year’s Eve one for last.”
Calista stood in front of the rack of clothes and let her hands roam over the mostly vintage clothes.  There were a few pieces of modern make, but a look of vintage fashion.  She had always been more of a trendy woman, but some of these pieces she wanted to buy, just to own, not even sure if she would wear them.  “I love them all, I truly do.”
“Fantastic!”  Tully chimed up.  “I’ve got a private dressing room to the right.  I’ll pull the rack back there.  You get undressed and let’s try these babies on.  Sweets?”  She hollered out to a person that was in the backroom.  “I’ll be in the private dressing room with Calista Miller from the Hide Out Café.  Cover the front and UPS should be here soon for the shipments.”
A man’s voice bellowed out.  “Got it.”  
Calista turned to Tully in her first outfit of dark red silk dress.  It was a bit much, but she had a feeling she was going to buy it anyways.  “Hey, I noticed you dropped the Dioltas as you were talking to Sweets.”
“Honey just go with it.  The revenge is over.  It got the town talking, which was actually, pretty clever if you ask me.  But your café was being called the Hide Out shortly after everyone found out you were in town.  Be that as it may, it works.  Play it PR style.  I’m sure Tess will produce a great article on you with follow up tweets.  She’s a gem.  She can boost my business any day of the week.  Now turn around, that silk dress screams Marilyn Monroe style, but you make it sexier.  Although with your peek a boo blue, I think the dark navy blue one for a new year eve party will look stunning on you with your blue eyes.  Where is Blake taking you?”
Calista smiled sheepishly at Tully’s reflection in the mirror and then went back to glance at her reflection in the dress.  She would agree that with blue highlights in her platinum blonde hair, a navy-blue dress would make her eyes pop, however this dress was something she was going to buy whether she ever wore it or not.  It was a statement dress of powerful yet super sexy red, that every woman should own, and find a reason to wear.  After a deep breath, she finally replied to Tully’s suggestion of her and Blake.  “We’re just friends.  I think I would like it to be more but we both seem to be working on moving on.”
“Shoot.  Blake’s been playing protect my heart and bachelor of the year for too many years.  Yes, his heart got broken, but the way he looks at you, or so I am told, it’s a matter of time.”  
Tully reached over into a beautiful cream white sewing basket that was organized beyond Calista’s capabilities.  It seemed the two of them had the love of organization to share between them.  She took a mental note to herself as she responded to Tess.  “Well, he seems to be too busy for me all of a sudden, not that we were anything, but he picked me up when my truck got stolen in Kansas City and on the long drive home, well, we got to know each other.”  Or so Calista thought, to herself.
Tully lifted her head to meet Calista’s eyes as she was marking the hem with pins for sewing adjustments that would need to be made.  Her eyes had a look in them as if to say something mischievous.  “I guess you leaving his house the next morning, was what?  You know, no other woman has been to his new ranch since it’s conception.  Jackie, because Blake babysits once in a while, Jenny, all the time with the boys, and the decorator, other than that, no single female has been to his place, overnight.  Care to tell?”
Calista blushed as Tully unzipped the back of the dress and it dropped to the floor.  In only her black lace bra and panties she turned to the woman and smiled sheepishly.  “I guess I kind of stayed the night.  But he keeps me at an arm’s length most of the time.  I kind of need to focus on me anyways.  Too soon after the divorce.  New business, new town, new friends.”  She reached out and touched Tully’s shoulder and smiled.  “But it does kind of make me feel special that he took me to his place now that I know that.”  She let out a sigh.
“Just keep on, keeping on.  Things will work out.  I guess Blake’s got some big project, Jackie was all hush hush about but really, the man likes to keep himself too busy so that if he stops, he might realize he’s not living his life but helping everyone else out.”
Calista shook her head as she knew that feeling all too well.  It was a hard habit to break; keeping busy to keep herself from dealing with her feelings, yet she had always made that work for her.  Perhaps after the holidays, she will force herself to slow it down a bit, observe life so to speak and then maybe things with Blake will begin to grow.
The next morning, Calista felt her stomach twitch with nervousness over the all mighty and powerful Tess who was about to walk through the doors of her café.  It was all she could do to reclean surfaces or retouch up her lipstick.  She decided to go wear a simple navy poplin dress shirt with dark dress jeans and a pair of her make me lucky black leather ankle boots tucked under the hem of the long length of the jeans.  She didn’t know if the boots were really lucky, but she was wearing them when Blake and she had their first sexual encounter, and before that she scratched off a thousand-dollar lottery ticket back in Utah one time.  So, she could only think they might bring her luck in dealing with Tess.  Hoping her true self came out in the interview.
The moment a skinny twenty something man with a start of a dark brown beard on his thin face walked through her door with two cameras around his neck, she felt the presence of Tess before she walked into the café.  The young man held the door open for her and in walked a short round woman with the eyes of Betty Boop but in blue and a windblown short dark black hair that she was sweeping away from her face.  Dressed in dark jeans, black Sketcher street shoes, and a light blue vintage rock band tee shirt, Tess had nothing scary or fearful in her presence.  If anything, it was as if your high school best friend just came to say hi, but a bit older than high school.  Her face held a very youthful look, which will go a long way when Tess gets older, but for now, it was like hanging with a friend, casual and laid back.
The three of them shook hands as Tess introduced her photographer and younger brother, Drake.  He did not share the round face look or pear shape body, but that was neither here nor there.  Within seconds, Tess and she were sitting in the back corner brown leather chairs talking like college roommates, while Drake walked around taking pictures of the café and them.  Tess’s starting questions were casual, yet leading.  Before long, Calista was pouring out her story in short version, dirty deeds of her two ex’s - ex-husband and ex best friend.  She spoke about her Aunt, what lead her to buy this place, the feeling she got when she first visited the town over a year ago, and how incredible everyone in this town has been to her since her formal arrival.  She kept the not so incredible experiences to herself, but those were her own story to tell, if she ever wanted to.  She found herself talking on until Tess’s eyes sparkled with mischievousness as she glanced over Calista’s shoulder.  
Without even looking, Calista knew.  Blake had walked through her café glass door and like an unseen magnet, he did things to her mind and body without her even looking at him.
Tess stood up.  “Blake.  Just the man I think would make a great customer picture.  Drake set him over there in the corner window looking out onto the town street.  The light filtering in, will add a glow to his handsomeness.  Calista, grab the man a fun coffee mug, make sure it’s hot so the steam will rise.  Let’s do a few of him alone and maybe a few with Calista at the counter handing him something.”
Before Calista could stand and turn to let herself react to the man who commandeered so much of her mental space, she felt a sense of need to touch him, yet she refrained.  With a swipe of her sweaty palms against her dark jeans, she turned her body towards him and smiled.  His smile back, told her that this was all planned.  But by who, Tess, or himself?
“Blake?”  She questioned off and smiled.
“Utah?”  He joked and then added.  “I mean Kansas now.”
“Too cute you two.  Now.  Drake…”  Tess spent the next ten minutes producing shots from over Drakes shoulder and asking Calista and Blake questions about how they met, how Blake felt that his favorite high school café was changing and was Calista here to root herself permanently into the town or was this a passing moment in her life.  Calista answered her with as much honesty as she could afford.  Deep down, this was a passing moment, but when Blake looked at her when she said her plan was to build a business where she could be a partial part of it while traveling the globe, he looked almost hurt as if she had not invited him.   Which she would, if he wanted, but it was her plan before she met him.  And why she would even think of changing her life plan for any man after what she just went through with her ex’s was beyond herself.  A little voice screaming in the back of her brain for her to be her own woman and let no man lead her life plan was taking over in the interview.
By the time Tess was done and walking out of the café doors, Blake and Calista had the room to themselves for a moment of quiet.
“So…” His voice traveled to her ears with hesitation.  “You plan to travel?”  He started up as his right hand gravitated to her new blue peekaboo streaks in her hair.  “I like this by the way.”  He looked directly into her eyes with a sweet smile, the kind he gave her after they had sex and he was looking at her for comforting affection.  Her body melted towards him slowly until the door chimed with an older female patron and she stepped back briskly with a flat smile.
Blake followed her lead and stuffed his hands in his denim pockets in front causing his chest muscles to bunch up.  It was a move that screamed, my hands are off, you happy now.
Calista went to the counter to help the customer, who decided to linger at a table, glancing occasionally at them as they now stood across the room from each other.
Blake finally approached the counter and asked Calista for a vanilla scone to go while he pulled a sparkling water out of the cooler next to the counter.  He plopped a twenty on the counter to pay just as the customer finally decided nothing juicy going on, so they will leave.  As soon as the door closed, Blakes hand touched Calista’s as she handed him the scone in the brown paper bag to go.
Blake started as he removed his hand.  “I usually don’t take on projects this size that I am working on, but it will be done soon.  Maybe we could spend a little time together?”  He suggested casually yet questioningly.
That would be nice Calista thought to herself as her mouth sounded off a not so sure, “sure” sound.  Calista had to wonder, was he blowing her off.  He used the words a little time together, not would you like to go out on a date, how about I swing by later and we go to dinner.  Instead a moment of silence ensued between them, when Calista could not stand it any longer.  She took a step back and began to rearrange a few brownies and rice crispy treats wrapped in plastic on a basket next to the register.
Blake blinked his eyes in a questioning fashion and then he felt his heart tried to guard himself from heartbreak.  “I’m sure Tess will write a great article.  She’ll follow up and use the pictures for PR.  Send her a request and she’ll release the photos for you to use free of charge, although most folks send her a gift card to their business.  Tit for tat, and all that.”
As he said the last sentence, she couldn’t help but laugh with a childish bubbly feeling.  He had a masculine way of sounding childish, probably the active uncle in him.
“That’s the smile I wanted to see.”  He teased.
“Anytime.”  She offered back.
“Then soon, after this project?”  He suggested a casual date.
“Anytime.”  She offered again, but this time, she felt herself feel sad that he wasn’t committing to a time, date or place.  Her smile faded and in doing so his eyes looked sad as well.
The door chimed with three teenage patrons and Blake was turning to go with a casual see you around in his exit.
Two hours later, Calista had relieved herself of café duties to hole herself up in her office.  She needed to do a full operation redo office revamp, and pronto.  She needed to get Blake off her brain and her mind onto something productive before she screamed in frustration or broke down crying over the Christmas blues.
A few hours later, Blake felt himself engrossed in Tess’s blog about Calista that Tess had decided to forward to him before publishing.  He found himself reading it over a few times.  It was as if he was finally understanding what really took place in Calista’s life.  He was starting to understand now that they were two hurt souls that meet and needed one another so badly that the only thing they could do was push each other away – to avoid the hurt, the pain, that comes with falling in love.  Or was it only him, that was pushing, and Calista was just protecting her heart?  He thought of all the moments they had together, and she was always willing to try until he pushed her away just a little bit that she would become guarded to a fault.  He shook his head and closed his iPad cover flap which automatically turned it off.  He set the device on his antique drafting board and realized, if he didn’t want her to travel without him, maybe he should give her a reason to stay.
He stood up to lock his office up, when his cellphone rang.  The call was urgent, and it was regarding the project he was neck deep in dealing with.  As he answered his phone, he promised himself, that this was the last project that consumed him and kept him from what he wanted, and that was to get to know Calista more and possibly fall in love, if he wasn’t already.
Everything heals.  Your heart heals, your mind heals, your body heals, wounds heal.  Repairing is a reminder that bad times don’t last, and happiness will be back.
Chapter Thirteen
She remembered who she was, and the game changed.
“Hello, Mrs. Forest?  This is Calista Miller from the Hide Out Cafe.  Did I catch you at a bad time?”  Calista offered up as her plan formed in her head, while her fingers scribbled out, pen to paper, the list of people she was going to invite over for a last-minute impromptu holiday gathering.  Christmas was in a few days.  Over five people told her they had nowhere to spend the holidays with other people.  Milly’s plans to go to her sisters in Oklahoma got cancelled when a last-minute surgery had to be scheduled.  Ben her baker had no family.  Sally was feeling lonely after Jimmy got hauled off to jail, and all her loser friends blamed her.  Then, when the Forest boys had stopped off to help her set up her new ten-foot pre-lit Christmas tree a week ago, they mentioned that their mom and dad had split up, and she had not even gotten the tree up at the house.  Larry mentioned he would be alone for the holidays, and then there was Remi’s comment about no family in Darling, and now with no boyfriend, the holiday would be quiet.  This was Calista’s chance to bring together friends to make a fun celebration.  This is what she did and loved doing it.
“Yes!  Hi, Calista.  The boys told me about your tree.  I’ve been kind of procrastinating, but busy, you know.”  Mrs. Forest answered up.
“Yes!  I know!  Holidays are crazy, but I love a good crazy.  Listen, the reason I am calling, is, well, this is my first Christmas without family.  I decided to throw a small Christmas potluck at my place.  On the twenty third.  Just a few of my new friends.  I would love it if you and the boys could come?”  Calista offered up with an opportunistic voice.
“Oh, I don’t know.  With things so crazy?”  Mrs. Forest hesitated.
“I really don’t want no for an answer.”  Calista chimed up jokingly.  “No pressure though.  Six o’clock on the twenty third.  Bring a dish if you wish.  It would be nice to have some sort of celebration this year, seeing as it’s a new year for me.”
“Well, can I get back to you?”  She offered.
“Absolutely.”  Calista responded as she put them down as a yes on her guest list as her boys already told her they would drag their mom there if they had to.  
With the next meeting tonight for the book club, Calista was certain that more questions about her life were going to be asked.  She had written down and memorized passive answers, while working on putting the gift baskets together that were up for auction.  Several stores had donated items, she told them she would include their business cards, along with a short story card about how the gift baskets sold, solely benefitting the Holly Street Clinic’s new day shelter. 
A little over a month ago, an anonymous donor stepped up and bought the empty building next door to the Holly Clinic.  They pulled permits and were working on construction, all the while the day shelter for the women was still open.  Nobody seemed to know who or what was doing this huge charitable thing, but Calista was just glad that come the new year, the place would be operational.  The money made from the auctioned baskets would then buy holidays gifts that the new director Sherry Walters would purchase tomorrow.  Short notice, but Calista was certain they would at least raise two thousand dollars by the end of tonight.  Sherry Walters was another newcomer to Darling that Calista realized that she had to ask if she had a place to celebrate the holidays.
By the time the meeting was underway, Calista already had her brain spinning with what types of food she wanted to serve, little gifts to wrap up for her guests, maybe a party game, or a holiday movie.  All of that stopped when her phone dinged with a text from Blake while his sister Jenny was sitting in her wheelchair, in front of everyone, auctioning off the baskets.
His text simple read, ‘thanks’.
She texted back while she felt her heart warm and her smile spread across her face as she typed back.  “For what?  I hope this is a nice thanks and not a snarky you did it again blondie text.”
“Nice thanks.”  Her phone dinged and little bubbles showed he was still texting, so she waited.
“I liked how your blue felt in my fingers, blondie.”  He texted again.
She paused and took a deep breath which caught Sally’s attention looking over her shoulder.  Calista quickly held her cellphone to her chest against her burgundy cashmere sweater.
“Who made you smile?”  Sally asked.
“Nobody.”  Calista whispered back and then decided to sneak off to her office to finish this texting thing with a phone call.  “Hold my seat, I’ll be right back.”
The moment she sat in her office wooden desk chair, her brown leather heeled boots up on her desk, leaning back in her seat with her dark denim jeans crossed at the ankle, she heard his voice answer his phone and her heart felt a pinch of anxiety and nervousness like a school girl.
“Calista?”  He drew her name out like he was stroking her skin.
“Blake…”  She breathed out his name like he was already in her.  She smiled and thought how she ached for his touch when he walked away from her the other day, but she knew, he had to be the one to reach out to her.
“How’s the auction going?”  He asked casually, flirtatious tone sliding away.
“Great.”  She replied quickly, wondering is this a friendly call, a late-night bootie call, as it was eight o’clock, or a simple how’s my sister handling the auction with Jackie.  So, she informed him.  “Your sister and Jackie are quite the team.  Very impressed on how they are taking bids from the women in the room and selling baskets online to other’s that could not make it.  There will be a few Uber rides home, not to mention, a few walked here when they came in with a bottle of wine or two.  I think my book club social meetings are evolving into something else altogether.”  She laughed.
“Sometimes things need to evolve, in order to be great.”  A tone of seriousness was in his voice.
“Did you buy a basket?”  She changed the subject.
“I did.  Two actually.  One for Jackie, and one for my sister.  They both sent me pics of the ones they liked.  You did a great job putting them together.  They look professional.”  He added casually.
“One of my many rare talents that has evolved over the years.”  She giggled as the last glass of wine seem to be starting a buzz.
“I think the few talents I’ve experienced with you have been pretty good.”  He teased.
He was flirting with her, a bit, but also just reaching out.  So maybe now would be the time to invite him to her friend’s potluck for Christmas.  But first, she must reciprocate the tease.  “You have talents that are quite pleasurable yourself.”
“I do?”  He asked fishing for a compliment.
“You do.  Jenny showed me your artwork.  The wood and metal sculptures you do.  The sign you made for Tully’s shop.  I finally made it by there.  I wouldn’t mind using you for the shops new sign now that the old one I ordered isn’t fitting for the name, I decided to officially drop the Dioltas out of the name of the shop.”
He was quiet.  So, she questioned out.  “Blake?  You there?  Did I lose you?”  She looked at her cellphone to see if she lost the signal.  As she did, she heard his faint voice answer her.  
“I’m here.”
“Phew.  I thought my cellphone dropped our call.”  She laughed.
She heard a deep breath in and then breathed out.  “I just got a text.  I need to go.”  He made the excuse.  She could hear it in his voice.
“Okay.  Well, on the twenty third, I am having a small Christmas potluck for a few of my new friends that don’t have a place to be on Christmas.  You are welcome to come.  Not that you don’t have a place to be, or a family to be with, but my son can’t make it and well, I would love it if you came.”  She blurted out fast before he hung up.
“I’ve got a lot going on right now.  I’m going to have to pass.”  He sounded regretful, but she realized this push pull, tease me and leave me, act was starting to wear on her heart.
“Oh.”  She sounded out softly as she set her feet back on the floor and stood up from her desk chair.  The sound of laughter coming from the front room pulled her back to reality.  Tonight, was about raising money for a great cause, being around other likeminded women and if the one man she could not seem to get off her brain did not know which direction this, whatever it is, was going, she needed to just let it go for now.  Keeping busy had gotten her through tougher times, the holidays were not going to suck with a few friends and a whole lot of keeping busy.
“I’m sorry.”  He offered.  “I’m just really busy right now.  Listen.  I just wanted to call and say thanks.”
She could just bet he was busy.  Playing property manager, single man playing the field around town, building a small fortune with his sister’s inheritance, she could just bet.  Her jealous envious voice was building in her head when her hand slapped the desk to remind her to stop it.
“What was that?”  He sounded concerned.
“Sorry.  That was my hand.  Something slippery on the floor in my office.  I almost slipped and fell in my boots.  My hand hit the desk.  Listen.  You’re welcome.”  She tried to sound as genuine as she could while her heart screamed at her head.  This man is going to break you, worse than Clay and Stephanie ever did.  You need to just get away.
“Good night, Calista.”  He said her name with sorrow and then hung up before she could even say goodbye.  She let out a deep cleansing breath and realized, she was in dire need of a change.
Calista made it back to the meeting, made it through the night with a huge smile on her face as she drank a few more glasses of wine.  The moment she locked up the café, knowing that Sally was going to open in the morning with Ben, and their new full time assistant that Sally found, a young man who wanted to learn the café business, Clark; since the gal from yoga class did not work out.  The three of them could open, and she would do what she did best which was running errands, paying bills, bookkeeping and trying to get her heart back on track.  Her last check to her retirement plan showed the stock market had a stellar year, she was ahead of schedule for retirement.  She wondered if she really even needed to work here, well, other than the basics.  It was not like back in Utah where she gave it sixty plus hours a week.  Here, just like the slower pace of Darling, she was figuring out quickly, that twenty hours a week was plenty.  It was time to devise a plan.
With the back door to the shop closed, Calista had her brown heeled boots in hand.  Her slip-on black safety shoes on her feet as she climbed the metal stairs covered in snow.  She glanced at the motorcycle under the metal stairs parked and thought about climbing on and going for a drive, which was completely stupid.  Two more inches of snow was expected, and she had a buzz going.  Driving drunk was not her style.  It was just the idea of taking off, running from her dilemma with Blake, and just letting her mind erase as the road unfolded in front of her that gave her the brief moment of insanity – driving a motorcycle in the snow.
She opened her apartment door and locked it behind her.  Then she convinced herself that she just needed to take a bath, drink a hot tea, read a book and fall asleep.  That was her plan.  Instead, she texted Clay.  She knew it was a mistake, as Cole swore, he did not have her cellphone number, but she had something she needed to say.
“You win.  I moved on just as I see you are making new plans with Stephanie.  I don’t know if she had anything to do with my stolen truck, but please ask her to move on as well.  I’ll stop if you two stop all this nonsense.”  She hit send and thought what the hell am I doing?
Her phone dinged ten minutes later.  “Calista?  Is this your cellphone number?”
“Yes.”  She texted back.
He did not reply.  Shit, she thought to herself.  Stephanie probably saw the text and answered his phone.  Now the evil temptress will have her cellphone number to do what?  After waiting fifteen minutes for a reply, Calista realized, it did not matter.  If she had to change her cellphone again, she would.  If Stephanie wanted to waste her time, energy and money on revenge, she would handle it.  For now, she just wanted to make some kind of amends with those from her past.  But talking to them did not seem like a way to do it.
She took a deep breath, turned on some soft music in her apartment through her phone.  She hit the Keurig machine to warm water to make a cup of hot tea.  While that was warming, she went into her bathroom, turned on the light, started up the bathwater to warm, lit a few candles, and then turned the bathroom light off.  By the time her tea was in hand, her body was naked, she was standing in front of her bathtub and a few tears fell down her face.  This was a temporary setback.  The holiday blues, she knew all too well when she lost her mother five years ago about this time.  It was time to just let herself feel the warmth of the bath surround her body.  There was nothing she could do about Cole, Clay, or Stephanie.  Cole, she would see this summer for sure, he promised her.  Clay and Stephanie getting married, well, may the priest that marries them, curse them as well.  She took a sip of tea and then set it down on the small table next to the bath.  It was still too hot to drink.
The moment the warm water stroked her body, she thought of Blake.  He was a temporary rebound that was starting to feel like so much more.  She had never really been alone, and it felt scary at times.  But tonight, she wondered, was he really too busy?  He reached out to her but then took a pair of imaginary scissors and cut the cord.
Just as she put her head under water for a second, letting the warm water soothe her heartache and her headache in a swoosh of water, she heard her cellphone ding underwater.  When she finally made it back up, there was a reply from Clay.  “It’s time.”
Time for what she thought.  So, she texted back.  “Clay?”  When nothing came back within a few minutes, she realized that Stephanie being Stephanie, was probably toying with her.  She would just get a new cellphone number tomorrow and chalk this up as a huge tipsy too much wine drinking mistake.
On the morning of the twenty third the time flew by and Calista began to realize that all good things come to those who are patient, and time flies by when you are crazy busy.  Calista had found ways to keep her mind and her body busy.  She had a few last-minute preparations for tonight’s friend’s potluck Christmas celebration.  She had not heard from Blake, other than briefly running into each other around town.  He looked a bit haggard and acted as if he was being rushed by this top-secret project, he was engrossed in.  She had kept the banter light and even mentioned tonight’s celebration again, which the last time she mentioned it, he smiled and told her if he got a few things done early he might be able to swing by.
Her entire day was spent checking things off her list in preparation for the evening.  The moment her first guest Remi arrived she felt the party spirit rise in her soul.  This was something she had always pulled off quite well, a holiday party.  Tonight, it was about keeping company with those she was just getting to know and celebrating the holiday spirit.
Milly was the second to arrive, and then she was followed by Sally and the new hire Clark.  Ben called to say he wasn’t feeling well, but Mrs. Forest showed with her boys.  The liquor store owner, Mark, down the street from her café, who she just met today, showed up with a few more bottles of holiday alcohol.  Larry showed up with his sister.  The last of the expected was Jackie and her new boyfriend Conner.  She had invited Jenny and Tully but they both said they could not make it this year, leaning on the note that this would be a yearly thing for Calista, which perhaps it might be.
The first hour swept by with plenty of eating and drinking.  Calista had started to almost forget about wanting Blake to come, but she was happy that tonight seemed to be making her forget about the strange text from Clay or perhaps it was Stephanie, forget about Cole not being able to come, and forget that her heart attached itself to a man that was not sure of what he wanted.
Blake found the last two weeks to be excruciatingly busy.  This new project he took on with a short time frame, had him remembering what it was like to work a real building project.  It was one thing to renovate one of his own buildings, it was another to have several high-ranking donors involved, all with opinions on how things should be built, with constant changes.
Every time Blake saw Calista around town or tried to see her when he knew she was in her coffee shop, he felt that pull of attraction, sexual or otherwise, that told him, he needed to act on his feelings before some other man around town decided she was an incredible catch.  He had heard she had been asked out on a few dates, all to be turned down, which made him wonder on her interest in him.  Jackie and Jenny had been trying to convince him that Calista was worth the chance to see where things went.  Then after reading the article on her, he felt his heart pinch with feelings he had not had since his ex-fiancé.
With much relentlessness from Jackie that he had to stop by to Calista’s celebration, late or not late, he realized that being an hour late was rude, but once he could tell her what he was up to, she might understand.  The moment he opened the door to everyone at her place, to the roar of laughter and holiday music, he felt lulled inside.  It only took Calista less than ten seconds to realize he had walked in the door.  He felt the warmth of her small hand grab his cold one as she pulled him inside further into her apartment.  She let go of his hand just as she laid a quick peck on his lips.
“Let me take your coat.  Food’s hot and delicious.  What can I get you to drink?”  She offered up with a look on her face of utter happiness.  He liked that look.  He had seen something quite similar on her face, but it was after an orgasm.  Tonight, it was a different kind of happy he observed.  It was as if she was in her element and no one could bring her down.  Just looking at her smile, warmed his insides, and made him realize that perhaps, all of his rush-rush my private business is too important, really wasn’t that important at all.  Maybe he could have carved some time aside for her, at least reassure her that once this project was done, and the donors made the announcement to the town, that then he could talk about everything he was currently a part of.
“Blake?”  Calista smiled as she waved a hand in front of him.  “I think I lost you there.”  She joked.  Which she had as he had been staring at her, thinking of all the intimate times between them, swirled up with all the times his pigheaded I’m not ready for a relationship, I don’t mix business with pleasure, cost him his own loss of intimacy between them.  What they had experienced, had been so incredible, that he realized they may have not met on normal dating terms, and they certainly had a lot to learn about each other, but tonight he wanted to somehow make that up to her.
Blake grabbed Calista’s hand, pulled her close to him and leaned down to whisper into her ear.  “I want you tonight.”
As she pulled back with a blushing to her face and subtle laughter to her voice to try and hide what he just said; she answered that with a wink and then joked loud enough to dismiss his whisper as nothing anyone should concern themselves with.  “Well then, cowboy, let me take your coat and make you a drink.  Jack and Coke?”
“That sounds nice.”  His lips curled upwards as his eyes darted around the room to see who all came to this festivity that had created such a holiday happiness on his Calista’s face.  It took only moments to notice that he realized, she was a woman moving on with her life, making new friends from all over town and she was not going to be held back by two ex’s that made her life a mess.  He only had one ex, and that one moved on fast, while he still held his heart out of reach from any woman, particularly any woman that he did business with.  It was in this holiday moment that he truly realized how pig headed he had been about Calista and his own life, that if he did not do something to assure her soon, that he might lose her to someone else in town that was interested in her, which was plenty of men by what his sister had told him.
When the party wound down, and Blake was the second to last there, Calista convinced Milly that a cab needed to take her home.  The old gal had just too much to drink.  Waiting on the cab with just the three of them in the room was excruciating, knowing all night Blake had whispered into her ear, sexual temptations and then went about socializing at the party like he had never said a word to her about what he was going to do the second he had her naked.
To keep busy, Calista made sure things were as cleaned up as they needed to be, while Blake sat on her couch, looking at her as if he was already peeling her clothes off one slow inch at a time.
The second Milly was safely in the cab and on her way, Calista wiped her hands on her holiday dish towel and then draped it over the oven handle.  She turned to Blake who was already standing by the door after walking Milly down the stairs.  She took a step towards him and the second she was within arm’s reach, he pulled her into him, wrapped her up in his arms, running his fingers through her hair as he held her face up to him, his lips dropped to hers, their mouths opened, their tongues twisted, their breathing wavered in long and short heavy breaths.  This was a moment of no turning back for both of them this time.
Within a short time, their bodies remembered each other, craved each other, and Blake had every intention of making Calista smile again tonight like the night he had her at his home.
He slowed his kiss to a soft slow kiss and then pulled away as he had her backed against a wall, one arm over her head, his eyes looking down into hers, their breathing slowed to a break in the storm of lust as he started whispering, “be patient with me, that’s all I can ask right now.  I know you’ve been through so much and I don’t have the right to ask, but I think if you just give me some time…”  his voice trailed off as his lips dropped to her mouth again.  His body pressed against hers, with them completely dressed, it felt like a wall between them, just as those words he spoke made her realize, he needed to be slowly led to the fact that things between them were something.  
What that something was?  She could only guess it was the beginning of an incredible relationship.  Lord knows, the sex between them was better than she ever had.  It was herself that thought she would not be able to let a man in, at least not this soon, but it was him, who was still hurt, still not trusting, and perhaps, so many other things going on in his life, playing dad to his nephews, helping Jackie and his sister that he felt bad if he took time for himself, to let himself feel something for another woman might take away from all his responsibilities.  Then there was this building project Jackie said he was not allowed to discuss until some announcement.  His kiss began to erase all these complicated thoughts from her mind, but they were still dressed and that told her that he might be having some complicated thinking of his own.
The moment the kiss softened; Calista pulled her lips away.  “Blake?”  She whispered as she looked up into his softened eyes.  “Take me to my room.”
With his hand guiding her to her bedroom, that had been curtained closed to keep the guest to the main part of the loft, he did not look at her, but straight ahead.  The second he stopped in front of her heavily draped bedroom, he let go of her hand and looked at her while starting to open a section of curtains aside.
She stopped right next to him and looked up at him.  “Stay the night.  I’ll be patient, I just want you as my Christmas gift tonight.”
Blake smiled with a curve to his lips and then slowly began to undress himself as Calista closed the bedroom curtains behind them.  The soft led candles already lit in her room provided a soft glow along with a small room diffuser of holiday mix smell.  Her dark red cashmere wrap sweater quickly came off her shoulders, dropping to the floor, as she looked up into his eyes.  They were almost completely naked but the air between them warmed as his eyes ran over her body, wanting to take her in visually as she stood before him in only a dark red bra and panty set, all lace, all sexy and the heels she had on made him want to take her that second, yet he waited.
Calista saw the hard cock pressed up inside of his underwear.  She slowly knelt before him as her hands gently guided his underwear to the ground.  The moment she knelt down, looking up, his cock wrapped in her hand, and her mouth about to take him, she wanted to please her man until he could want nothing more than just her, all the time.
The heavy breathing and moans from his mouth as his hand gently rested on the side of her head, was reassurance of his pleasure.  Yet, he did not leave her on her knees for long.  
Within seconds he had her wrapped up in his arms, kissing her tenderly as he guided her to her bed.  The moment he had her on her back on her bed with her hair spread out like a halo all around her head, he took her foot with her red strapped heel and kissed the inside of her ankle.  He let his mouth trail kisses all the way down her leg until he started gently kiss her red lace panties.
“Blake?”  She moaned with a questionable teasing note.  He was taking his time, slowly kissing every inch of her, his mouth wandering up her stomach to her red lace bra where he let his tongue dance over her nipple poking at the lace.
She took a stuttering breath of anticipation as his fingers pushed the lace aside on one of her boobs and he began to suck on her nipple.  She liked slow and easy, but not after being teased and whispered to all night about what it was that he was going to do to her.  She wanted him in her now and the slow easy kissing could happen right before they make love a second time.
Her nails scratched along his back as she pleaded.  “Fuck me now Blake.  I want you.  I need you in me.”
He pulled his body back and up while looking down into her blue eyes as he watched a look of wanting and pleading for him.  He would never get tired of that look, the way she displayed in wanting him.  Tonight, it was about confirming to him about how good it felt before, so maybe he could just move forward and ask her to marry him.  He knew that was what was going to come next, not tonight, but soon, because what electrical thing that drew him to her, it wasn’t going away, only growing stronger.  His obligations be damned come new year, but for now, he did what any responsible man would do, he rolled on a condom from his pocket as Calista shimmied out her bra and panties.  
By the time her heels dropped to the floor, Blake was already gently spreading her legs apart for him to position his body.  Nothing felt sweeter than the moment his cock entered her tightness, her legs wrapped around him as her hips raised a bit for him to push in deeper.  Her fingers pressed into his back as her words filled his ears with pleasure.  “I want you Blake.  I want all of you.  You feel so good.  So right.”  He couldn’t agree more as he stroked in and out of her.
It was the moment his sated body collapsed against hers as their orgasms synched within seconds that he heard her say words that scared him.  “Every time you do this to me, I fall more in love with you.”
He wanted to say it, but he hesitated.  He wanted to say I love you.  It was so easily rolling out of his mind, but his tongue stopped.  It wasn’t until she was sitting up on her elbows looking over his sated body and kissing his chest, his neck and then his lips that he let himself say it.  “I think I’m falling in love with you Calista.”  In those words, she kissed him passionately letting her tongue deep into his mouth.  The second she pulled away, he made himself add the words he could tell caused her to feel a bit distant.  “Just be patient with me.  Just be patient.”
As her naked body cuddled up next to his, he finally heard her respond.  “I can do that Blake.  For you, I can do that.  Just don’t break my heart.”
“I won’t.”  He rushed out.  And he knew he wouldn’t because he knew how it felt to be hurt so bad and he could not do that to her.  But he still needed time.  Time to finish this project uninterrupted, time to figure out how she would be a permanent part of his life and time to figure out if things did not work out, what he might do to protect his heart.
As they parted ways that night, the cold night air surrounded them as a heated kiss between them begged them both to stay the night together, however Blake insisted he could not.  His words of I have a lot going on right now, please be patient with me, replayed over and over in her mind.  Those words told her that maybe he wasn’t ready for a relationship.  She now had a full understanding that the stranger at the bar she fell for, was still working through his own heartache as well.
It takes both sides to build a bridge.
Chapter Fourteen
Waking up next to you makes up for all the anticipation I had to go through.
“Merry Christmas Mom.”  Cole made her heart melt as she answered his phone call.
“It’s not Christmas yet.”  Calista teased.  “But Merry Christmas to you too.  Did you get my packages at your fathers?  There was ten of them.  I want pictures to make sure Stephanie didn’t switch out packages.”  She teased with a sense of seriousness.
“Dad made sure.  He was home when the packages arrived and placed under the tree. But I’ll send you pictures anyways.  We’re not opening them until tomorrow.  Because…”  His voice trailed off with sadness before adding.  “Maybe it would have been better for me to fly out there even if it was just for a day.  Today has been hard mom.  Harder than I could ever imagine.  I don’t know what the fuck dad is thinking.  Stephanie’s a bitch and I don’t think I want to even be here tomorrow to open gifts, just the three of us, like a family, a family I don’t want or like and this was stupid.  The whole day was stupid.  Rushing here and there, pretending like this or that, when really, dad looks agitated.  I think he’s made his biggest mistake ever mom.  I think him marrying Stephanie on Christmas Eve was like the worst thing ever that a dad could do.  It sucks.”
Calista pulled in a deep breath and held it through all his cussing and frustration.  She was not alarmed nor surprised since she got word on Facebook about the wedding bliss fun.  But listening to her son speak such harsh words and frustration, she had to wonder was he saying all this to make her feel better or was he truly miserable.  She spoke with slow sincerity.  She had so much she wanted to say, so much great advice, but her own pain of knowing that Clay and Stephanie picked the one holiday they always spent together as friends to now be married, felt like a knife to the heart.  “I’m sorry Cole.  Try not to take it personable.  One day your holidays will be about you and your new family, new wife, kids even, and all of this will just be a memory.”
“At least tell me that you friends party went well.”  He asked.
Calista remembered every single moment, from the start to the end where Blake admitted he loved her too, but she didn’t go into all of that.  Cole would have lost interest half way through.  “It was spectacular.  I have made some great friends.  I even have a guy I’m kind of dating.  So, your old mom is doing just fine.  I was sad to not be with you but we both originally thought you’d be in Europe still, not enrolling early in school.  Try not to let this get to you.  I got you some great stuff off your list you gave me.  And a few surprise gifts I think you will really like.”  She teased out.
“Did you get me the new PlayStation…”  He rambled on with questions about what she might have gotten him.  Instead of saying yes, I got that or no I did not, she laughed. 
By the time she hung up with Cole, she was restless.  Last night had gone well.  Everyone seemed to be having a wonderful celebration, but it was midnight on Christmas Eve, and Cole’s news made her feel melancholy.  
She looked at her Christmas decorations around her apartment.  Her place could easily had been photographed for an interior design magazine.  This she could do well.  However, a lot of other things in her life were not going as planned.  She wondered if the choices she made were now catching up to her.
Wanting a cup of spiced coffee, she realized she ran out last night and threw on her warm black sorrel boots over her thick black socks.  Her black leggings had a little bit of tissue lent from the ones she used to wipe her eyes after a few silent tears fell while talking to Cole.  The snow was lightly falling so she grabbed her blue ski parka and zipped it up over her dark blue turtleneck she had on.  The light blue knit hat with a pom pom on top that Milly knitted her matched her jacket perfectly.  She slipped it on over her head and stuffed her fingers into a pair of warm black mittens.  She figured she might take a walk outside along the closed-up shops, while drinking her coffee, and enjoying the quietness of the late evening her life was providing her.
Calista walked out the front door of her shop, spiced hot coffee in a to go cup in hand, and carefully double checked that she locked it behind her.  Just a walk up and down the street, she told herself.  
As she begins to walk in the snow, making small footprints from her snow boots on the snow dusted sidewalk, she felt herself turn to go a certain direction first.  It had been less than twenty-four hours, but she missed him.  He was probably at Jenny’s helping her get things ready for tomorrow at her house, but all the same, she wandered that way towards his office just several doors down from her coffee shop.
The moment, she reached Blake’s shopfront, she saw the lights on in back and wondered if he was there.  She had never actually gone inside but thought of it more as a sacred place for him.  The door was locked so without thinking her right hand that wasn’t holding the hot coffee reached up and knocked hard on the shop glass.  Not thinking really, just wondering, was he there?
The moment Blake walked out, looking exhausted and unruly with his flannel shirt open to a white tee shirt, his blue jeans looking like they needed a wash as something dusty was on him, she thought he must still be working on his ‘project’ he was so secretive about.  Yet his look of embarrassment mixed with shock that Calista was at his window, something she had never done before, brought her concern as an older woman she had seen him with before out on the street came walking out from the back lit room as well.  His look of awkwardness caused Calista to feign a smile and turn to walk the opposite direction away from his shop.
Blake felt frustrated.  He needed to explain but didn’t want to frustrate Calista.  They had texted on and off all day, but he saw the look on her face.  His fingers trembled as he typed.  “It’s not what you think.”  
Calista didn’t reply back.  
Blake dialed her number and excused himself from the chair fundraiser for his project to explain what she saw.  Her phone went to voice mail as his hurried voice barreled out.  “Calista, honey, it’s not what you think, that is if you are thinking anything.  This is work.  This lady is here to finalize, oh shit.  Just call me when you get this.  I don’t want you mad or hurt.  I would have introduced you to her.  It’s been a long day and I am exhausted and have regretted almost every minute I have wasted on this project instead of being with you.
Calista had turned her cellphone off after his text.  Her heart was feeling heavy.  Coles news, albeit something she knew, still weighed on her heart as her son was the one so affected by it all.  Which she should be feeling great, because the news was not making her sad, however, she had an evil thought about what could go wrong for the holidays for Clay and Stephanie.  As for Blake, obviously had plans on his Christmas Eve with someone else.  Just like her hair, she was feeling blue.  She turned the corner at the end of the street.  She let the snow fall on her as the silence of the night felt soothing yet, encumbering.  The moment she reached the bottom of her stairs to her place, she stopped.  Instead of going back up to her apartment loft, she got in her SUV and decided to just go for a late-night Christmas Eve drive.
It had been a while since she just drove around some of the neighborhoods in Darling.  She did it a few times when she first arrived to get her bearings, and to understand the demographics of the town in comparison to her shop.  GPS is a wonderful tool, but sometimes, getting lost and finding one’s way home without it can have a strange empowerment.
She noticed several homes still had their Christmas lights on at the late hour.  The drive of colorful lights, mixed with the sound of Christmas music playing inside her car, she realized a few tears were trailing down her cheeks.  With a quick wipe of her fingertips she realized her feelings were a mix of relief and sadness.  Thinking about Clay marrying Stephanie so soon after the divorce made her sad, even more so sad for Cole as the timing was crappy.  He made it clear that he was going with the flow on this but he struggled with the divorce all the same.  Then there was Blake.  She wanted him, friend and lover, but she did not want to push.  She knew that waking up tomorrow on her own would be tough.  But she also knew the decision she made to put all revenge aside, make amends and move forward, was her new way of thinking.
By the time Calista made it back to her alleyway to park, she noticed Blake’s truck was parked in her spot.  She saw his face being illuminated by his cellphone as he was looking into it and typing something.  Just as she parked behind him with her headlights already off, she turned her cellphone on to several dings.  It was Blake.  “I’ve got a gift for you.”  His last text read.
She looked into her cellphone, squinted her eyes at disbelief and then turned her car off, shoved her cellphone into her shoulder bag and got out of her car at the exact same time as Blake got out of his truck.
“Merry Christmas.”  His thick deep voice filled the air with a cherry note.  He walked around to the back of his truck and unlocked the truck cover and rolled it back.
Calista walked towards him in disbelief.  It was one am in the morning and he was at her place bringing her a gift, that meant something.  “Merry Christmas yourself.  Sorry, I turned my cell off.  I had some thinking to do.  It has been a strange evening of conflicted feelings.”  She responded slowly as she looked inside his truck.  In the bed of his truck was a very detailed wooden sign with the name Hide Out Café in metal iron scripted type.  It was custom made, obviously, but was this what he had been working on that had him so busy he couldn’t spend time with her, she quizzed internally.
She looked at the sign, and then looked at him with her body sideways to him and her head facing over her shoulder in his direction.  “It’s gorgeous.  It’s perfect.”  She cooed as her knitted gloves came off and her fingers touched the sign.
“Do you like it?”
Her eyebrows raised as her eyes opened wide.  She touched the detailed wood sign again that was at least two feet high and six feet long.  It was gorgeous.  “I love it.”  She finally replied.
“Phew.”  He joked with a word she was known for using often around the café and in town; he used his hand pretending that he was wiping sweat off his forehead.
“But why?”  She turned to him and looked with an expectation of an honest answer.
“Why?  I honestly wanted you to have something special for your shop sign after I found out you decided to not make it officially the revenge café.  Jenny and Jackie told me that you admitted to the ladies at the social meeting that you wanted the café to be more of a place where folks come to take a break, old and young.”
She took a step towards him and stopped.  “But, the only other sign you made for anyone in town, was…”  She stopped herself from saying the name of his ex-fiancé.
“I know.  But you’re different.  We were friends first.”
“Is that what we are Blake?  Friends?”
“I don’t know.  I thought so.”  He offered.
She lightly laughed as the snow falling was getting thicker, filling her blue hat and his hair with white sticky flakes.  “Well, in all actuality, we were a heated mess the first night we met, but yes, friends for sure.  I would love to spend time and see where we can take this.  I’m extremely attracted to you.”  She offered up with confidence that even if he shot her down tonight, she would have let him know her true feelings.
“I want more.”  He spoke up as his steps put him directly in front of her, his lips found hers as his hands tangled up into her hair.  The moment their kiss parted, he added.  “I wanted more from you the moment I realized you weren’t in Utah, but in my Kansas.”
She laughed lightly.  “Me too.  Let’s get this sign into the shop.  Then do you have time to come upstairs for a hot tea?”
Something hotter than tea will be served this Christmas Eve night.
Chapter Fifteen
By the stroke of midnight, as the bell tolls twelve, I promise you a new year that is magical.
Calista had spent have the latter part of the day getting her hair and nails done to match the navy-blue dress from Tully’s.  The nights weather was cooperating as much as it could for New Years Eve in Darling Kansas, but it was cold out; which is why the last-minute arrival from Tully’s shop was well received.  A off white winter coat with navy trim for her to wear over her dress until she got into the heated ranch barn where the festivities would take place.  Blake was taking her to the event that was the talk of the town, by invitee only, Culver Ranch New Year’s Eve Ball.
Now, just a year ago, Calista would have laughed heartily at someone who suggested that she, of all people, would be going to a ball, in a barn, in Kansas; yet here she was getting ready to do just that.
With a bit of in trepidation that the only other person that was invited to this that she knew, besides Blake, was Jenny.  It was a family tradition along with several other well to do people in town and the surrounding area.  Jenny had reassured her that it wasn’t as all fancy as she thought, but high heels or fancy cowgirl boots, wear your best to impress was the motto.
Standing in her dressing room, trying to decide which purse to take, the sound of Blake calling her name from below the loft brought a flutter to her stomach.
“I’ll be down in a second.”  She called out from the dressing room.
“Take your time.  I hate being the first ones there and there is at least an hour and half before the awards ceremony.  It’s your choice if you want to stay after that.”  He resounded out as if he was yelling out to her, but she could hear him just fine in the dressing room.
She did a once over in the mirror and smiled at herself.  She looked incredible and she knew it was part the dress and the other part all the orgasms she had in the last few days from Blake.  It was as if since Christmas Eve, he found a way to be inseparable from her even if he had work to finish up on the new women’s shelter addition project.  His super quiet can’t tell anyone project came pouring out as he felt he had to explain himself that night.  While her own emotions came crying out over her ex’s getting married.  That night was a turning point for both of them and she thanked God for that.
As she started to sashay down the stairs of the loft to the main living area, the look on Blakes face as he turned to face her, told her she had done herself up right.  Her hair was swept up in an updo, thanks to Remi, and her dress made her feel like a movie star.
“You sure know how to make a guy want to strip you naked and not take you out in public.”  He teased.
She winked at him as she walked off the last step and began to walk towards him in a sultry fashion.  “And you sure clean up nice cowboy.”  She wrapped her arms around him all dressed up in a semi-formal black tux, and leaned in for a soft sensual kiss, not wanting to mess up her lipstick and then pulled away.
“And yes, to answer you from earlier, I want to stay until midnight.  Leaving any earlier on New Year’s Eve is wrong.”  She turned from his arms and reached for her off white winter coat from Tully, holding it out for him to help her slip into it.  As soon as he did, she looked down at her feet.
“Darn.  I have to switch out to my winter boots to go down the back stairs.  No matter, I packed an overnight bag by the door.”  She slipped her feet out of her silver strapped heels and handed them to him.  “Would you be a darling and put those in my bag?”
“I can and I can even promise you one thing better.”  He walked her shoes over to her bag, put the heels inside as she asked.
“What’s that?”  She slipped her feet into her snow boots that did not make her outfit sexy but was a necessity if she was going to make it safely down those outside snow-covered steps.
“I can offer to put the original inside door back in that goes from the living room to a hallway between buildings and out to the front sidewalk.”  He beamed proudly, knowing full well after their first night together at his ranch, he wanted to do that for her, but got sidetracked with the women’s shelter project.
“Why Blake…”  Calista teased as she gave him a coy look.  “That might make me think you want something in return.”
He lifted her overnight bag onto his shoulder, thinking to himself, he loved the feeling of knowing she wanted to go back to his place for the long weekend like they talked about over Christmas Day.  He imagined an entire weekend of naked intertwined bodies sweaty and sated before teasing back.  “I only want to see you smile like you do after, you know.”
She opened her back door out to the alleyway as she casually added.  “That I can do.”
By the time they arrived at the party, and got out of the truck so the valet service that the ranch hired to park cars and trucks out in the fields of snow and muck, Calista was ready for the midnight bell to ring twelve.  The entire half hour drive to the Culver’s Ranch was nothing but sexual teasing, rising the tension between them to a degree of way past hot passion.  Yet, somehow the blast of cold air as they climbed out of his truck, and the humming of conversations coming from within the heated barn enticed Calista to realize this was their first official out in public date.  She took a deep breath in and turned to look at Blake as he grabbed her hands with an excited expression on his face.
“Shall we?”  His head nodded towards the large barn doors that had a smaller tent in front of the doors with blasting heaters to help keep the cold air out of the barn.  
Calista looked around and noticed that this was the type of party one only threw on a expensive budget, unlike her small friend get togethers she always loved to throw.  She could only imagine the type of money that was floating around in the barn this evening.  She observed the decorated barn which looked like a rural wedding might take place inside as yards and yards of tulle were draped everywhere, a crystal ball hung in the middle of the room with lighting to cast shimmers everywhere.  Strings of lights illuminated the ceiling and side walls while covered in white flowered vines.  The center of the room was a wood dance floor surrounded by several round tables well decorated for the evenings event.  One would not be able to tell it was a barn from the inside, but more of a rustic building.  She wondered if a furry animal had ever step foot in this barn or if it was strictly built for this type of event.
While taking it all in, Blakes hand squeezed hers, assuring her it that none of the frivolous thoughts running through her brain truly mattered at the moment.  What mattered most was the award that Blake was to receive in not only designing the new shelter but playing project manager to the construction of it all.  In finding that out, Calista forgave him for every dismissal moment since their first night together at his ranch, however Blake was having trouble forgiving himself for putting the project first, as he had mentioned everyday that they had been together since Christmas Eve.
As the first moments into the barn settled into Calista’s brain, she realized she was among those she could easily associate with.  Jenny was only moments behind them.  She arrived with an old family friend that was a few years older.  She was dressed in a dark red cashmere sweater with black dress pants.  The sparkling crystals in her dark brown hair was a nice touch from Remi.  Her wheelchair had a dark red fur throw on the backside of the seat, incase her legs got cold in the barn.  Within seconds, Jenny and Calista had an entire conversation going about her boys and Christmas day, while the men were discussing the Chiefs going to the Superbowl.
As Calista chatted so comfortably with Jenny, Blake kept tossing glances of endearment at her.  It all seemed like a fairytale for a moment, so she looked away for a second to catch her breath and in doing so she turned and stubbed her toe on Jenny’s wheel chair.  
“Oh my god, I am so sorry.”  Both Jenny and she exclaimed to each other in a breath and then began to laugh.
“Around me, you might want steel toed boots on.  I’ve been known to run over a toe or two.”  Jenny joked.
“It’s completely me.”  Calista leaned down to Jenny’s ear and whispered.  “I’ve been so nervous all day.  I don’t know why, and Blake keeps staring at me.”
Jenny cupped her hand and whispered into Calista’s ear.  “That’s because he finally realizes how much in love, he is with you.”  Then she grabbed Calista’s hand and squeezed it gently before letting it go.
Calista cupped her hand and whispered back.  “Perhaps that is why I am so nervous.  I fell in love with Blake before he could admit we are good together, but tonight something feels different.  It feels more real.  Like I’m in his life now and before we were just a secret.”
Jenny started to laugh heartedly before whispering back, trying to stifle her giddiness.  “Oh honey, I think everyone in this town knew you two were in love before you two did.  But I knew.  I’ve known since that first night you two met.  I mean to say, he mentioned that first night you two met shortly after he found out you rented the loft and I could tell; he had found someone to pique his interest.  And that is not an easy thing for anyone to do.”
Calista straightened up and let her hand touch Jenny’s shoulder before she felt Blake come beside her and practically lean himself into her.  Their hands intertwined and they both let out a sigh of appreciation for one another.  This felt right, Calista thought to herself as they turned to look at each other endearingly.
By the time they had champagne or beer glasses in everyone’s hands, along with plenty of appetizers handed their way by wait staff making their way around the heated barn, an event coordinator indicated by music and dimming lights that the awards part of the event was to begin.  Blake wasn’t the only one getting an award tonight, apparently, this was the night the local area awarded those for great achievements over the year.
The conversation stayed light and casual until the moment, Blake excused himself, to talk to the mayor.  Calista watched Blake join the mayor and the older woman she had seen him around town with join him at the podium with the mayor.  Just as Blake and the woman were being introduced, a strange voice whispered in her ear.  “Isn’t it just incredible what Blake did for the shelter?  I mean it was all Mrs. Worthington’s money, but Blake handled the plans, the crew, everything in such a short time.”
Calista turned away from the award ceremony as the mayor began talking in her Mae West type voice; the voice she remembered fondly from the hair salon day where the woman let her know their opinion.  She turned a bit to notice the strange man who whispered in her ear just as the mayor was handing the award to Blake while shaking his hand.  The stranger, an older man she never met before, but looked vaguely familiar smiled at her as his attention went back to Blake receiving the award.
Calista turned her full attention back to Blake as the sounds of clapping broke her thoughts from the man standing next to her back to Blake up on the stage looking her way.  They placed another handshake for the media before they both walked off stage with another vaguely familiar woman, the one she saw in his office Christmas Eve.  The moment the three of them headed towards her, Calista felt confident that the reason Blake had been avoiding her was well worth it, however she could only have wished he communicated better with her about it.  She smiled to herself knowing that at least they were working on that - their communication.
“Calista, I’d like you to meet Mrs. Worthington.  Dad, I’d like you to meet Calista.  Calista this is my dad Jake.”
Calista said hello to both and shook Mrs. Worthington’s hand and then turned to say hello to Blakes’ dad, the man with an older yet familiar face.  “Hello.”  She offered up as the older man took her hand and kissed it.
“Well hello to you too darling.”  He offered as a slight blush rose up on Calista’s cheeks.  There was no doubt where the charm came from in his family.
“Dad here, found Mrs. Worthington to come meet the needs of the clinic.  In the meantime, I guess they found each other.”  Blake announced with a bit of joking to his words.  Calista could only imagine the story behind all of this.  She had never had the chance to talk to him about his entire family, only the Jenny and Pete side.  There had been casual mention of their mother’s death over Christmas day but was quickly hushed in a vibe about we don’t talk about it much.  
“Well it’s a pleasure to meet you both.”  Calista offered up politely.  
It was in the next few moments, that unanswered questions began to be answered.  As Blake’s father spoke proudly of his son, his accomplishments and of Jenny’s ability to keep him in line while their dad was traveling about the country, meeting people.  Which brought Calista back to thinking about how sad Blake looked when she spoke about traveling abroad herself.  She had to wonder was Blake worried, back then, when she made the comment, that she would leave him to travel?  Which she did plan to still travel, but only now she was hoping he would travel with her.  She pocketed that thought for a later conversation, one for when they were more serious than now.  But as everyone talked and she included herself in all of their conversations so casually, she kept wondering, how serious were they?  Overnight bags and hot sultry sex every night was perfectly fine with her, but what about next month, next year, as things become more of a true relationship.  Blake interrupted her thoughts with the suggestion they take to the dance floor.
The moment their bodies were intertwined in a slow easy step back and forth to a love song under the dimmed lights, Calista was welcoming the reprieve from all the social banter.  “You should be very proud of yourself.”  She offered up into his right ear.
“It was something this town needed, but I could have done with a much better schedule and not so many cooks in the kitchen, if you get me drift.”  He talked softly into her ear.
“I completely understand that feeling.  I think that is why I always wanted to be my own boss.  Although I know sometimes, I annoy my employees at the Hide Out with demands, right now, it seems like everyone is getting along great.  So great that I don’t feel like I need to spend sixty hours a week or more like I did at my old coffee shop back in Utah.”
“Well, I only regret not telling you or at least finding time to spend with you.”  He whispered softly.
Calista let her lips find his for a soft reassuring kiss.  When she pulled back, she spoke honestly.  “One thing you will come to find out about me Blake, even after all this talk of me being the Revenge Queen of Darling, is I really do like to just move past things, move on, and plan for a better future.  I saw my error in the revenge department.  I’m ready for a future here, with you if it works out.”  She blew out a breath of air in fluttered anticipation.  She knew the feelings were there, growing, planning, but was he ready to move on.
Blake whispered into her ear.  “I want to spend the new year getting to know you, Calista?  Even if that means spending less time fishing and more time with you.”
“I like to fish.”  She teased.
“You do?”  He sounded excited.
“I do.  But yes, I think all business niceties aside, I want you for pleasure and I want to get to know this Blake you have been hiding from me the past month.  I had no idea that you were the man behind this.”  She questioned flirtatiously.
“I didn’t want anyone to know.  It’s like I get infatuated with something and I just have to fixate on it or keep busy; I like to keep myself occupied to keep me out of trouble.
“I can understand that.”  She thought of her two years of planning her divorce and move here.
“Do you?  Because, after the night I found out that you were my renter in my apartment and building shop, I kind of found it hard to not want to fixate on you.”
She laughed while thinking as they danced.  She had read all his signals as immature, when in reality he was working on getting over his own hardship.  They were two ships in the night that passed and lost course.
To mine own self be true, I would be lost without you.
Chapter Sixteen
Is it bliss when the rain stops and the sun shines? 
Can one person’s clarity bring happiness to another?  That was not something that Calista was really thinking about, not until a certain phone call ended in an unusual way.
Some of the coffee shop regulars had stayed past closing to discuss the Valentines benefit they were working on for the shelter.  Calista had run upstairs through her new connected doorway from the outside front of the shop.  Blake had surprised her after the new year with the offer to reopen the hallway from the front to her loft which connected to living room area of her loft.  She had gladly accepted several of his offers since that dance on New Years Eve, some of them life changing, but this one was simply put, a life saver as those alley metal stairs deemed more dangerous in the frozen winter storms they were experiencing.  By the time she made it back down with her notebook full of hand-written notes, she felt an air of suspicion in the front area of her café.  Standing in silence in only black leggings, her black winter ankle boots and Blake’s navy blue and gray army sweatshirt she stole from him the other night, she realized all eyes were on her as she entered the room.
“Calista?”  Jackie held up the café cordless phone in her hand as the room came to a hushed quiet.  “I think you might want to take this call.”
Calista looked at Jackie with a tilted head and curious smile on her face as she walked towards her quickly, dropping her red mead college ruled notebook on the table of six women and one man, that had become the regulars in the group.  The large black sharpie marker adorned an ornamental heart and the words Valentine Benefit neatly graffitied the front of the notebook.
Jenny, Tanesha, Remi, Tully, Milly, Sally, along with Larry the plumber, stared at her with wide open eyes, some with their hands under their chins as if they were awaiting her news from the call of the phone that Jackie was holding up.  Curiosity was striking her imagination as she reached for the phone and Jackie whispered two words that sent a striking shiver through her body.  “Your ex.”
Calista had to wonder how he found her, since she changed her cellphone immediately following the night that she drunk texted him, or more so Stephanie received his text, but that was neither here nor there at the moment.  What worried her first was if Cole is okay?
Cautiously, Calista whispered out a meek ‘hello’, not sure if by the statement ‘your ex’ if it was Clay or Stephanie.  Things had been quiet in that arena since New Years but somehow her apprehension was building as the silence laid on the other end of the line; that was until his deep soft-spoken voice rattled her nerves unexpectedly.
“Calista?  It’s Clay.  Before you get worried, everything is alright with Cole.”  He rushed out the last sentence to assure her that was not why he was calling.
“Clay?”  She said his name as she turned to face the group of organizers for the fundraisers, who had also become her dear friends.  “How did you find me?”  She put a palm up in the air as if to say what gives and gave a questioning look to her friends.  Cole had promised not to tell his father or Stephanie where she was at or her new cellphone number.  The fact that he called the café looking for her, worried her, nonetheless.
“I did a little detective work.  Don’t worry.”  He rushed out the last sentence again.  “Stephanie has no idea where you are or that I found you.  Best to let those barking dogs lay.”  He awkwardly joked and then cleared his throat.  “I see you and your Aunt bought a small café in Kansas.  I like the pictures someone took of you and the handsome man.”  He paused.  “You look more in love with him, than you and I ever looked in any of our photos.”  He went quiet and Calista was at a loss for words. She knew the pictures he was referring to.  They were used in several social media feeds for the café, not to mention her own new Facebook account had them on it.  She thought once she blocked Stephanie and Clay, that they would never find out.  Then again, she had taunted Stephanie with a picture of Blake to prove she could get a better man.
The silence crept on for ten seconds which felt like minutes while everyone’s attention was on Calista.  Her breathing slowed after a huge breath out.  Her smile plastered on her face to tell her friends that she was okay; when, in reality, she had to wonder, what was Clay up to.
He finally spoke up.  “I don’t know if this is a good time to talk.  Stephanie has left to see her mother in Chicago.  She’s fallen seriously ill and well, I know you had been close to her mother at one point, and she’s not doing well.  Not that, that is not the reason I called.”  He went quiet again.  Normally he was one to avoid serious conversations, but this time it seemed like he wanted to talk.  For the sake of Cole, she thought maybe it best she took the call in private.
Clays voice started to say something when Calista turned her back to her friends and interrupted his next words in a whispering voice.  “Clay?  I am in the middle of something, but I can take a few moments to talk; if you need to?”  She questioned out.
“Yes.”  His reply was soft and questioning.
“Okay.  Well, you called the café shop number.  It’s closed but we are working on a local fundraiser.  Give me a second and I will call you back on my personal cell phone number.  It’s probably a good idea you have it for Cole, but if by God you let Stephanie know this number, I will cut your balls off with a dull knife.”  She half threatened; half laughed.
“I won’t.  I’ll put you under Bob Ross.”  He laughed.
“Give me five minutes.”  She quickly replied and hung up without saying goodbye strictly out of nervousness, not out of rudeness.
“So that was the old ball and chain?”  Larry chimed up which surprised everyone.  The rest of the females could sense her duress.
“It was.”  She replied with raised eyebrows and soft-spoken voice.  “Listen, I need to call him back.  Nothing serious.  Cole’s okay, but I suppose it’s time I finally talk to the man.”  Thinking to herself the last time she spoke to him, he was tied up in their old bedroom, on their old bed naked, pleading for a last act of sexual mischievousness that she had no intentions on playing out.
A few “suppose” echoed the room, as they all looked at her with concern.  She set the café cordless phone back on its charger and then walked back to the table they were all sitting around.  “I put just about everything I can think of in this notebook.”  She flipped open the red notebook to a neatly scripted and organized page full of to do and explanatory information on their next event.  The women’s fund raiser for the shelter had become a monthly event.  This time they want to have valentines for the women, a chocolatier demonstration and a motivational speaker on how to move forward from a major stressful event in one’s life.  A speaker, Calista found herself through a podcast that was willing to speak to a group of women staying at the shelter via internet Q and A.  Jackie had mentioned a fondue potluck, while Jenny wanted to address the new disability quarters needed for some homeless women at the shelter.  Either way, research had gone pen to paper nights ago, Calista felt these guys could make up their own decisions and let her know, while she handled this personal business.
“I’ll only be a bit.”  She offered up to the room as she grabbed her purse and iPad.  Then she looked at the group staring at her from around the table.  “But if I am not, Sally can you lock up.”  Sally was now officially manager in training, while Melissa had been officially fired because it was her who had planned the take a trip and steal your boss’s car situation.  Things were much calmer now that Milly was back to keep on eye on Melissa.  Calista would not hire her back, but she didn’t press charges either because the insurance already paid her for the stolen car.  Besides, every day, Calista noticed that now that Sally was given the roll of manager in training, her confidence level had risen far above where Calista could ever have imagined, thus giving her and Blake the extra time they found ways to have fun with each other.  This is how she had imagined her shop, but just didn’t imagine it getting there so quickly.
Blake was due soon to help with the next benefit, so she looked to Jenny next.  “Tell Blake what’s up.  Have him come straight upstairs.”
“Will do.” Jenny spoke supportively.
Remi offered up.  “You okay?  You look a little flustered.”
Calista meekly smiled.  “I’m fine.  It’s just weird that he called here.  Cat’s out of the bag so to speak.  At least for him.  He promises not to tell Stephanie, but I know her, it won’t be long she’ll be rearing her ugly head this way.”  She paused thinking of Stephanie’s mother and her health.  “Or not.  Hard to tell.”  She passed off the comment as a nonchalant thought, but her mind was already softening over Stephanie’s mother who was a kind decent human being, unlike her daughter.
The trek up the stairs to her place felt heavy footed, but she got herself settled in on her couch after grabbing a bottled water out of the refrigerator, left her door unlocked and grabbed her cellphone out.  She was hesitant in calling but the moment her fingers dialed his cellphone number, she knew this was a long overdue phone call.
The moment Clay answered the phone with her name, the conversation felt a bit surreal.  “Calista?”  He questioned out.
“It’s me.  Now you know my new cell phone.  Use it sparingly.”  She joked, just like the painter Bob Ross might have suggested on using a color.  Bob Ross was an inside joke between them, Clay and herself, one they never let Stephanie in on.  It felt nice to hide something from her for a change.
“I will.”  Clay offered in a serious tone.  There was a long pause between them, so Calista took a sip of water and then grabbed an empty yellow notebook that was sitting on the table in front of her.  
She put Clay on speakerphone.  “Can you hear me okay?  I have some work I need to do while we talk so I put you on speakerphone.”
“I can.  Ah, ever the great multi tasker, still doing two jobs at once.”  He teased.
“You know me.”  She half joked, but he didn’t know how cold and callus she had gotten from the affair; how mangled her heart was for two years, how all the scheming left her feeling hollow instead of successful.  That was until Blake came into her life.  Blake, and all of her new friends.  In a sense, she was extremely thankful for his affair.  Before she knew it, she said the words.  “Thanks.”
“For what?”  He asked inquisitively.
She clicked a black pen to push the ink nib out and started to write the words thankful on her notebook before replying.  “Well, not to sound snide, but my life here in Kansas is great, and if it weren’t for you and the…”  She paused as a nasty foul mouth word almost slipped out of her mouth and then corrected.  “brunette.  I never would have found what I found here.”  She replied just as Blake quietly walked through the interior door to the room and shut the door soundlessly behind him.  She put a finger up to her lips and he nodded that he understood.
Clay awkwardly laughed for a second.  “Cole told me you are engaged to be married this spring.  I assume the man in all the photos you are dreamily staring at on your social media accounts is him.  Handsome.  A bit younger don’t you think?”  The room got quiet as Calista looked at her handsome man quietly walking towards her with a huge smile on his face.  He was dressed in a brown wool blazer winter coat, which he was trying to quietly take off, a pair of dark brown dress pants and a deep charcoal cashmere sweater she bought him from Tully’s with a lighter charcoal grey soft tee underneath.  He was dressed in his new normal business casual which she loved to dress him up in.  He had a business meeting earlier that day with the final payment from Randy at his old bar along with Randy’s new business partner, Jackie’s new fiancé Conner, who had money to invest.  As she looked lovingly at her new fiancé who was trying to quietly sit on the couch next to her, she heard Clay clear his throat and mumble a few words.  On the off chance he might say something she did not want Blake to hear, she decided to set the record straight.
“I don’t mean to interrupt, but you should know that Blake just showed up and he is here in our place together.”  She proudly announced.
“Oh.”  Clay paused.  “Hello, Blake.  Cole has told me a lot about you.  All good of course.  Thanks for having your friend fly him out to see his mother for a weekend.”
“No problem.  I thought it was important he was here when I officially asked for Calista’s hand in marriage.”  Blake offered and then dropped a soft kiss on Calista’s lips.  When he pulled away, he offered.  “I can give you two privacy if needed.”  Offering more to Calista than Clay.
“That won’t be necessary.” Both Clay and Calista replied in unison, while Blake raised an eyebrow out of curiosity towards Calista.  She laid her left hand on his thigh and winked.
Clay spoke up first.  “I suppose I should apologize for all that I put you through.”  He cleared his throat, but before he could continue, Calista had rehearsed what it was she wanted to say to him for so long once she found a man like Blake.
“Clay?  Sorry to interrupt but I must accept your apology and say this.  We were once happily married, or so I thought.  Yet there was always something missing.  In our marriage that is.  I guess we married young, started a family young and I just felt okay with that.  Stephanie and you both betrayed me, I have decided to forgive you for that.  Doesn’t mean I am okay with it, but let’s just say, getting back into a new life that felt so much like me has led to some pretty spectacular people.  So, your apology is accepted and please lets just start this next phase of our lives in peace.  Cole will meet someone special one day and we will see each other on and off.  Not that I want to see Stephanie ever again, but I can be polite.  If she can.”  The last sentence came out with a slight laughter to it.  
Blake stood up to excuse himself.  Calista watched him walk to the bathroom and close the door behind him.  They had been switching off staying at each other’s place almost every night since New Years Eve.  Only a week after the gala event, did Blake choose a sweet romantic setting at his house to ask for her hand in marriage.  A simple, yet perfect for them moment, made up Calista’s mind.  This was the kind of man she wanted in her future.  A strong, sweet sentimental man, that knew how to make her smile in a lot of different ways.  Then his surprise in flying Cole out to Kansas, arranging a nice family gathering at the bar while he planned for Cole to tell his mother that Blake had his approval to marry her in front of everyone.  It was a moment; she would never forget.
Clay’s voice interrupted her own internal thoughts rebounding over the memory of Blake asking her for her hand in marriage and the previous nights lovemaking.  “I guess you won’t be surprised to know, Stephanie and I are already getting a divorce.  We’re splitting assets.  I got a new job in California and Cole is trying to decide if he wants to stay here or go with me.  I asked if I could talk with you first, you know to finally apologize, tell you the news first about Stephanie and well…”  His voice trailed off.  
Calista screamed internally at him.  Well what?  You think I want you back?  Who the fuck cares if Stephanie and you are getting a divorce?  But instead of verbalizing it, she took a deep cleansing breath and blew it out.  “Probably for the best Clay.  I mean about you and Stephanie.  It was more of the thrill of the hunt then the prize at the end.  How’s Cole handling all of this?  I mean, I would hate for him to move farther away from me, but I did move away from our old…”  She paused as she almost said home, but really, she could not get herself to say the word home, because now this was her home and although Cole was not here in physical form, he was in spirit and her new home, new life, with Blake and her new friends, her café and this town.
What Calista did not know was that Blake was standing a distance behind her but could still hear the conversation pursue.  His own internal fears of the words that Clay and Stephanie were divorcing caused him to stop in his footsteps of walking towards her.  He had wanted to hear what she had to say unedited from her.
Clay spoke out to her pause.  “He’s actually just busy between classes and two part time jobs.  I tried to get him a fulltime job at the bank before I left, but he seems to like his two part time gigs.  I don’t know.  It bothers me that his work ethic for his generation seems, so different.”
Calista spoke up quickly when Clay paused.  “Well I will talk with Cole, now that you have talked to me, but by all means Clay, let’s not play the let me talk to your mother first game.  Your life, your news, is just that.  Divorcing Stephanie does not really affect me one way or another.”  She breathed in and continued as she breathed out.  “Actually!”  She spoke up at the same time as Clay interrupting him, with a voice that was rather joyous and loud.  “I am thankful.  She wasn’t really good for either of us, all three of us if you include Cole, but our marriage was not really a happy one, but an existing one.  I might have divorced you without Stephanie.”  She boldly announced.
Which must have struck a cord with Clay’s ego, not knowing that Blake was not in the room, or so Calista thought.  “So those last two years of you begging me to stay with you, were what?”  He maliciously announced with pride.
Calista calmly asserted out a firm answer without a second thought.  “A desire to save our marriage for Cole, but, in reality, once I drove every single mile away from you two Clay, you and Stephanie that is, I realized, I just didn’t want Stephanie to win, so I begged.  I didn’t want to upset Cole after another one of your affairs, so I begged.  But when I got to Kansas, I realized I deserve a new life.  One where a man does not cheat on me, and friends that don’t stab me in the back.  I guess my only surprise is how quickly I found that new life.  Cole knows how happy I am now.  I think, perhaps, after the damage you did to our lives, you should be happy for me too.”
Without hesitation, he replied.  “You are right.  I am happy for you.  Sorry.  I have a lot of things I am working through with a therapist.  Sorry, Blake.” 
The last sentence shocked Calista as she herself almost forgot that Clay may have thought Blake was in the room.  Perhaps his dig at her begging him, was a self-preservation of pride.  Although she was glad that she got to answer him just today as to why. She had not wanted to save her marriage, she had wanted to win, and then she wanted to divorce him on her terms.  How happy she is now that she had not wasted anymore of her own valuable time with him and Stephanie.  
In the moment of losing herself to his apology, and the empty sounds from the room, a bold victorious voice filled the air.  “No need to apologize Clay.  Calista and I are very much in love.”  Just then his strong firm hands landed on her shoulder as he stood behind her on the couch and he softly began to massage her knotted muscles in her neck.  “I should advise you however, that I am very protective of Calista…” a slight pause elapsed before his tone changed, “and twice your size and five times richer than you.  You’re not the only one that did your research.  However, I love your ex-wife and your son Cole.  He’s a bright young man I will be proud to call him my stepson.  I think we will all do just fine.  You in Cali and us here in Kansas.  Cole can decide where he wants to be for the time being and in the future.”
Clay spoke in a more dignified professional tone.  “Well, yes.  I should leave you two alone now.  I agree Cole has to make that decision.  Congratulations Calista.  You deserve a happy life.  If you need to communicate with me regarding Cole, please feel free.  Congratulations Blake.  I wish you two a very happy life.”
Calista heard the preservation turn into sadness in his voice towards the end; a sound that she was sure Blake could not interpret.  Sometimes when you have been with someone so long, as she had been with Clay, she knew the sadness she detected in his voice.  He brought on this loneliness and it was not hers to deal with.  She quickly rushed out.  “Sounds great.  Good bye Clay.  We’ll talk again.”  And she quickly hit the end button on her cellphone before he could reply.  
It wasn’t that she had second thoughts, it was just that emotionally she could not deal with the fact that the father of her son had major regrets, as he should, and he sounded humbled, as he should.  She also worried how much Blake heard and what he was feeling right now.
His hands stop massaging her neck gently as his voice softly filled the room.  “That was a bit awkward.  Sorry if I sounded harsh and protective there for a second.”
Calista turned her body on the couch and laid her cellphone off on to the coffee table as she looked up at the man who captivated her every thought since her first night in Kansas.  “No.  No.  You were very sweet, and I think it was strange for everyone.  That’s the first time I’ve talked to him since I left him the night before I got here.  I guess it had to happen sooner than later.”  She let out a huge sigh of relief that it was over as Blake sat down on the couch next to her.  His hands went together between his knees as his head lowered down and his body leaned forward.
Calista leaned into him, wrapped her arms around him and laid a kiss on his shoulder.  He was a larger than life man, but he was giving her the vibe of something was wrong.  Instead of prodding as she normally would have, she remained silent and just leaned her body into him.  It wasn’t long before he spoke up.
“No regrets then?  I mean, now that you know it’s not working out with that other woman?”  He quizzed as he let his eyes lift while his head turned to look at her.
“None.”  She pulled him towards her, their bodies slowly intertwining on her couch until their mouths passionately began to kiss while their hands were touching each other in a reassuring manner.  Only moments passed until they both rolled apart to be laying next to each other on the couch.  Blakes hands held her from rolling off the couch, while his smile was telling her that Clay had left the room and their thoughts.  That is until he frowned and spoke up.
“Is it too soon for you?  A spring wedding?  Do you want to take your time on all of this?  I mean I get that you like planning everything, but do you need time?”
Calista quickly laid a kiss on his lips and then pulled back to situate herself to get up off the couch.  She wanted to change out of what she was wearing, but most importantly she wanted to drag her man back to her bed, make love, pack her weekend bag to stay at his house and discuss her moving in sooner rather than later.  The shop was covered for the next few days.  Other than the shelter fundraiser, she wanted to spend the next few days with her man, planning their wedding.  She had found a special wedding planner notebook and it was already filled with ideas, with help from some of her new best friends.  When she finally stood up, she looked down at him as he rolled onto his back on the couch to look at her with his hands behind his head.  He was unreadable at the moment.
“I don’t need time to think about anything.  I would marry you tomorrow, in fact, I would marry you tonight.  But first, you have to get me naked, so I can change clothes, so I can pack for a long trip to stay at your place the next few days.”
He smiled and started to sit back up on the couch as he looked up at her while she offered her hand for him to take.  “So, let me get this straight?  You need me to get you naked so you can change clothes?  You do know what I will do to you once I have you completely naked?”
“I do.  And I am counting on it.”  She turned her body to start to pull on him to drag him to her bedroom.  “Besides.”  She cast back a taunting flirtatious glance.  “I plan on convincing you for the next few days, that moving in together now, rather than later, would make our life so much more fun.”
In one fair swoop, Blake was up off the couch, and Calista was up over his shoulder, while he laid a few gentle pats on her behind.  “You naughty girl you, making plans to ravish me are you?”  His voice held such sexual laughter, yet the fact that he was strong enough to pick her up and carry her felt so insanely sexy to her.
She let her hand rest over and down to reach his butt and she laid a hard smack against his rear-end.  “Hope your well rested cowboy, cause this Kansas girl has the next few days planned with nothing but naked entangled bodies getting hot and sweaty.”
Blake softly set her on the bed as he quickly undressed.  The moment his naked body was gently climbing on top of hers, he had a look of pure joy on his face as he finally responded to her plans.  “I’ve got nothing but ideas on what to do to your naked body, Calista, but first I want to make love to my future wife.”
With the stroke of their naked bodies touching, neither of them gave another thought to the people in their lives before they met that caused such havoc.  For now, it was just them, just two lovers connecting and a grand new future ahead of them.
Nothing is as sweet of a revenge as no revenge at all, only the completion of success for the one they thought had fallen.  Seek not the revenge against those that did you wrong, seek only the power to succeed in what is right and makes you happy.  All else will fall into place.  That is why there is karma.
THE END
Author Note: This book and my other recently published book, Finding One To Call Her Own, have a special meaning to me.  Sweet Revenge has a little bit of me in it.  It was more of statement I would make to myself as soon as I got back into writing.  I took two years off from writing to grieve the loss of a loved one.  In the chaos of ugly matters, I found that sometimes the best revenge is none at all.  Sitting back and watching Karma do its thing is serendipitous.  In the matter of months of my loss, I chose to distance myself from those that acted worse than I ever thought possible.  I won’t deny there were moments that I imagined what I wanted to do to serve a platter of revenge on those that had tried to hurt me so.  But yet, my inner peace would not let them drive me down the dark and windy road of revenge.  Instead, I witnessed revenge upon their own doing, from afar, until one day I woke up and decided to forgive them, without their apology, forgive myself for letting this consume me in a way I could be spending that energy elsewhere.  That was my new super power.  That is revenge, in a better form – live the life that suits you; do not let the ones that hurt you, destroy the incredible you.  Instead, wish them well and let them deal with their own feelings that will arise once they realize what they have done, what they have lost.  Not everyone will offer forgiveness but forgive those that hurt you and you can find your own inner peace.  That is a much better way to live.
In this book, there are metaphors for roads taken, choices made, things undone, and there is plenty of revenge being served up.  Better to write about it, then to actually do it.  
Never piss off a writer, because they will cold cock you upside the head, run you off a steep cliff, knock you down the stairs, clog up your pipes, screw up your sewer system, and maybe even find a better life – all in imaginary fun of course.
Calista who contemplated doing more than she actually did, and quickly came to realize her time was being wasted on revenge.  She spent energy on finding ways of making revenge an art, only to realize, her time was better suited doing other things – like Blake.
When I am not writing, I am running a small business.  Unlike Calista, I don’t have just twenty hours a week of work.  When I can, I like to write, and novels take time, patience, and a whole lot of work that most readers can never comprehend, only other writers.  I can write three chapters, only to kill them off my screen and replace them with something better.  And that, is what my character does, she replaces her ex with someone better.  In the meantime, she replaced her damaged soul with a renewed sense of belonging once again to something she cherished.  That is what I have done.  I found peace and tranquility in doing the things I loved, taking back my life.
Be kind to others and burn the bridge of those that try to bring you harm.
Some might say take the high road, but always be looking in your rearview mirror for karma to kick their fucking ass.  And when it does, rip that rearview mirror off that car, toss it on the long dirt road called New Adventure, and just forget about them.  Life is short and can be sweet.  Its challenges will reward you but always remember that you are someone special and no one deserves to be treated poorly, mentally or physically.  Always ask for help if you find yourself in that deep dark place.  There are kind people everywhere and they just might be your new friends or family.
As a self-published author, I appreciate you taking the time to read my romance novels or erotic short stories.  Pleasing reviews and social media claps are always invited.  Kat
Other Available Books
FINDING ONE TO CALL HER OWN – Adult Romance Novel - Allie’s life was putting her in one testing predicament after another.  First her boyfriend cheats on her, then her car breaks down, and all the while her business is going belly up.  In better days, she could handle it, but as of right now, she felt like she had just lived the worse year of her entire life.  With a huge passion for movies and cupcakes, the two things that have always kept her sane, especially through a cheating boyfriend and a failing business, Allie wanted something to call her own.  Who would believe that this is the time for finding the perfect man and quite possibly a new business?  
THE GREY SUIT CLUB – Adult Romance Novel - In Felicity’s attempts to keep her career altering plan quiet, she does just the opposite by creating office gossip that might cost her the new client she brings to the firm.  Will she tell both men to stay out of her life, or will she decide with her heart for once?  An unconventional offer that leads into a sultry mix of business and pleasure while distorting the lines of corporate business structure to one woman’s advantage.  Fate, sexual pleasures, and exchanges can sometimes work out when only two are involved, yet sometimes a woman can feel lucky when there are choices for her to make.  
JUST ONE LOOK – Adult Romance Novel – Meeting the right man at the wrong time can all change with just one look.  Romance was the last thing on Melissa’s mind after a nasty divorce from a discovered cross-dressing husband and a crazy new boss.  However, some friendly adult mind erasing sexual fun sounded like just what she needed, that is until she finds herself falling in love with the man that can change her attitude with just one look.
SINFUL DESIRES – Erotic Short Stories. Some desires are so sinful; they make you want to explore the wild side. These short erotic romance stories have women who like to make their wicked pleasures a reality. They like to pick their man and seduce him while succumbing to their desires of pleasure.
BREATHLESS - Erotica Short Story - A desire so quick it flashes through her body like a jolt of intensity. The mere sight of him left her breathless every time she saw him. The images of their naked bodies intertwined in a heated mess caused her to take pause in what she was about to do.
CAUGHT - Erotica Short Story that starts right out with the devilish deed of high-powered sex with revenge. One woman's ambition to be caught by her ex having sex with a client is all too carefully thought out. The thrill of getting caught and seeking revenge is suddenly replaced with the true feelings she has for her client. Is it love at first sight that finally wins over her determination?
INTENSE - Erotica Short Story - The moment it happens, it is so intense that it will not be forgotten and the only thing you want is for it to happen again.  When a woman sees something she wants, that the desire drives her so insanely wild she will do just about anything when she gets it, she will succumb. Even if she must be a submissive lover, far different from her dominate nature.
SWEETLY INKED - Erotic Novella - From the moment the bet was made, the sexual attraction started. One simple dare, on live radio, could not be taken lightly. Being a woman of honor, not to mention the curiosity of the attraction to the man and his voice on air that proposed the dare, the loss of the bet would only be completed once her virginal skin was sweetly inked. How far will a woman take it?
SPANKED - Erotica Short Story - From the moment, the friendly bet between two neighbors was spoken; the flirtatious teasing transpired to the point of pleasure. The sexual attraction started months ago with a desire on both their parts to be so much more. One simple dare from his gorgeous mouth taunting her at a chance meeting in a nightclub had her so frazzled with anticipation. She wondered if she could take it lightly and 
REACTION - Erotic sexual situations in a romantic setting evolving into a short story to remember. Reaction happens when two elements combine and create an explosive nature of response. Celia spent the last two weeks dealing with the reaction between her body and her new coworker Conner. Somehow, he ended up here with her in her bed, naked and sated.
A YEARNING FOR MORE - Sometimes once is not enough. Being able to experience something over again with variety makes the spice of life even more exciting. Four Erotic Romance Short Stories, steamy sultry tales that ignite a warm passionate feeling within. What's your favorite spice - Dangerous Reaction, Misbehaving, Naughty Nighttime, or City Lights, what do you yearn for?
A WILD RIDE - Erotic Short Story - Passionate glances and short words exchanged were not the sexual satisfaction they were looking for. They both needed an explosive exchange of primal carnal sex to suffice their desires. What happens when their bodies ignite with passion and nothing stops them from pure sensual satisfaction? A willing desire to have more.
IMPULSE - Erotic Short Story - A sudden impulse to take some time away from her usual surroundings can land a woman in a situation that is filled with sexual desire and lust from long ago. When a man captures your attention and your desires are not fulfilled, your desire for him will only explode once you are given another chance. A remote cabin and an early-morning surprise are a chance at a destiny unfulfilled.
WANTING HIM - Erotic Short Story - Jade had this dream before, yet each time the dream was more explicit, enticing and erotic. Every time she woke from her seductive dream, she would replay the memory so fresh on her skin. There in her dreams she saw the man of her recent desires. His thick dark-brown hair styled professionally yet it held that sexy bad-boy appeal. His honey-brown eyes that would light up... 
SENSUAL - Six erotic filled romance short stories that will ignite the fire within. Sensual erotic stories with a touch of romance that will bring you a warm tingling feeling and enough passion to light your soul on fire. Each short erotic romance has a man, just for you. Can one air force pilot fulfill a woman's dreams of doing it while a mile high? 
ONE MORE TIME - Erotic Romance Short Stories in one book that will tantalize your steamy reading needs. Several stories of hot sexual desire, fulfilling you with yearning and fantasy. Each sensual story is written to entice your need for a romantic story that leads only to fulfillment with a romantic notion of sexual fantasy and tantalizing description of each steamy scene. Leave your worries behind and let the sensual play begin.
THE WILD ONE - Adult Mystery Novella - The Wild One is an adult mystery romance written for mature audiences. With a mystery to solve, a client to protect and a past that is catching up with one very sexy female with the call sign Malcolm, there is bound to be erotic suspense in the air.
TOUCHED - Erotic Romance Novella with bonus short story. Pleasuring a woman comes in all forms; this is something every man should know. However, when you are the employee of a very attractive boss, you have to take things slow, finding multiple ways to pleasure her, before you convince her, that you are all the man she needs. So much sex in such a short time can only lead to one thing.
SENSATIONS - Erotica Short Story - There is something about a man in uniform with the emblem of a hero, muscles so big and strong you want him to rescue you. Every woman fantasizes about a hero. Summer was about to meet hers. Over nine thousand words of erotic sexual fantasy evolving from self-satisfaction to lingering longings fulfilled, as an erotic short story unfolds. 
WILLING - Erotica Short Story - Freedom of desire can have a powerful effect upon a woman. When they see something they like, are they willing to release their inhibitions and succumb to sexual desires so strong? Perhaps shyness can keep one from attempting their desires that are aching to touch. 
PERFECT COWBOY – Book One – Romance Novel.  A heart-warming, sultry experience, of a modern cowboy romance. A down-home country girl who has been given the heart wrenching task of looking for the replacement for her boss, who has been like a dad to her all her life. His recent heart attack brought new meaning to everyone’s life at the ranch. Her true dream to marry the perfect cowboy might just come in the form of her new boss!
COSMOPOLITAN MAN - Book Two – Romance Novel.  Opposites attract yet when the attraction is this hot, you just have to add fuel to the fire instead of putting it out. One simple down to earth cowgirl can't seem to work this cosmopolitan millionaire out of her system. His international experience did not prepare him for the way his body reacted to someone as sexy and explosive as her. Just when he thought the deal was done... 
LUCKY CATCH - Book Three – Romance Novel.  Some woman just cannot help but fall for the dangerous badass. Some men think the only way to get the woman is to become that badass. All Claire wanted was a good man like Joe, after years of dating the dangerous ones. All Joe offered her was friendship. Little did she know that her sexy looks and sweet demeanor was all Joe could think about.
COWBOY KISS - Can one rodeo-winning cowboy steal the heart and kiss of one Daisy May? You bet your bucking bronco. This steaming duo finally take the chance to express their sultry attraction to each other, and in more ways or positions than you can count on. In a steamy shower, old barn, handmade custom kitchen table, or in front of the fire, these two find ways to make the ecstasy elevate. 
SANTA BABY - Holiday Adult Romance Novella What do mistletoe, a sizzling hot redhead and a smoking hot bartender do if thrust upon each other with undeniable lust? They meet in the middle of course. Instant attraction and lustful illusions can lead to something so wonderful during the magical time of year.

Legal: This is a fictional story with no reference to real people or places.  Any similar names are strictly coincidental and have been created in the authors mind for pure fun or reference.  If the story lists an actual city or state, all information in the story is purely reference or to give the reader a mental idea of the location but does not in any way dictate the true nature of that area.  Any reference in a story by this author that could be seen as prejudice is not a true semblance of the author's ideals, it is strictly to create a character in the story and allows the reader an idea of how that character might think or feel.  This book cannot be given away for free on any blog or computer reader site.  This book must be purchased from a reputable site that may list the book for free for a short promotional period.  Any blog or reader site that offers the free book must link the reader to a reputable site where they have to download directly to their reader, thus giving the author credit or payment for the receipt of this book. If you need to purchase any additional copies or have fraudulently downloaded the eBook and would like to do the respectable thing and pay the small price to purchase the book, please see my web page on Smashwords.com.  Any blog or eBook site that would like to use the book cover, synopsis or place an editorial review may do so within the legal limits.  Any slanderous hater type reviews will be challenged and asked to be removed.  All honest perspectives will be considered in future writings, however reading a book is like looking at art – to each his own.  If adult romance erotica is not your thing, please do not download the book and write a bad review as that is in bad taste.  All reviews on Smashwords.com are read and considered by the author, I do not have time to search all sites for all reviews.  If you want your review to be read and considered, please log on to Smashwords.com and leave your book review on my page.  This book, under no circumstances, should appear in print in any language except English.  If this book has been bought in another language, it is a forgery and therefore an illegal copy.  The author holds the rights to reprint this book with alterations under a different author name in order to reach a broader audience.  
Cover Art:  All photos used for any cover art for the Kat Von Wild books have been purchased for use from Big Stock Photos.  Any alterations to the purchased stock photo images was made by the cover artist to create a unique book cover from the original art and in no way was meant to deface the photo art purchased.  Each stock photo purchased came with rights to alter said photo for artistic purposes, such as cropping, color change, title placement, and additional Photoshop work as needed.
Title of the book: If the title of this book matches that of other books, it is in no way meant to replicate or simulate the other book or books.  This book was written in its entirety from the writer’s mind, as was the creation of the title to match the story of the book.  Under no circumstances, should the cover and title of this book match another book as it will be seen as a forgery and legal action will be pursued.  The cover artist altered the stock photo and created a unique book cover that should not be replicated.


Sweet Revenge
Romance Novel by Kat Von Wild
This book contains sexual content that is suitable for mature audience only.  Published at Smashwords.com and Copyright 2019 by Kat Von Wild  This eBook is licensed for your personal enjoyment only and strictly fictional.  All persons, places or incidences are creative endeavors of the author.  This eBook may not be re-sold or given away to other people.
Look for other titles by Kat Von Wild on your e-reader or at http://www.smashwords.com/profile/view/KatVonWild
Devious deceptions can lead a woman to do things she never imagined.  With a new life all planned out, a new business to grow, her past still haunts her.  Every scorned woman loves a bit of sweet revenge and with only one thing on her mind, Calista is about to find out what better things there are to concentrate on.  One tall, dark, and handsome just might make her revenge worth the forgetting. 
Table Of Contents
Chapter One
Chapter Two
Chapter Three
Chapter Four
Chapter Five
Chapter Six
Chapter Seven
Chapter Eight
Chapter Nine
Chapter Ten
Chapter Eleven
Chapter Twelve
Chapter Thirteen
Chapter Fourteen
Chapter Fifteen
Chapter Sixteen
Author Notes
Other Available Books

If there is one thing women know how to do, it’s revenge.  Mix revenge with a man that can make a woman change her mind with every orgasm he gives her, and Calista might keep coming back.  Things get heated between the sheets, while revenge is being served with a carnal twist to the ex that did her wrong.
Small business entrepreneur, Calista Miller, recently had her life shattered by extreme measures.  Best friend and husband don’t mix, and when they do, divorce is served up with a heaping platter of sweet revenge.  A fresh start with some calculated cold hard cash was Calista’s for the taking.  Will she screw it up by getting muddled in a sandpit of vengeance, or will one sexy stranger named Blake Jones, make her realize that her new life is sexually satisfying enough to forego the agony of retaliation.
Once a coffee shop owner in the Utah suburbs, Calista now finds herself in the middle of small-town Kansas, making new lifelong friends, while wondering if she could ever truly trust women again.  However, once they seek out her help for revenge on those that have done them wrong, in ways that the law should handle, she sees the camaraderie beginning in her new life.  It isn’t until a few strong women show her how revenge is not the way to a satisfying life, does Calista start to see a future without a thought to her ex.
Her list of revenge ideas was long but what started to motivate her in a positive way was the list of her ‘new life’ check list.  In a rush to get out of town, with her ex tied up to their old bedpost – naked, Calista’s sex with a stranger gets box checked on her newfound freedom bucket list.  She had no idea that it would bring her face to face with the man, daily, challenging her to rethink where her energy is best spent – revenge or between the sheets pleading oh yes, like that.  With the new stranger’s sexual suggestive ways, and hardworking hero reputation, will it stop at a one-night stand, or two, and will their last kiss goodbye, really be just that – the last kiss.
If ex’s turn into oh my god yes’s, what could be so wrong with a new life as a divorcee?
Chapter One
There’s no looking back now baby.
With one last look in her rearview mirror, Calista’s glaring bright blue eyes and ash blonde hair glanced at her reflection, as she settled back in her seat.  The vision of her white picket fenced covered in yellow climbing roses, situated in front of her perfectly manicured yellow and white house, left her with a sudden queasiness of confusion as she sat in the driveway with her car directed towards the street.  She shook that raw emotional attachment to her house aside as she knew the right thing to do was what she had planned for far too long and that was to move far away and fast.  Now that she had her lying cheating husband tied up in their old bed, she felt a rising bravado she needed to pull away from the scenario she once thought was forever.  Listening to the howling pleas from her ex from the upstairs bedroom window as her car window was rolled down, she smiled to herself thinking this was just the tip of the iceberg revenge she wanted to seek.
She pushed the up button for her window, turned up the volume of her satellite radio station to hard rock, put her black cat eye sunglasses on her face, and put her car in reverse.  
The pleading sounds of his voice replayed in her head as she drove down the street that she had driven on for so many years as a faithfully married woman.  “Calista!  Please!  I beg of you.  This is not funny.  You can’t leave me here, naked, tied up to our bed.  Can you?  Calista?”
But she could, and she did.
The divorce papers were signed and filed, the house was sold, the furniture – what she had not sold, the movers would take to his new place, and their son who recently graduated from high school was taking planned time off before college to travel through Europe.
This wasn’t some fly by night incident.  Nope.  Calista knew from the moment she married her husband that his wandering eye might be a problem.  However, she was raised to rear her man like she should rear her child; keep them in line when they stray.  But this time he had strayed just a little too close to home for her liking. 
From the moment she caught on that an affair was stirring between her husband and supposedly best friend, she took measures into her own hands.  She plotted, schemed, and did things her upper class Ivy League Society mother would never approve of – God rest her soul.  It must have been the genes from her fly by night biker father that Calista never met, that caused her to act so callously, then again, cheating on their marriage with her best friend, behind her back, revenge came easy.
Dressed in only a black tee shirt, dark casual jeans and black kickass boots, she had her medium length long blonde hair up in a ponytail, however her painted face for alluring sex with the ex was still on her face.  She left the black negligee on the bed as a reminder for Clay and dressed as fast as she could to get out of their old bedroom before he could talk her into letting him out of the handcuffs – boy he had tried in the few minutes it took for her to get dressed.
The minute she dropped her silver Honda CRV off at the dealership that was buying it from her, she had a plan to put in motion mixed with a full steam of revenge putting her on the fast track to a new life.  
The Car Mart that offered her a written bid for her CRV was only blocks away.  The Uber ap on her phone was going to arrange for her to be picked up as soon as she put in the request time.  The check should already be cut.  She only had papers to sign and then she would have the Uber car take her to her storage lot, where her truck she paid cash for, sat loaded with all her boxed up personal belongings along with her new cell phone.  There was no way Clay was going to track her down after she just did what she did, at least not in the immediate future.  Although, their son Cole, would eventually need to contact her.  But at least for the first few days, until she got her bearings in her new life, she wanted no way for that man, or her ex best friend, to find her.  No way.
She turned into the Car Mart parking lot and turned her car off.  The female buyback agent she was dealing with was currently standing out front smoking a cigarette.  This was not the first time she sold a car to Car Mart, as it made getting a new car so much easier than trying to sell herself.  She knew the drill; it would be quick and painless.  And in just a few hours, she would have her new truck out of storage loaded with what little she wanted to bring from her old life to her new one.
Her new life included a check list of revenge, all the way to success marked as - make them regret the day they betrayed you darling.  First up was getting settled into her new place, a loft apartment above her newly acquired coffee shop – two states away.  Then came making the business successful along with a few personal upgrades.  All the while, tormenting her betrayers with occasional revenge strategies that could never, would never, be linked back to her.
Somewhere on that list of get it done, you’re a free woman now, was to have reckless abandoned sex with total strangers.  The kind of sex where you meet a man, in a bar or bookstore, she did not care, and you make an irresistible flirtatious offer.  That was something her high society upbringing never allowed her to do, and now that her time had come, she was going to do those wicked things she never got to, before it was too late.
At thirty-nine, Calista had found the life of a doting wife and mother, along with being a successful coffee shop owner, quite content.  Sure, she had thought something exciting was missing from her life, but then again, didn’t a lot of older adults feel that way.  Life had rolled on, sometimes with uphill struggles and midlife battles, only to be tampered down with a success here or there.  That all changed the moment she caught her best friend Stephanie, kissing her husband Clay, at a five-star hotel in the heart of downtown.  Making out like two long lost lovers seeing each other for the first time.  Everything in her life stopped at that moment.  She felt as if she just jumped out of the roller coaster cart and fell flat on her face, all the way down to the ground while internally screaming – no...
It might have taken her a few years to gather her bearings, two of them to be exact as she made plans in secrecy to take him for all she could before divulging the tormenting secret.  In those two years, Calista had often hoped that Clay would come around and dump Stephanie, all the while she had hoped Stephanie would get run over by a train, or maybe a large trash truck – now that would be spectacular.  Neither of those lovely ideas took place.  Instead, she made plans, sold everything off she could without anyone noticing.  Jewelry that Clay gave her for gifts through the years, valuable antiques she bought whenever her sad mood struck her and she over shopped, a rare coin collection that her grandfather gave her, and her alone, after her wedding, telling her that if she ever needed some get out of town cash, the coins were worth more than she could imagine, which they were.  She put all her money in her Aunts account, and started planning a new life, one she would execute the day the papers were signed.  She had always been a planner, but these plans she made, she would have given everything up for Clay to admit his wrong doings and promise to never do it again.
The moment Clay admitted to the affair, with Stephanie by his side, as if they were proud of their accomplishments, Calista no longer cared about forgiveness or working it out.  Her entire mindset reared its ugly head and drove as fast as it could down the highway named Revenge.
Calista found that turning forty soon had its benefits and its faults, however, being just shy of her actual fortieth birthday, she had to wonder if she could have done a better job of keeping her marriage intact?  One singular word mentally echoed out into the hollows of her now empty storage unit; ‘nah’.
With her black F-150 truck loaded with only ten large boxes of personal items, most of them new clothes she bought for herself the first year after the affair started, she was ready to head to her new place.  Therapy shopping had always been an escape of hers, but shopping for clothes that you were not even going to wear until the divorce was done, somehow had felt even more gratifying while charging them to your soon to be ex-husband’s credit card and telling him that you bought him a new business suit or two in his closet.  Luckily for her, he was never good at paying attention to those kinds of things.
The drive to her new place in Darling Kansas was going to be long.  She had every intention of driving straight through.  Sitting next to her twelve pack of Monster energy drinks was a brown envelope; it held the keys to her new apartment and lease papers.  She had never met the landlord but when she bought the coffee shop business from the previous owner with her Aunt, over a year ago, she inquired about the empty place upstairs.  After a quick look around, it held all the bare bones of a fun brick industrial looking loft and back then had hoped it would still be available by the time she rolled into town and claimed her coffee shop.  Luckily for her, it was.
With the business signed over to her silent corporation from her Aunt, the apartment was ready to move in, and the previous coffee shop owner had only a few months left on her commitment to run the place until she could move here and be settled in.  It was time for her to stake her claim in Darling, Kansas, and make a fresh start with her life.
Part of her new life was a huge slice of pie called revenge.  Part two of her revenge plan needed to be set into motion.  Clay had to be wondering if she was going to send someone to untie him.  Which, she was.  She closed the storage door, grabbed the no trace disposable cellphone, and she dialed in the local police department for her house. 
“Nine one one, what is your emergency?”  A calm female voice answered.
“Is this the Salt Lake City Utah emergency?”
“Yes mam, what is your emergency?”
“This is Joan Fraser at 4219 Elm Street and I just noticed a strange man breaking into a house across the street that just sold.  I think he’s in the upstairs master bedroom.  I just saw him in the window a moment ago.  Strange man, brown hair, slender build, average height.  He’s wearing a business suit.”  Calista calmly offered up as she snickered to herself; he was wearing a business suit before she convinced him that sex one last time with his ex was a great idea.  Which he was totally agreeable to until she slipped handcuffs onto him that were attached behind the metal post of their bed.  Luckily for Calista, her neighbor Joan was happy to back her up but not actually put the call in.  If only she could be there to see the look on his face as the cops come into their old house to discover a naked man on their old bed – the bed she left him in the settlement because Stephanie was bold enough to tell her that they had sex on it, more than once.
Just about the time the police show up, a courier was going to show up at her ex best friend’s business, a whole in the wall art gallery that she ran downtown.  In the courier package, held a video on a sim card of their consensual sex along with dated photographs, slick glossy eight by tens of sex they had over the last three years.  There was enough proof there to let Stephanie realize that all she really is to Clay is another piece of ass.  He liked the thrill of the play, the allure of chasing a married woman, the ability to screw two women at once, but what he probably would not like is the actual commitment that Stephanie was expecting out of him when the dust settled.  And now that he had to pay an alimony check to Calista every month for a large portion of his income, Calista could bet that Stephanie was regretting her decision to sleep with a married man for the last time.
After hanging up the disposable cell phone once she was reassured that the police were on their way, Calista avoided answering anymore questions.  That was what her neighbor Joan was for.  Joan had always disliked Clay from the minute they met over fifteen years ago when they moved into that house.  The cute adorable upscale suburbia home, yellow with white trim and the complete white picket fence.  It was cottage adorable, but now it felt like a horror show.  Although, to be honest with herself, there were some incredible memories in that house and neighborhood, it was just that Clay and Stephanie’s affair tarnished most of those incredible memories.  Calista could only imagine how many times those two stole away for a kiss or more.
The moment the sim card was out of the cellphone and on the highway, Calista knew there was no tracing the call back to her.  Or so she hoped.  That was why over a year ago, she found evidence that Clay had been stealing from the bank he works for.  That proof alone, was used as a negotiation for making the divorce end in her favor.  Not to mention the fact that she threatened him that if anything happened to her, the information would get to his employer at the bank.
There was a long list of revenge she was going to take from this moment on that could never be linked back to her, but for now, the biggest two pieces of the divorce puzzle just got put in their place.
Sometimes you must give people a taste of their own medicine.
Chapter Two
One sip, then two.
The coffee shop was just like she left it, one year ago when her Aunt Caroline and herself visited the current owner to enquire about purchasing it for Calista’s future.  Darling was a small to mid-size town in the heart of the states, yet it was growing at an increased rate over the last few years.  Which, not that the middle of flat lands had always been her ideal place to settle down for a bit, but it was a short half day drive from where her Aunt, who was like a mother to her, lived.  This business was the closest productive coffee shop available, and it made sense, at the time, because starting from scratch was too much to deal with. 
The town’s base of clients would be middle class like herself, well at least like she is now.  Clay and she had done well for themselves, and she had been raised by a rich mother, but her father, biological father whom she never met, was a low income man, or so her mother had said several times; which put Calista in the mindset of she is middle class, not upper class, not poor due to her retirement fund, but just where all the folk she liked to hang with was at – normal class as she commonly joked about it.
Business seemed average, but it could be better.  She had a plan to spruce the place up, change the name, spark the town’s interest a bit in her business and perhaps a bit in her.  She had plans of select promotions to the ones that would most likely frequent her shop.  For her, it really wasn’t so much about making a ton of money, but more about making a success of the shop.  This was going to be her business, her home, for the next few years until she reached her goal of over a million dollars in her retirement, which she was getting close, and then after that, she had visions of finding a nice non-cheating man to settle down with and perhaps, travel around the world together.  Seeing as her goal was to do this by fifty-five, she still had a bit of saving to do, however, if the stock market stayed bullish, and all her other investments paid off, the last two hundred and fifty thousand she got from her share of the house, was going into investments.  She has always been a saver by all means, and a spender when pissed off.  Clay had pissed her off, and boy did she spend while still married to him, but that tab was on their marriage expenses.  Now she would save, and make do with a lot less, putting her closer to her retirement goals.  Taking two steps at a time to get there if she could.
By five o’clock in the evening, the next day, she had pulled into the back of her now closed coffee shop, only stopping for a few hours rest at a Travel Inn.  She had felt exhaustion in her bones, yet the excitement of a new life was marching her forward.  She wanted to do all she could tonight, and then wake up tomorrow with absolute good intentions of a new life.  The coffee shop was closed by three so, Calista was glad to wait until tomorrow to introduce herself to the staff and get her feet wet with the business.  As she pulled into the alleyway, where the entrance to the loft apartment was just up a set of industrial metal stairs, she saw the two guys she hired off Craigslist.
She parked the truck after reversing it towards the stairs.  She got out and offered out her hand to introduce herself to both of the young teenage men.  “Shaqeem and Malek Forest?”
“Yes mam.”  Both of them spoke up while taking turns to shake her hand gently.
“I’m Calista Miller.  The new owner of the coffee shop, but also the new renter up those stairs.  I promised you that I would pay you forty each to move the boxes from the truck to the apartment.  You cool with that?”
“Yes mam.”  They both spoke up again with big white straight I’ve already done the braces teeth smiles beaming in contrast to their darker skin.  She put their age somewhere around late teens, and by the work wanted ad in the local Craigslist listing she had a feeling she might need their help at the shop every so often.  Their reference of their mother as the bank manager checked out when she called her a few days ago.
“Awesome.  Listen, tomorrow, I’ve got a furniture delivery that will be coming in that I could use help with.  You said you live close to here.  Mind if I call or text you when that comes in?  I need the furniture brought upstairs and three things need to be put together, the boxes broken down and taken to the recycle place.  Twenty an hour each?  Interested?”  Calista offered up. 
This time, their yes mam held much more enthusiasm.  By the time they got the boxes up and cash in hand, Calista had learned they attended high school just down the street, their dad managed the Ace Hardware two blocks over and their sister who just turned sixteen was graduating early with honors and was accepted into an elite IT school for gifted programmers.  They had talked her ear off, hauling the heavy large boxes up the stairs, for which she had struggled to get in her truck with a dolly and ramp.  
She looked around the empty industrial loft style apartment and imagined how just a few simple female touches, and a lot of long luxurious draping, and the place would be hip, to her anyways.  For now, she was hungry, and her cooler of snack foods held no appeal.  She wanted a meal and a beer or two, and decided to hit the place she saw just on the edge of town coming in; it was a bit out of the way back but a place where no one might ask too many questions, seeing as she did not have all her answers in place – but she would soon.
Finnigan’s neon green light was flashing on and off for a few seconds as if to say stay away, but Calista knew that it meant the neon sign repair man needed to come out soon.  The parking lot held about fifteen or so trucks, and several small two and four door cars.  All in all, about forty cars wrapped around the painted dark green sided building.  She decided to park towards the back with the other trucks.
The moment she walked into the pub, she found an empty bar stool off to the right side of the main bar, not too far from the lady’s room, and far enough from the regular tables, she felt she would have a nice view of the room for people watching; something she found soothing over the last year of her chaos.
The brunette female bartender greeted her with a big smile, sparkling cider brown eyes, thick lashes, full thick lips that sounded out a sincere greeting as she laid the bar coaster down on the counter.  “What can I get you?”
Calista had always been a wine drinker, something her and Stephanie shared a passion about.  She briefly let the memories of their planning wine country tours steal a few brain cells while she cleared her throat and replied with her new drink.  “Honey whiskey, ginger ale with a twist of lime, on the rocks.”
“Coming right up love.”  The cheerful charisma of the waitress lingered after she smiled at her and turned to make her drink.  There was an instant connection, friend connection, one that she would proceed with utmost caution as any female friend of late had let her down.
Calista tapped her fingers on the counter.  She still had on the same clothes from yesterday, her hair was down and still held a bit of wave to the curls she had put into it for the seduction of Clay.  However, her makeup had faded, and her mascara was starting to flake that caused her to blink one of her eyes.  That blinking must have made the older drunk gentleman three seats over on the bar think that she wanted him to come to her.
“Sho, howza bout I buyz youz a drink?”  He slurred with a bit of alcohol and cigarette to his breath.
Calista gave him a flat line smile and replied with ease.  “I’m meeting someone here.”
He slurred something out and got up, while leaving his glass stein of beer on the counter and headed to the men’s bathroom.
Calista slid his beer mug a few seats back where he had been sitting hoping he would forget all about her when she got back.
“Who you meeting, darling?”  The bartender asked as she put her drink on the coaster.
“Anyone but him.”  She joked back.
“I hear ya.  Hungry?  We’ve got a club sandwich special, homemade chicken noodle soup, or some great hamburger specials.”  She slid a menu on the bar top towards her.
“Yes!”  The enthusiasm filled her voice as she had eyed the shelled peanuts on the bar as something that she might consider eating just to get food in her.  “Starved actually.  Just drove straight through from Utah since yesterday.  I’ll take the club sandwich special.”
“Chips or fries?”
“Chips.  No, fries.”  Calista answered smiling.  “Sorry, a bit lagging on decision making these days.”
“I hear ya.  Want a small cup of soup until the sandwich is ready?  On the house.  Jackie, by the way.”
“Calista.”  She offered her hand to the woman.  The moment they shook hands, something about the woman seemed familiar and friendly.  This was a good sign to her new life.  She hoped.
Jackie quickly turned, keyed in her order to her computer, walked to the back soup and salad bar, poured some chicken noodle soup into a cup, placed it on a plate with a spoon and a few packages of crackers.  When she returned, she set it down and smiled while taking the towel bar off her shoulder and wiping the spot where drunk man’s beer had settled for a brief moment.
“What part of Utah are you from?”  She asked gingerly.
“Salt Lake.  But I’m now a Darling resident.  Just bought the coffee shop down on main; going to live in the apartment above for a while.  Just making new roots.”  Calista offered up with enthusiasm.
Her eyebrows raised, and a smile crept up as she flipped the towel back over her shoulder and put one hand on her hip.  “What’s wrong with the old roots?”
“Lying cheating ex-husband and ex-best friend.”  Calista whispered out as she took a packet of crackers and crumbled them before opening onto her soup.  Jackie’s eyes opened wide in surprise and sorrow as Calista took her first spoonful of soup.  The chicken broth full of flavor mixed with homemade noodles left her with a feeling of home, her old home, her old homemade soup she made for her ex-husband and son so many times on cold winter nights.  Today, it felt homey.  It was as if this was her first meal in a new place and she would remember it.
“Ouch.”  Jackie offered up while watching Calista approve of the homemade soup.  “Best leave those two to their own accord.  Karma will take care of them.”  She turned her attention to a new couple that just came up to the bar.
As Calista ate her meal, she thought about what Jackie said. There was no way in hell she could just let those two go live their life, free of any agony like they imposed upon her.  She had her initial revenge, and it was sweet.  However, she had a Pinterest private board full of revenge ideas she was going to let loose on those two, one month at a time.  It was her revenge of the month idea.  Each month, both of them, at different times, would get a different revenge that they could not connect back to her.  This way, their son Cole, would not get upset, and Stephanie was such a believer in Karma that she might think that the shit was happening to her for betraying her best friend.
By drink three, her meal was mostly eaten, and the pub was losing its dinner crowd for its midweek evening drinkers, Calista knew she should stop drinking, however her new choice of drink was feeling smooth to her mood and her internal defense of they were small glass servings let her decide to order a last one.  “One more, and then I’ll call it quits and head to my new empty apartment.”  Calista offered her empty drink in the air to Jackie.  They had been chatting on and off.  Jackie was a single mom of a little boy and had a little experience with revenge on an ex-boyfriend that left her for another woman while pregnant; that woman shot him dead.  Come to find out he was married all along – so three women scorned and one man down.  After he got killed, Jackie decided to take the high road that Calista did not see herself traveling.
The moment her last ordered drink was placed in front of her, the sound of a man’s thick timbering voice filled the air in a greeting fashion to other patrons.  She turned to see a man with dark brown hair, cut short, and a very nice muscular build, give a wave to another guy leaving with a woman out the door.  The second he turned to the bar, he looked straight at her and smiled.  His smile turned her insides to mush.  She looked away and took a sip of her drink while mentally rethinking about the image of the man she just exchanged glances.  His features were that of a strong man with a presence, and by the way people reacted to him, he appeared to be well liked, and well known.
With three more sips underway, Calista watched him out of the corner of her eye as he sat at the bar one seat away, telling Jackie what he wanted to drink.  She felt this undeniable pull of attraction to him.  Firm muscles, nice jawline, light green eyes, she thought.  She glanced quickly and then back to her drink.  She took a long sip.  He had a distinct smell of some manly like soap, not a heavy cologne but a musky clean smell.  She took another sip thinking how just his presence next to left her with sexually stirred feelings.
Calista set her glass down and took a deep breath in while her mind went to a dark place – sex with a stranger.  But how did she go about it?
Within seconds he turned to her and smiled while staring at her.  The moment she glanced up from her drink that she kept holding with her hands wrapped around the glass as if it was a safety thing, she looked at him and smiled.
“Blake Jones.”  He offered his hand.
She looked at his large hands and saw the hands of a man that used his hands for living.  “Cali.”  She offered back her old nickname she used to go by without a confirmation of her last name, besides, Jones was probably a fake last name.  The moment she took his hand in hers, she felt it, something tingly, sexy, or her fourth drink was getting her tipsy in less than two hours.
Jackie set his cut glass drink on the counter, gave them both a smile and turned to help another customer.  She was getting busy, and Calista knew she should be heading back to her new place.
She watched him take a sip of his drink, which looked to be a Jack and Coke.  He had strutted into the bar like he owned the place but was dressed casually in jeans and a black tee shirt like herself.  His work boots told her that he probably did some kind of construction for a living, thus the large strong hands, ones that she began to mentally envision cupping her breasts, while his mouth dribbled kisses on her neck, and his naked body was pressing against her.  She cleared her throat and turned to glance around.  She saw the entrance to the lady’s room that was darker than the rest of the place, with a sign pointing to the storage room.  She mentally did a thought of sex with a stranger in a storage room, on a crowded week night at a bar – wondering if that was even conceivable from herself?
“What are you drinking?”  He asked her as she glanced back at him with heavy breathing after mentally envisioning the man stripping her naked, and passionately brought her to orgasm.
For a brief second, she swore he asked what was she thinking, sex of course, but then realized he said drinking.  She raised her eyebrows and looked down at her glass still half full while clearing her throat; she felt nervous sexual energy between them, the kind she had not experienced since she had her first time back in high school – Clay had not been her first and would not be her last.  A wicked smile curled her lips and she replied.  “Honey whiskey and ginger ale.”
“Um, a whiskey woman.  I like that.  Jack is my guy.”  He winked.
He was flirting with her, or so she thought.
“You from around here?”  He asked her.
“Utah.”  She replied with a smile still tingling on her face as she kept envisioning his lips, manly lips, sucking on her tit, her neck, her wet spot between her legs which was only getting wetter the longer he looked deep into her blue eyes as if he too was envisioning what she was mentally experiencing.
She watched him take a long sip of his drink that emptied half of his short crystal glass.  He waved to Jackie and caught her attention.  “Two more.”  He signaled at his and Calista’s glass.  Her glass had plenty left, and was her last drink, however, she did not want to be rude.
“So, Utah?  How’s your day been?”  He drawled out in a sexy matter of fact kind of way which caused her body to tingle.  She supposed that he thought calling her Utah instead of Cali was cute.  Perhaps he forgot her name.
“Cali?”  She offered with a smile.
“I remember.”  He drank back the last of his drink and set it down with a smile that said, darling I can make you one happy woman.
She glanced over his body and then back to his eyes.  His physique was fit, manly fit, with broad shoulders, trim waist, nice legs by what she could tell with the way his jeans filled out.  He was flirting, and she really had no desire to rush back to an apartment where she had planned on pumping up an air mattress and rolling out a sleeping bag as her bed for tonight.
“Well, Kansas…”  She teased back.  “My day has been productive, how about yours?”  
“Can’t say it’s been bad, had better, but then it’s only Wednesday and I am more of weekend kind of guy.”  He casually tossed out while looking over her body once more.
Jackie approached them with two drinks and a huge smile.  They both nodded their heads to Jackie and tossed out a ‘thanks’ in unison as she turned to walk away.
Calista took a long sip of her drink and thought, Uber could drive her home.  The moment her empty glass set on the countertop; his hand reached over to touch hers.  “Save my seat.  I need to grab something.  Please don’t leave.  I’m not done talking to you.”  His last sentence drawled out slow and sinful, just like the mental orgasm she could only imagine he could give her.
He took a big sip of his new glass of whiskey and drank most of it back.  When he set his glass down, his eyebrow raised, his eyes glanced over her body, and he smiled that wicked smile that warmed her insides.  He turned from getting up from his stool and she watched him walk towards the back-storage room, because the men’s bathroom was on the other side of the bar.
She reached for her new drink, slammed it back with a huge gulp, and then shivered from the rush of the alcohol.  She waved her credit card at Jackie and had a decision to make.
The moment Jackie approached her with a smile, she had a feeling something was up.  “Blake’s got it.”
“He does?”
“Yeah.  I know him.  He owns part of this bar.  You can thank him in the storage room, where he is most likely grabbing a bottle of Jack to take home.  Big weekend fishing trip.  Leaves tomorrow and won’t see the guy back until Sunday.  Does it all the time.”
I guess Blake doesn’t work that much, Calista thought to herself.  “I should go thank him.”  She stood up and wavered for a second while a slightly buzzed smile creased her face.
“You should.”  Jackie smiled back and then turned to help a customer.
Calista grabbed her purse and pulled a ten out to tip on the counter.  She turned herself towards the direction of where she knew Blake to be, but wondered, if he kissed her, would she kiss back.  Staring in his direction, she remembered the way his words rolled off his tongue like a flirtatious invitation, the way his eyes roamed her body, he was interested.  It felt good to have a man want her this way, and if sex with a stranger got checked off her list, well so be it.
The ladies room was on the way.  She stopped in there to pee and freshen up, wasting a few minutes.  If he was still in there, she would thank him with a kiss.  If he wasn’t, she would pass by him, and wish Kansas, aka Blake, a good evening.
The moment, the heavy storage door opened, the sound of two men talking filled the room.  They both stopped and turned to look at Calista.  Blake’s green eyes traveled her body again like he was undressing her.  
“I’m sorry.  Jackie told me to come back here and thank you.”  She stumbled out not quite sure how to handle this situation.
“See you Sunday night Blake.”  The short round gray haired man padded him on the shoulder and then turned to leave the room.  “Night miss.”
“Good night.”  She offered up not quite sure what to think or say.
Blake held up a travel size bottle of Jack Daniel’s Honey Whiskey.  “I was having a hard time finding this.”
She took a few steps inside and blinked.  “Jackie said you got my meal, and drinks.  However, I am happy to pay you back.”
“Nonsense.”  He offered her the bottle of honey whiskey and nodded his head as if to say take it.
“Thanks.”  She slipped it into her black shoulder bag and stood there unsure as to what to do next.
He turned to a large stack of thick cardboard boxes of alcohol behind him and took one off to set on the floor and then he turned.  “You’re welcome.  Sorry, I thought I said that, but I guess my mind was elsewhere.”
She raised her eyebrows and frowned.  “I completely understand.”
He took a step towards her which landed within inches of her body.  Sexual heat stirred within her as his fingers went under her chin and lifted her head up to look into his eyes.  “Do you?”
Do I what?  Calista rambled inside her head while not replying with her voice, instead she opened her mouth hoping his lips would drop to hers.
The moment they did, her purse slipped off her slumped shoulder and her hand caught it to set on the floor, all the while his hands wrapped up into her hair, his lips still pressed and pursuing her to deepen the kiss.  The moment she let her hands wrap up behind his head, the kiss deepened.  Their tongues touched, the whiskey flavors exchanged and twirled in a magical dance.  Their breathing became heavy and their lips parted for only a second to reconnect with just a twist of each other’s head.
She liked the feel of his hand on her neck, the way his smell filled her nostrils, the slight buzz of alcohol causing her to not feel so cautious anymore, instead allowing her mind to wander to the possibility of naked sultry sex as her hands yearned to touch other parts of his body.  
She felt her hands reach for his shirt, her fingers flitter over his stomach muscles which twitched for just a second.  As soon as she had his shirt off with his help, he was reaching for her black tee shirt and it only took him seconds to have it over her head and on the floor next to his.  Leaving her in a black lace bra that unclasped in the front, and one very sexy well-muscled man in front of her half naked.
Their kissing went back to passionate senseless need and desire when laughter from outside the storage room roared with a female crackle.  Blake pulled away and put his finger up.  “Hold that thought.”  He took quick strides to the storage door and locked it with a click to the side.  He turned back to Calista who by now was wondering how far she really wanted to take this.  One long hard look at his upper naked body, his muscles, the curve of muscles that indented at his hips, something Clay never had, she let out a stuttered breath and realized - all the fucking way.
Within seconds, he had her backed up against the stack of heavy cardboard boxes.  He was kissing her neck and sliding his fingers around her left breast to find her bra clasp.  Her nipples hardened with excitement at his lingering touch.  Her bra was unhooked, his hot wet mouth found her taut nipple as her head tilted back, her eyes went upwards in pleasure and a moan escaped her mouth to match her feelings.  Thank fucking God, a man built to make her moan.  A slow easy “yes…” hissed out of her lips in a sultry vibration. 
The moment some cool air rushed over her wet licked nipples, she turned attention from the ceiling of the storage room to the side of Blake’s head that was now licking and sucking on her neck as his hot breath sounded excited; his manly presence wet her core.  
She craved this, wanted it, hell it was top of her new life bucket list.  Complete stranger, those words dangled in her brain.  He was part owner of the bar, not a complete stranger.  People seemed to know him well, but it’s a fair size town, how much would their paths cross?  However, that fear faded fast as her shoes and jeans were now being worked off her at a pace of a hungry man.  His lips kissed her belly, her inner thigh, and then gently kissed her recently tended pussy, all bald and smooth for her seduction for Clay, was now actually being touched and kissed by a man she knew for only a brief few words.  Yet, the way his fingers parted and licked her for a brief second, she did not care about Clay, about Stephanie for that matter, she just cared about careless fun sex with a stranger – in the storage room of a bar?  Then again, beggars can’t be choosers.
“Blake?”  She heard her voice betray her as her mind wrapped around the fact that she was in a sexual fantasy of sultry touch while completely naked in front of a stranger.  Her next words surprised herself as it made Blake smile.  “Fuck me.”
He stood back up from bringing her pleasure between her legs as he mustered out the words with a cocky smile.  “I intend to.”  He pulled a condom packet from the back pocket of his jeans and tossed it on the stack of heavy cardboard boxes behind her.  
As he started to remove his shoes and jeans, she toyed with him.  “Come prepared often?”  It was as if her mind and mouth were not working together.
“Not really.  Compliments from Randy.”  His shoes banged against a box off to the side as his jeans were being pushed down.
“Randy?”  Her breath sounded lustful as she caught her first glimpse of his well-built legs; legs that were sturdy, full of muscle and nothing like Clay’s pigeon legs she always thought he had.
“Yeah.  The guy that just left, the owner.”  Those words filled the room but not Calista’s ears, because her eyes were now on the nice size of Blake’s cock, and he was rolling the condom on while her legs spread on their own.
The was a mere second pause between them as he stood before her, hard cock, muscled body, a few years younger than her but that was not important.  What was important was the way her mind thought of nothing but sex and lust for the first time in over three years.  She was leaning naked against a stack of boxes in a storage room, legs slightly open, mouth practically drooling, eyes glazed over with lust, and all she wanted to do was beg for this man’s mercy with throws of passionate yes and more oh yes.
His first move was to kiss her again, kiss her senseless while his one hand held her face, his other hand lingered over her body, between her legs, touching her wetness and then dipping in.
She felt herself cave from his touch of his finger inside her, his lips kissing her neck now, his mouth sucking and moving over the sensitive area under her ear.  His heavy lustful breathing feeling her ears as she heard another passionate moan escape her lips.  It was a moan of pent up frustration, a nasty divorce, betrayal and anger, that wanted to scream out and escape, yet, instead, a soft heavy stuttered sigh mixed with an ‘oh yes’ sound filled her ears.  She was not in control of her body – Blake was.
The moment he stopped kissing her, his finger left her, his hands dropped to her ass and with slight bent knees he picked her up and placed her on the box.  “Perfect.”  He announced to no one but himself.  She had to wonder, the minute he walked in the room, was he scouting for the best place to have sex?  Who cares, she internally mustered as he was back to kissing her, placing himself between her parted knees, and letting his hands have their fill of her body.
“Fuck me, Blake.”  She moaned into his ear; her eyes barely closed as a vision in her mind whirled with erotic fantasy come true as the sensation of how all this risky sex felt.  Although the door was locked, she had never had sex in a public place before.  After tonight, she could check two things off her list.
His lips left hers as his hand placed itself just under her butt cheek, while his right hand grabbed his cock and guided it into her.  With the movement of his hands pulling her in and up onto him, they both moaned out in pleasure from the sensation.
There was no talking, thinking, just heavy breathing, touching, from both of them, as his thick hard cock slid in and out of her wet pussy.  All the while, the only sound other than the distant patrons on the other side of the door, was a distinct clinking of glass shifting in the box beneath her as he leaned against the boxes for leverage, competing with their heavy breathing of satisfaction.
She felt her breasts gently slide against his chest as she started to lean backwards a bit, causing her head to tilt back as her pleas of more pleasure left her lips.  She cast a glance up into his eyes that were now focused on her but fighting the urge to come first.  His pace quickened; his arm muscles were beginning to bulge from the work of holding her average frame.  The weight of his body slamming against her, touching sensitive parts of her, and the fact that she was doing something so sultry and sinister on her first true night of freedom, made her mouth plead and beg for more.
“Oh my god, Blake, yes, please, yes, like that, I need this.”  She burst out with a plea as her brain shut off, her toes curled while the magical electric currency woman know and love as orgasm, something she had not felt in a very long time – pulsed through her veins like the sweet elixir she craved.
With only a few more push pull strides of his cock, he slammed against her, groaned out a sound resembling a hissing yes, before his sweaty forehead rested against hers, curling a bit of his body away from her.  That was when she heard him whisper something that made her smile.  “I like Utah, you’re pretty fucking spectacular.”
A light laughter filled her lungs and escaped her mouth in a careless fun filled way.  It was joined by Blake’s manly chuckle.  They had accomplished something she never thought she could or would do.  And in her lifetime, she always wondered, what it would be like; now she will never wonder again, only crave it over and over.
In the short time that it took for both of them to regain their composure, in a bit of awkward silence, they got dressed.  Blake handed her purse to her and pointed to the back door off to the side.  “I don’t know if you want to go back out front.  I take it that head shaking thing means no.”
She laughed softly with a smile curled upon her lips.  “Not really.  Although, it’s a quaint little pub I’ll never forget.”
“Let me walk you to your car.”  He offered.
“Truck.”  She replied quickly.
He shrugged his shoulders as if to say potatoes, pah-ta-toes.
She watched him unlock the storage room door and grab his cellphone out of his pocket.  He texted something quickly and then slid the phone back in his back pocket.  His hand touched the small of her back, leading her to the back door.  “I’ll follow you out Utah, I’ve got this thing to get ready for.  Jackie knows the storage room is available if she needs to restock.”
She motioned her head in acknowledgement.  She didn’t think heavy conversation was needed.  He wore a condom, she was willing, and quite frankly very able.  He thought she was from Utah, and if he ever stopped in her coffee shop, he would find out that she was now Kansas.
Nothing surprised her more when he turned her around at her truck, dropped another kiss on her as if to say he could go again, which she could easily have done, however the wear and tear of divorce and driving had taken its toll.  When he pulled away, with her head still in his hands, he asked her in a serious tone.  “You okay to drive?”
“I’m good Kansas.  Keep it sexy.”  She put her two fingers on her lips, kissed them, and then pressed them to his.  The moment she saw him staring her direction in her rearview mirror, as he watched her drive away towards town, she smiled with complete and utter satisfaction.
Parting is such sweet sorrow.
Chapter Three
My, oh my, what do we have here?
Calista had just enough energy to blow up the small twin air mattress with the foot pump, which felt like it took forever, open the box that had her new pillow and blanket, and set her alarm on her phone.  She went down for the count, fast asleep, in her clothes, makeup still on, and didn’t even brush her teeth.  She felt every inch of exhaustion.
Unfortunately, five hours later, she woke with an amazing amount of energy to get her life unpacked and on track.  She had a lot to do, and sleeping was the last thing on her mind.  Although, sleeping with the stranger, Blake Jones, now that held some serious appeal.  Fortunately, she was hoping there were plenty more of those Blakes ambling around town for her to have adventures with.  The town wasn’t huge, but it wasn’t so small that everyone knew each other’s business.  It was the perfect size to kick off her new life, and if she kept her wits about herself, it would be her home for many years to come.  A home, far, far away from Clay and Stephanie.
As for her son, Cole, he had plans to travel when he wasn’t in college, so maybe he will travel her way a couple times a year.  Sure, she missed him, but she had raised him to be independent, and that meant her not depending on him for her emotional needs.  He had always had a wandering soul that loved exploring.  Now was his time to explore the world before exploring the college experience.  Clay and she had saved up for this, seeing as they agreed to only having one child.  Her upbringing had allowed her a bit of travel and worldly experience before settling into her first year of college.  Meeting Clay and marrying him, by her second year of college, had not been the plan but a baby on the way and full-time schooling, was supported by her mother’s ample wealth.  Calista had wanted every opportunity for her son that she had and more.  Besides, the nasty divorce and peculiar circumstance Clay had put them in, any distraction for the both of them was good.  Although, she did miss her son dearly.  Perhaps a quick text to let her only son know how much she missed and loved him would make her feel better.
Calista had packed a box of kitchen essentials and some basic food.  Enough to make herself a bowl of oatmeal and coffee.  It was only five am and the new employee meeting was at ten.  She had five hours to kill, a body invigorating itself while thinking of her new life, almost like an adrenaline booster, and one certain revenge she needed to pull off.
Clay had mentioned that he was moving into Stephanie’s house.  What Clay and Stephanie did not know is that two years ago, when they were still oblivious that she knew all about them, she put Stephanie’s thermostat ap on her iPhone, along with her garage ap, and her security system.  After she got her new cellphone number, she had everything transferred to her new phone.  If Stephanie had not changed her passwords, which there was a very good chance she had not as she didn’t want to be bothered with that tedious task, then Calista was going to turn the air conditioner on in her home, when it was only fifty degrees outside.  She was going to open and close the garage, a few times, which should set off the security system.  She made a fresh cup of coffee, sat on the wide wood planked window ledge under the eight-foot industrial windows that looked out to the edge of town.  The sun wasn’t even up yet, so she stared out into the black darkness as she opened the ap and started her evil deeds.  
The thermostat ap showed the heat was on.  She turned it to air conditioning and dropped the interior temperature that was showing seventy degrees to sixty-two.  She took a sip of coffee.  She clicked on the garage ap.  She hit open and watched a display that the garage was opening.  She smiled and laughed at herself.  She waited for the alarm to go off on the security ap, but that ap would not work correctly.  She went to shut the garage door back down and nothing happened.  It was four am back in Utah, she was sure that maybe it was an ap error.  She closed the ap out, reopened it and then she tried again, and it closed this time.  She took a deep breath and wondered, why was she even bothering with this, what if they thought it was an ap error and not her.  She opened and closed the garage one more time and then realized that without being there to see their reaction, it wasn’t as much fun.  Back when the two were dating behind her back, she did stuff like this all the time, playing the innocent bystander while one or the other was trying to figure out why weird things happened to them.  That had been fun.  Being far away and not even sure if they were there, not so much fun.
She took another sip of coffee and decided to check todays weather in Darling, Kansas.  High of seventy-two with a cool front coming in the evening.  She opened her notes, read through the employee’s names to remind herself.  Milly Rockford was the previous owner and still the acting owner slash manager.  Benjamin Hit was the main baker, followed by three other employees that helped with baking, store front and overall store maintenance – Sally, Melissa, Carl.  She made a note to pull records to find out last names of the other three and put their contact information into her cellphone before the end of the meeting.
With her first cup of coffee down, she wanted to walk around the place again.  When she was last here, the place needed a good cleaning.  However, now it had been cleaned up to sparkle, which made her feel better about her landlord.  She found her tape measure and began to walk around measuring windows for drapes and taking notes.  By the time she made it up the large wooden industrial stairs to the small enclosed room, which was probably once an open loft before, she realized that with her migraine issues, she would need a dark place to hole up and unwind.  She opened the door to the enclosed loft and realized it was a lot smaller than she remembered and having to run down those stairs every night to go to the bathroom was a bit too far.  This would be the glamour walk-in closet she always dreamed of having.  Noting the size, she put long mirror and chandelier on her list of things to buy.
In the space under the loft, there was those large eight-foot windows.  They did a decent job of holding out the cold, but it was the light that concerned her.  When she had a migraine, she needed it dark, other than that, she loved having natural light flood in her place.  She measured the area, the windows, and then noticed a few things, like outlets, and an exposed wire that needed fixing.  Not a big deal; she could do it herself but having a landlord to fix things was a lot easier.  
She realized last night that the old small tub was replaced with a much nicer soaking tub.  The sink pedestal that was there before had a small white cabinet and white base sink along with the fact that the toilet was new.  Not that the old stuff was old, but it wasn’t a bathroom she could be proud of.  She opened her notes and typed in a few things the bathroom would need to make it sparkle a bit; she wanted to make it girly and spa like.
She had four hours to go.  She figured that she would take a quick shower, and while her hair dried, she would at least get unpacked what she had time for.  
Five minutes to ten in the morning and Calista was walking down the metal steps in a pair of black leggings, black ankle boots, burgundy tunic poplin top, her blonde hair up in a twist with curls framing her face.  She had her iPad and cellphone along with her small laptop in a black leather bag with silver studs around the top.  The air was still a bit cool, but she was going to be inside, meeting everyone, taking notes, setting up shop so to speak.
The moment Calista walked in the back door, Milly and Benjamin greeted her.  They looked to be ordering baking supplies.  
“Good morning, Calista.  I see you arrived alright.  Benjamin, this is the new owner Calista Miller I informed all of you about.”  The silver haired lady with arthritis in her hands gestured like a game show host to Benjamin.
“Good morning, Miss Miller.”  The short skinny oriental man, who looked nothing like a typical baker who would be a bit overweight from eating his own cooking, held out his hand to introduce himself.  He had a Cajun accent that flooded Calista’s brain with memories of a trip to New Orleans when she was younger.
“Good morning.”  Calista replied as Milly set a hand on her back and a motion of her other hand palm out to the front area of the coffee shop as if to lead her that way.
“Everyone else is out front.  Melissa and Carl must leave in a half hour, but Sally will be here all day.  As soon as Benjamin is done getting his order in, he’ll be out for the meeting, and then he does all his baking in the early hours, so he’ll be leaving after the meeting.”  Milly offered up in explanation as the two walked from the kitchen area to out front where the customers are.  Milly walked Calista to a small set of tables pushed together where there was a small set up of morning food for everyone to nibble on.
“Help yourself to something to drink.  Gang, this is Calista Miller, your new owner and manager once I finish out in a few weeks.  Calista this is Sally, your full-time staffer, like Ben.”  A very thin brunette somewhere under the five-foot-high stood up and offered her hand.  Her brown eyes had a twinkle and her grip told Calista that she might be small, but she was a worker.
“And this is Carl.  He’s a part or full-time guy. Whichever you need him for.  He takes college courses at night, so I never try to have him open.”  Up stood a very tall sturdy built looking young man, all of maybe twenty.  He still had teen acne on his face and an awkward stance as if he wasn’t quite used to his large frame.  He shook Calista’s hand and smiled without a word.  Calista figured he was shy.
Milly laid a hand on Melissa’s shoulder and stood behind her.  “This is my sister’s granddaughter Melissa.  She works part time, most of the time, but in a pinch, she’ll pick up extra hours.”  The heavy set young twenty something brunette with green eyes held up her hand to shake Calista’s without getting out of her seat.  As their hands touch, Melissa’s phone dinged with a text.  She quickly smiled and mouthed a hello, and then reached for her phone to read her message.  Whatever text came in, it must have been funny as Melissa had a huge smile on her face.
“Good morning everyone.”  Calista offered up and then sat down at the table just as Benjamin came in to sit down.  With everyone including Milly sitting down, Calista started to hand out a small packet to each employee.  One that had a few minor changes to Milly’s pay and compensations.  It stated the corporation’s agenda and that once Milly retired, she would be searching for a full-time manager to work coinciding with herself.  As she started to talk and explain the packet, several customers ambled in while talking.  If Calista had not known better, town chatter was out about a new owner and some looksie-loos were coming in to check her out.  Although, she might just be assuming this, however, they were more interested in glancing her way, while Milly got up to help them.
As Calista continued to go over benefits with the employees that worked full time, several more customers came in and Benjamin kept looking at his watch.  “Benjamin, why don’t you write down your contact info here on this legal pad for me.  You and I can arrange a time to spend some time together.  I can help with baking as needed, but I believe it’s clear in the package, I am a hands-off manager in that sense.  As for the rest of you, please write your information after Benjamin and then in the next few days we will spend some one on one time together.  Sally, if you wouldn’t mind, helping Milly get caught up with the customers and then you can come spend a few minutes with me since you’re on the clock.  Carl and Melissa, I’ll pay you for the full hour for the meeting, but if you have questions, my door is always open, or should I say, my cellphone is always on hand.  Milly will still be acting manager for a while as I integrate myself into the café.  Any questions?”  Calista offered up as if she was begging them not to, at least not at the present second as a few more customers just walked in.
Calista observed Benjamin’s rush to get out of there, she hoped he wasn’t put off by her in any way.  Baking was not her favorite thing to do and losing a baker would be a huge set back.  As Carl scribbled his name hurriedly, he jumped up to help Milly and Sally as there was a custom bakery order he needed to get out of the kitchen’s deep storage refrigerator.
It was in that moment, that Calista realized, this little coffee café she looked at a year ago, seemed a lot busier than she remembered, which was good.  She also observed Melissa, busy texting on her phone and eating, yet she had not put her information down on the yellow legal pad.  “Melissa.  If you would not mind.”  She pushed the pad with a pen on top of it, in front of Melissa, practically nudging her cellphone to the side.
The young gal plastered a sarcastic sure thing look on her face.  She scribbled fast and then slide the pad back to her while looking for her next direction.  
“You can go.”  Calista offered.  “Unless, that is, that you have questions.”
“Nope.  Milly told me all about you when you bought this place a year ago.  I’m going to run.  Carl said he would close for me today.  I have plans tonight.”
“Enjoy.”  Calista offered up casually as she reached for the legal pad to slide into her black bag.  It was as if Melissa could not have bolted out of the café fast enough, causing Calista to make a mental note to be on watch for her.
Within seconds, the café settled down, and Carl was leaving, Benjamin was gone out the back door to go buy supplies, and Milly and Sally were sitting at the table telling Calista about the locals catching wind there was a new owner at the café.
As the two women talked to her instead of asking her a million questions, which was a big relief, she felt her mind ease up from anxiety over what today’s meeting might have gone like - bonkers, instead it felt right.  Calista knew that she had spent most of her adult life planning, because that is what she is, a planner.  Her plans to save her marriage failed, but as her plans to divorce, divert money to her later needs and now revenge, she realized it ate up so much of her energy that she would rather divert that to making her new coffee shop successful, instead of focusing on revenge.  Not that she was going to give that all up.  However, a quick flash of Blake Jones naked body filled her mind as a sly slow smile creased her lips of the delicious memory of the man.  Her first night in Darling had been a major success in that sense.  As for sleeping on an air mattress, her back was tingling with a slight pain of a rib out.  Sitting, listening to the two women talk to her, Calista knew that her new place that she was going to call home, was going to be just what she needed.
Shortly after the coffee shop was closed, Calista walked up the metal stairs at a quarter to four.  The meeting with the staff went well, she thought to herself.  She could see how once Milly officially retired, she would need to hire two part-time or one full time, because she had no intentions of being there every day.  The place was big enough and busy enough to keep two full time staffers, a full-time baker, two part-time, and herself.  None of the part time staff gave her the first impression of management material, but then again, she was learning to doubt her first impressions over the years.  Stephanie’s first impression was besties for life; now she looked back and wondered how she missed all the signs.
Opening her apartment door, she realized that her bed and new furniture could not come quick enough.  She almost wished she had a place ready to just step into fully furnished and she would have just put her own embellishment on.  Yet the moment she closed the door to see the sunset through her main area windows she realized that the view, the feel of the place, had a vibe she could really get into.  Clay would never have lived in a place like this, and that was what made it so much more attractive.  A few more days until her furniture was here and set up would not kill her.  She stretched her back thinking how the air mattress could do some damage.  As she opened the fridge and grabbed a bottle water, she realized that grocery shopping was top on her list.  Then she laughed to herself, thinking just below her, she owned a coffee and café shop that had pretty much had a fully stocked refrigerator in it.  She would raid the stores fridge until she got her big shopping trip in.
With a water bottle in hand, iPad on her lap, and cellphone on the ledge next to her ass, she decided that she wanted Chinese for dinner.  She placed an order online and then her cellphone rang with an unknown number just as she was about to call her Aunt Caroline.  “Calista Miller?”
“Is this the new tenant above the café on main?  I got your text but I’m a bit detained at the moment.  Mind if I swing by later to take a look at the list you texted me?”  A man’s voice that sounded familiar but had an irritated edge to it drawled out his questions as if he was not sure who she was.  
Calista had signed the lease with a female under a corporation name.  She was beginning to have second thoughts about the landlord being easier rather than she just taking care of things herself.  She thought of all the years of trying to get Clay to do some man things around the house and how it ended up being easier to hire someone or learn to do it herself.  Same went for her coffee shop back in Utah, he had never helped with anything there.  She smiled into her phone as she replied nonchalant.  “No hurry.”
“You sure?  I could be there in a bit, it’s just…”  His voice trailed off as if he wanted to say something.
“Absolutely.  If I don’t answer, let yourself in, I have food being delivered and then I am going to take a long hot bath.”  A mental vision of soaking with some lavender scented bath salts, a hot tea, and some soft music had her mind twirling happily with how life was so much easier now that she was divorced and only truly responsible for herself.  Although, after last night’s sultry fun, an occasional strong set of arms to wake up in would be nice.  Just not all the rest of the ridiculousness that came with being with men.  She smiled to herself thinking about her new free of men life.
“Sounds good.”  His voice brought her back to reality as he spoke out and then hung up without saying goodbye.  
Calista put the phone number in her contact list as landlord as he never introduced himself.  Not a big deal, once the few things on the list got fixed, she saw no reason to have the man come by for the little things.
All day she had been taking a few moments to put things in various online shopping carts for her place.  Online shopping carts like Amazon, Wayfair, and Overstock were overflowing with necessities.  She wanted as much of her new life to be filled with new items as much as possible. She ran through her Wayfair and Amazon carts one last time and hit purchase, whereas her Overstock cart she was wavering between two almost identical items and told herself to make up her mind and hit the purchase button after dinner.  Twelve hundred dollars later, curtains, cushions, small furniture and some décor were going to be shipped here in the next week.  She decided that she needed to drive over to the Walmart on the other end of town to buy bath accessories and kitchenware.
While glancing over her list of things she needed to purchase, a flashback to the finalizing of the divorce crept into her mind.  Clay had told her to keep all household items as they really had no monetary value as he put.  But they did.  Twenty years of living together, hosting dinner parties with elegant dinnerware, china, crystal and elegant furnishings, she knew the value of everything he did not want to quibble over.  So instead of keeping really any of it, she had a huge successful, I’m divorce estate sale.  Perhaps it had been foolish in the sense she would never have gotten the monetary value of what she paid for everything, but she wanted to start her new life fresh; no china dish or serving platter was going to bring up memories of the past.  Everything she came here with was nothing that associated her with Clay.  So that meant an entire new life starting from scratch, but she was ready for it.  A smile creased her lips upwards as she remembered the only thing that she left in the house for the new homeowners was their old Ethan Allen four poster bed, mattress, and bedding.  She had no need for it; that is other than her exit plan with Clay that day.
In the meantime, she had the basics to get by, but having the closet setup was a must as her boxes of clothes were everywhere.  She had found a rope to make a makeshift clothes line and hung up five outfits for the next few days.  She grabbed her cellphone, texted the Forest boys and asked if they could meet her at the shop after school to discuss putting up a closet organizer for her.  Her phone dinged with a yes.  That was her signal to take a break in planning and organizing.  Food would be delivered soon, and she wanted to take a bath after she ate.  She moved her air mattress makeshift bed setup to the room under the loft.  She found a small lamp that was left in the small closet in the now bedroom, along with a small fan.  She plugged the little silver lamp with no shade in and the lightbulb was good.  A bit bright, but she could see better in there now.  
Half hour slipped by her almost like a minute in time as a loud solid knock came at her door.  “Just a minute.” She hollered out.  In all the moving and unpacking, she had taken off her burgundy poplin top and slipped on a black tank top that was now a bit dirty.  She grabbed her wallet out of her purse and opened her door without looking through the peephole.  There standing in front of her was Kansas, aka Blake, the complete stranger from the bar she had sex with last night.  With her eyes opened wide as her mouth formed a complete O, the man of great talents spoke out just what she was feeling.
“My of my!  What do we have here?  Utah?”  Standing before her in a dark flannel shirt opened to a very dirty looking navy tee shirt, with his hands in his pockets of his worn denim jeans, was a man with a smile of desire on his face as his eyes were scanning her body like it was an engine he wanted to start up.
Calista blinked her eyes a few times, before answering.  “Kansas?”
“You’re a bit shy of Utah darling?”  His voice sounded like he was taunting her, teasing her to submission.  “I guess it’s my lucky day.  You’re my new tenant?”
She shook her head yes as her mouth softly whispered out in shock.  “I guess so.”
They both stood there silent for a mere few seconds.  The air felt calm and almost warm like or was it the electricity between them heating them up.  The only sound was their breathing while their eyes held contact until a small red four door car pulled up to the bottom of her stairs.  A magnetic lighted sign on top of the car told her that her food was here.  “Sorry.  Come in.  That’s my food I just ordered.” 
She stepped aside while he took a few steps inside.  As soon as he went pass her, she practically ran down the stairs to meet the driver.  She handed him the cash and told him to keep the change as he handed her the warm brown paper bag of food.  As soon as she made it back up the steps by running, she thought of how awkward this entire situation felt.  The moment she walked inside, he was standing there looking like a rough around the edges cowboy with his dark brown hair unruly and his flannel shirt open to the mud on his shirt and a look on his face of how can I satisfy you darling.
With a huge breath released as she closed the door, she set the bag of food on the counter and turned to look the man in the eyes.  “So!  You’re my landlord?”  This time she put a tone of excitement mixed with certainty in that statement.  A certainty that she might need to find a few more reasons for her sexy landlord to come around.
“You can say that.  And you’re not in Utah anymore?”  He quizzed.
“You can say that.”  She casually tossed the statement back at him while her lips smiled, and her eyes just examined his body while she set her food delivery on the counter next to where he was standing.  Last night at the bar he was a clean cut, hardworking guy, kind of look.  Tonight, he looked like he had been working hard.  Then she remembered Jackie saying he had plans to be fishing.  “Fish not biting?”  She added.
“Oh, they’re biting alright, but I’m not fishing.  Family thing.”  He looked down at himself before looking back to her with a smile.  “I’ve been known to be a dirty kind of guy, but this is my nephews doing.  I was going to head home and shower first, but I figured once I did that, I might not want to come all the way back here.”  He let out a breath and shook his head as if to say no, while he let out a slow low whistle.  When he finished, he said the words again.  “My oh my, you are a surprise.  You were not who I was thinking I would be coming over to visit.”
She cocked her head with a half-smile and shoulder shrug.  “Well, it’s me.  Listen, you can come back tomorrow or while I’m gone at work the rest of the week during the day.  I was just about to eat and…” 
He interrupted her with a smile and sultry draw to his sentence.  “Take a bath.  Naked.”  
She raised her eyebrows and laughed with her face.  She could tell he was flirting with her.  Thing was, there were no curtains, no bed and no stack of boxes to have sex.  Her place was out. And it wasn’t like he was asking her to have sex, but the way he was looking at her, she knew when a man wanted her.  In only her black tank top and black leggings, she felt his eyes roam every square inch of her body.  Just as she was about to say something, he turned around and surveyed the room.
“Living large here Utah?  Got plans for furniture?”  He turned back around to look her body up and down while his lips smiled the words, sex.
“Yes.  I do.  Can I offer you some Chinese for dinner?”  She was starving and had not eaten a thing all day other than her oatmeal and one muffin from Ben’s fresh batch of cooking.
He patted his belly.  “Nope.  I’m full.  Sister fed me meatloaf and mashed potatoes.  Look, I don’t have any tools with me.  I just wanted to take a quick look at the list you sent me and make sure we agree on what needs to be done.”
“Oh.  Okay.”  She heard the deflation in her own ears.  What was she expecting?  A follow up to last night’s rendition?  She walked to the frayed wire and motioned for him to follow.  By the time she showed him the few things on her list, she noticed his body language had changed.  He went from let me bang your box again, to don’t keep the light on for me kind of guy.  She let her mind think of other things like all that she had to do while she followed him to the door, listening to him talking about swinging by to fix the things in the next day or two.
He opened the door to outside which caused a sudden rush of cooler air to blow in.  He turned and looked at her as if he was going to say something but stopped himself.  Instead, he wrapped her face up in his hands and started to kiss her until her knees felt weak.  The moment the cold air rushed over her wet lips, she was ready for more, drag him inside more, do it on the air mattress more, but instead, he said this.
“I don’t mix business with pleasure.  And you are pleasure, but now you’re business.”  He let out a huge breath of air and shook his head from side to side.  “Damn Utah, I haven’t stop thinking about you since you drove away last night.  But I’ve got these rules.”  He took a step back on the metal platform landing as a huge cold wind blew Calista in the body, causing her to wrap her arms around herself to warm her bare arms and to protect herself from a man turning her down before she asked.
“I’m good, Kansas.”  She joked with a sensual smile curling her lips, while her heart pinched with a sadness that this could not be something more so fast, so quickly after her divorce.  A rebound man like this could do her some good.  Instead, she stepped backwards and said her goodnights.  “See ya around Blake.”
Her hand was on the door and about to close it when his right foot went inside the doorway jam and his right hand put his palm on the door.  “I suppose we will.”
She smiled and started to slightly push the door against his hand.  His foot withdrew, and his hand lowered as his husky voice sang out.  “Thanks for the memories, Utah.”
With the door shut, Calista leaned against it with a huge smile on her face.  “Thanks for the memory, Kansas.”  She whispered out with her back against the heavy metal door.  Things in Kansas were just getting good, business or not, her stranger was no stranger, and she liked the feeling she got just thinking about him.  Now if only she could make him see that business and pleasure do mix well. 
Rebounding is a blast when you got the right man.
Chapter Four
I’m not a bitch but a survivor of unfortunate events.
“Cole, darling, how’s France?”  Calista blew into her caramel macchiato and then adjusted her listening ear buds in each ear while her son appeared agitated on his skype video.  Calista had situated herself in the quietest corner of the coffee shop in a worn brown leather chair that was due for replacement, which was on her list for her remodel.  Her mind was on her shop, and Blake, but her brain told her to focus on her son who had a mad look on his face at the present moment while he was staring at her from her laptop.
“I’m in the UK.  Plans changed.  I sent you my new itinerary.  But I guess you were busy tying dad’s naked body to your old bed.”  His voice was clipped with irritation, although she thought a small smile might have creased his lips by the change in tone in his voice.  She knew he felt loyal to both parents; they both loved him and raised him right.  Asking for loyalty to one or the other was difficult and yet, he took the divorce quite well.  Or maybe, Europe was his way of escaping the realities of what new adult responsibilities would unfold for him.
She gave him a meek oops I’m sorry look and glanced around the practically empty coffee shop. It was the lull time where sales indicated they were always much slower.  She had two on staff at all times and had just posted an ad for a mature adult to do opens from five am to ten am, part time.  She could do it, but a part of her wanted the freedom to work on promoting the shop, handling all billing and payroll, and then taking the rest of her time to just enjoy life.  This shop supported five employees including the owner before her.  If it was up to her, she would make the shop support a few more, including her work, so that she was free to travel.  However, this wasn’t Salt Lake City, Utah, this was Darling Kansas, a fraction of the size and economy.
“Hey!”  She chimed up with excitement.  “I saw your pictures from Ireland.  Way cool.  You know I wanted to take us there on a vacation before you got too old, you know too cool for your parents.  Maybe someday we could go back there, together, as mom and son.”
His smile was conveyed in his voice as he chimed out.  “I’m never too cool for you mom.  That would be nice.”
A moment of silence sat between them as they smiled at each other into their laptop cameras.  Cole in some cheap looking hotel or hostile, and her in the back-corner spot of her café where she could see the incoming customers and the Melissa at the countertop who was slowly cleaning the glass case in front of her.  She was on top of her let go list if she didn’t find a way to work a bit harder around the place.  She jotted a note on her legal pad to have a talk with her before next pay date.
“Hey mom?”  Cole spoke up first.  As he did, the front door chimed with a customer.  Calista looked up over her laptop and saw the man that left her with a senseless kiss last week, and a warning that he did not mix business with pleasure.  It was as if he gave her a good-bye kiss, when all she wanted was to drag his ass into her apartment, into the building he owned, and replay their scene, or something similar, from the bar that first night they met.
Cole’s voice talking to her serious broke her trance with Blake who stopped just inside the door and looked her directly in the eye.  “Promise me you’ll lay off the revenge shit with dad and Stephanie.  Dad says he wants to make a go of this with her.  This is his second chance and you did something to try and screw it up.  Although, he won’t tell me what.”
She turned her attention away from Blake, and back to Cole with squinted eyes glaring while her sensual smile turned into a lopsided tight-lipped frown while thinking about Clay and Stephanie.  She could just bet that Clay would not tell Cole what it was she did.  “Sorry.  Look, I’ve got someone that just showed up for an interview.  I emailed you my new cell number.  Don’t share it with dad.  I’ll look at your email.  Let’s talk longer tomorrow.   I’ve got to get back to work.”
“Promise me mom.”  Cole’s voice pleaded as her eyes were drifting back to Blake smiling at Melissa.  Was he flirting with her?  A mental grr growled inside of Calista’s brain while a soft sensual smile placed itself on her lips strictly out of memory of how the man’s lips felt on hers.
Melissa’s voice softened to a flirtatious whisper as she announced the store’s new name.  “Welcome to Dioltas Hide Out Café.”  
Blake shot a glance towards Calista with a questioning look on his face over the name.  Obviously, this was the first time he had heard there was a name change.  The new sign was on order and would be out front in the next few days, that is unless the manufacturer gives her another delay.  
Calista casted a sensual smile in Blakes direction but then he turned and answered a question from Melissa in what looked to be a flirtatious manner.  Not that she thought he might, do anything with Melissa.  She was young and frumpy looking, although the young probably did not matter to a man.  A huge sigh exited her lips as she looked back to her laptop.
“What, honey?”  She softly spoke out as she looked back at her camera.
“Mom, you are obviously distracted.  Where are you anyways?”  Cole asked with concern until some pretty brunette popped into the background behind him on camera and his laughter informed Calista that they were more than friends
“Sorry.”  See whispered knowing full well that she had to tell Cole about the coffee shop, well at least where she was living, and not that she owned it just yet.  That would be too soon.  She did not want him to know about all the planning and conniving she had schemed before the divorce, not until many years from now. 
“Look, I promise, no more tricks.”  She whispered as she placed her hand on the top of her laptop about to close it.  She could not believe herself.  For once, she was more interested in a man other than her son or husband.  She loved Cole with all her heart, but it was time for him to go be his own person while she picked up the muddled broken heart his father shattered, and standing at the counter, now flirting with twenty something Melissa was the man her mind could not shut down on.  Business or not, pleasure was on her brain.
Cole’s voice broke her focus on Blake with an exasperated tone.  “Where are you living now, mom?”
“Kansas.”  She said it loud enough that Blake stopped smiling at Melissa handing him his coffee, and turned to look at her with an intent gaze of what?  Sexual lust or irritation?  Curiosity or desire?  Good lord, she was an internal mess of questions.  If he had not kissed her the way he did when they last saw each other, she might have believed his words of not mixing business with pleasure.
“Mom!?”  Cole shouted in both question and excitement.
“What?  I really do have to go.  I’ll text you tomorrow as scheduled?”  She smiled and then clicked off skype and shut her laptop down just as Blake stood in front of her, sexy in his dark denim jeans, light blue Henley shirt with enough buttons open she knew the muscles that lay beneath.  His brown hair had been tousled by the wind that was outside.  Fall was in full swing and leaves were tossing everywhere outside in the wind.
“Kansas?”  Blake questioned with authoritative tone.
She turned her head towards Melissa staring at them but kept her eyes focused on Blake.  She glanced for a mere second at Melissa and then back to Blake.  “Melissa, can you go do those dishes in back.”  It wasn’t a question but a request, however the girl could not seem to take her eyes off the two of them, Blake standing over her, and her sitting in the brown leather café chair, laptop on the table in front of her, and the sexual tension in the air.
“Now, please?”  She practically hissed at the young adult child.
With a puff of air to show exasperation, Calista stood up.  She had on a nice pair of dark denim boot cut jeans, her brown leather three-inch heeled designer boots and a very nice snug fitting dark green cashmere sweater that she bought herself two Christmas’s ago.  A long dangling silver and light green stone necklace hung from her neck.  Blake reached out and touched the necklace in his fingers before he looked back into her eyes.
“Melissa?”  Calista motioned to the back room with her head as she hissed her name in question over her shoulders before looking back at Blake and staring directly into his light green eyes.
The young brunette bolted to the back in frustration.  Calista did not know what was worse, the young help, or her sexual frustration around Blake.  He let go of her necklace and smiled.  “You have a nice day Kansas.”
She raised an eyebrow.  The other day he called her Utah right before he kissed her and now, she was Kansas.  Was this his way of stating their relationship, whatever it was?
She watched him turn and reach for the door before she practically stammered out.  “Hey, Blake?  The stove upstairs isn’t working, and the hot water is barely hot.”
He stopped with the front door to her coffee shop open and turned with the door handle in hand.  The wind from outside blew some fall leaves inside as he spoke out with certainty.  “I’ll be by later to fix that.”  His eyes glanced over her body like he was saying he would fix her need for another sweet orgasm, putting his business rules aside.  Then he turned and walked out of the door as if he did not have a single sexual frustration lingering in the air, but boy did Calista.
What better way to work out that frustration than to startup operation ROE – Revenge on ex’s.  Calista had promised that she would not pull anymore dirty tricks on Clay and Stephanie to Cole – or did she?  It didn’t matter, because Calista had waited a long time to make this happen, the saving, the planning, the proposition that he leaves Stephanie – which he didn’t, so she pursued other legal matters in her own hands, all the while calculating what her next moves were.  Cole was a man now, and he might be mad at her if she got caught at what she was about to do, however she had no intentions of getting caught. 
Operation ROE started all the way back to the day she saw Stephanie and Clay making out like two horny teenagers in the parking lot of the downtown hotel.  She watched them get in their cars and drive away, while she sat in hers with the prescription from her doctor for a yeast infection.  She felt physically miserable, but mentally she was shattered into a million pieces that day.  A yeast infection, meh, a woman gets over that quickly anymore, but a marriage with an affair with your best friend, that is a lifetime of pain and sorrow.  
Calista got revenge every chance she could.  She poured clay mixture down Stephanie’s pipes month one, flushed as many condoms as she could month two, broke a few sprinkler heads, oh on accident of course, and poked holes in the water line to the water heater so that a slow leak gradually flooded the basement one night while Clay and her both happened to be out of town.  By the time the plumber’s bill was more than a cost of a vacation in the Bahamas, by end of year one, Stephanie still had no idea who or what was causing this.  Calista did, and she made Stephanie think she was going crazy by convincing her that the plumber was out to cheat her with odd excuses on plumbing repair.  As for Stephanie’s husband at the time, he was so oblivious to everything going on around him that the affair came as a complete shocker to him.  
By year two of the cheating, Calista got sneakier.  By now she was really hoping Clay would tire of Stephanie and she could approach him about marriage counseling while vacationing somewhere tropical, instead, she watched the two get sneakier with their planned hotel visits, stolen kisses on baby cam’s nobody knew were placed at both houses, and a hired professional detective to put everything on paper or digital image, so that come time for when she asked for a divorce, Clay could make his choice.  Unfortunately, his choice was Stephanie, although Calista was sure he might have changed his mind once he could not get out of negotiating the fact that since they were married for twenty years as of that year, he had to pay a lifetime maintenance fee, as she had made her coffee shop appear as it did not pay her much of a salary compared to his.
Now, after all of that, Calista felt somewhat settled.  Sure, she missed Cole, but it was his time to spread his wings – in Europe and hopefully after that, off to full time college.  That was what Clay and she agreed on and saved for.  She had a new life, in a new town, with a new business, and now that things were falling into place, she still had a check list of ROE to complete.
First up, update social pictures and status from divorced to single and searching.  She had professional modeling pictures taken before leaving Utah.  Some just great shots of her out golfing, fishing, and drinking a coffee.  All with the intent to look as if someone else caught her in a glamorous moment looking twenty pounds lighter, with perfect hair, makeup and outfit.  Then there was the boudoir photo shoot.  Now she was not planning on posting any pictures of herself in the nude, but classy, well styled seductive pictures, those she was going to post.  Some of the pictures, she had emailed to close friends back in Utah, who promised to post at her request.  Those who were in the know after the separation, came out of the forest of long forgotten friends and offered up if there was anything that they could do for her.  Her neighbor was the first, as it turned out Clay was not a well-liked guy.
With a click or two, photos would be posted across several joint acquainted social networks of both Clay and Stephanie’s.  She could only hope Clay has a ping of regret while Stephanie felt threatened, she could lose Clay back to Calista.  Not that she would take him back, yet she wanted the fear instilled in her anyways.  Clay on the other hand, she knew if she allowed him, he would climb back into a hotel bed with her in a split second.  She knew her ex-husband well, and as she was posting pictures and looking quickly over to ones that were recent of Clay and Stephanie, she realized her mind was screaming at her, ‘you’re better off now!’ 
Somehow that smart voice screaming in her head did not stop her next move; the well paid photoshop pics of both Clay and Stephanie, looking quite a bit heavier and pale in pictures that had them looking worse for wear.  The time was now for those friends to receive those pictures to post on their accounts as well.  This way, it didn’t look like Calista was exacting the revenge, but the lot of friends they all used to socialize with on occasions.
Calista got up from her last hour of ROE activity and wanted a bottled water.  The moment she grabbed it from the cooler, a few patrons came in, and Melissa was still in back.  With her best hostess voice, she introduced the new store name and took care of her customers.  Everyone was friendly and curious who the new owner was, which gave her thought as to how to not just promote her store, but also about who she was and why she selected Darling Kansas as her new home.  She would call her old friend Tally, who worked PR magic for a living.  Have her come up with a blimp to have published in the local paper, and online in social media.  Maybe hire a local photographer to take some pictures of the coffee shop with its new name, but perhaps after she did the closed for the Thanksgiving holiday makeover she had planned.
There was so much to do on her list for the shop and decorating her apartment, that ROE was losing its appeal, especially since she could not be there to witness her secretive revenge or see their reaction like she used to.  Those small moments of crazy reaction from Clay and Stephanie had kept her sane as the plan of divorce was working into motion.  However, Blake was not losing any appeal to her.  He was sexually rendezvousing in her brain, her sultry dreams at night, taking up every bit of space he could.  Just as one customer mentioned his name as the person about some local town news, her body tingled with excitement.  With just the mentioning of his name Calista felt the stroke of her dying coals being brought back from just an ember to a red hot fire of sexual need and desire.  That was not part of her new life plan – or was it?  It certainly would make life more interesting.
Once the small late day rush was gone and closing time was in an hour, Melissa finally showed up from the back room.  “Ben’s on his way by.  He said he has to get all of tomorrow’s baking done early tonight.  I was wondering if you wouldn’t mind if I grab some of the two-day old stuff to take home.  Milly usually throws out in wrapped clear plastic bags and hangs on the trash bin in the alley for any homeless or local takers.  I need to head out early, I’ve got an interview at the Target for holiday help, which by the way, I was hoping you don’t mind working me around their schedule, you know, give me a few less hours?”
Calista gave her a flat lined smile and no emotion on her face as she spoke.  “That’s fine.  We can review your schedule tomorrow.”  She paused with a weak smile and then added, “Good luck with your interview.”  Mentally she already had fired the gal, if it weren’t for the fact she was related to Milly.  However, the schedule would reflect her lack of desire to work, not just next week, but the many weeks to follow.  She had decided that by the new year, Melissa had to be permanently replaced, but first she would have a heart to heart talk with her tomorrow, just to show she was trying to keep her on; for Milly’s sake. 
As Calista watched Melissa, take her time gathering her purse and coat, she pulled her old iPad out of her brown leather laptop bag.  She finger-pressed an ap for photo sharing that they once shared pictures between.  She added the two hundred images of artfully edited images of pictures of herself and Clay naked from one hot sultry summer night just months ago to the account, naming them Stephanie pic 1, Stephanie pic 2, and so on.  She clicked order pictures under Stephanie’s online photo account and billing, all to be sent to her house.  She smiled as Melissa went to the back room for a second and came back thinking how Stephanie most likely forgot about the account.  Calista had already removed her credit card information and account billing, so that the favor could not be returned in kind.  In that singular moment of waiting for Melissa to gather her stuff, clock out and leave, Calista revealed in the evil planning and internal laughing about revenge and she hit her order button for Send Them Poop dot com.  In that order, she requested that a large pile of poop be placed under Stephanie’s four door Camry in her driveway, in the next week.  At a cost she thought worth it.  She paid the extra for the stinky stuff.  Stephanie was a freak about her driveway and her car.
By the time Melissa was finally getting on her coat, Calista had placed an order on Stephanie’s amazon account that she still had the password and log in to, for a case of Depends adult underwear.  To add a check off and done to her all things shitty list to do to Stephanie, she had one last thing to do, but she was saving that for when Clay and Stephanie moved into their new place.  She clicked her old iPad to shut down, slid it in the laptop bag, and pulled out her new iPad, one that neither Clay nor Stephanie knew her id or passwords to.  She flipped it over to the engravement she had put on herself when she bought it, ‘to freedom’.  It was in the moment her fingers slid over the words, she realized her freedom came at a heartbreak price, but she was not broken.
As soon as the glass door closed on Melissa’s round bottom, Calista put a note in her phone to basically cut Melissa’s hours until Melissa is on the bottom of her schedule – which usually meant her employee was about to be fired.  She had lazy employees in all her years of ownership, but Melissa was a master of doing absolutely nothing for the last twenty minutes of her paid time at the shop tonight.  Instead, as Calista did her revenge, she watched Melissa flitter around pretending to work, almost making it harder on oneself to not work, rather than work.  She knew she had to train these employees like her old store, but she had hoped to do it a small bit at a time.  With only three weeks left on the contract with Milly, the previous owner, she knew she had to step up her game, promote the business, bring in quality mature workers who wanted and needed hours.  In the meantime, two more late day customers were walking in.  Calista knew what to do without even thinking about it.  She could make a stranger feel like her best friend, and a customer leave her store feeling like this was their coffee shop.  She was good at this and this was the thing in life she enjoyed calling her lot in life.
Her new-found freedom just found its wings.
Chapter Five
The mirror of a man’s heart is in his actions.
Blake Jones was mystified by what changes had taken place in his life in the last few years.  First, his fiancé left him for another man, a wealthier man, or so she thought.  Then, his sister got into a car accident, leaving her in a wheelchair permanently.  That was after she found out her husband was cheating on her and got a woman pregnant.  The car accident was caused by her drinking too much at the very bar he used to own, but now his buddy Randy owned most of it until he could pay him the rest of the money – Blake was still part owner.  While dealing with his absentee fiancé, crippled sister, and helping with her divorce with two small boys to still take care of, Blake had to bury his brother in-law Pete, who was shot by girlfriend number three with her daddy’s shotgun.  Girlfriend number two to Pete, was Blake’s old high school acquaintance Jackie, who Pete also left a child with.  Jackie was out of work and six months pregnant when Pete got killed.  Jackie had no idea that Jenny was his sister since she was living in Kansas City ever since graduating high school, and she had never met Pete for a date in Darling.  All of that was just a few years ago; life was settling down, that was until the night Utah sat at his bar and begged him to make her a very happy woman.
Life had been difficult, but he had it under wraps.  His plan moving forward was to help raise Pete’s kids as a fulltime uncle with Jenny.  They took Pete’s life insurance policy and formed a business.  They bought up real estate when the market was in dire straits, Blake took care of the properties and collected rent, and now that things were back up and booming, they were selling off land and buildings for a nice profit as they saw fit.  Jenny gave Jackie a hundred thousand, of the two-million-dollar life insurance policy she had on Pete.  Blake tried to convince Jenny to give her more, and for Jackie to take more, which she wouldn’t, but Jackie was happy just to get a job at his bar.  Both women had guilt and anger over what happened that he often felt torn between them, helping them, until he finally got them to see that together, they made a better team.  It took a long time, but Jackie and Jenny were now best friends, raising kids together, and laughing every time they went to visit the woman in jail that shot Pete.  Turns out, the woman that had shot him while he was with another woman.  Oddly the three women formed a bond, while Blake, got social update pictures of his ex-fiancé with some older rich guy.  He figured it best to never let her know his net worth now, or she might try to come back into his life, which he did not need.  He was happy taking long fishing weekends alone, playing uncle to his nephews, and not putting himself in a position of a broken heart anytime soon.
He knew that he had been missing that feeling a special someone can put in a man’s life.  Nothing is better than waking up naked next to a woman you made love to the night before.  He missed that.  But he did not want the drama that went with it.  So, for now, it was hook ups on social aps or short-lasting relationships with women that did not live in his town.  Which was hard, seeing as Darling had doubled in size the last few years and new eligible women had asked him out, yet he didn’t want a relationship with someone that didn’t work out being too close to home.  With each swipe type meetup in a different town, he felt emptier on the inside as he was not willing to share any part of his life with these strange women. 
Maybe it was the fact he finally finished building his ranch.  He had a decorator known for her industrial farmhouse décor furnish his new home.  This was his new place, built by his design, everything had his touch on it; no ex-fiancé bought this or that, that he had come home to every night and stare at.  No trace of the previous single life turned engaged that went horribly wrong.  He had built his place with pride, yet every night as he sat on his rustic designed deck with natural waterfall and large stone firepit, watching the sunset, he yearned for a woman to be there with him – a mature no strings attached woman.  He was sure that was what him and his new home needed, a no drama, no strings attached, wealthy woman.  He scoffed at his own thinking while shaking his head in a no fashion.  “Needle in a haystack, boy.”  He mumbled to himself while walking and thinking.
Yet, today, stopping in to get a coffee at his favorite coffee shop, there was Utah – aka Calista.  Yes, he remembered her name, but somehow calling her by the state she said she was from, it kept it less personal.  The thing that they did in the storage room, that was fun, and very personal.  Fun for him, and by her reaction, a well desired fun for her.  In the past, his quick hookups always moan, yes like that, or god yes, but the fact that she clearly stated that she needed it, well, that was his first clue she was a woman in need.  Which, he did not need in his life.  No matter what her story was, he was not ready to be a part of it.  Not yet.
Finding out that Utah was his new renter in the empty apartment above his favorite coffee shop, minor hiccup.  However, knowing she is a Kansas now, Darling Kansas at that, it could cause an issue if she turns out to be a crazy stalking new woman in town that just wants his services, not that he wouldn’t mind servicing her again.  Her body was rocking, not to mention the fact that it was nice to find someone who just, like that, no questions or commitment asked of him, was willing and able.  Real nice.
Blake tossed his empty coffee cup into the trashcan outside his architecture office a few doors down from the coffee shop.  He unlocked the doors and stepped inside.  He was a business of two, Jenny and himself.  However, most days she worked from home handling all the mundane business stuff while allowing her to hang with the kids when they were not in school.  He just liked having an actual office away from home, seeing as this was one of his own buildings he bought back before all the chaos began.  It was as if the place had become his professional man-cave.  It was a place he designed industrial art products out of metal and wood in the back area, while maintaining a very manly looking professional front office, antique drafting table and all.  He designed his first home that he had built for himself in this office, Jenny’s handicap home to fit her new needs, and the place he designed ideas just for fun.  His architectural degree wasn’t being put to too much use these days, but it was the place that made him feel like he was contributing to himself and this town in a way he knew best how to.
The moment he sat on the antique wood stool and set his hands on the empty wooden worn smooth drafting table, he thought of Calista.  Her outfit she was wearing did not seem like something an employee would wear.  Maybe she was just using their wi-fi?  Although a flash of her instructing Melissa, made him wonder, was she the new manager Milly talked about a month ago.  He shook his head to himself thinking how so much had changed in the last year and he just had no desire to keep up with the town gossip.  Although, now that he was remembering, her mouth moved with words, but he wasn’t listening.  Instead he was envisioning that very mouth on his hard cock, sliding it in and out, looking up at him with her intense blue eyes and blonde hair.  That look on her face that told him that they were just beginning to have fun.  He chuckled to himself as his hands roamed over the feel of worn smooth wood of his architect desk.
He started to wonder, if they would be crossing paths often.  He mentioned that business and personal did not mix when he met her at his rented loft the other night, but then the kiss he left her with, told him, maybe his hard-fast rules could be broken, at least one more time.  A quick mental question flashed in his mind, ‘would one more time be enough to get her out of your system?’
‘Pfft.’ Blake made an internal puffing sound.  She probably just wanted him to come by again and finish off that kiss with another mouth moaning orgasm, which held some appeal as just the thought of it had him semi hard.  That stove worked fine last time he checked, and as far as the water heater, he might have forgotten to turn the temp back up after the last short-term tenant left about three months ago, since then, he was thinking of selling the place, or making it into an office as the light in the main area was incredible due to the unobstructed views of the western horizon.  
A text from his sister Jenny dinged on his phone.  He pulled it out of his back pocket and set it on the metal strip on the bottom of the drafting table to lay it flat in front of him.  ‘Milk, eggs, and a pound beef.  Home for dinner?’
He didn’t live there, but he sure did spend a lot of dinners there with her and the boys.  She was probably on her way to get them from school and he was planning on eating at Finnegan’s with Jackie and her four-year-old son Mack.  Jackie had a new guy she wanted him to meet, and get a background check on.  He texted Jenny back.  ‘I’ll get groceries for dinner to eat tomorrow.  Eat at Finney’s tonight.  Jackie wants us to meet a new guy she’s hooked up with.  No better way to break him in.”
His phone dinged again.  ‘Great plan.’
Jenny had a wheelchair disability van with a driver that would take her during most day hours wherever she needed to go, and on call for evenings.  However, Blake just liked doing things for her to make her life easier.  It wasn’t like he had a nine to five hard working job thanks to her; it was more of a luxury job that benefited from Pete’s death.  Not that he had wished this on Pete, he had always thought of him as a bit of a roaming eye type of guy, but he would have rather they divorced.  Pete and he had been drinking buddies, shooting pool, catching fish, and messing around mechanically when the house needed to be the woman’s place.  Be that as it may, Blake knew from his upbringing that he had to step up and be the man for everyone involved.  All the more reason, Kansas, did not need to commandeer his time with drama.  Because if there was one thing he could sniff out, it was drama.
The grocery store by Jenny’s house was his first stop a little after four. He had his hand cart filled with two breads, two dozen eggs, the beef – two pounds because he never understood why she asked for a pound at a time.  He was about to grab two one-gallon milks by the handle out of the dairy case into his right hand, when he heard a familiar voice.
“Hey Kansas?”  Calista stood there with her very full grocery cart of all thing’s household and kitchen pantry essentials.  Stocking up for the winter for three, plus occasional parties, was an old habit; she was shopping for one now and at the looks of her shopping cart she was not doing so well as she had obviously over shopped.
Blake grabbed the milk and turned with his body towards her.  He glanced at the way her tight-fitting sweater was drawing his eyes to the curves of her body.  He glanced at the necklace she was wearing that he touched earlier.  It gave him thoughts of touching that necklace on her naked body.  He tried not to smile when he replied.  “Evening Kansas.  Got a party you shopping for?”
She blushed as she thought he might have caught her staring at his bulge between his pants, if she did not know better, she was noticing that he appeared to be semi hard.  “No.  Just an old habit dying hard.  I like stocking up early for the winter season.  Farmer’s Almanac states this will be a cold snowy winter.  Utah had some serious cold winters but I’m in Kansas now.”
“You don’t say.”  He joked with her and could not help smiling at her cute little ways of checking him out and sending body language signals that would land them right back in that storage room, naked, doing the bang the box of bottles game.  He liked that game.  Would not mind doing that game again.
“Any hoot, you look like you’re ready to check out.  Thanks for stopping by my new coffee shop.”  She smiled and started to continue towards the yogurt section.
“Yeah.  Good evening.”  He started to walk away and then realized what she just said.  She, owned the coffee shop?  The one he had been going to for years.  He noticed a name change, and a lease change was mentioned by Jenny, but he had not realized that a new owner was finally taking over his beloved coffee stop.  He shook his head side to side.  He’d be damned if she went and made it all frilly.  It had looked the same for the last ten years since Milly opened it.  He knew Milly had talked about selling it, but he had to wonder was Calista just a transitional owner or was his favorite bang the box of bottles blonde going to be in his life – day after day?
He set his milk jugs on the conveyor belt as the young male teenage cashier asked how his day was going.  “Huh, yeah great, and yours?”  Blake asked, not really caring but just trying to be nice.  In his normal unique charisma, he plastered a smile on his face while his mind ticked away at the idea of Utah, now Kansas, was going to be in his life in a passing permanent passion and not in the one night stand I am attracted as hell to this stranger sitting at my bar woman.  He joked with the guy about the last Chiefs game being a blowout, while his mind flashed sultry images of Calista under his control in the back-storage room of his bar.  Then he paid his bill and turned to head outside to what looked like small snowflakes.  A flash of Calista’s sexy lips making conversation about the Farmer’s Almanac like it was a sexual deed flashed in his brain as he mentally spoke to himself with a smirk on his face.  ‘Maybe Kansas was right.  Maybe, it was going to be a cold snowy winter.  Maybe she’d be willing to be his naked snow bunny and play games in his bed with the fire crackling against a full-blown snow storm?’
“Why, Blake Jones, looks like the smiley bugs taken a bite out of you.”  A familiar voice passed him in greeting as he looked down to see his first-grade teacher walking into the store with a head shake.  
“Have a lovely day, Miss Kent.”  He voiced over his shoulder as he took his steps towards his truck.  If he had stopped to acknowledge her fully, he might be there long enough to see Calista ring up that cart full of groceries, and that was not on his evening agenda. Nothing could ruin a man’s imagination of naked snow bunny play like your first-grade teacher.  With a bit of bulk between his step, and a smile still on his face, he opened his truck by remote and realized it was going to be a long cold winter if he didn’t figure out a way to get Calista out of his every sexual thought during most of his day.
Blake took the groceries items into Jenny’s.  No one was home.  She probably had already headed over to the bar for dinner.  Jenny’s boys liked to play pool before the real pool players showed.  They were probably hungry, and Jenny was most likely talking to some of the staff.  It had been a long journey of AA meetings and visits to the bar without drinking before he felt confident that she had figured out how to handle the memories from the accident.  Finnigan’s had been their place as a family.  Slowly, it was becoming that again.
The restaurant bar atmosphere seemed calm, while the boys were filling their plate with everything but salad from the salad bar, Jenny was talking about tenant agreements, a property inquiry and something else, but Blake had his mind on the last time he was here with her, Calista.  Right in his back-storage room, he had ravished the woman into an incredible orgasm only to follow up with a successful feeling for the evening.  It was the first time in a long time that it felt that good, and that was why Jenny’s talking went in one ear and out his other.  Only Calista’s image of her naked body in the production of pleasure kept flashing through his mind.  However, the moment Jackie walked in with her date, a small part of Blake made him puff his chest out and give a firmer than normal handshake.  It was his big brother act, that probably didn’t need to be displayed, but all the same, Blake felt the need.  His attention got turned around to the real reason he was here tonight, to protect his friend’s best interest – not to date another loser like his dead brother in-law Pete.
“Blake, Jenny, this is Conner.  Conner, this is Blake, his sister Jenny, and my bestie, her two boys Colton, and Drake.”  Jackie proudly announced her adoptive family to her date.
“Pleasure.”  Connor offered out with a sincere smile.
Blake sized the man up in under five seconds by accessing his looks first.  The man had darker skin, brown eyes, a slight curl to his thick dark hair.  His hands were big and had a few calluses on them, along with the fact that his feet matched Blake’s size thirteen shoe, or so it seemed.  He wore plain jeans and a blue flannel shirt, which was about dress up code for these parts.  His smile had sincerity to it, as did the way he looked at Jackie like he won the lottery.  For now, he’ll pass, Blake thought to himself.  
Jenny, the smaller, feminine version of Blake, started right up asking questions and laughing with the new couple.  There was no mistaking that Blake and Jenny were sisters, and no mistaking that Jackie could easily pass as a taller, darker version of Jenny.  They looked like family and felt like it as well, and that was all Blake needed.  Not some newcomer from Utah with her soft pouty lips, flirtatious blue eyes, and soft blonde hair.  Not some erotic mature sexual energy she put off every time their eyes met.  Not the way her hands devoured him with her touch, her soft purring sounds of pleasure, and not, not the way she made him want to put all standards of business and pleasure don’t mix out for the wind to blow away.
Blake cleared his throat and asked Jackie where her son was at.  Not really listening to her explain that he was at the babysitter for the night.  He half listened to Conner talk about how he managed a local refinery, how Jackie’s new red highlights really looked great and then finally, without warning, the conversation turned to the new Dioltas Hide Out Café.  The very place that was owned, by the very woman, who was sexually occupying his mental space with ideas of how to make her moan in pleasure while everyone sat around talking casually.  The coffee shop was the last place he wanted to talk about.
Blake waved his hand in the air for the waitress attention.  He needed a drink.  Just one, which he usually did not drink in front of Jenny at the bar, but just the fact that the one person who rattled his balls with her bare hands, name was being mentioned while he was out with his family.
“I heard she is a divorcee?”  Jenny quizzed Blake.
“Blake met her, the other night, actually her first night here, isn’t that right?  Blake?”  Jackie had a snarky tone of amusement to her voice.  He turned and looked at the two women as if he did not hear a word they were saying.  
“Conner?  You a Chiefs fan?”  Blake offered for a distraction.
“Since birth.”  Conner bolted with pride.
The two men kept the conversation around football and local weather, while Blake affectively ignored Jackie and Jenny who carried on the conversation between themselves, luckily only mentioning Calista’s name one more time.  Blake heard himself repeat the farmer’s almanac quote from Calista and his cock flinched.  Just thinking about the woman constantly had him filled with a desire that he needed to work out of his system.
The night could not move on fast enough for Blake as he finally escaped the bar to head home after resolving a few issues for Randy.  He felt exhausted.  To be exact, exhaustion from thinking about box banging a certain blonde.  He continued to scrap some snow and ice off his platinum silver GMC Denali truck windows.  The family had gone home by six thirty while Jackie was heading out to the movies with Conner.  He replayed his entire bizarre day in his head, and all he could conclude was that he needed answers.  The sooner the better.
Before he knew it, he was staring up at the metal stairway, in the alley behind the coffee shop, that led to Calista’s apartment.  Long ago, there was an interior door and stairs that led down to the empty hallway between the building next to the coffee shop.  However, it got bricked over and Blake thought how it might be nice of him to unbrick it so that she had inside stairs to walk up and down, that led her out to the front street.  The empty building next store had an interior door in its loft that also took those stairs.  Architecturally, it could be done, but it was not something he would tend to right now.  Watching Jackie, all happy and giddy on her date, made him realize that he had not been on a date in over six months.  A real date, not a social hook up.  He thought about pulling his phone out and swiping for a local hook up, instead, he climbed the metal stairs, feeling his legs getting heavier with each step.  What lies beyond the metal door at the top, was an enticement he was not sure he could handle to turn away.  However, business and pleasure never mixed well – like oil and water.  
Calista listened to the knock on her steel back door while her mind had been trying to forget all about Blake.  The moment she looked through the peephole and saw him standing there in his Carhart denim jacket, snow falling lightly around him and an intense look on his face, she hesitated in opening the door.  “Just a minute.”  She hollered over her shoulder as she grabbed her dark purple jersey knit robe that had been draped on a chair by the door.  She tied it at the waist, tight.  All she had underneath was just a navy-blue tank top and gray jersey knit pajama shorts.  No underwear, no bra, and denying that after seeing him, twice today, that she had a few new naughty thoughts about her Kansas man.
The minute she opened the door, while mumbling that she forgot about asking him to stop by, he seemed irritated.
He stood just inside of her door, after she closed it.  He looked around and noticed that in a very short time, the woman had a chandelier up hanging from the twenty-foot ceiling rafters.  There were heavy rich looking gray velvet type curtains over the eight-foot windows; they were closed.  A lot of salt wood looking furniture, mixed with some industrial farm house pieces that looked like the stuff the designer put in his house.  She had a lot of dark purple and gray tones everywhere, faux led candles that were lit, and fur pillows in gray and cream.  Large one’s piled on the floor, small ones all over a decent looking L shaped dark gray couch.  Her entire place was an open loft floor plan, but she had some kind of seriously expensive looking dark curtains, that were closed in the area that was the bedroom of ten-foot ceilings.  Above that area was a small closet storage area with a set of stairs he designed and put there.  It gave the open floor plan an option of small bedroom upstairs enclosed, or large closet and bedroom downstairs.  He was afraid to ask what was behind the thick dark curtains in what he was sure was the bedroom.
Calista took his silence and staring as a compliment.  She had outdone herself in decorating the place in such a short time.  Thankful for quick delivery of her decorating items and quick work of her teenage hired handymen.  The Forest boys had spent several days after school, hanging curtains with their dad’s expertise, putting together furniture, picking up supplies and decorative orders from a shipper that came in but was too big or heavy for her to bring up.  They pulled it all together day by day.  In fact, she wasn’t totally sure until the boy’s mother Tanesha stopped by to see the progress and covered her mouth with her dark hand while tears dribbled down her cheeks.  Her two boys had been talking for days about what they had been doing for her, and how it got them thinking about starting their own home fix up business.  She mentioned that until then, they thought Xbox gaming was their future after high school.
Calista finally spoke up to Blakes look of astonishment.  “Let me take your coat. Would you like a hot tea?”
“Huh, what?”  Blake turned his attention back to her.  His eyes trailed from the place her robe tied, up her body, stopped at the perky nipples poking out of the robe, and then up to her eyes.
“You got a minute for a hot tea?  I just got out of the shower and was thinking about a hot tea and a movie.”  She smiled while her hand was out to take his coat.
“No.  I can’t stay.”  He shook his head no as his hands wanted to not only take his clothes off but hers as well and find out what was behind those thick dark curtains that were drawn.  “Wait?  The water heater.  You told me it wasn’t working.”
“I got it fixed, the temperature needed to be turned up, but there is a leak.  Slow drip.  I emptied the tank this morning, a lot of rust gunk came out of the hose. I think it might need a new water heater soon.  Other than that, the stove is shot.  Not that I cook a lot. I had bought a convection microwave and I picked up a hot plate at the hardware store, but yeah, no stove.”
“Let me take a look.”  Blake turned his attention to the stove first. 
As Blake messed around with the stove, first by testing buttons, then by pulling out from the wall to make sure it was plugged in, Calista felt her nipples peak with excitement.  His body in motion, even with clothes on, peeked her sexual interest even though his resounding words of business and pleasure don’t mix echoed in her brain.  She mentally scoffed at that idea and reminded herself that she had ample years of the dating scene to conquer.  Although, her mind could do nothing but think about how nice it would be to find a man like Blake to pass time with when she wasn’t busy with the shop, and with passing time, she was thinking about the sexual pleasure kind of time.  She leaned back against the wall, folding her arms under her breasts, and smiled down at Blake who just cast a strange glance up her way.
Blake had to wonder, was the seductive way she just positioned herself so that her robe opened to maybe nothing underneath on the bottom and her cleavage calling to him like a canyon he wanted to explore with his tongue.  He quickly got up from his knees after closing the lower stove drawer and towered over her body that was only inches away.  He paused because his body wanted to untie that robe and fuck the ever-living pleasure out of the woman looking up at him with blinking blue eyes.  Instead, he turned and went to the kitchen sink to wash his hands, not that they were dirty, just that he needed a moment of distraction, and cold water might do the trick.
Blake spoke out over the running water.  “Sure thing, it’s toast.  Not a huge expense, I might have a good working one over in my storage center for all my rental buildings.”  A place that was stocked with his industrial art furniture, appliances, and anything associated with remodeling and repair.  
He turned and could not help but softly smile at Calista as he dried his hands on her purple kitchen towel that had been set next to the sink.  He walked by her and motioned with his hand towards the utility closet.  “I’ll take a look at the water heater.”  It was due, he knew that, but had kind of put it on the bottom of list of things he needed to do; now it got moved to the top, but this was a job for a local handyman named Larry Stiles.  He just did not think being in this woman’s apartment, with her dressed like that, sex in a robe, it was like she had just done her hair and makeup for him, although she looked good at the grocery store, and even better naked on a stack of liquor boxes.  Holy shit, he needed to get out of there.
“I told you.”  She chimed up cheerfully as he turned from being on his knees to look at the leak on the water heater closet.  She handed him a hot tea, which he took out of politeness, but he was not going to stay.
The smell of cinnamon spice tea filled his nose.  She was looking at him over her gray coffee cup with words on the side, that said, ‘Fill Me Up’.  Holy shit, he imagined his cock filling her up.  He set his hot tea on a wood and metal coffee table he wouldn’t mind knowing where she bought it.  He shook his head no.  He needed to get out of there before he did decide to take his cock out and stick it in her hot warm places.
Calista set her tea down on the table next to his and reached out for his hand.  She could not deny the feel of his hand in hers was alluring, but the resistance to hold her hand told her that he was uncertain as to why she grabbed at his hand.  She smiled at him and tugged.  “Come on.  Let me give you a quick guided tour around.  I bet the place looks a bit different.  The Forest boys worked for me the last week and half, getting the place together.  I could hardly sleep until I got the place in order.  The café is next.  Over the holidays.  I have a slight remodel for the place.
He dropped her hand and she turned to him while he gave have her a raised eyebrow flat smile look. 
“Don’t worry.”  She teased with a smile that almost spoke out like, hey, Blake, come stick your cock in my mouth and I’ll let you plant your face between my legs.  Or so he thought to himself.  He shook his head and listened to her mouth moving and talking, although the words were not completely registering.  
“I’ve owned a coffee shop before; all my remodels have received great appreciation.  I actually, thought about being a decorator once, but my mother insisted a degree in business was in accord while I raised my son.  My business degree made me a coffee shop owner back in Utah.  Although, I could have been a coffee shop owner without one.  Business degree that is.  It was just a choice back then, more or less, my mother’s choice, but I followed through with it, even though my heart was really into helping people and decorating.”  Without even a single deep breath she continued talking more out of nervousness, rather than chattiness.  “To the right, is the dining table for four that can expand to seat eight.  Not that I really know eight people that might want to eat here yet, at least not until I get a stove.”  She laughed.  “Upstairs is my dressing room.”
Blake remained silent while she walked up the stairs in only her skimpy robe, purple fuzzy socks and a happy go lucky gal kind of look on her face, as he followed her thinking only of stripping her naked on the stairs he built.
The moment he walked into the small room of ten by ten feet, he felt a waft of female energy breeze over his body.  It was well lit.  Another hanging chandelier, a large cream-colored plush chair with a matching ottoman.  Those fuzzy pillows everywhere, mixed with the same grays and purples as accents.  Floor to ceiling leaning mirror, and more clothes, shoes and accessories than he needed to see.  The only thing that held its appeal was a lingerie bag from a well-known retailer sitting on the floor, and some lacey things placed on the floor next to it.  He let go of her hand and turned to walk down the stairs while talking over his shoulder.  “It’s nice.  Really.  Listen, I’ve got a guy that will call you.  Larry Stiles the local plumber.  My business has a contract with him.  Sorry, but I’m running late.”  
He was already at the bottom of the stairs.  The moment he turned to see her standing at the top of the stairs with a hurt look he half smiled.  “Sorry.  Quickly, show me the rest.”
She practically ran down the stairs in a flittering fashion, causing her robe to expose some short shorts underneath.  Good lord, he needed to get out of there before he took the robe and everything else off her body while begging for a fashion show of lingerie down those stairs.
She pulled hard and fast on the thick dark gray curtains.  As they rolled on o rings to the side, there was purple sheer material everywhere.  She pulled a set aside on o rings and in the room, was another chandelier, dimmed to a very soft warm light.
Blake stood there, staring at a huge king size bed.  No light was peeking in anywhere.  It was dark out, but usually this space had some filtered outdoor street light coming in.  The room was a deep dark dungeon of sex lounge look, purple, gray, creams, fur, pillows, candles – everywhere.  There was a huge rectangular ottoman that looked like a couch without sides, and in that instant, his cock was hard, his mouth watered for her naked skin and for the first time around a woman in a long time – he was utterly speechless.
Calista spoke up first.  “So that’s basically it.  I have a huge writing desk that once it’s delivered, the boys need to put together, but that’s going in front of the front windows out there, facing to the street and beautiful horizon view.  Shoot, if I live here long enough, I might inquire about buying the building.” She thought he might like her décor job, but then again, he was just staring at her bed.  She wanted his opinion but sensed something was extremely rigid in him tonight.  It was as if was on guard.
He turned to her and looked her straight in the face.  “I own the building, and this apartment.  That might be hard to buy seeing as I have no plans on selling it, which reminds me, how come your name is not on the lease for this or the coffee shop?”
She was taken aback by his sudden frosty demeanor.  She closed her robe with her right hand as if to protect her heart and felt her eyes water.  “Okay.  I guess I did not know you owned it.  The paperwork stated JBJ Enterprises owns this and my shop.  My corporation, CCM, leases both.  First C is for my Aunt Caroline who was more of a mother to me than my deceased mother.  The other two initials, obviously stand for Calista Miller.”
It was in that moment, that memories flooded her, emotional ones and her eyes watered and her nose ran.  She wiped an eye before he could see the tear that was about to fall, and she sniffed her nose.  “Sorry, allergies.”  She turned away from him and looked at her place.  She was proud of her design and all the hard work the Forest boys did on her place.  So what if she could not buy it, she would call it home as long as Blake let her lease it.
“Sorry.”  His apologetic voice whispered out, while his large hand landed on her shoulder trying to turn her.  When she finally did, he stopped resisting.  He pulled her body to his, letting his lips drop to hers, pursuing her hot wet mouth that tasted of a salty tear.
She fought him at first, but then her body succumbed to his desire expressed in his kiss.  
He felt the need to kiss and hold her as long as he could, because he was not going to take it any further than that.  He did not have a condom and he knew he had to stop.  By the time he did, she was trying to get his coat off as her robe had fallen slowly off her shoulders.
“I can’t.”  He stopped her and stepped backwards a step as he considered her confused pained face.  “Look, I have a personal thing. I don’t mix business with pleasure, and you darling are business.  You and your CCM corporation could cause me some serious issues if things went…”  He paused not sure what the right word to use would be.
“I see.”  Calista’s instant defense took over.  Her head went high, while her robe fell the rest of the way off.  Her nipples were poking out of her navy blue ribbed tank top, as her mouth issued words of dignity her body did not feel.  “I appreciate you stopping by.  If you can just share the plumbers contact with me, I’d appreciate it greatly.”  She turned to her shoulder bag that still had his whiskey travel size bottle in it, that was setting on the couch next to where they stood.  She reached in, grabbed a calling card with the corporation name and phone number.  
He stared at the card.  It was all there in print, her corporation information and the local PO box he knew, his was there too.  
He stuffed the card in his back pocket and wanted so badly to say I’m sorry and then strip her naked, fuck her until she thanks him for what she needed so badly on her new boudoir bed décor.  Instead, he frowned and looked down before looking at her; she had a distant hard edge to her face now.  For the best, he told himself.  He had digits of a willing blonde in town, that he could get a quick relief with, thinking it was Calista and no one would be the wiser.
By the time Blake left her loft, the chill from the outside air, stayed inside.  As she poured herself a tall glass of red wine, her phone dinged with a text from his cell, sharing a contact.  She accepted the contact and put Blake’s cell phone number in her phone under his corporation name.  Then in name she put Kansas – giving the man a sense of stranger’s name again.  She opened her sleep aid prescription pills, took two instead of one, with a large swallow of wine.  She figured she would call the plumber in the morning; she was in no mood now.  Which got her next plan in action.
She was tired of men ruining her mood.  She had worked hard on this place and it looked spectacular.  The moment she had Blake in her apartment she wanted to strip him naked and fuck his brains out, no commitment or drama.  Having him this close, tasting his lips, his tongue mixing with hers, she was beyond horny.  Instead, he had to go all “I don’t mix business with pleasure’.  She let his words in his voice repeat in her head while she practically gulped her wine down and poured another glass.  She clicked her phone’s Bluetooth and sultry music poured out of the hidden speakers in the main area.  She dimmed the lights and reached to turn the heat up, which was included in the rent.  She was going to heat this place up.  She walked to her closet upstairs, wine glass in hand.  She looked around her dressing room and imagined a naked Blake sitting on the cream chair, hard cock, begging her to come to him.  She slipped her tank top off over her head, pulled her pajama shorts off, and dressed in a pure silk lavender knee length slip.  By the time she was walking back downstairs, to refill her wine, vibrator in her other hand, she had the perfect movie to watch in mind, and it was not some women’s life time movie show. 
Snuggled on her couch, soft cream fur blanket under her, female mixed with male orgasmic moans coming from her tv, she set her refilled wine glass on the wood coffee table, leaned back into a set of pillows and hit the on button of her personal pleasure toy.  
Really, who needs a man, when you got contract labor and a vibrator.  
Chapter Six
Redhead Seeks Revenge
As Calista sat in the beauty shop chair at Darlings local main hair styling salon, where all that is anyone in Darling went, she had a mission.  Dioltas Hide Out was doing okay, but she wanted to get out and socialize with the types that would get business to her coffee shop.  What better place than the main beauty shop in local downtown Darling, two blocks from her coffee shop, one block from the police station and right by the high school where those teenagers with disposable income needed to start frequenting more often.
The gal that was supposed to give her some fall color lowlights was running behind with her previous client.  Nothing new, Calista was used to that.  After spending an hour this morning talking to Larry Stiles the plumber aka older man flirt, she left him talking to himself in her apartment to fix the two things that needed fixing, the stove and the water tank.  After last night, she was fixed good and happy with two orgasms, before crashing hard, naked on her couch, with the heat blasting her place at seventy-five degrees all night long.  She chuckled internally thinking about the heating bill Blake was going to get; but she knew she would probably be more reasonable with the heat after last night.
She blocked out her entire day to run around town and hand out her promotional cards.  The beauty shop card was every fifth coffee free with twenty-percent off all lunch items.  Rarely, did a hair dresser frequent a coffee shop before nine am.  It would be more likely for a late lunch run that she would see the employees from this shop.  The police station, she wanted to hand out cards for fifty-percent off every purchase as long as they wore their uniform in the coffee shop.  This would give her place better security.  The previous owner Milly had several break ins, and one robbery the year before she bought it.  The last stop was the local high school DECA club where they are to hand out punch cards for every tenth drink is free under five dollars in exchange for her speaking to the class about running a small business.  If there was anything, she knew well, it was teens, and there was a good chance they’d make this a hangout if they felt welcome.  She had the new digital register set up to help her counter help with all her promotions she had planned.
By the time her new hairdresser gal, Remi, was ready to do her hair, she had her mind going a million different directions but somehow always ending with the kiss Blake left her with.  It was passionate yet, withholding, as if he wanted to tell her that yes, as she already knew, he was an incredible lover, but that he was not hers – but then again, she had not been trying to give him the available vibe.  If anything, she held her head high and backed down when he turned her down.  But that kiss he left on her yesterday, that made her think of a million and one different things about Blake.
“Calista?” Remi called out in question.
This was her second trip to see the gal, but she must have forgotten who she was.  She needed to get to know her, ask her questions about herself so that she would remember her.  She did a great job on the trim last time, that she was ready to explore a bit of fall colored lowlights to spark up her October mood.  Weather was changing – why shouldn’t she?
“How’s your day going?”  Remme chimed out as she wrapped the black cape around Calista and clipped it in back.  She began to run her fingers through Calista’s hair which felt heavenly.
“Good.  And yours?”  Calista replied while looking at the slender dark-haired girl in the mirror.  She had some shade of dark blue streaked through her black hair.  Her dark brown eyes had quite the makeup job on it, only someone of youth could easily pull off.  Her pale skin had a slight sunless tan look to it, which their spray tan specials were prominently promoted on the shop front window.  She looked to be in her mid to late twenties and the tattoo of two names on her wrist made her think they were kids but could be something else.
“I’m a bit tired.  Late night last night.  I went to the pub on the edge of town.  Finnegan’s.  Two for one shots and large happy hour buffet.  I am working through a bad break up.”  Remi’s voice lowered to a sad tone on her last few words and then she forced a happy smile on her face while looking at Calista through the mirror in front of them.
The bar, Calista remembered well.  Her first night in town and she decided to recklessly check off shag a stranger off her list.  That stranger, Blake, was now her landlord, and someone she could not get off her mind even though she wanted to as a break from men might do her some good.
“Do you know the place?”  Remi asked, which broke the mental image of Blake plastering her against the storage room wall, kissing her, taking her clothes off, and then the moment when he lifted her onto some heavy-duty box with something glass in it and began to stroke his cock in and out, causing the glass to jingle – that memory was broken by Remi’s voice asking if she knew the place.
“Uh, yeah.  Decent place, I guess.”  Calista answered as Remi dropped her hands to her shoulders.
“We should go there sometime, ya know, gal’s night out.  Now, what are you thinking?  Appointment notes stated fall colored lowlights.  I love this color of blonde by the way.  It appears to be natural?”  Remi’s voice held a note of sadness while she asked Calista, practically a stranger, to go hang out with her at a bar.  
Calista had to wonder, she knew her age of thirty-nine did not always look thirty-nine, on most days, she was called out for looking mid to early thirties.  But she was new in town and making friends was in her top agenda.
“I’d love that.”  Calista quickly chimed out while glancing up in the reflection of Remi in the beauty chair mirror.  “So, I was thinking fall colored lowlights.  Maybe some red, some caramel.  But while I was sitting out front, I saw this picture of a woman in a soft reddish blonde hair and thought, damn that is pretty.”
Remi smiled in the mirror at her and pulled a section of her hair up in her hand and then out.  “Low lights or red colored highlights for the fall is like on every woman’s check list right now.  Not many women, can pull off that shade of red, but you can.  It would look spectacular.  If you don’t like it, my last half of my day is empty, we can always change it and I’ll only charge you half the cost of new color for the second color.  Sound good?”
The thing was, Calista did not have all day to play beauty shop.  She had a huge list of things to do and a quick color job was one of them.  Could she really pull it off, a complete color change, versus some low lights in her soft light blonde colored hair?  Did she have the time?  She looked at Remi in the reflection of the mirror and gave her answer with a very wide smile and a nod of her head.
Two hours later, Remi was done styling her hair and then turned her into the mirror for the first time.  She looked at the soft red strawberry blonde before her.  Her blue eyes popped, her smile spread as she looked a bit vixen and a whole lot of someone different than the blonde hair woman that she had been all her life.  She ran her fingers through her hair and played with it.  Remi had done a great job.  This was her color, at least until winter.  Then she wanted to go with streaks of light blue on the underside that only showed when the wind blew her hair, or she wore it up.  She had seen it on a Toni and Guy ad in the hair color book out front and thought, now that would be daring.
Remi stood behind her, bent a bit so her head was above hers.  “You like it?  I mean, because I love it.  I want to take a picture of you and put it on my social feed.  I can get some new business with this color.”
“Sure.  Why not?  Just, please mention the coffee shop.  You know, as business promo.  I’d appreciate it.”  Calista answered with a huge smile on her face.  She could only see a sexy woman, who did not look sad after being recently divorced, looking back at her.  If this color looked great on a few other women and gave them the idea to come change their color, why not.  
Just as Remi stood up and turned to take a few steps away from the chair Calista was sitting in, standing behind her just a few feet away, was Blake, staring at her reflection in the mirror.  She had no idea why he was standing there; it wasn’t like he knew that she had an appointment today, but the look on his face was totally unreadable.  If he was attracted to her before, was he now.  Did he not like redheads?
Calista smiled at him and waved.  It was the moment he looked blankly at her staring, then turned to walk straight out of the store, that she did not care if he liked red heads or not.  But she did.  An imaginary image of a newspaper headline popped in her head.  Redhead seeks revenge.  She wafts that image out of her brain with an imaginary swat.  It wasn’t revenge she was seeking on Blake, but one of his sensual hungry man kisses that led to things that only made her moan.
She let out a huge sigh and thought to herself that if he didn’t like it, so what.  She would go find a new stranger to check off her list.  Seeing as Blake turned out to not be a stranger at all, but a man she saw almost every day around town, in her shop, and then when she had apartment issues, which in the beginning it was a lot.  But watching him walk away, little headlines of revenge popped in her head.  A loud metal clank sounded out, bringing her back to reality as another hairdresser’s color bowl dropped on the ground.  It was in that moment, that Calista realized all this revenge was not getting her the satisfaction it once did, and Blake, she did not want revenge, she wanted him – all of him, deep inside of her and more than once.  That thought curled her lips into a very satisfied looking smile.
Calista’s day carried on with comments from complete strangers regarding how beautiful her hair color looked on her.  It put an extra pep in her step and a smile around everyone she greeted for the rest of the day.  Everyone she handed discount cards to acted as if she was doing them a favor, instead of what she feared, which was them not wanting an outsider, of Darling that is, pushing their business on them.  Darling had a small town feel but was not the typical small-town size.  It had been growing rapidly in the last few years and from what she could tell, if you have some major players in the retail in town, they will come.  Most of the surrounding towns were much smaller, so maybe running a few ads in those local papers, might bring out of town patrons to her coffee shop when they came in town to stock up at the brick and mortar retailers that were not in their small town.
Back inside her place after a long day of promoting, she tossed her shoes off at the bottom of the stairs to her upstairs loft.  She thought about changing, but there was a good chance she wanted to stop at happy hour at Finnegan’s.  Not to see Blake, although that would be a benefit, but to see Jackie who caught up with her as she was walking out of the police station.  They had talked briefly about her hair, and Jackie convinced her to come put a flyer up at the locales bulletin board wall at the bar.  She already had a few pre-designed, so printing one out and going there sounded like a hell of a better plan than being alone in her loft.  Not that she didn’t love it, now that it was almost done, but she liked to keep busy, planning, listing, running, and when the silence settles in, so does the sadness over her ended friendship and marriage.  Most days it was easy, but there were those days, when the dishes were done so to speak, that she would sit for a moment in silence and think, never in a million years did I think this would be my life.  Wine tours with Stephanie, Europe traveling with Clay and Cole, and most importantly a life with love, happiness and family all surrounding her.  This new life was panning out, but the loneliness crept in one inch at a time when she was home alone.
The day had been warm but checking out the five-day weather forecast on her cellphone, a cold spell was moving in tonight.  She sat down on her sofa with her feet tucked under her, setting her cellphone off to the side, while she checked out the mail that she picked up from the post office, one piece at a time, tucking each white envelope behind the other.  When she was done, she tossed the stack of mail on her salt oak coffee table and sighed.  She would just make a few notes for tomorrows itinerary and then run up to her dressing room, find a warmer top to wear, slip on some sexy but sensible black boots in case of snow, and head out to the bar where the fresh memories of Blakes naked skin tingled against hers.
Her cellphone buzzed with a text and picture from Jackie.  In the picture, Jackie was holding up a napkin with a pen written message that stated, get your butt over here.  Her text simple read, ‘Redhead contest – winner, winner, gets a free chicken dinner.’  That caused a huge smile to spread on Calista’s face.  She got up off her couch, set her cellphone on the charger as she mentally contemplated what fun outfit to wear to Finnegan’s.
Just as she was about to ascend the stairs to her dressing room, a hard knock resounded at her outside door.  She turned to walk towards thinking who could that be?
“Calista, it’s Blake.”  His serious voice caused her to stop in motion.  Was he here to give her a hard time about the red hair, the fact that she accidentally dialed his cellphone and hung up after he left the hair salon, although she knew it wasn’t an accident, just her fingers wanting what her heart could not?  
She took a deep breath and hollered out.  “Just a minute.”  She looked down at the soft blue tunic silk top she had been wearing all day.  It looked fine.  She fingered the long-beaded necklace she was wearing and thought about the last time he touched her jewelry like he wanted her naked wearing it.  She fluffed her fingers through her hair and took a deep inner breath to get her confidence up just as she reached for the door to unlock and let the man in that had her on a yo-yo over what?  Whatever this thing was they had going on.
So, with a cockiness to her tone, she opened the door, leaned against the doorway seductively and teased out.  “What is it Kansas?  Business or pleasure?”  
She watched his large hand set itself palm flat against her door above hers and asked.  “May I come in for a second?”  He sounded all business, so she took a step aside.
With her breast peeking through her V-neck tunic length blue top, her nipples poking out past her white bra showing the darkness of the outline of her nipple and her simple black leggings just begging him to strip them off, Blake stepped in the apartment and did not answer those questions with a word but a lip searing kiss of the tongue twisting kind.  He was quickly figuring out he had no control around the woman, trouble or not, he wanted to be in her – deep.  The red hair only made it more so.
Somewhere or somehow, Blake had the door closed and Calista out of her soft blue tunic top.  He had his hands full of her breasts before he breathed out his first words. “Why the red?”  
His mouth was pulled away from hers.  His light green eyes appeared bright and shiny as he looked deep into her blue eyes for an answer.  Her breathing was so heavy she could barely answer.  “Why not?”  She whispered as her hands began to tug at the dark navy-blue shirt he had on.  The buttons were tight in their spot and she wanted to just rip the shirt off, buttons popping and all.
He looked deep into her eyes and hesitated before his mouth rushed back to hers.  His kiss held passion and frustration.  The rush to be in her was the hardest desire he would have to forego.  For now, he wasn’t thinking, he just showed up at her back door, wanting nothing more than to run his fingers through her new red hair, stroke every inch of her naked skin and slide his rock-hard cock inside of her, but instead he had to stop before that.  He had to have control, he reminded himself internally, while his hands and mouth were touching every bare inch of skin that he could get his hands on.
It took only a few steps, once he picked her up and she wrapped her legs around him fully clothed, before he had her lying flat on her back, on her big plush L shaped couch.  This couch with all of its pillows and blankets, all fuzzy and fur, it felt so girlie, yet so sexy with her laying on it looking up at him as if she was mentally pleading with him to fuck her, yet this time, unlike the last time, she said nothing.  She didn’t beg, plead or ask.  She just looked at him with desire and a softness to her smile that told him she wanted this.  He wanted it too, but he knew he had to stop himself before he went completely inside of her.  He would pleasure her, tell her that he has a loss of control but that his business and pleasure rules still stand.  This was just him, coming here, to taste her.
Before Calista could say anything, or wanted to say anything, she was looking up at the man she just could not get out of her head.  This is just sexual fun, she repeated over and over in her head.  You don’t know anything about him, really.  She told herself internally.  However, the moment he had her completely naked, while he was still dressed, and his tongue was dancing around her skin with his hot wet mouth teasing her, pleasing her and making her moan soft pleasuring sounds, she was lost.  Her will versus her desire was battling it out.  She wanted his tongue lashing he was teasing her with, but she wanted his hard cock in her.  God, she could only hope that he brought a condom.  Her body moved in reaction to his touch, his tongue, his fingers sliding in and out of her hot wet pussy while he looked up at her licking her clit.  She looked up to her ceiling, away from his glance of satisfaction as he ate at her pussy, filling her with his fingers, and making her think that this was just what?  
She told herself to stop thinking about the what and enjoy the now.  She raised her hips a bit in reaction to his mouth.  She let her hands hold her breasts as her fingers toyed with her hard nipples.  Her new red hair had a section that had fallen across her face a bit as she turned her head sideways during a long drawn out intensity that caused her to bite her lip and keep her from screaming.  
It was in the second that her body shook with a tremor of delight, that her lips could no longer bite back what she needed to scream.  “Oh my.  Fucking.  God.  Blake!”  She screamed his name; her fingers grabbed his dark brown hair and shoved his face hard into her pussy as she literally felt her entire body become a tingling sensation of electricity.  
He had her good.
It was quiet for a minute as the world around her, her world, tried to regain a bit of consciousness.  He was kneeling one leg on the couch between her legs, one hand on her knee, wiping his mouth with the inside his shirt he never took off and looked down at her.  She got the distinct feeling that perhaps, this was all that was going to happen.  She sucked in and breathed out a deep stuttering breath before asking.  “Can I return the favor?”  Not that she was a cock in mouth gal all the time, but she loved to make a man happy, hoping he would finish off inside of her.
His eyes said it all.  He had a smile of satisfaction on his face that he made her happy and the huge bulk under his dark denim jeans, told her he wanted more.  
“I had not planned this.”  He smiled and winked, acting causual.  “I did not come prepared.”  He stood up and took a step back.  
She leaned up on her elbows, letting her new red hair cascade down behind her as she closed her legs and bent her knees to lean them sideways.  “I can take care of you.”  She offered softly.  Knowing full well that she wanted his entire hard cock inside of her wet pussy and not just in mouth but if this got them this far, maybe next time they could play the bang the box game.
“I shouldn’t have come.”  He offered quietly as his demeanor changed suddenly.  
Calista watched his facial reactions that started to show a bit of defense begin to return; a signal he had given her before clearly stating that this was as good as it was going to get for now.  Someone, somewhere, had hurt him.  Because no normal man would do the things he does to her and refrain.  What business and pleasure did he mix before that caused him to be so cautious?  She blinked hard and fast to keep tears from falling that she felt stinging the backs of her eyes.  She raised herself up and grabbed a large grey feather pillow, setting it in front of her, like a shield, while quizzing him.  “Maybe you shouldn’t have but you did.  Come.  And I came.  And I am just offering the return favor.”  Her voice was not the sexy sultry vixen she wanted to sound like.  Her tone was deceiving her over her hurt.
“Calista?”  Blakes voice sounded out in questioning as he took a step back and looked at his surroundings as if he just realized what he had done, where he was, where he placed her before he slid his large muscular fingers in her, his mouth planted firmly between her legs.  “I…I don’t think I can do this.”
She stood up and had a firm grip with her right hand on the pillow that was still covering a part of her body.  “What is this?”  She seethed in slithering tone.
“This.”  He motioned to the couch, and then looked towards her bedroom where it called to him like a siren in the night.  “Us.  Sex.  Casual sex.  I don’t do casual sex.  I mean I do, I guess I don’t do casual sex with people I have to do business with.”
She dropped the pillow from her body but kept a grip with her right hand as the large pillow rested half on the couch and half against her now standing next to the couch.  “And why not?”  She smiled but it wasn’t a heartfelt smile, nor was it a come let me lick your cock smile.  It was a what the fuck smile.
“Do you?”  He asked with an inquisitive look on his face.
“Hard to say.”  She jutted out.  “Seeing as you’re the first business associate that I might even consider.  But hell, if I take my business elsewhere, who’s to say.  I just might.  I’m a free woman after all and I like sex.”  And then for added measure right before she threw the pillow at his head as hard as she could she added a sting to her tone.  “With or without men!”
No surprise.  He dodged the pillow and then took a step back.  With a calm voice he kept stepping back while talking.  “You are my renter.  I own your lease on your coffee shop and I think incase things went, I don’t know, crazy, then this might not be the best for both of us.”
She followed him with her eyes as he walked backwards and slowly turned her naked body towards him.  Her head high, her eyes wide and a fuck you tone to her voice.  “Well, I’m not crazy but you most certainly must be, because when a woman like myself, asks a man if he wants a blow job, he does not turn it down.”  She blinked hard to keep the tears back while her jaw tightened, and white lights started to dance around her head.  Her euphoria of her orgasm was gone, and a nasty migraine was tapping on her head.  She watched his jaw clench and release a few times before his soft voice echoed out into her home, actually, his building and her temporary home, but it was the place she wanted to call home by staying here a long time.
He cleared his throat and looked away as he spoke with guilt.  “I’m sorry.  It’s all my fault.  I have no control around you.”
He started for the door as her voice pleaded out.   “But why then?  We are grown adults.  If this is business, why can’t we make it just business?”  She could hear her own words clawing at the room, begging for salvation, wanting him to change his mind and in doing so, give up her own dignity, just to have a few great orgasms.  The old her would have thought she was crazy, then again, she lived the last few years of her life with two people that meant so much to her, just treat her as if she was no one.  Just as Blake was treating her now.  That she was just business he had a hard time keeping his hands off of.  Where was her dignity now?  She wondered as a tear fell down his face.
He started to say something but stopped at the sight of her tears and wavering in her voice as she pleaded to him, naked in front of him.  “Just go.  I don’t want to do this.  Just go.  I don’t like fighting.”  
She turned and walked into her bedroom.  The last image he saw of her was her sensuous naked body tempting him to follow while she closed her dark thick curtains behind her.  How he wanted to just go back in there, strip off his clothes, let her wrap her sweet juicy mouth around his cock and then slide it in her hot wet pussy until she withered from another orgasm.  Instead he softly talked to the air.  “I am sorry Calista.  It’s me. Not you.  I am truly, truly, very sorry.”  He cleared his throat and offered up what he could not promise.  “I won’t do it again.”
“Never say never.”  She whispered out, not even sure if he heard, but he did.
Blake heard the three words that sounded so pitiful.  He knew who hurt him, but what or who hurt her.  Jackie and Jenny had been mentioning things they heard, but he was not one to listen to rumors.  Those were things he usually tuned out.  The minute he closed her door and started down the metal steps, which each step felt like a cement block for his foot was landing on each metal grated step, he knew he had done something so stupid, so selfish tonight.  What was wrong with him?  Two consensual adults having sex, he swipes that way once in a while.  But Calista, after that first night they met and more, he knew, something about her, some alluring sexual part of her called to him, made him yearn for her, want her in more ways than sex – and that scared the ever-living shit out of him.
Blake’s heart pinched, and his mind reeled with the question – what had he just done?  He walked to his truck, started it up, without thinking he drove straight to his bar, where Jackie took one look at him and glared.  She must know.
“Just an iced tea tonight Jackie.  And the number three burger special.”  He adjusted himself on the barstool as Jackie leaned forward with a grimace on her face.
“A little-known fact – Jack!”  She said the name as if it was a mix of his name and you are a fucking asshole.  She continued.  “Not everyone is caught up in the Blake Special.  Some women might fall head over heels in love with you because I guess they think you’re sexy.  I know you for the kind human being you are, as for sexy – not my type.  As for Calista, that woman has her shit together.  Especially after everything she’s gone through.  She is sweet!  She is kind!  She is funny!  And, if I was a lesbian, she would be top of my got to get me some of that list.  You are one stupid asshole!”  She turned away as if she was going to help another patron that just sat down a few stools away, then she turned back towards Blake glaring, marched right back in front of him, leaned back over the counter towards him and sounded out her thoughts through a whispering seething noise that caused Blake to feel a pinch of pain behind his eyes.  “Not to mention the chemistry I caught onto the moment you two looked at each other.  She’s not some fly by night, I will leave you for an older richer man.  If anything, her finances match yours, or at least as close as any woman in this town might get to.”  She stood back up and glared at him.  “One Jackass burger special coming up.”
Blake was left speechless as Jackie walked over to her computer monitor to put in his order.  By the time she put his iced tea on a coaster in front of him, she seemed a bit calmer, so he thought he might try his hand at asking.  “Did she call you?”  He quizzed as Jackie turned to help another customer.  
By the time she walked by him, she hissed at him as she walked back and forth from behind the bar counter. “I texted her.”
She went and helped another customer and when she walked back by him with a glare she mouthed ‘asshole’ and walked by.  Blake rolled his eyes and could only imagine what caused Jackie to text her and when the hell did his kind of sister become bff’s with Kansas.  Holy shit, this was not the kind of mess he wanted to roll around in.  All the better he just leaves this situation alone.
His jackass special as Jackie called it was slapped down in front of him and a bottle of ketchup was smacked against the bar top next to his plate.
“Listen, Jackie.”  He started up with his soft toned voice he used to comfort his sister a million times.  “Things are complicated for me right now.”
She put her arms across her chest and made a humph sound.  “Not really all that complicated Blake.  As you and I are here right now, millions of people across the world are getting their hearts broken one way or another.  To not love is a loss.  To not pursue love is a tragedy.  I remember you telling me that one time.  Thing is, Calista is a fun mature woman that yes, she too got her heart broken, but she chose to move here and make a new life.  Perhaps she wasn’t thinking something like this would happen so fast to her, but then again, she said she’s not looking for serious right now.  She was supposed to come here tonight and win the redhead contest.  By the way, you get to judge and hand out the prize.  So, stick around a bit.”  She walked away before he could say a word.
As Blake ate his hamburger, he contemplated texting Calista, but his pride stopped him.  Or maybe it was the fact that if she forgave him, he would do something mean and replay the entire incident again.  He figured no communication was best for now.  Until he could get himself on track.  
When Jackie finally had a moment to stop back by him, she was less pissed off.  “By the way, Calista did not say anything to me.  She just texted she wasn’t feeling so hot and could not make it.  However, I just saw her an hour before that, and she was doing great.  Then, I happened to swing by the hardware shop and happened to take the alley way and saw you coming out of her place.  When I called her, she sounded sad and when I asked her, she said she was, but it was nothing I needed to be concerned about.  This is me, putting two and two together.  You and her,” she finger-motioned sex, “that first night you met, in the back room.”  She wildly motioned to the back room.  “Then, knowing you Blake Jones, you couldn’t get enough of the woman.  Remi is here tonight and said she thinks somethings up by the way you two were looking at each other at the salon.  Jenny said you talk about her a lot but then stop.  Whatever is going on in that brain of yours you better figure it out.  If it’s just sex, then let it be that.  If it’s more, you might be pleasantly surprised, seeing as Jenny and I have done a little digging on the woman.  But we are not telling you what.  Just that we approve.  So, pull that head of yours out of your arsh.”  She giggled as she always used the word ‘arsh’ instead of ass as a form on parental cussing.
“Jesus...”  He drawled out in exasperation. 
“Oh, he’s not gonna help you if you keep this shit up.  Go do some good humanity thing, like you always do, and leave the poor woman alone, otherwise, man up and ask her out on a real date.”
“It’s none of your business, Jackie.”  He said it jokingly but as soon as he saw her reaction, he realized she had not taken it that way.  Ever since she became a mother, her fun joking side took a back seat more often than not.  
“Is it, Blake?  Because I think you know it is.  You are like a brother, an uncle to my son, but as a sister, I feel it is time to move on.  An older, wiser woman, would do you some good.”  She paused at his reaction to the words older and then added.  “Who cares if she’s a few years older, she doesn’t look it.”  
Blake interrupted her before she can say anything more.  “I don’t care about age.  Hell, besides age between men and women these days is a far different thing than in our parent’s time.  It’s me, not wanting to deal with her, and her recent baggage.  I just want a nice quiet life, nice quiet wife.”  He stammered knowing himself, that he was asking for the impossible.
“Do you, Blake?”  She teased and started to walk away before turning to look at him with a solid bit of advice.  “Nobody, and I do mean nobody, has a nice quiet anything – we all come with baggage, yourself included.  Ask yourself if your life would look better with her in it or out of it?  Sounds like she keeps following your lead.  Besides…”  Jackie drew out the last word with a teasing smile.  “I think you like you some bit of crazy darling.  I truly do.”
Blake just shook his head no as he laughed softly while smiling at Jackie walking away.  Her words echoing in his head, were starting to sound true.
“I think you like you some bit of crazy darling, I truly do.”
Chapter Seven
Women unity in mind is more powerful than a solar plant.
Calista cleared her throat while standing in front of group of twenty or so woman, plus or minus, that were here to experience Dioltas Hide Out Book Night.  Dressed in a deep burgundy tunic sweater top, black leggings and her knee high dark brown boots, she felt comfortable and confident about herself.  Tonight she offered free coffee, and complimentary baked goods as an enticement for the socially promoted women’s only book club.  It was like a reading club, but instead, others brought recent best sellers in excellent condition to be exchanged or auctioned off, with proceeds going to the Holly Clinic off Route twenty-two.  The Holly Clinic, as Calista had come to find out, was a health clinic that turned its extra building that wasn’t being used into a day space for homeless women and children only.  They were not permitted for a full homeless shelter, but a place during the day, where someone who needed it, homeless or not, but mostly homeless used it, for a shower, fresh meal, child care, and a computer to send out resumes or look for listings for affordable housing, which did not seem to be too much of.  
She cleared her throat in front of the crowd of women.  “Welcome to Dioltas Hide Out Coffee Shop, easier to just say Dioltas, but you get my drift.”  She chuckled with a warm-hearted sound she missed hearing from herself.  She looked around and smiled while thinking to herself, this, she missed this, being around other possibly likeminded women who were gathering together, not to get drunk or sell products, but to exchange thoughts and ideas.
Calista’s idea was to gather once a month, however, the turnout was better than she had hoped, and there was already chatter amongst the women before she announced the start of the event, that these women wanted to do something that made a difference.
“Yes.  You in that lovely red sweater, where did you get that?”  Calista started off the meeting by taking questions from several raised hands, which had not been her plan, instead, she wanted more of a casual open discussion, books exchanged, the rest auctioned off from which she had bought several just published best sellers from Amazon prime earlier this week to be placed in her store, but instead, decided to auction off for the cause.  What she had not expected was large book bags full of great books.  Tonight, was going to make a difference, she was sure.
“Several amongst us want to know, why the name change to Dioltas Hide Out?  Not Darling Hide Out, or just The Hide Out Café?”  She smiled and raised her hand again.
“Yes?”  Calista asked with a smile to the same woman she just asked her question from.
“The sweater, Tully’s Thrift Store on Main.  It’s five blocks from here.  She buys from estate auctions all over the world and then eBay’s them.  If you’re lucky, you get to buy before it sells on eBay.  It’s a rare vintage label in perfect condition.”
Calista raised her eyebrows and formed her mouth in a hmm formation.  “Is Tully here?”
A slender woman in her early twenties stood up.  She was ravishing looking.  She had on a vintage sweater of pale pink, which played nicely against her darker complexion, and dark denim jeans with some type of custom embroidery about the front pocket stitching.  She looked to be Indian ethnicity with her thick dark black hair perfectly flat and shining.  Either way, her brown eyes sparkled, her smile was wide, and her voice had a singer note to it.  “I’m Tully.  Sorry, I wasn’t expecting a sales pitch.  I think everyone here knows me but you.  We should talk sometime and get to know one another, but for now, I am dying to know – what is the meaning behind Dioltas?”
Calista’s eyes grew big with surprise.  She had not expected everyone to catch on to the name so fast.  She thought she was clever, but these smart women knew better.  Dioltas in Irish meant revenge.  With her strong Irish lineage on both her parents’ side, it seemed a fitting name.  Perhaps, her personal revenge should not have seen its way all the way to Kansas from Utah and put into her coffee shop, but at the time it seemed awesome, right now she was doubting herself.
“Uhm, wow!”  Calista started and then cleared her throat before taking a deep breath.  “Short version is so much easier than the long version, but before I do that, please understand that tonight is about raising awareness for the Holly Clinic, which a new friend just told me about the other day.  Thank you, Jackie from Finnigan’s Pub.”
A slight round of clapping filled the room.  Jackie stood up and then motioned for everyone to be quiet.  Because like most of these women, she wanted to know why the name revenge in the café.
“Okay.”  Calista started.  “I’ll tell you the short version.  The one where I look totally innocent.  The long version with details will come years down the road, after I feel I can trust you and perhaps several drinks of whiskey.”
“What kind of whiskey?”  Someone shouted from the group.
“Yeah, how many bottles to make you tell.”  Someone else shouted.
Calista giggled.  “Not many, but I’m was not going to answer that.”  She cleared her throat and fast blinked her eyes for a second.  “In the big picture of things, my new friends, I picked Darling Kansas.  I don’t know why.  Maybe it was the name, the place far away from where I came, or maybe it was the feeling I got when I came here with my Aunt, who is like my mother to me, and we bought this coffee shop almost a year ago, at the same time I served my soon to be ex-husband with divorce papers.  When I came here, the town spoke to me.  And believe you me, I wanted to be one of those women that got divorced silently while sneaking off to a tropical local, but something happened when I came here.  I can only describe it as my soul found music.  Strange, but true.”
She raised her eyebrows from looking down at her shoes, letting her lips press hard together as she realized she had a very captivated audience.  It would be so easy for her to start crying right now.  Tell her entire sob story to all these women, who she was sure most of them would console her, however she was over the consoling part, on to the revenge part and if she needed to explain her decision to name the café coffee shop Dioltas, so be it.
A deep breath in and Calista started her brief explanation.  “Three years ago, my best friend, whom we raised sons of the same age and were close friends themselves, decided, with my husband, that they should get caught having an affair.  But they did not know that I knew.  For two years, I calmly, cautiously calculated my revenge and escape from a marriage I kept hoping he would decide she was not the better choice.  In the end, financially I won.  However, they are currently buying their first place together as we speak.  I thought of revenge as an end to the means, however, that slowly changed.  The two boys are no longer friends.  My son has lost what hero status he stamped on his father and replaced it with the image of a middle-aged man gone awry.  I, on the other hand, had decided that revenge comes in many forms.  Seeking revenge on someone is…”  she paused and then said it, “fucking satisfying, pardon my French.”
The room lit up with laughter as all faces had been staring at her with sympathy.  She had not wanted tonight to be about her, so she quickly ended the explanation.
“However, the best revenge is to seek higher ground, burn that bridge and not look back or go back, find what makes you happy, make a list and check it often putting yourself on top, which I have for a change.  At forty, I am a mother of one son who is traveling Europe and plans to come back and get a masters in college.  He is healthy, happy and well adjusted.  That was my accomplishment for the last twenty years.  As for my marriage, there were good times, great times and several memories now marred by the two exes’ in my life.  I wanted revenge that felt like I had arrived.  I am in the best shape of my life physically or at least I haven’t felt this good since my twenties.  I hired a nutritionist, a personal trainer for those two years the two were cheating behind my back, thinking a better body, a happier me and he will choose me.  When he didn’t, I still won.  I look and feel good.  I wanted a business that made people feel good.  Serving coffee and baked goods, in a warm friendly atmosphere while spending some of my time giving back to society, with events like tonight, that is my revenge.  I tell myself every day that I felt lost in the chaos I called divorce that I’m back baby.  I’m back to the me I was before I met those two, and I am back to putting myself first, making lists and checking them off with success and plans.  And that in a nutshell is why I named this place Dioltas Hide Out instead of the other suggestions.  I guess I wasn’t thinking totally clearly yet.”  She chuckled.
Someone spouted out.  “You’re forty?”
Another woman chimed in.  “Seriously, thirty-five maybe at most, but where’s the gray hair?  The wrinkles, the midlife weight.”
“Ladies, tonight is not about me.  However, liposuction and Botox can be a good friend to keep in the emergency bag.  Seriously, nothing like a bit of revenge in the looks department to help a gal out.  This long hair, it’s a weave, the red hair – for the first time I might add, is compliments of Remi at Darling Hair Salon, these boobs, had a boob job in my twenties, because I was flat as a board.  This face, it saw a facial at the spa a lot during those two years that lying cheating, you know what kept telling me that he was late night at the office.  But I digress.”
“No.  Tell us more.”  Someone shouted.
“How about if you come back for the next monthly meeting and auction for the Holly Clinic.  It will be close to Christmas by then and we will be wrapping spa packages to give to the women who visit the clinic and small toys for the kids.  Food donations will be taken as well.  In the meantime, Jackie, if you would not mind taking over as this is your idea after all, I need to run upstairs to my apartment, I forgot I left my curling iron on with the excitement of getting ready.”
As Jackie stood up and came front and center, Calista found it hard to keep her composure with a smile on her face.  What she just did, what she just talked about, was now three years of hard pain staking heartbreak that she had only talked to a therapist about, but after tonight, obviously not enough.  She felt things she had tucked deep inside of herself, hoping it would only eek out at the time most convenient for herself.  Tonight, was not it.  Those questions were hard to answer, even if she only gave the short version.  The long version was painful and full of memories where she was not at her best.  
Calista took the cold metal steps to her apartment one hard step at a time.  Light snow had fallen and even with the metal non-slip tread, in her heeled dress boots, she needed to realize that she had to wear nonslip shoes on the stairs, and just change into her dress boots or shoes once down the stairs.  A small thing to deal with as the winter snow season approached, but she was tough, and she was creative, and damn it she was not going to cry until she had a tissue under her eyes to catch the tears.
The minute she opened her apartment door, she realized that she was not the one that had turned most of the lights on.  She stepped inside cautiously and looked around.
“Oh hey!”  Blake came around the corner with a metal tool in his hand and a look on his face that he was happy to see her.  
If Calista remembered correctly, the last time he left, they broke off, whatever it was that was going on between them, just as he suggested that what was going on between them did not keep going on.  In that brief second, his sexy smile made her forget that she was about to come up here to cry.
“Uh, hey?”  She softly whispered out but kept staring at him as if he was a nice plate of desert that kept morphing into a pile of spiked nails.  Her internal vision of wanting to eat him up versus the dangerous vision of what he kept doing to her.  She really did not need this right now.
“Sorry.”  He offered up gingerly.  “Jackie mentioned the thing going on downstairs tonight.  Kind of cool of you to offer your shop.  Listen, I never finished fixing those few little things on that list you texted me.  I know we, I mean I, kind of ended the other night with I’ll just send someone over to finish, but I figured, you know, that I should just do it while you are not here seeing as I’m not busy or anything and anyways, I left you some flowers over there on your table with an apology note.  That is if you can read my handwriting.”  He chuckled softly remembering how the blonde he dialed up last night had not worked out like he planned.  There had not been a good substitution for Calista, but he still wanted to keep this as friends, for now.  He had been harsh that night, and this was the only way he really knew how to apologize.
Her eyes opened wide while her mouth licked her lips with desperate need to kiss him.  In that moment, tears started to fall.
Blake could have shot himself with a forty-five.  What the hell was he doing getting involved or apologizing to a weepy dramatic woman.  But he had been known to be a great shoulder to cry on, a hugger of all champs, and a means to the end of sadness – which usually ended in sex.  
He wrapped his arms around her tight and kissed the top of her head.  “It’s only flowers and an apology.”  He teased.
She pulled out of his hug a bit too quickly for his liking, which bothered him tremendously.
Calista held her head high, although it felt incredible, his hug would lead her to more despair she could not handle right now.  I am a strong woman, she told herself internally before softly speaking out to Blake who seemed put off with her distance.  “It’s not that.  Sorry.  I just had a moment downstairs.  It’s nothing really.  I guess you caught me off guard.  I was coming up here to cry for a second, get it all out, regain my composure and freshen up.  Jackie is heading up the entire thing.  I just got caught off guard.”  She turned to the decorative mirror she had put by the door.  Wiped her eyes with her fingers and then took a few deep breaths as she plumped her curled red hair with her fingers.
Blake looked at his feet as he spoke out.  “Sorry.”  He knew that feeling all too well about finding composure after a breakup.  Jackie had given him an assumed reason for Calista’s moving here.  That was the main reason, he just did not see this going anywhere.
Calista turned and smiled.  “It’s nothing really.  I guess I’m just bummed everyone knows my real age.  That, and the fact that those clever women figured out Dioltas meaning.  Listen.  Lock up when you leave.”  She slipped her cute heeled boots off and slipped on her black Sorel Winter ankle boots she had set under the table by the door.
As she closed the door, she faintly heard the question that matched Blakes confused look on his face.  Either he was confused about her age, concerned, or the name Dioltas?
By the bottom of the steps her phone dinged with a text from Blake.  “Revenge? Huh? Age?”
She texted back.  “Forty as of last night.  Thanks for the birthday gift.”
He did not text back.  Perhaps it was in his apology note, she really did not care at the moment, because if she had stayed in her apartment a second longer, she was going to find a way to convince that sexy fix it landlord of hers to strip his clothes and hers and bring her revenge satisfaction delight – which meant more than one happy o was coming out of her body.
Sometimes a woman must hold her head high and move on.
Chapter Eight
Breaking up is hard to do.
Blake checked his list for things to fix note for Calista’s’ apartment.  He gathered his tools into his toolbox.  He wanted out of there before, she got back.  The coffee shop said she was expected to be most of the day running errands.  He left last night without finishing.  It wasn’t her age that bothered him.  He had been with older woman.  Calista did not look forty and if he had known it was her birthday, he might have let the business thing go for some personal birthday pleasure.  It was the fact that she was just starting to get her life together after a bad divorce and friend break up.  He did not want to be hurt by being the rebound guy again.  Not to mention she lived and ran a business in his buildings.  He knew that just keeping this thing between them as business associates was best.  The problem was that he wanted nothing more than to strip her naked and make love to her like a real man knows how, over and over, waking up in the morning naked and satisfied.  That was something his mind thought he was ready for, but not his heart.
Just as Blake turned from locking the apartment door, he felt something in his awareness of his surroundings.  As he turned, there at the bottom of the stairs looking up at him like a red headed sinful treat, was Calista.  He loved blondes, but the red on her gave her an edge look that spoke volumes in the naughty department.  Her lips curled up in a sinful manor as she stood at the bottom of the stairs looking up at him.
“My oh my, what have we here?”  She teased and started to walk up the stairs.
“Just finishing up.  You should be good to go.”  He replied coolly, as if her presence didn’t make him rock hard between his legs.  He tried to act casual as he took a few steps down the metal steps.
Each step they took, they looked at each other, drawing closer, Blake wondered why he was so hard edged about not mixing business with pleasure, then he remembered his ex-fiancé used to be his renter in a shop, which led to a disastrous heartbreak when she dumped him.  Every time she called him for repair, it was like a knife to his heart.  Nothing made him happier than to see her shop close for good.  Well not exactly, not seeing her around town, that made him find a way to get over his heartbreak.
Calista stood in the middle of the stairs blocking Blake from going any down further.  She smiled up at him with a naughty thought she kept to herself.  Her day had been a great success on the errand front.  She wanted to freshen up and head into the café for the rest of the day.  Her intentions were to not fly over the employees like a mother hen but keep them guessing as to when she will stop in, maybe keep them on their toes.  But right now, the way Blake was looking down at her from one step ahead, him blocking her from going up, she wanted nothing more than to take him back up into her bedroom for a midafternoon delight.  “Blake!”  Her excitement was in her whisper of his name.
“Calista…”  He drew her name out like a long shattering orgasm.
They both took a deep breath, took a step to the side and faced each other on the metal stairs, same step, looking at each other.  Blake reached up and gently pushed a long strand of red hair out of her eyelash that the wind just blew in.  She smiled at him and then her phone rang with Cole’s ringtone.
“It’s my son.  I have to get this.”  She grabbed her cellphone out of her shoulder bag as Blake continued down the stairs without a word goodbye.
As he sat inside his truck watching the apartment door close behind Calista, he thought to himself, a son.  She has a son.  He had not even thought of that being a part of his life.  He only thought of having her to himself, no strings attached.  But there were strings, plenty of baggage, and this was what he did not want in his life.  His sister and her kids were his family.  His desires could take a backseat for now.
Just as he started up his truck, the café shop back door opened, and Milly ambled out to wave him down.  He pushed the window button down and looked at the gray-haired woman that he bought his coffee from for as long as he could remember.
“Blake.  Glad I caught you.  I just called Calista, but her phone went to message.  We’ve got a problem.  With the plumbing.  Mind taking a minute to see what happened.  I was just about to see if Calista was upstairs.”
Blake turned his truck off and climbed out of his truck.  “I just saw her as I was leaving her place to finish fixing a few things.”
“Uh huh.”  Milly smiled at Blake while he rolled his eyes with a smile.
“Seriously, Milly.  You know me.”  He slipped his keys in his pocket, opened his back door and grabbed his small tool bag out.
“Uh huh.”  She smiled again with insinuation.  Blake was going to let it go for now.
“So, what’s wrong?”  Blake asked as he followed the old woman back inside the café.
Calista sat with her phone to her ear while listening to her son but thinking of the interaction that Blake and she had earlier as they passed on the alley staircase.  “I know mom!”  His crackling voice sounded exasperated, while trying to hide the tears.
“I’m not saying I told you so, but… ok, maybe it sounds that way and lord knows I hated that when others said that to me during your father’s and I’s divorce…”  her apologetic voice was quickly interrupted.
“This is not about you and dad mom!”  He practically screamed into the phone before disconnecting.
He was mad.  She could get that and if him yelling at her over his girlfriend dumping him then she would hold strong.  Although, he was right; this was not about her divorce to his father, this was about life throwing a wrench in his plans, or more like a whack upside the head – she should know.
She had a sense this was coming.  He decided to go off with two friends and tour Europe, and typical in fashion for Cole, he thought his girlfriend Katie should be waiting for him.  He was so much like his father some days, she wanted to scream.  In fact, sitting here, staring at her now silent phone, she could only imagine what was going through his mind.  In that instant, a migraine pierced her forehead and she set her phone down, walked into her bedroom, shut the curtains, and began a ritual she knew so well.
In the darkness of her room, she had closed her eyes, and tried to listen to the sound of her breath slowly adjusting to a rhythm.  What Cole was going through was nothing compared to finding out your best friend was sneaking around behind your back with your husband.  What was harder, was keeping it a secret, until she had proof that was without a doubt for the lawyer, along with a financial plan that she set into motion the day she found out.  
Outside of her room, she heard her phone ring and then stop.  She heard a ding from a text, and then another.  If it was Cole, she would call him back as soon as the Excedrin Migraine medicine kicked in, but for now, she had to breath and focus.  Her pain was not his.  She knew he was resilient and in two weeks, Cole would be out bar hopping in Dublin with his two buddies and there would be a girl.  For all she knew, maybe Katie had already figured out that his year in Europe meant for him that she stay solid and faithful, while he could taste all of the female flair in foreign countries.  Cole was his father, she knew that, and did not try to rationalize her own son.  Someday when he got married, she would have to keep her mouth shut and fingers crossed that he finds the one woman that he will not want to cheat on.  
As for Clay, he cheated before the marriage, during without proof, but along came Stephanie and she never would have thought that her best friend since Cole was born would be the one that he cheated on her with.  They shared so much raising their boys together, that she never would have dreamed of Stephanie and Clay doing what they were doing behind her back.
Thinking about it was not making the migraine go away, it was making it worse.  Her cellphone ringed again from the other room and then stopped.  Another ding sounded out and if she wasn’t stricken with the worse migraine in a long time, she would have conjured up the strength to go get her phone, bring it back into her darkened room and answer it, if it was Cole.
She rolled over onto her side, pushed her extra decorative pillow between her knees while reaching for the soft lush lavender throw blanket that she laid on the empty king size bed side.  The side that she shared with Clay for twenty-two years.
She felt her mind start to slow, realizing she was in such a better place now.  With Cole in Europe, he would get over this breakup with his friends, she just needed to stop talking to him about her failed marriage, and just listen to him until this too shall pass.  
Calista let her mind start to relax and thought about positive things.  Life had been getting better day by day.  The coffee house was making a great profit, which was part of her plan.  Her Aunt Caroline was doing great on her last Viking cruise; the social updates had brought her comfort.  The women in town seemed friendly every day that went by.  And then there was Blake, her mind always seemed to wander back to the man the enticed her with just a look.  He was like no other man she had been around.  He evoked feelings from just the memory of him, yet she knew that sometimes damaged people hurt people.  Was Blake that kind of guy?  Or was he so badly damaged his heart just would not let him fall in love again?  Calista did not want to be with a man who couldn’t be in love unconditionally.  Physically they were a match, but emotionally, perhaps they both still had a lot of healing to do.
Her phone dinged with a text again, but the sound was faint as her breathing and memories of sex with Blake was beginning to lull her into a restful state of napping.  She was never great at totally falling asleep, but a fifteen-minute nap, especially when a migraine hit, she was the boss at that.
Moments later, a feeling of someone sitting on her bed stirred her to slowly awaken.  However, the instant a large manly hand set itself on her shoulder, she bolted straight up in bed and began to scream while her hands where flying in the dark, trying to fend off whoever it was.  
“Calista?  It’s me, Blake.”  He removed his hand from her and got up from her bed.  He tossed her phone onto the bed next to her and then turned to reach over and turn on her small lamp next to her bed.  “I’ve been calling and texting you.  You didn’t answer and then when I knocked, I got worried.  Listen, a pipe burst at the café.  Larry is fixing it right now, but I thought you might want to know, it wasn’t a break, it was intentional.  Somebody fucked with your plumbing and I thought you might want to come see for yourself.”
She rubbed her eyes but kept a glare on her face as if to fend off his sexual energy that was causing her insides to turn with lusting heat.  He had awoken her from a sex dream, one where he was the major player in it, and she was being incredibly satisfied and about to scream out his name.  Thank goodness, she didn’t.  Standing now before her, he looked not like the man in her dreams that was licking her to utter pleasure, but like the man who had told her more than once that he did not mix business and pleasure.
She rubbed her eyes and grabbed her cellphone to look at it without saying a word to him.  There were several texts and calls from both Blake and the two gals working at the café.  As far as her son calling her back, not a word.  He hung up because he was pissed, and he wanted an apology from her first.  As usual, she would do it, but deep down, she could only hope that his buddies would get him through this, as she had her own battle to fight still, two actually, her sexual attraction to Blake that would do her no good, and the revenge she wanted to continue instilling on the two people that made her life a living hell for two years – Stephanie and Clay.
Blake cleared his throat and raised an eyebrow at her as he was expecting an answer from her.
“Sor…” she stopped herself from saying the entire word – sorry.  It was the one thing she knew she had to stop doing, apologizing for everything, when really, she did not need to apologize for him letting himself into her apartment that she rented from him.  “Wait a minute here.”  She rolled off her bed, set her decorative pillows back in place along with the lavender fur throw on the bed just right, and turned towards him wanting nothing more than to strip the man down naked and have crazy passionate no emotions attached sex with him.
“Come down, don’t come down.  I just thought you might want to see what Larry pointed out to me.  Pipe is getting fixed, but it wasn’t a bad pipe but an intentional break, so the cost is on you.”
She grabbed his arm and applied a grip hold to his bicep which was thick with muscles that Clay never had.  “Did you…”  She stopped midsentence as the touch of his skin under her hand did things to her no man had ever done.  It was a primal feeling of lust and need pulsing through her hand, carrying it through her body, making her nipples peek out.
He raised an eyebrow at her and looked down to her.  “You might want to tell the girls to quit getting so excited when you touch me.”  
His light laughter and motion to pull his arm out of her grasp left her feeling sexually frustrated mixed with altogether ready to scream.  He was walking out of her bedroom, leaving the curtains open behind him which led in a flood of noontime daylight.  She squinted her eyes and put her hands over her nipples.  Sure enough, the little traders, they had poked through her white tee shirt and white bra.  But how could he tell in the darkness of her room with only the small lamp on behind her.  Then again, she probably woke up with them that way from the dream she had been having.  Either way, he always seemed to get the last laugh when it came to her sexual frustration with him.  She mentally put buying padded bras on her list of things she needed to cope with being around the man.  Another bottle of whiskey, padded bras, dark sunglasses – to avoid eye contact, and zipper for her lip.
She reached for her navy cardigan sweater she had tossed on her bed before laying down.  Slipped it over her head.  It was in that moment she realized she had taken her jeans off to lay down.  She had been standing in front of Blake, half naked and he did nothing to make her completely naked.  She was not the type of woman to throw herself at a man.  She wanted him, sure, she thought to herself as she slipped her dark denim jeans back on.  She wanted him bad, she thought to herself by the time she had her keys and cellphone in her bag and was locking her door behind her.  But having him and wanting him were two separate things.
By the time, she made it down the metal stairs to the alleyway, the back door of the café was open, and Larry was packing his tools away into his white plumbing van.  Blake was in his truck and some thin young blonde was sitting in the passenger seat.  She turned her attention away from Blake and tried to focus on what Larry was saying to explain the intentional damage done to her plumbing in the cafe.  “What’s up Larry?’
“Well, as far as I can tell, someone cut your main waterline in two places so that as soon as the water was turned on this morning, the pipe would burst open.  Basically, flooding your kitchen area.  However, whoever did it, knew what they were doing.  They knew that the water would take the pressure down but not off so that your gals working this morning would not catch on right away, until the water started flooding out from behind the storage closet and out into the main part of your back-kitchen area.  Pretty sneaking if you ask me.  I mean if you’re going to cut pipes and have them leak, that’s how I would do it.”
As Larry kept explaining, Blake finally drove off down the alley passing them, at a speed one only takes off in to either show off, or show they are pissed.  He couldn’t be that pissed.  It’s only water, the building is brick and what’s a little drywall repair and mop up?
“Well, I’m sorry Larry.  I don’t know why one of the girls didn’t come get me first.”  She offered up wanting to mentally bang her head with flat palm because she had no reason to apologize.
“Oh, that’s alright.”  He lifted his shop vacuum up into his white work van full of plumbing repair essentials and then reached for a double carbon copy old style receipt book.  “I guess you could have saved yourself some money, ya know, mopping the water up but here’s my bill.”  He handed his handwritten bill to her but without letting it go as her fingers touched it to grab.  “Although, if we could do some kind of exchange, I could say, lessen the bill, or forget it all together?”  He quizzed while they both had their hands on the bill for his labor.
She felt her migraine kick back up.  Larry had been picking her up since the morning she called him about her apartment.  He is ten years older, and nowhere near the type of man she liked.  she would pay the bill.  She frowned and raised an eyebrow to toy with him a bit, let him down easy, and then write him a check.  “Larry?  I thought we talked about this.  I’m taking a break from men right now.”
He let the bill go out of his hand and looked down at his feet while slightly laughing.  “Oh no.  Nothing like that.”  He started up.  “See.”  He started to whisper.  “My sister is Alice.  The one you helped last week with her cheating boyfriend.  Well, word has gotten out that Revenge Coffee Shop, sorry Dioltas Hide Out Cafe, is not just a high energy drink place where you get a kick start for you day, but a secret club of women that are plotting revenge and taking action.”
She stopped him right there.  “Why Larry?”  She put her right hand over her heart and chimed out some sweet southern charm accent.  “I do declare.  I have no idea where you get your information from.”  She teased with a wink and then tucked his bill into her bra for a flirtatious kick.  She watched his eyes wander there to the crest of her boobs for a second and then looked back into her eyes.
“No.  No not that.  Although, you know if you want to take me up on a date, I’d be open to it.”  He started up.  “Honestly, I’m not sure what all it is that you women do late at night?  Drinking coffee or drinking whiskey, but Alice did mention that you were the best at plotting revenge.  See I’ve got this buddy of mine, well he was a friend, and he has been running his mouth off behind my back about how I lie about the fish that I catch.  Now, it’s gotten to the point where I almost punched him the other night.”
She decided to stop him right there.  Revenge on a friend, for twisting the truth and telling tales, not her forte, but revenge of a friend if he slept with his girlfriend, that she would help with.  She put a hand on his shoulder and looked him in the eye with a tilted head.  “Larry?  You know I went through a really bad divorce, right?”
“Yes.  Alice told me.”
“And you know that word has gotten out that I may or may not have, swear on my mother’s grave I will never admit to, a bit of revenge on my ex-husband and ex best friend who hooked up with my husband.  And I may have made some mild suggestions under the influence of Jack to the women.”
“Who’s Jack?”  He spat out fiercely with a tone of jealously.
She laughed lightly and pulled her cellphone out of her back pocket as it had just dinged with a text.  “Jack Daniels; the whiskey.  Excuse me one second Larry, I need to reply to this text.”  She quickly texted back to Sally at the front counter of her café.  ‘Yes, I will be there in a sec.’  “Sorry.  Girls are wondering if I am going to make it in to check on things.  I guess this is what I get for hiring some young gals to serve coffee and energy drinks.  As you were saying?”  She tried to confuse him with the conversation.
“No.  You.  We’re saying?”  He was still interested in her service.
“Ok.  Yes.  Listen.  I am good, no great, at serving up a dish of revenge.  However, it sounds to me like something else is bugging your friend and he’s reflecting his negativity on you, maybe knowing how nice you are that you won’t do or say anything, when really, his back-stabbing lies could have underlining meaning of something else altogether.  Best to just take him out fishing, toss back a few beers and then confront him.  If that doesn’t work, then come find me, will pull a number on him.”  She laughed half meaning it, half wondering why she let this revenge thing get so far.  Then again, she did name her business with revenge in the name, she just did not think the folks of Darling would catch on so quick.  Perhaps she really needed to examine internally what she wanted out of all of this.  Darling was to be a fresh start, not a replay of her last few years which were lonely and full of anguish.
“Listen, I’ll get you a check and drop it in the mail, or if you like I can just send you an electronic payment?”  She offered.
“Actually, if you want, no, never mind.  Listen, mail me a check.”  He finally stammered out.
As she walked into the back doors of her café, she was pretty sure that Larry wanted to switch the bill for date night and as of right now, that was not going to happen.  Money was not a problem, she made damn sure of that, and if she got to the point where she had to exchange labor work for sex or dates, she would just cash in on some retirement.  
The minute she reached the front counter, Sally was on her like lightening.  “Listen, Calista, I am really sorry.  I think Jimmy might have saw me punch in the code to get in the back door one night and after, you know our ugly break up and my revenge you suggested I do to him.”  She paused before continuing, looking distraught and meek before speaking up again.  “I might have told him that you gave me the ideas, and well, he might have decided a little payback was necessary.”  She rambled the last sentence out so fast that Calista knew.  Sally had not kept her mouth shut about who gave her the ideas for revenge and Sally was back with Jimmy.  Go figure.  Never trust someone to do your dirty work.  Things had to change.  She was no longer going to give these women ideas, she was going to make them take a pact, come up with the ideas themselves, and perhaps she might need to convince a few, like she did Larry, to try the higher road first. It was in that moment, the flashback of conversations she had several times with Jackie suggesting the high road was the only road that led to victory, did she wonder why she mistook youth for ignorance.  If anything, the proof that Jackie and Jenny, now best friends, and a hell of a lot richer after Pete died, did something so incredibly difficult, yet the reward paid off.
Calista let out a huge sigh of exasperation, as her mind whirled over Sally’s situation, Larry asking for advice, that she reminded herself that she was just going to keep her chin up around town, and silence worked better than helping others to dig deep up the dirt.  People could burn their own bridges with a torch.  It was as if this was the moment she realized all of the revenge she sought will never bring her satisfaction from the disaster, however a sexual moment with Blake, as frustrating as all of this has become, was the one thing that did bring her some satisfaction, even if most of her satisfying moments were imaginary in her sleep.
Sally’s voice echoed in the distance next to her about the idea she gave her on how to quickly disassemble Jimmy’s motorcycle, so it would not run, might have not been her best idea on revenge.  Men do not like you messing with their toys.  Luckily for Sally a customer walked in that she had to go help, while Calista churned in her mind that a long talk with Sally was overdue, but it had to be done in private, for now a word to the wise was needed.
Calista grabbed herself a cinnamon streusel muffin with a pair of metal tongs and set it on a small white china plate so that she could heat it up for thirty seconds in the microwave.  She waited until the customer was rung up and walking out the front door before saying anything.  “Listen Sally.”  She started up and stopped while she opened the microwave and then shut it.  As soon as she hit the add thirty second button and turned, Sally had a scared look on her face.  “I can only assume what you were doing coming in three Friday nights ago at three am.  Perhaps sex in the back area of my café versus your car or his truck was a great idea, seeing as you both live at home with your parents, but nothing goes on here I don’t know about, for the most part, and I was young once too…”  She paused and thought about the punishment and decided to take the high road.  “I think if, from now on, with Jimmy or not, don’t bring men in here late at night, and for God sake after I change the code on there tonight, do not, do you hear me, do not let anyone know the code.”  She watched the scared frantic twenty something motions her head up and down in agreement that what she did was not such a great idea and she would do what Calista said.
“Now.”  Calista started to continue as she pulled her muffin out of the microwave and then decided she needed a grapefruit red bull to go with it, she reached for the cooler while she kept talking.  “I think, that if you just tell Jimmy that you actually came up with the idea yourself, he might not decide to seek any further revenge.”  She offered up.
Sally shook her head no while looking at her feet and whispering, I guess.
Calista took that as a sign that Sally might be scared of Jimmy and her inner momma bear took over.  She set her red bull and muffin on the counter next to where they were standing and lifted the young woman’s chin up with her fingers while looking into her eyes.  “Has Jimmy ever hit you, threatened you?”  She whispered up in fierce confidence.
“No.  Nothing like that.”  Sally offered but Calista did not believe her entirely.
“Then why are you afraid to tell him it was your idea?”  Calista frowned and reached for her red bull and cracked the top open.  As soon as she took her first long sip, the pungent grapefruitness of the energy drink shook her senses a bit.  She needed a jolt after dealing with Cole earlier and then Blake, freaking Blake who was always on her mind and she needed to do something about that.
“Well.”  Sally started and then stopped.
“Well what darling?”  Calista offered up.
“Well, I kind of think that maybe things with making up were just temporary as I think he might be texting, you know her, the other woman?”  Sally offered up like it was a question.
Calista took in a deep cleansing breath.  She breathed it out and took another large sip of her energy drink.  She had been thinking that maybe this revenge bit was getting out of hand.  It was time for her to dole out a bit of relationship advice.  “Do you want to be with Jimmy?”  She asked.
Sally shrugged her shoulders and then turned to the front door dinging as a new customer just arrived.  
“I’ll take that as an unsure.  Real quick and listen up good.  Nothing gets a man more freaked out than if he thinks a woman is going to dump him or replaces him with another man.  If you want Jimmy, and talking to him doesn’t seem to work, then break up and be seen with another man.  He will want you back.  But if you don’t want to date him anymore, and telling him that you want space doesn’t work, because I have no idea how it works for you generation, each one is different, but then make yourself unavailable.  If he keeps dating that other chick behind your back, break up.  Simply put.”
“But Jimmy doesn’t work that way.”  She meekly peeped out and then turned to go help the customer that was just reaching the counter.
Calista sat down at corner table that positioned her to face most of the store with no one behind her.  She reached for her red bull drink and finished it off.  She got up and went to the complimentary refill coffee station, tossed her can in the recycle bin and reached for one of the many ceramic coffee mugs stacked up with sayings on them.  Today, it was the black mug with the words Wicked on it in gold script.  She was feeling wicked.  Wicked about Blake and a bit jealous of the woman in his truck, but she needed to get over that.  Wicked about getting a little dirt on Jimmy and figuring out what Sally really wanted.  ‘Jimmy doesn’t work that way’, kept echoing in her brain.  The one thing she could not stand is a man who used himself as a physical persuasion to what a woman does not want.  If Jimmy so much as had laid a hand on Sally, there was some serious revenge coming his way - and nobody was going to know about it. 
With only a half hour of mental evil planning, Milly walked in with a look on her face that told Calista, she was done.  She had overheard from the others that when she sold the place over a year ago to Calista’s Aunt Caroline, she had hoped to be done then, but since not too many offers were as good as CCM Corporation, then she decided to hang in there.  She only had about another week before the Thanksgiving holiday closing.  Calista had a feeling that today was her last day.
“Calista, do you mind if I talk with you.  In private.”  The aging woman smiled at her flatly.
Calista stood up from where she had been sitting and motioned that they head to the small five by five foot, one desk, two chairs stuffed in, office in the back kitchen area.  “Sure, what’s on your mind?”
Milly did not reply but rather grabbed a coffee cup with the snow flakes and poured a fresh cup with hazelnut creamer.  “I think this requires a cup or two.”  She laughed.
Calista refilled her own cup with decaf and sugar free salted caramel creamer.
 As soon as Milly sat in the only small wooden chair opposite of the desk chair, she took a deep breath and started right up.  “I have been wanting to talk to you.  I really need to just finish up.  Take a break.  My sister invited me on a cruise in Europe and I have wanted to go visit her for quite some time.  This Thanksgiving being the start of it.  I guess what I am asking is that I need to quit early.  I really want this and seeing as you have the place totally under wraps, making better profit in a week than I do in a month.  Although I think you are the star of all the attention.  Folks come in here to see you, and with you flittering in and out at all hours of the day, they come back more than once to catch your attention.  Your advice.”  She chuckled.  “Which by the way, this small town that grew out of its britches, is still a small town.  Let me give you a bit of advice.  Stop handing out revenge ideas.  Change the café name to something else before the sign you ordered goes up and makes it a more permanent damage on a café that I have built up from nothing and made it my life for the last twenty years.  I don’t mean to sound harsh.”  She stopped talking while Calista had a flat lined smile on her face, a returning migraine, and a realization that Milly, twenty-five years older than her was right in most sense of her meanings.  Deep down she knew it, she just had not really thought things would progress so fast.  In the heat of her revenge design over three years ago, she had not stopped to think that putting this kind of negative energy out into the world, might bring it right back to her.  Broken pipes and all.
“Please.”  Calista offered up softly while wanting to beg her to just shut up, instead she reached across the desk with a folder she already had in place.  It was an exit package.  It gave Milly the final payment two weeks ahead of time.  It gave her a gold star card that allowed her free coffee and tea any time she wanted.  It had a questionnaire in it along with a business card, from the local hometown journalist that had wanted to do an exit story on her.  And most importantly, it had a thank you card for all that she had done for Calista over the last year while she worked out her divorce.  
Calista cleared her throat while Milly asked.  “What’s this?”
“This is me saying thanks.  It is me saying absolutely, I understand.  And by what you just said, I have a lot of thinking do to before next week’s remodel over Thanksgiving.  I’ll give it serious thought.  I will, because you know this town better than me.”
“Well this was easier than I thought.”  She took the envelope in her lap and opened it to look inside.
“The final payment is in there.  I even tossed in a bit of a bonus as things have been going so well.  I would greatly appreciate you doing that newspaper article like we discussed.  I guess just keep it about you and not the new place would be perfect.  I hope you come around often to see the place after your visit with your sister.  In the meantime, please leave me a phone number where I can reach you if I have any more questions.”
“Before I forget.”  Milly stood up and held the yellow legal letter sized envelope under her arm.  “If you want Blake, you need to know his past and he needs to know yours from you.  If you have it in you to be patient with him, you will find he is one of the good guys that’s been hurt.”
“I’ll keep that in mind.”  Calista ended the conversation with a hand to show her out of the office and walked her to the front so that she could say her goodbyes to the staff that was on hand for the day.
Having, wanting, and needing are completely different beasts.
Chapter Nine
Don’t harsh on my holidays.
Calista did not know what was worse, the fact that Sally admitted that Jimmy had pushed her around a time or two, smacked her once extremely hard that it left a mark on her cheek for a few days, or the idea that Sally was saying he was not all that bad.  What Sally did not know, is that Calista did some digging on Jimmy and his dirt ran deeper than she could assume Sally knew.  Jimmy had a rap sheet at twenty-two.  He had been charged with rape, twice, but the charges were dropped.  He had stolen as a minor and once as an adult, always getting probation.  The stealing didn’t bother Calista’s much as the later charges she had read, it was the fact that one of the women he raped at eighteen, was now missing.  She wasn’t from Darling, Kansas, she was from Mexico and nobody seemed to care.  But Calista did.
The night was growing dark and Calista had just pulled up to her extra storage just outside of Darling.  She punched in her code to the Public Storage facility and watched the large black wrought iron gate begin to open.  As she drove her truck inside, she followed the alley between the storage units all the way to the back and far right.  She had picked that unit intentionally.  She parked her truck in front of the door and sat there asking herself, ‘is what you are about to do right, or wrong’?  
She did not have an answer for that, maybe a conscious, but after Sally did not show up to work last night, it did not take long for Calista to find out.  Jimmy had hit her after she broke up with him, and then forced himself on her.  Sally would not talk too much to her about it, so she let it go.  Or so everyone thought.  Leaving Sally at the hospital while her family surrounded her to support her, Calista felt something inside of her break.  
A degree of protectiveness had been growing over Sally ever since her first day of owning her shop.  Day by day, Sally felt like the daughter she never had.  She discovered the young woman’s vulnerabilities to the world and felt a need to protect her where her parents seemed to be failing.  Even while watching Sally’s face bruised to tenderness, her mother was asking her what she did to set him off.  Sally’s father seemed meek and scared against Jimmy’s well-known bully type family.
Calista did what she could by spreading word to those that might be able to help, but until Sally choose to press charges, Jimmy would be a free man and that bothered Calista the most.
A sense of loss of control was arising in Calista and she hated that feeling.  Between Cole not returning her calls, Clay putting an announcement on Facebook that Stephanie and him just got engaged, she was feeling like a raging bull.  A couple of customers had come in this week with snarky remarks to her about the name of her café.  She figured a few might not like it, but at the time, she thought it was clever.  On top of her crappy last few days, she had not seen Blake once, which she wasn’t sure why, but it upset her.  He was like her coffee fix.  Five minutes of flirt and visual could do a lot for a woman.  Cole, she knew would call her soon.  He had a temper like his father.  As for Clay, she should have removed him from her Facebook friends.  She had not gotten confirmation that this was real, or a tease to get back at her like revenge.  It had eaten her up for a day, but as she sat in her truck, thinking now, it was time to stop wasting her energy on Clay and Stephanie.  They ate up three precious years of her life with anger, deceit and she needed to just let karma do its thing on those two.  As for the café name, Milly was right, she would do something to make it correct; yet that was the last thing on her mind right now.
Blake. What to do about Blake?  She thought to herself and then got out of her truck with no clear answers in her brain other than to just ask the man for another night of fun.  Not that he seemed interested lately.
Inside the storage unit, was a small pull string florescent light.  Calista pulled it and looked around.  There, under the light, was the Kawasaki Ninja 300 in black with red accents that she had bought from a guy on Craig’s List, for cash, a few days ago.  She had plans for that bike at one point.  Plans to drive by and blow Stephanie’s brains out late one night, but she smothered that idea out with the image of herself in orange and twenty to life years wasted on that bitch.  However, buying the bike, dreaming of her plan, and doing nothing was actually therapeutic.  Her back up plan was to wait until summer and maybe take it on a scenic drive, not that Kansas was the most idyllic place for motorcycle drives, but she had thought of taking it up to South Dakota or maybe back through Colorado.  Back in high school, she had a friend that taught her drive one, before he taught her a lot of other fun things that involved sexual activity.  She mentally felt herself feel better with those memories.
She walked around the bike and thought how the bike’s original revenge plan of killing Stephanie was just a thought, and she never really planned on using it.  The VIN was removed, the bike had never been plated.  What she was about to do could very well land her in jail – if she got caught.
Instead of freaking out about it, she thought, putting the bike in her truck and covering it for its drive back to her loft – not illegal.  Putting on a man’s foam muscle Halloween costume on under an extra-large black hoodie and men’s jeans and work boots – not illegal.  Putting on a full-face helmet while going out for a drive with costume attire on – not illegal, however driving the un-plated motorcycle - illegal.  Carrying a nine-millimeter Glock with the serial number off of it, not being registered to carry, and taking said gun on her ride – illegal.  But what would really get her into trouble – was what she planned to do with the gun and Jimmy.
With the bike ramp out of storage and now placed on the back of her truck, she wasn’t even sure if she could get the bike in the back of her truck, but she was going to try.
As soon as her storage was closed and locked, Calista knew there was no going back, but she still had time to think about all of this.
No sooner did she get five minutes from where she wanted to situate the bike, Cole called.
“Hey Cole!  How’s it going?”  She chimed with enthusiasm even though her hands were shaking, and her mind was reeling with how stupid all of this was, not even knowing she could go through with it but just planning it, participating in it to as legal as she could, felt gratifying but at any moment, she was going to freak out if she took it any further.
“Not much mom.  I’m back in the states.  I stop by dad’s new place, but I don’t think there is room for me to be staying there.  It’s a two-bedroom condo downtown, and the other room is an office.  Brian is off at college in Cali.  I’m currently couch surfing at a friend’s place and well, I thought about driving out to stay with you, but you said it’s a tiny apartment above a café…”  his voice was questioning but he was not asking for what it is he wanted…yet she knew her son.
“Okay?”  Her voiced trailed out shaky to her own ears as she knew her thoughts should be on her son’s needs and not her own need for revenge.  She took a deep breath and began talking slowly and as calm as she could muster.  “So, yeah.  I guess with you taking off to Europe for the year during the final of the divorce, neither one of us thought about where you might live when you get back?”  She left the sentence off as if it was a question.  When Cole first found out about the divorce, he was a senior in high school and there was no getting any resolution out of him as to what his future held other than traveling through Europe and college as soon as he got back.  When he left for Europe, she decided she would deal with his living arrangements when he got back, knowing full well, Stephanie and Clay would not put a second thought into it.  Stephanie’s son Brian was going to college in California and as far as the plan was, at least what little she had found out, was he was staying there and not coming back to Utah.  
“So, I was wondering?”  He started again but ended the question with no question, which always drove Calista nuts.
“What?”  She could hear the clipped tone in her voice as she was officially irritated with all things male at the current moment.  Blake and the blonde he drove away with the other day and then nothing more from him, Jimmy and his inability to leave Sally alone, Larry and his insistence they just try a date, and Clay who never put his son first, only his dick – and now Cole, who needed his mom to think for him when really at nineteen, he needed to think for himself for a change.
“Well… I kind of spent all that I had saved for Europe, in Europe, so, I could use a loan to get a place.  I’ve got a line up on a job and a roommate.”  He eked out as she could now hear the sounds of the bar that he was probably sneaking into with a fake ID.
“Sure.  Two grand enough?  Listen sweetheart, I am glad you are back and yes if you want to visit soon, I would love that, but I have to go.  I’ll transfer the money into your account as soon as I am not driving.  About ten minutes ok?”
“Thanks mom!  Love you!  You’re the best!”  He practically sang out so fast that she knew that he was excited to be living on his own.  Twenty was young but not too young to have your first live out of parent’s experience.  He had saved his entire youth for the travel around Europe before settling into college.  She had put a lot of thought into this very scenario and realized as soon as the divorce papers were signed, and Clay was handcuffed to their old bed, in their soon to be old house, that as soon as Cole came back from Europe, it might be best that he did not live with either of them, until the smoke cleared - from the bridge that connected their marriage had blown up. Figuratively speaking.
After talking briefly with Cole, instead of driving the motorcycle to park in the dark abandoned parking lot, next to an old abandoned building, in a seedier part of town, she found herself pulling up to the alleyway of her coffee shop.  She put her truck in park and realized that her life had been one hell of a crazy ride the last four years.  Stressful – yes, but more so, five years ago, she never would have imagined her life as it is now.
As she sat with her truck off, in the dark, she remembered her life five years ago.  Stephanie and she had weekly barbeques or dinners planned together with the entire family.  Cole and Brian appeared to be good friends, many different interests, but the closeness of the families had kept the two boys growing up like brothers.  
Sure, Calista had wanted more kids, and so did Stephanie – or so she said, but the cards were not dealt in their direction.  By the time, the boys were in middle school, Calista really felt that as parents they had everything going as planned; retirement on track – check, her owning her own coffee shop close to home – check, business successful – check, Stephanie was a great best friend and like a sister – check, Clay and their love life was average but good – check, Clay’s career was taking off – check, Cole’s plan to travel Europe savings plan building from part time work after high school – check.  Life was pretty damn good – or so she thought.
As quickly as the happy memories flooded in, the bad ones took over.  The original notion that Clay was cheating on her.  The fact that she found ways to keep her head buried in her coffee shop business while Stephanie would accuse her of not spending time with her.  Stephanie had become needy, her marriage was crumbling apart, their family get togethers turned into monthly not weekly, and Clay spent a lot of time away from the house when she was home.  Then, the moment she happened to catch the two kissing in the parking lot outside a luxury hotel downtown, she remembered the anger, the frustration and the immediately planning of revenge.  Which she got.
She spent one full year planning her exit plan from their marriage without a soul knowing what she was up to.  She feigned a womanly organ issue with her husband to avoid having sex with him, not that he really seemed that interested.  She cashed in what she could and hid it in a separate bank account under her aunt’s name, with her permission.  She sold anything of value in the house on Craig’s List under her aunts account.  She made plans to sell the coffee shop, but still work there the last year of their marriage; she sold it to her aunt for next to nothing, who then sold it once the divorce was final.  In other words, she found financial ways to scar Clay, and it was worth every penny.  She bought Dioltas Hide Out Coffee Shop – formally known as Darling Coffee Shop, under her aunt’s name.  
Once the divorce was final, all financial reversals from her aunt to her was slowly, methodically, reversed back to her private off shore account.  As far as Clay knew, she got a deal on a rundown coffee shop far away from him and Stephanie.  That was why she bought it – to move away and start fresh.
She let her mind remember back to the last few months of their marriage, trying counseling first at her request, then a financial advocate, before the lawyers finally stepped in.  As far as Stephanie’s husband Darwin was concerned, he did not fight her, as he was already unemployed and decided to move in with his parents until he got back on his feet.  A hard thing to do when you are just turning forty.  Calista felt bad for him, but then again, he had never been close to her and always took Clay’s side on things.  Perhaps if he had been a bit nicer, she might have advanced noticed him when things were getting bad.
Calista blinked her eyes open from the darkness of her truck, to adjust to the bright overhead alley light that illuminated her back door to her café and the stairs to her apartment above it.  She frowned at the flash of memories of revenge she got on those two.  At the time, it felt so sweet, but in passing the relief to be out of the marriage was what she cherished most.  Her new life was really shaping up, so why was she so eager to seek revenge on a man that could land her in jail?  Why did she want to harm him, when deep down she knew that hurt people, hurt people.  She was starting to feel like a not hurt person.  There was nothing she could do about Jimmy but help Sally recover.  In that moment, she realized her thoughts dissolved in to thin air like dust in the wind.
She grabbed her black duffle bag of manly costume items, opened her truck door and decided to go inside and get something to eat to calm her nerves.  She was now sure that she did not want to go through with all of this.
The moment she set her bag down on the kitchen back counter, she forgot to lock the back door behind her because her mind was on transferring the money to Cole before he freaked out and called her back angry and fearful that she changed her mind.  She pulled her phone out of her purse and clicked the bank ap.  Within in a minute, the money was transferred from her savings account to his checking.  He was down to under a hundred dollars, so she knew it was necessary to give him this money.  She also knew the chances of him paying her back were ten to none.  
She opened the black duffel bag and pulled out the foam muscle man Halloween costume and set it on the metal baking table.  She laid the black hoodie, black bike helmet with a black flip down sun shade on it next to the hoodie, and then laid the Glock next to that.  She pulled out the men’s jeans and work boots that she was going to wear. She set the jeans on the 9mm Glock and the work boots on the floor.  She stared at all of it and wondered what she was thinking?
She frowned and heard her phone ding with a text.  Clay set a thumbs up emoticon and a heart.  She knew her son well.  He would find a job, work, and eventually get going on his college classes, but after the divorce and the last two years of hell at their house, he had needed that year off to travel.  Hell, she needed the year off to travel, but instead, revenge had become her normal, and her coffee shop was starting to feel like home – at least as best that it could.
The sound of someone knocking on the back door, caused her to jump back and grab one hand to her heart and her other towards the gun on the table.  “Calista?”  She heard a familiar but weary voice echo out from behind the door.
The moment Blake appeared with the black inkiness of the night behind him in the doorway of the back room of the bakery, she realized the man standing there could easily had been Jimmy out to seek revenge on her.  She quickly flipped the hoodie over the gun, but not before she was sure Blake saw it.  They both stood there for a moment, her all dressed in black and him in his usual dark jeans and blue flannel peeking out of his dark gray Carhartt jacket.
“Sorry.  Did I scare you?  I saw the light from the shop seeping out into the alley.  I was just leaving my office and decided to drive by this way…”  He paused and didn’t finish as he started to walk towards her.  He put his hand on the costume.  “Going to a belated Halloween costume party or is this something else kinky I might want to know about?”  he chuckled but she could sense the serious tone in his voice.
“I found it in storage.  It’s my son’s.  He’s kind of built like his dad, a bit scrawny, and he wore it as part of a Halloween costume.”  She quickly verbalized her explanation as her body language screamed out scared and lying.
“I see.”  He answered as his hand laid on top of hers.  “And the gun?”
“Uhm.  Protection.”  She mumbled out.  “I found it in storage too.”
“So, whose motorcycle is in the back of your truck?”  He quizzed as his hand pulled away from hers and he took a step back as if to keep the space between them.
“Mine.  It’s my motorcycle.  It was a whim purchase.”  She looked down where his hand had been on hers and thought how crazy it was that she missed his touch and that from one single touch she no longer wanted to seek revenge on Jimmy.  At least, not in the fashion her crazy frantic brain had come up with.  It was as if she was right back to crazy thoughts like she had before with Clay and Stephanie.  The motorcycle was a purchase to kill Stephanie, as was the gun.  Never thinking in a million years she would do it, but just putting energy into buying it and planning it she felt better.  Now, she wanted to put that energy into making love to Blake, but he seemed severely disappointed in her or at least the look on his face did.
The silence between them grew.  Yet their eyes starred at each other, soft, yearning, wanting to say something, yet each of them did not know what the other wanted to say.  The wind slammed the back door shut and Blake turned briskly as Calista clambered to his back for a second.
“The wind.”  He offered up and turned to hold her in his arms.  “I think we are both are a bit jumpy due to Jimmy, but I got a call about fifteen minutes ago.  He’s in county jail and nobody wants to bond him out.  Has nothing to do with Sally, so maybe some time in jail will do us all some good.”  His fingers lifted her chin up and he lightly kissed her lips.
Calista was the first to pull out from the hug and gentle kiss.  If he thought she could handle another night of Blake turn me on and turn me off, he was wrong.  She felt so very fragile at this particular moment, that all she could do was be strong.  She cleared her throat.  “That’s great news.  Maybe I’ll just lock the gun up in the bakery safe.”
“That would be a great idea.”  He offered up and then glanced at his phone that just dinged.
Calista couldn’t help herself.  “Blondie?”
Blake looked confused.
“You know, blondie from the other day.  She was in your truck after you left here, and I was stuck talking to Larry.”
Black chuckled lightly.  “No, darling, you are the only blondie I’ve been interested in for a while now.”
She smiled and looked down at the bakery table and then up into his eyes.  “Just call me red.”  She teased as her fingers touched and curled a piece of hair, knowing the strawberry blonde had faded into a very soft blonde with a bit of red.  Remi had already called her to set up another appointment for next week.  She was ready to go back to blonde.  Red was a thing, for just a fraction of her life.  She might do it again, but she needed to feel like her old self for a while.
She frowned when she realized he never answered about the blonde in his truck.  “Then who was the blonde?”
Without hesitating he answered with a smile.  “Megan, Jenny’s friend.  Her car broke down out front and was in the coffee shop when all the water commotion happened.  She asked if I could drive her home and her husband would swing by to fix her car after he got off work.”
“Oh.”  She responded and smiled.
“Yeah.”  He replied, and the silence returned.
She sighed.  “I feel better knowing Jimmy is in jail.  Now maybe Sally can focus on getting healthy, mentally and physically.”
“That would be great.”  He answered.
“Blake?”  She quizzed the air with his name.
“I’ve got to run.”  His phone dinged again.
“A date?”  She quizzed feeling out the mere suggestion that he turns her down since she was business, but he was still out looking for pleasure.
“No.  Jackie is having an issue at the bar and Randy is home sick with the flu.  I’ve got to run over there.  Care to join me?”
She wanted to; she really did.  But where would it lead?  And after the week she had, she just wanted to forget about her stupid idea she almost went through with and wake up in the morning thinking a new start was in order.  It was time.  The remodel time was fast approaching, and she needed to just be herself for a while.  No revenge.  No man.  No friends.  Just Calista the friendly coffee lady who knew how to make a customer smile.  She shook her head no.
“I get it.”  He offered with a frown.  “Can I at least help you lock up and walk you to your door?”
She laughed lightly.  “No.  Go.  I’m able to take care of myself.  I’ve got a few things to do in the office and then I promised Remi to meet her at the movies tonight.  I’ll be fine.”
Blake looked long and hard at her, and then to the gun and men’s clothes and back to her.  “I’m sure you will, but I wanted to ask.” 
He sounded as if he wanted to say more but than his phone rang.  “Yeah Jackie.  I am on my way.”  He started for the back door and turned and paused as he hung up on words to Jackie that he was getting in his truck now.  “I want you to know, that I think about you all the time, it’s just not a great time for me right now.”
“Me either.  Take care Blake.”  She offered as he walked out the door.
This time there was no sizzling kiss leading to push and pull, I want you, but I can’t do this.  This time it was concern, friendship, an honest comment that he too thinks about her all the time.  Maybe when things settle down for the both of them, maybe not.  But for now, she had no reason to keep the gun.  Jimmy was in jail, and Stephanie was not worth the bullet or time and energy it would take to carry out her fantasy plan to kill the woman that made her life hell for a while.  It took two to tango on that.  They both deserved each other.  She grabbed the gun, emptied the chamber, letting the bullets fall into the trash.  She reached inside the bad dough trash and grabbed a glob of expanded yeast.  She wrapped a bunch around the gun.  Put the blob of yeast and gun inside a black trash bag and chucked it in the trash.  She then walked over, locked the back door that Blake had closed.  She emptied all the trash cans in the front area onto the trashcan that held the gun.  She flipped off the lights, grabbed a few chocolate chip cookies.  She grabbed a coffee cup in yellow that read ‘morning sunshine’ and filled it with milk from the machine.  She took a quick glance at the men’s costume and clothes and set her late-night snack down.  She grabbed the bundle of clothes and costume, tossed those in the trash as well, and then proceeded to her little bakery office to eat her cookies and milk while ordering office furniture and supplies off Amazon.  She did not have a movie planned with Remi.  She felt like a rebel without a cause.  Then again, sultry images of Blake popped up in her head.
A rebel without a cause can easily be entertained by a sexy man.
Chapter Ten
Side roads lead to spectacular scenery.
The day had finally approached.  Calista took her final plans of the remodel and laid them out on two of the café tables pulled together.  She had an electrician on his way over, the Forest boys for help, and all of her employees were required to work today, two days after Thanksgiving.  She had wanted to do the remodel over thanksgiving, but not everyone else’s timeframe matched hers.
It was a quick two-day remodel.  Most of the bones stayed.  The kitchen was getting a new industrial oven, much to Ben’s pleading, she gave in.  Luckily, she found a buyer for the old one, shearing some of the unexpected cost off the price of a new one.  The main sitting area was to have everything removed as a fresh coat of paint was going up, local artist work for sale was going on one wall, while the rest of the shop was to have new furniture and effective lighting to bring the café a nice touch.  The front counter was to remain the same, with a few minor changes.  Luckily the floor guy worked over thanksgiving eve to get all the old carpet in the main area pulled out, and the laminate flooring installed.
As Sally set up a food and beverage catered table in the kitchen area, Calista glanced over her notes of to-do’s one last time.  On the bottom of the notes, in a female scribbled print was – have an adventure.  She smiled at the handwriting.  She was sure it was either Sally or Jackie, who had been coming around a lot more with Jenny as the three got to know each other.  Jackie had suggested that the local interest in her story of divorce was escalating, perhaps putting some rumors to rest would be best.  However, Calista wondered if it was just Jackie and Jenny with piqued interest, or maybe even Blake, who had been rather cold and distant when she turned down Jenny’s offer to come over for Thanksgiving dinner.  Instead, she made sure the flooring was good, things around the café were ready for the remodel, and then spent over ten hours doing her online shopping – having all of her gifts shipped to the shop, except for Aunt Caroline’s.  She was not up for traveling, during the snowy season, so Calista promised her a visit after the holidays.
With almost everyone there, Calista turned her attention to her cellphone, where a text from an unknown sent a message – have an adventure.  She frowned and deleted it.  Someone was trying to be clever.  She did not know who and she really did not have time to figure it out.  For now, the next forty-eight hours was about the shop remodel.  After that, it was all about the book club fundraiser, and then to follow her plans to spend some time with Cole when he finally came to visit her new business and home.  Her plans didn’t include a man right now, because if it happened, then she would deal with it.  For now, it was forward movement in business and personal inner peace.
A strange comment from Melissa at the end of the remodel sat in the back of her brain while they walked out.  “Going on an adventure soon, I hope?  You know somewhere fun for the holidays?”  Calista shrugged it off but with another unknown text suggesting an adventure, she wondered if someone was toying with her.  Then again, the stress of the remodel and this being her first holiday alone, she internalized that she was being paranoid.
The next morning, the finishing decorative touches were going in the café’s front window box that faced the street, Calista was pleased with it.  A few things she would have done different.  She had a more modern edge she wanted to put on the place, but Darling is a laid-back town, of casual hard-working folks.  So, she settled for the industrial café look that was almost universal in any decorator’s language.  Maybe next year, she’ll change a few more things.
As she turned off the lights, she walked out the back door, hit the new keypad with the new code for her, each employee got their own, and decided that she deserved twenty-four hours of just quiet alone time.  Just as she reached the top of her back alley stairs, her phone dinged with a text.  She waited until she was inside her apartment, door locked behind her, and her work boots off before pulling her phone out of her sweatshirt pocket.  The moment she stared at the words from the third text from the unknown phone number, she felt a bit precautious.  The words – want an adventure – stared up at her from her phone.  She was going to get to the bottom of this.
With her personal laptop open on a secured Wi-Fi line, Calista put the phone number into a paid search engine.  It came back as unknown, prepaid phone.  She let out a sigh of relief.  It was probably Clay trying to get a rise in her.  He used to pull these kind of romantic stunts before, but now, since her operation ROE had gone silent, she almost wondered if he realized that she had moved on.  This could be his way of reaching out, telling her he missed her a bit, and wanted to have some taunting banter.  It would not surprise her one bit.  Yet the thought nagged in the back of her head, she never gave him her new cellphone number and Cole promised not to.
As she sent the unknown texter a message back – I’m on one, thanks – she had a small part of her wonder, could it be a stalker.  She blocked the phone number.  As soon as her cellphone was set on the charger, she unlocked her large writers desk facing the window out to the horizon.  She reached inside the drawer, checked that the newly purchased and registered forty-five caliber gun had bullets, closed and locked the desk drawer, and then set the loaded gun next to her phone as a precautionary measure.  For the time being, she would be extra safe in her steps.
By the next morning, Calista awoke with a sense of adventure on her brain.  Screw whoever was texting her.  Her shop was reopening with grand opening specials, but all her staff was on board except Melissa since she had discussed during the remodel the necessity of cutting her hours to on call as needed due to the conflict of available hours since she took a new full-time job elsewhere.  She had already hired a new a young gal from yoga class to start today. 
It was in the first few hours of the business day, that she could see that her employees had the store handled.  What she needed was a long drive to the closest large-scale town to do some serious shopping, maybe stay at a five-star hotel, and get a massage.  A little get away from Darling you deserve it trip.  There were some things she had been wanting to pick up there at a few specialty shops and the drive and night away would feel nice for a change.
By the time she wandered into the back room, Ben and Sally were laughing and working.  “What a great grand opening day so far.  Everything is running so smooth.  Thanks to you two I felt like I don’t even have to be here.  New gal is working out nicely, don’t you think?”
In unison there were head shakes up and down and words collectively of absolutely, she’s great.  Sally was now acting manager in training, and Ben seemed more willing to hang around and work the front counter from time to time.  He had never truly gotten along with Milly the last two years, as she was always questioning his baking, but Calista’s freedom type management, seemed to work well with him.
“I have to run to Kansas City for the day; I plan to stay the night and be back in a day, possibly two.”  She offered up to the two in a fun mannerism.  “I think you can handle it for the next few days.  I’ll most likely be back late tomorrow, after the shop closes.”
Sally walked over to her and hugged her before casually replying.  “You take all the time you need.  Things are running smooth here, just like you planned.  You deserve some time off to shop.”  
“No problem.”  Ben replied.
“Well that’s settled.  I’ll have my cellphone if needed.  Sally I made you that manager’s binder for just in case situations; it’s on my desk.”  Calista looked to Sally as she shook her head yes.
By the time she was in her truck and one hour into the drive, Calista thought that a white truck with dark windows had been following her ever move.  She still had a little ways to go before getting to her first destination.  She pulled off to a gas station and figured she would see if the truck would follow.
By the time she paid for a red bull and a bag of sunflower seeds, she realized that it was all in her head.  An overactive imagination and a quick realization that maybe all this revenge stuff was turning its ugly head on her.  Once back on the highway, she decided to quit focusing on familiar vehicles and just focus on letting her mind listen to the music and enjoy the decent weather for the drive.
Parking a block away from the second shop she planned to visit in Kansas City, she noticed a white truck behind her again.  It had darkened windows, but it looked like every other construction truck around town.  
As she locked her truck and proceeded to walk towards the store, she grabbed her cellphone out of her purse just as a text sound dinged out.
“Hey lady.  Jenny, Remi and I are wanting to discuss the next holiday book gathering slash fund raiser.”  Jackie’s text read.
Calista quickly typed back.  “I’m in Kansas City shopping.  I’ll be home late.  Tomorrow?”
“We’ll stop by bakery around four after shop is closed.  That work?”
“It should.  See you then.”
Calista slid her cellphone back into her purse and looked around.  The white truck was gone.  It had to be all in her head.  She turned back towards the direction she had been walking before her text and realized she had walked right past the store she wanted to visit.
The minute she walked inside the small specialty boutique her cellphone dinged with a text from Melissa.  She read the text.  “Sally told me you are going to Kansas City.  Are you there now?”
“Yes.  I’m actually in this adorable boutique that has some items I wouldn’t mind selling at the bakery this spring.” Things between them had been civil when she cut her hours, or so she thought.  Melissa had sited she wanted to work full time at Target anyways.  Therefore, a casual text conversation of hey what’s up didn’t seem too unusual at the moment.
“Oh.”  Was all Melissa typed back, but the bubbles that she was still typing were popping up.  So Calista waited.
“How long are you going to be?  In that shop?”  Melissa typed.
Thinking back, Calista had noticed a change in Melissa after the Sally and Jimmy incident.  She had to wonder if something was up, but then she realized the early twenty something probably was bored or just wanted out of the shift she had Sally put her in tomorrow for the extra help.  She quickly texted back.  “For a bit.  Why?  Need something?  You okay to work tomorrow?”
“Yup.”  Then the texting stopped.
Calista starred at her text message for a second.  Was that a yup I need something or yup I can work.  She shook her head physically as she rolled her eyes.  She would be none the happier if that employee quit or went to work elsewhere for her side job money.  She took a deep breath and let it out slowly just a short slender brunette sales clerk came out from the backroom area and asked if she could help her.
Two hours later into her shopping, Calista was wrapping the new burgundy flannel blanket scarf around her neck as the cool air was whipping her hair around.  She was sure she parked her truck on this street right here, but it wasn’t there.  She had walked around the block twice, retraced her steps, and checked her cellphone for the picture she took of where she parked her truck.  It should be here, right here but it wasn’t.  She let out a loud sigh and realized, chances were, her truck was stolen.  To make absolutely sure, she decided to press the alarm button on her key fob while walking around clicking the button to see if her horn alarm would start sounding.  Nothing.  It was official; her car was stolen, and she had a sneaky suspicion who was up to the dirty deed.
While fuming over her stolen car, Calista got off the phone with her insurance agent.  She had two choices, or rather a few choices, but the state of mind of getaway bliss was gone, she did not want to stay at a hotel and get a rental car.  Instead, she texted out to Jackie first, then Jenny and Remi.  She just put it out there that her car was stolen, and she was working on getting back home.  Not but fifteen minutes went by, Jackie and Remi texted back.  To stay put, a ride was on its way.  A warm fuzzy feeling filled her heart thinking of her new friends and how helpful they always seemed.  She decided walking aimlessly around town, she did not want to shop anymore, but to find a salon for a pedicure and perhaps a shoulder massage until whoever it was that was going to get her showed up.  It was over two hours from Darling, so it would be a bit; she texted both gals back – whoever picks me up, there is a Village Inn just inside town off highway – I’ll be there.
Both gals shot a thumbs up text.  Which at the time did not seem suspicious at all?  Both gals had become fast friends just as Calista had taken Remi to hang with Jackie at the bar a few times.  
Trying to make the best of an awful situation, Calista had stopped into a small salon while walking towards the Village Inn.  One mani-pedi later, along with a fifteen-minute shoulder rub, Calista was now sitting at the restaurant just inside town off the highway, checking her phone and wondering who it was that was coming to get her.  She had been there for over an hour; she had already paid her check and handed the waitress a hefty tip explaining she needed to stay a bit longer until her ride shows.  A brunette with purple streaks in her hair was her waitress and she had been all too sweet to listen to her ramble on about her stolen car.  
About twenty minutes after she anticipated it would take for someone to get her, she was doubting her idea to get a ride instead of rental car.  In front of her was the second napkin she was shredding while her waitress had just topped off her fifth cup of coffee.  She let out a huge sigh and thought to herself how she just can’t keep this table much longer.  She was focused on shredding the last bits of her napkin when a familiar voice cleared his throat and joked.  “Your chariot awaits you my lady.”
Calista looked up, shocked to see Blake standing there in front of her at the tables edge.  He was dressed in dark dress slacks and a dark navy patterned button-down collared shirt.  His normal wear and tear boots were nowhere to be found, but a nice pair of men’s dark dress shoes.  Calista tilted her head and slowly breathed out his name in question as if he was a mirage.  “Blake?”
“Yes mam.”  He teased as he offered his hand for her to take to stand up.  The moment she did, she felt a rush of sensation that she tittered a second.  She had been sitting so long, mixed with her angered emotions over her car being stolen, or perhaps it was just the tingling rush of need the moment her hand laid inside of his.  “Long day?”  He added for personable measure.
“You can say that.  I thought Jackie or Remi were coming.  But thanks for driving out to get me.”  She offered in confusion.
“No problem.  I offered.  Do I need to get the check, or did you take care of it already?”  He offered just as the waitress walked up and teased.  
“Well if he ain’t a sight for sore eyes.  I’d be waiting that long too if I had a man like him to pick me up.  Maybe I ought to get my car stolen.  Good luck honey.  I hope you get your car back or at least catch who did it.”  She laughed and walked away.
Blake grabbed the shopping bags by the handles that were sitting in the opposite side of the table and put his other hand to Calista’s back as to direct her towards the front door of the Village Inn and out into the parking lot where his truck was parked.  The moment they were inside of his truck, Calista tried to angle herself to look at him while offering up a polite conversation as he started up his truck and waited for a car to pass to start backing out of the parking lot.  “It was sweet of you to offer, really it is.  I had thought about getting a rental car or just staying in town but part of me just wants to get back home.”
“Well, it’s no problem.  I’m sorry your truck got stolen.  Kind of makes your shopping trip cut short.”  He commented as he pulled out into traffic; acting as if this situation between them was just a normal friendly thing, but Calista knew otherwise.  She wanted to walk on the side of caution as it was a long ride and the fifth cup of caffeine jitters was starting to kick in.
“You can say that.  I mean I made the best of it.  I got a shoulder rub and mani-pedi special while waiting.  Paula my waitress was sweet to talk to.  Overall, I think I know who stole my truck and I don’t want her to think she got the best of me.”  She noticed her speech was in hyper speed.
“Your ex’s?”  He offered up.
“Yes, possibly… but mostly no.  I think Melissa from the shop.  Call it a strange suspicion but she texted me asking strange questions; questions like how long I was going to be shopping.  I don’t know.  It could be a fluke but overall it sucks.  Nothing of value was in my truck.  I had packed an overnight bag with a change of clothes and some of my favorite makeup, but I can replace that stuff easily.  I guess I could easily see my ex-best friend doing a stunt like this.  It isn’t like my hands aren’t dirty with a bit of revenge I pulled over on those two, but honestly I don’t know, or at least I am sure they don’t even know where I am living.”  Calista took a deep breath.  She was talking fast and almost immature like.  She was not this person, well at least she was not this person before the divorce.  Somehow the muddled situation brought out the worst in her and that was the part of her she wanted to leave behind.  If this stolen truck situation would teach her anything, it was to not over react, to deal with the facts, and be glad she wasn’t emotionally tied to that truck.  Just as she was thinking it, she spoke out into the silence in the truck as Blake seemed to be mulling over her last quickly rambled sentences.  “In fact…”  She let out a slow easy breath and started to talk slow and easy.  “I’m kind of glad my truck was stolen.”
A quick side glance from Blake with a raised eyebrow looked her way before he went back to focusing to the green arrow to turn onto the merge lane that would take them up onto the highway.
She laughed lightly and spoke softly, her voice competing with the soft volume of the country music playing on his trucks radio.  “I wouldn’t be spending this quality time with you.”  She practically purred.
A huge grin spread across his lips as he was merging into the far-right lane of highway traffic.
“I hadn’t seen you around much lately.  This is a special treat.”  She chimed up.  “You know a gal needs a visual ever now and then, ya know, business with a side of pleasure.”  She teased watching, waiting for his reaction.
The second his lips curled upwards and a soft looking glance was cast her way before he went back to focusing on the highway, Calista knew he wasn’t at all turned off with her flirtatious tease.  Yet, she was not going to take it too far, too soon.  It was a long drive back to Darling.  Before she said another word, he casually tossed out into the air of the truck.  “I’ve missed running into you.  Things got busy for me.  I kind of feel pulled in multiple directions right now.”
“How so?”  She quizzed.
Blake started to talk casually about helping at the bar and he was really hoping Jackie’s new boyfriend was serious about buying him out to partner up with Randy.  How Jenny and the boys seemed to need his every free moment and then he started to talk about a project he was hired to do but his words drifted off to a lull, so Calista intervened before he sounded like he wanted to shut down.  Just be quiet.  That was not how she wanted this drive to go.
“I hear ya.  About the pulled in multiple directions.  I thought moving here things would quiet down so much that I would be extremely bored all the time.”  She reached out and touched his arm gently with his fingers.  “I honestly do appreciate you coming all this way to get me.  It seems foolish now that I just didn’t get a rental, but I was feeling frazzled about my truck.”  She pulled her fingers away, but not before she noticed his eyes drift to her fingers for a second and then to her eyes with a loving manner.
“It’s no problem.  I really needed the break and the drive gave me time away from the office to think through a few things for work.  And a break from Jenny and the boys.”  He laughed at a memory he must have running through his mind.  “Jenny was the one that insisted I swing out to get you.  She can always sense when the boys are a bit too much for me.”
“One son was busy, and often I had his good friend, my ex best friends’ son, from time to time and it felt exhausting.  I wanted more kids when I was younger but as my business in Utah took off, I had a coffee shop there, a successful one at that, well… I guess I just went about life thinking there was more to life than just having kids.”
“There is, but I regret not having any of my own.”  Blake tossed out casually, but Calista could hear the hurt in his tone.
“So, you don’t want to settle down and have kids soon?”  She quizzed, knowing full well she had no intentions of having another child to raise.  She had been there, done that, and quite frankly not everyone was made for having kids, or at least more than one.  Her mother wasn’t.  Her Aunt never had any.  Her ex-husband would never been able to handle it.  Blake on the other hand, she could see him with several kids and a homely like wife, running a ranch, or coaching a soccer team.  She sighed at her own thoughts that she was not a true fit to his picture of familyhood.
“I did.  Want to settle down.  But that did not work out, then Pete died, and I stepped into the roll of uncle and father for my nephews.  Jenny…”  He sighed deep.  “Jenny was a mess.  She still is rather cold to the idea of another man being her husband, but watching Jackie date Conner seriously, she makes comments about missing a man around the house.  I fill in for some of the duties, but hopefully soon she’ll want to settle down again.”
Calista had to pry, because she wanted to know, was she wasting her time and energy on a man that would break her heart if she wasn’t willing to have another child, not that she thought they were even remotely at that stage of interest, but it was out there in her brain so she asked.  “So are you looking to marry, settle down, have kids of your own?”
Blake laughed.  “Are you asking me to marry you?”
“No.”  She laughed nervously.  “I’m asking you what kind of future you want.  Answer fast and don’t edit it.”
“I want to marry.  I want to wake up naked next to a woman that gets me and doesn’t want to use me for my money.  Has something to contribute to our life.”  He tossed her a glance.  “Sorry, that was a bit forthright.”
“No.  Not at all.  I mean don’t you find that at our age, me forty, you at what thirty-six, Jackie mentioned.  Well that at our age we can’t just play footsie and hope both adults are on the same page.  I for one do not want anymore kids, but if I fall in love with a man that has kids, then I will do my best to be a great stepmom.”
“So you…”  He stopped himself from saying what he was feeling, which was the fact that he had been wondering about; did she want to marry again, settle down?
Calista took the silence as he really didn’t want to talk about this, whatever they were talking about, so she changed the subject.  “I was wondering if you knew anyone that might want that motorcycle I bought.  It was kind of a whim purchase.  I think I’ll put it up for sale.”
“I never did ask you that night, so you know how to ride a motorcycle?”  He quizzed with relief the subject was changed.
“Yes, I do.  It’s been a while.  I think I was not thinking straight when I bought it.  Besides, I like riding on the back of a motorcycle with my arms around a man, focusing on the scenery instead of the road.”
“I’ve got a touring motorcycle.  It’s kind of dusty in my garage under its covers but maybe this summer we can take it for a drive.”
“I’d like that.”
“And yes, I know a guy that buys those kind of motorcycles.  I’ll have him swing by the coffee shop next week.  He’s probably already been in to meet you.  Dale Ferguson.”
“Doesn’t ring a bell, but I have met what feels like half the town in a few short months.  I really like most of whom I meet.  I feel very fortunate to have made some good female friends so quickly.  I was worried about that.”
“What making friends?  You’re a natural.”  He beamed with enthusiasm and reassurance.
“Thanks.  No, I know that.  I mean I love owning a coffee shop because of just that, the social interaction.  It’s the making friends I can trust feeling.  I was truly hurt with what happened to me.  I thought it would take years and fester.  I thought revenge would bring me satisfaction.  Which I won’t lie, when I was doing revengeful things to them and they had no idea it was me, nor did they know that I knew they were cheating behind my back, it felt awesome.  Back then.  It felt great.  But now, I look back and think what a waste of time.  I could have just gone on with my life and not had to be so malicious.  Jackie was right, taking the high road and forgetting about it does feel better.  It releases me from the pain, day by day, I think less and less about it and more about all the possibilities in my life, right here in Darling.”
“Yeah.  Jackie tried that one on me too.  I wasn’t revengeful, but I took a long time to get over the hurt.”
“Are you over her now?”  Calista questioned softly.
“Yes.  But weary.”  He tossed a crooked smile her way and then nervously back to the road as if this too he did not want to talk about.
So jokingly she tossed out.  “If there is anything, and I do mean anything, I can do to help you create new memories, you know in that department, you just let me know.  Because my first night in town is a memory that made me feel like my new life was going to be spectacular.”
“I might take you up on that.”  He teased back.
“That’s settled.  Offer is open.  Now, what kind of car do you think I should get next.  Definitely four-wheel drive.  I need the cargo space for the shop, and I was thinking a metallic silver, not like your truck but a dark metallic shade.  A fuel economy SUV…”  Calista kept the conversation light and inquisitive.  She kept Blake in question about his opinions, his degree in architect, his nephews, his sister, how he started his bar, to how he built up his empire of local real estate.  She kept the conversation off ex’s, away from revenge and hurtful feelings of betrayal and before she knew it, they were driving up a long beautiful gravel road where a nice looking ranch sat up on the hill.  He wasn’t taking her back to her apartment, he had driven her straight to his place, a place that Jackie said he never took a woman to yet.
“I hope you don’t mind but my place is on the way before town and I need to feed my dogs.  How do you feel about staying for dinner?  I can do a mean grilled steak and vegetables.”
Without a second thought, Calista acted casual as she stretched her arms and back while answering politely.  “I would like that.”
By the time two black Shepard dogs were fed and out of their kennel to run around on his fifty acres, Calista had accepted a glass of red wine to toast a cheer to Blakes bottle of bear.  
“A toast to new friends and new experiences.”  Blake offered.
“Cheers.”  Calista chimed out before taking a large sip of wine.  She looked around his place.  On the outside, it was very detailed, landscaped, like he put a lot of pride into his home.  An empty home of people she noted to herself.  One that she never took a woman to before, says a lot about a man casually asking her to come for dinner.
As he set his beer down to pull the steaks and vegetables out of the refrigerator, Calista noticed their taste in décor was very similar, less the purple accent tones.  He liked grays and blues, no cream colors anywhere but on the walls.  As for the furniture they both seemed to like the industrial farmhouse look.  Jenny mentioned he had hired an interior decorator to develop the interior of his place, but she also mentioned some of the furniture in his place, he made himself.  While she sipped on her wine, and Blake talked casually over his shoulder while prepping the food to grill, she let her hands run across a few pieces of furniture she was sure he had made.  One in particular, was stunning.  It was a dining table for twelve and it was made from a unique cut of oak with the wood grains splitting in certain parts that a vibrant blue epoxy filled the veins almost like a river running through it.
“This is gorgeous!”  She spoke out with excitement.  “Did you make this?”
Blake turned to look to see where she was indicating and grinned with pride.  “I did.”
She leaned into the table to examine closer the detail work, putting her in a very precarious situation from Blakes standpoint.  With her backside bent over the end of the table, her upper body towards him, while her silky looking blue blouse she had on that was once under a sweater, hung precariously low in front that he could see her blue lace bra and all at once he was hard.  He turned away just as she looked up to him from looking at the table, her blue eyes piercing him with nothing but sex.  All it would take for him to take her on his handmade table was the word go.
The next thing he felt was her hand on his shoulder asking if she could help.  He heard the words, but his mind was buzzing with naked images of their bodies intertwined and him getting a long overdue orgasm from hers truly.  Just as he turned to answer her, she let her hand down and was reaching for the wine bottle to refill.  It was in that moment that he thought the food could wait, but he could not.
He washed his hands in the sink to contain his feelings, hoping this instinctual need to be deep inside her would pass.  The moment he turned from the sink, dish towel in hand drying his hands, he saw the way she was observing him.  She had a sexy smile on her face, her eyes searching his body with desire, her body language relaxed leaning against the countertop and the glass of wine in her hands was the only thing between them that he could think that he needed to set down on the countertop.
The moment his hand reached for the glass to set aside, their open mouths searched each other, their breathing increased, hands were touching, clothes were being tugged at and Blake had to assure her that this time, this time he was not going to stop at her pleasure, this time he had condoms, a king size bed and deep need to be inside her, not once, but multiple times.
With her shirt practically off and nothing but those darn leggings and blue lace bra, Blake pulled away, to take a moment to speak his intentions.  Calista was working feverishly at the buttons on his dress shirt when he stopped her with his hands cradling her face as he looked down into her blue eyes twinkling with desire.  “Calista?”  He breathed her name in question.  “I’m not stopping this time, not at once, not at all, so if you have a change of heart…”
“Thank God, finally.”  She teased as she pecked his lips with a kiss and then went back to working hard and fast at getting him naked.  He had no idea how sexually frustrated he made her.  Fuck business, it was all about pleasure right now and all the rest they would deal with when they had worked their sexual frustration out of their system.
Standing in his kitchen, her in only her blue lace bra and matching panties, him in a pair of dark boxer briefs with a bulge that made her salivate, they began kissing slower, with more intention, easier breathing.  Her nipples poked through her bra wanting nothing more than his naked chest against hers.  She could feel his bulge pressed up against her, but they were still in his kitchen, still leaning against his counter and she wanted to be completely naked, her laying on her back while he slowly eased into her.  
As if he read her mind, he lifted her up, holding her ass in his hands, pressed her against him as the kiss turned carnal.  Tongues were dancing about, lips were pressed and moist, breathing was elevated, and Calista could not help but echo out her desires the moment their lips parted. “Take me to your room, Blake.”
He gently set her feet to the ground and grabbed her hand in his.
“I want you to fuck me in your bed.”  She teased with a smile while adding for pleasure.  “And not just once.”
A primal look of need and frustrations crossed his face.  He needed this, hell, he wanted it again and again since the first night they did it.  But could he handle what followed, after tonight, after things were supposed to go back to normal.  Jackie’s words echoed in his head like a flash – you like you some bit of crazy.  And maybe he did.  Maybe this was what he needed after all.  Before he knew it, it was her leading the way down the hall to the bedroom he showed her before with a quick – this is my home tour.
The minute they stepped foot into his room, Calista noticed that the sun had far passed set and the window curtains had not been closed, the moonlight was illuminating his room through the floor to ceiling windows plastered on either side of the large double French doors that led outside to his firepit area.  It was in that moment, she realized, this long-awaited venture she had sultry dreams about, were just about to come true.  Their naked bodies intertwined in hot passionate sex, going at it, over and over until they were so sated, this crazy burning desire she always felt for him, might relieve her of the ache she felt for him since their very first night.
With gentle strength he laid her back against his bed with a passionate kiss before standing back up to remove the final part that was keeping him naked.  With his underwear shucked off to the side, a condom from his nightstand tossed onto the bed, Calista with her body angled for him to remove the rest of her lingerie, yet he could wait.  He could kiss and lick every square inch of her, getting her naked, knowing that the moment the condom was on his throbbing cock, and he was sliding inside her wet pussy, he could not stop until he was so deep and sated.  Then she spoke out with a sound of pleading sex.
“Fuck me Blake.  Fuck me good and don’t stop at once.”  
He watched her unclasp her bra and shimmy out of it as his lips started to kiss up her legs, his hands spreading her thighs, stroking her skin until the moment his mouth parted her lips to suck on her wetness.  A serenading moan filled the room with pleasure to his ears.  She was his.  Tonight, he would make her cum more than once.  Tonight, she would sleep naked next to him sated and satisfied; come morning he would put a smile on her face once again.  And if this was as far as they took it, he would know, once again, what it felt like to be deep inside her, but he knew it would cause him to crave her even more.  He could only pray that this thing between them, could just keep going for a while until it didn’t.
All Calista could think about as her fingers clambered into his thick dark hair, pushing his head to press hard against her between her legs, while her mind screamed for her to yell out yes! Yes! Yes!  The only sound that left her body as a tremor took over was his name in question.  “Blake?”
His mouth left between her legs and slowly sated kisses on her belly up to her boobs, sucking each nipple for a second before pulling out to suck the next.  His eyes looked up to hers as his words echoed over and over.  “I’m right here baby, I’m right here.  I’m not done with you yet.”
A smile curled her lips at the thought of what she wanted so badly was going to come next.  The moment his warm skin separated from hers to reach over for the condom, Calista adjusted her body to lean towards him.  Her hand reached out and stroked the naked skin on his chest as he rolled the condom on.  She liked the feel of his muscles underneath her fingers, they way he was smiling down at her and how completely aware she was that this man held more power over her in a short time then in all the years she was married to Clay; that thought scared her a bit but she knew the risk was worth the reward, she just had to be patient.
The moment he positioned his body directly over hers, her legs parted as he slowly sank down to meet skin to skin.  The tip of his cock just at the wetness of her pussy but not going in just yet had her breath labored and her hands pulling at him to push inside of her.  It was her words that drove him in, slow and easy, filling her up with his hard-throbbing cock as she whispered out.  “I need you Blake.  I want you, this, us.  Fuck me Blake.”
Blake wasn’t a talker so much in the sense when he was focused on sex.  He was enjoying the sensation of his cock inside of her, the tightness surrounding him from her recent orgasm, the way her body moved with his, her slight gasping sounds of pleasure and moans of approval as each thrust in and out gently brushed her sensitive clit.  He cast a glance down to her face which showed pure pleasure and a smile.  Her eyes intently looking up to him while her mouth formed sounds of pleasure.  It was the moment she sounded out ‘you feel so good’ that he felt his own shutter of pleasure, the tense of his body, the hold of his breath as he looked upwards and closed his eyes.
As his body relaxed against hers, he felt her slowly roll him off and before he knew it, she was on top of him, looking down at him, her faded strawberry blonde hair cascading down over her shoulders with a look I’ve been happily fucked on her face.  The next thing he heard from her mouth not only stunned him but challenged him to arouse the big guy once again.  “I want more of you Blake.  I want to do this all night long.  Because if all we give each other is tonight, I could do it again, and again, and again….”  Her voice had a teasing laughter to it as her mouth lowered down to his for a passionate kiss.  Her breasts touching his chest and the feel of her pussy on top of him made him mentally aware of how serious this could get.  
He hadn’t had sex like this since his early thirties, with what’s her name before he realized for her it was all about money and not love.  Now with his fingers inside of Calista, her body reacting to his touch to finish her off again, her eyes looking lovingly at him as she moaned and encouraged his touch, all thoughts of painful relationships faded and he felt his cock twitch with the need to be inside of Calista once again.
He was almost afraid to reach inside his nightstand for another condom, but the thought of getting someone pregnant stopped him.  As his body rolled away, his fingers left her hot wet pussy, she rolled towards him and her hand reached out to touch him.
“I just need to suit back up.”  He joked.
Her reaction was a smile and a moan as she curled her body away, opened her legs while her hands fondled her breasts, her fingers toying with her nipples causing them to harden.  He looked at her as he rolled the condom on realizing how sexually content she appeared; how comfortable she seemed with touching her own body.  There was no awkwardness between them, not now and not the first night they met in his bar, which appealed to him more than she’d ever know.  Looking down at her body, he did not see a woman of forty but a healthy sexual woman who appeased his appetite.  It felt like they are a sexual match like none other he had before.  In his youth it was immature sex, but as he aged his desire to do things to a woman to please her was high on his list of satisfaction and right now, she looked satisfied yet wanting more.
The moment their bodies touched with tender stroking and a lingering kiss; Calista knew what she wanted.  She wanted to ride her Kansas cowboy and watch his face as pleasure erupted from his body.  She slowly maneuvered him to where she was sitting on top of him, looking down, her body positioned on him, but he wasn’t in her yet.  She wanted to watch his eyes as she slowly slid on top of his cock.  Wanted to see how he reacted to her slow up and down motion, riding him in pleasure while trying to squeeze another orgasm out of him.
The moment she guided his cock inside of herself, she moaned with pleasure and tilted her head back for a second.  Her hands fell upon his chest muscles as she leaned her head back down and looked into his eyes.  Her body began a rhythmic stroke of back and forth, a slight up and down, a squeeze of her inner muscles and then back and forth.  His hands were on her ass, guiding her to go faster, she could feel his need, his desire building and hers was about to crumble.  Within seconds of unison breathing mixed with moans of pleasure.  Calista shattered.  Her body trembled with an orgasm while her mouth moaned out his name.  “Blake…”
As she fell limp against his body, sweat on their skin mixing with each other, Blake whispered softly into her right ear.  “You are the most incredible woman Calista.”
She let that sentence linger down to her heart. Where she knew she had love to give, big love, sexual love, love that last an eternity, and she wasted it on Clay.  Right now, as her body slowly recovered from their sexual acts, all she wanted to think about was how to make this last – forever.
As her mind whirled, her body withered and rolled to the side of him.  He held her in his arms for several minutes before whispering again, but this time it was typical of a man after sex.  “I’m starving.  You lay there all sexy and I’ll go cook us some dinner.”
As he rolled off the bed and looked down at her, she had rolled off to her belly, put her arms under her head with a smile plastered on her face.  “Sounds great.”  She whispered back, but Blake wondered if by the time he made the dinner on the grill if she would even be awake.
It was in that moment he knew; he was lost to a woman named Calista and there was no going back to just business without pleasure.  Because right now, a million thoughts of how to pleasure her sexually and otherwise were running through his mind.
Sometimes the darkness brings the spectacular, like a shooting star erupting across the night sky just as the clouds dissolve and there is nothing but twinkling stars to tease you.
Chapter Eleven
Talk is over rated.
“Oh Darling, you can’t fix yourself by breaking someone else.”  He whispered into her ear and then his naked arms held her closer to his body.
Calista glanced up at him with her arm draped over his chest.  “You make that quote up or does it belong to someone else?”  She quizzed as she was sure she heard that line before, out of her mama’s mouth when she was little.
“Pinterest.”  He whittled a slow easy smile across his face which caused a perplexed look on her face.  Somehow the fact that he looked at Pinterest amused her.  A man so manly with all his muscles and sexual ways, sitting around with his iPad open to a an ap like that, well it showed his intriguing side that she knew was showing the more she got to know him.
“Pinterest?”
“Yup!  My sister sends me pins all the time.  That quote stopped me from breaking a heart that did not deserve to be broken.
Calista rolled her naked body over to raise herself onto her elbows.  She brushed her hair off to the side and looked down into Blakes eyes.  He had one arm behind his head on top of the pillow.  His other arm was under her where he had her wrapped up in his arms only seconds ago, but now she wanted to look into his eyes.  “Having a younger sister to be responsible for must be amazing?  I’m an only child and wanted a sibling so bad, and then once I became a mom, I wanted another child, but we got busy and truthfully, I wondered a lot, how often I might be a single mother.”  Calista shared that small piece of her past with him to follow up on the previous night’s in depth conversation.
“It’s amazingly awful when you’re a teen, but as we grew up, she was there for me just as much as I feel like I need to be there for her now.  She loves being a mom, and Pete had been a great dad.  Lousy husband, great dad.  I keep hoping one day she’ll meet another man to help her, and then maybe I can…”  His words lingered off and then his tone changed.  “So, your ex wasn’t too faithful then, I take it?”
“No.  I mean, he was discrete, but not until he decided that my best friend was a choice.  It’s not like I totally blame him, or totally blame her, I blame them both equally.  He was always looking, and possibly cheating, I had my suspicions, and she was lonely and needy.”  Calista sighed and laid her head on his chest.  “I don’t want to talk about them.”
Blake didn’t either, but he could tell they both had a lot to talk about at some point.  This position they were currently in, naked, sated, happy, wasn’t going to stay that way.  He had himself wrapped up in a project that consumed all his time, then there was Jenny and Jackie, always needing help with the boys; although Jackie seemed to have Conner to help now.  Things were working out in that area of his life, but Randy always needed help with the bar still.  He mentally shrugged off his responsibilities as his hand instinctively went to Calista’s hair and began to stroke it as her face had settled against his chest.  She was breathing softly but enough so that he could tell she was thinking and not sleeping.  He really wished the conversation had not started, because her cheating husband got him thinking about his cheating fiancé.  Perhaps they were not too different after all, at least when it came to being hurt by someone they loved.
It had been an interesting evening with driving Calista back from Kansas City.  He spent more time listening to her chatter on about the coffee shop back in Utah compared to the one here, her son and his accomplishments and her suspicion that Melissa had something to do with her truck being stolen, but he tried to let her know that cars get stolen all the time.  Although her strange texts and written message had an odd timing.  It wasn’t until he found himself driving her home, his home, that he realized that he wasn’t done spending time with her.
What started as a suggestion that she come inside his home for a home cooked meal and an evening fire with a glass of wine before taking her home, turned into carnal need for lovemaking on his king size bed, from both of them.  Now, as he watched the sun slowly rise through the curtains in his bedroom.  He listened to Calista lightly breathing, a relaxed look on her face had returned, and a soft cast of light against her naked skin that was not under the blanket any longer.  He let his mind reel with a replay of last night’s lovemaking, which it had, felt just like that, love.  There was heated passion, the first time, but more of a slow easy exploring, versus a heated I need this bad kind of feeling the second time around.  It was, as if, she was over the I need it phase, and now it felt more like, dare he think it, a relationship phase.
If Jackie had not called him from the bar, desperate about helping Calista because she had her truck stolen and she needed a ride home.  Why did Jackie call him?  Why did she call him to come get Calista instead of just suggesting she get a rental or stay at a hotel, Although he had to admit, the surprise on Calista’s face when he showed up at the Village Inn as she was sitting at the table shredding napkins and drinking coffee, was worth the drive.  Somehow, Jackie failed to say that it was not her that was on the way, but that she requested him to drive the couple of hours into the big city.  It wasn’t like he made that drive a thousand times before, often a couple times a month, but his visits were usually for a swipe on an ap and quick date, or something for one of the buildings or the bar.  He did not mind the drive, but this time, he had his mind spinning with questions about why he was so eager to jump at the opportunity to rescue Calista.  The last thing he needed was another responsibility.
But on the drive back to Darling, she kept insisting that she pay him for his time, that she really could have gotten a rental.  He recalled her repeating that he understands that she is a very capable woman and could handle her own dramas.  He thought of when she said that Jackie insisted she would be right out and it was no big deal, but on the ride home he asked her if the tearing of napkins would help her get her car back and she looked over to him in his truck with a sinful sexual smile and teased, ‘no but it keeps my fingers busy, that is unless you have another suggestion for keeping my hands from being bored.’.  And boy did a few possibilities popped up in his head, sexual possibilities.  It was from that moment he realized this little side adventure for the day, could not have been any more enticing.
As she had fallen asleep after lovemaking, naked in his arms, he laid there realizing how incredible this felt, yet his guard was not down, and his mind was thinking of ways to approach the topic, about where did they go from here.  This was not a relationship – yet, and it definitely, was not a swipe either.  This was two consensual adults, that more than once now, had sex that made him realize how much he missed having a woman like this, one that he was truly attracted to, to be with, versus a match on an ap and a willing participant for a quick date and a quick whatever.  He was starting to realize as each year passed after his heart was broken, by a woman how he couldn’t even say her name in his head, that he missed this, wanted this, but could he deal with another broken heart?
His mind was stopped with a soft hand stroking his body, in all the places that aroused him.  He gently kissed the top of her head and asked.  “Shower?”  
Her hand stopped, and her body crawled up on top of his.  She looked down into his eyes and had a smile on her face.  “Only if we lather each other up.”
The mere fact that she was just as sexually aroused in the evening as in the morning, told him that she did not have the morning after awkwardness.  She was every bit as interested in him – sexually, as he was her.  He guessed anything more could be dealt with later, for now, he let her take his hand and slowly lead him and his morning wood directly into the master bathroom shower.
Sexually sated and sitting at the handmade dining table, Calista’s cellphone dinged with a text from Sally.  She was at the bakery with Ben and she was handling opening.  Sally assured her that she could stay until closing; for her to take the day off if needed.  It made her smile as she realized, when Sally asked for the manager’s position, she was serious.  It wasn’t until Blake’s voice brought her back to the coffee he was pouring and the question of how she liked her eggs.
This was nice, she thought to herself.  The sex was incredible, better than Clay.  The drive brought them past a level of I want you, you want me, but he won’t mix business and pleasure.  Well, Blake Jones, she internally voiced, you just mixed it quite nice last night and this morning.
“You have a huge smile on your face?”  He teased as he cracked eggs over the frying pan.
“You sure I can’t help?  Sally’s got the café handled.  I was supposed to close and train today, but she wants the manager position so bad, she’s doing everything.”
“No.  I got this.  I cook for my sister and nephews all the time, and vice versus.  She cooks a lot of dinners for me to come by and eat.  We’ve made a great team at this.”  He offered
“It sounds like.  Things always go better when everyone works together.”  Her thoughts were distracted by a ding of her cellphone with another text.  Earlier this morning, while Blake was shaving at the sink after their lovemaking in the shower, Calista had put in an order for a rental car to be sent to the bakery.  She already found a car at a dealership that she ordered by phone.  It would be ready next Monday and until then, she would drive the rental car.
Blake quizzed her.  “Sally?”
“No, rental car place.  They are dropping a rental car off at the bakery in the next two hours. I hate to rush breakfast.”  She suggested that breakfast was the end of their sexual escapade.
She watched Blake slide two over easy eggs onto a plate next to some toast with butter.  She loved the way he looked in the kitchen in front of the stove.  Clay had never been a kitchen helper.  A fraud at the grill as he burned things more often than he cooked them, but he always insisted on being at the grill.  In the kitchen, never one meal was made from that man unless it was heat and eat from a box or can.  Blake on the other hand seemed to move effortlessly in the kitchen.  That, in itself, was a sexual bonus.
As he sat at the table next to her, he asked.  “You mentioned you ordered your car last night while driving home.  That was fast.”
“Eh, I guess I know what works for me and the bakery needs an SUV over the truck I was driving.  You know for specialty cake orders.  I had intentions on selling the used truck anyways.  It served its purpose to move me out here and I hope whoever stole it, it runs out of gas in the worst place.”  She chuckled.  “Or gets a flat.”
Blake was quiet for a second as he finished his bite of eggs with toast before stating something that had been on his mind.  “Often people do bad things for the wrong reasons.  If it was Melissa that stole your truck, perhaps it’s better to get to the bottom of why she did it.  Otherwise, you’ve already made a name for yourself in town on serving up revenge.  Naming the café, the way you did, really didn’t help much.  I think if you keep all of that up, it could get ugly, around town that is.  I don’t like revenge; it only gets things all mucked up.  I guess I’m speaking a bit from my own experiences in life, but as for you darling, you are like the star of Darling that moved here, made a name for herself, made several friends, and in the process of dishing out revenge you made a few enemies.  Enemies are like cancer.  Eating away at your soul. Don’t get me wrong, I understand why you did it with the ex’s but as far as all the people in this town, sometimes just listening to their troubles instead of stirring up the pot, is best.”  He could tell by the look of hurt in her eyes and the way she stopped eating by laying her fork across her barely touched breakfast that she was not okay with his forthrightness.  He frowned a bit out of the corner of his mouth before taking another large bite of eggs.  He looked down at his plate of food, forked up some egg and put it on his toast and then took a bite before looking back up to her eyes.  The hurt was fading but a look of defense had crossed her face.
With a long pause of silence between them, staring into her coffee, Calista finally spoke up.  “Look, I hear what you are saying.  I’m not the one giving advice to the women on revenge.  I might have repeated a few suggestions other patrons have come in and suggested.  Perhaps the name was not fitting, but it is what it is for now.  I’m not going to change it because rumors get out, nor am I going to change.  I haven’t done anything to anyone, well except my exes but quite honestly, I have been so busy the last few weeks that I haven’t done anything to them recently.  However, the folks that ask me, I might have suggested…”  She paused wondering, was she encouraging the few scorned women around town to go about and do their revenge damage.  Sally was really the only one and she really did not think the woman had it in her when she made the suggestions, and she did not like where it led.
Blake watched her pushed her plate away from her, which caused him to not want to eat the rest of his breakfast.  He wondered if he made a huge mistake just now, being straight forward about all of this, when he probably should just let her do what it is she wants to do.  But something deep inside of him, the protector part of him, wanted her to fit in this town, to make things work out, so that maybe they would work out.  Making enemies in this town never went over very well for those who chose to go that route.  It usually ate away at them, making them less happy of a person than they were before.  Calista had this way about her that he loved but he could see how all of this could turn its ugly head, like her having her truck stolen.  He sighed and stood up, put her practically uneaten plate of food onto his and walked them over to the sink.  When he turned back around Calista had a false look on her face like she was pretending to be happy but wasn’t.  Her eyes glanced at him and then away quickly while her mouth had a flat lined smile on it.  He wanted to fix this, all of this, take away any pain she ever dealt with, but he knew that sometimes folks just needed a nudge in the right direction and an ear to listen to their troubles.  
He grabbed his coffee cup and began to open his mouth again against his own will.  “I just think you should take Jenny’s suggestion.  Do an interview for the local paper.  Maybe clear the air.  And when you say the last couple of weeks, did you ever stop to think that maybe you need to move on past what those two did to you?”  He drank a sip of coffee and then poured the rest into the sink.  He picked up his keys and put them in his pocket, which made Calista think he was ready to drive her home.
At this point, she knew the conversation was useless.  He had his opinions, right or wrong she didn’t want to ruin what they just experience in the last twenty four hours with an argument over a name of a shop she really should reconsider, the fact that she had overstepped her eagerness to help women with revenge suggestions, when really, deep down, she knew she should be guiding them towards the high road.  It was the road that was leading her closer to Blake and she liked that idea.  However, he seemed like he turned irritated all of a sudden, wanted to pick a fight, create distance, or find a way to say, it was nice, but this was all that it was.  She chose silence and a friendly smile over replying any more to the conversation.
She grabbed her purse.  Her shopping bags were still in the backseat of his truck.  She felt a bit off when his hand went to her back like he was leading her out of his house.  She let out a huge sigh of relief thinking about all of it and thought better to be silent than continue talking to him about it or god forbid fight over something that just wasn’t worth the energy.  Her sigh got her an inquisitive look on his face.
“Everything alright?”  His voice held concern.
She was completely exhausted.  Her little adventure was over for now.  She needed to go make a list of what her forward plans were, for changing the shop name, the interview, talking to the police about Melissa and her suspicions and first firing the gal, or possibly just take her off the schedule permanently.
“Calista?”  He pleaded out her name in questioned.  He was concerned he just ruined their entire new try at whatever this was.
She looked up from her gaze that had been staring at the front door, not realizing she had stopped in her footsteps and was just standing in the front hallway of Blakes house.
“Yeah?  Sorry.  I’m just exhausted.  Somebody wore me out last night and this morning.”  She teased while her mind whirled with questions about what she was really doing.  Any kind of serious talk was the last thing she wanted.  She wanted to go back to where they were teasing each other’s bodies with touch and no words were spoken.
“Okay.  Sorry.  You seemed upset over what I just said.”  He offered as he slid his gray Carhart coat on over his navy-blue thermal shirt.
She flatlined her mouth and then frowned while shaking her head no.  “Nope.  Just tired.  I’ll give the interview some thought.”  She replied as her mind screamed, no you won’t.
“Shall we go?  You said you needed to get to the shop when the rental car is dropped off?”
“Actually, if you can drop me by apartment, that would be great.”  She smiled flatly.  Her head was starting to feel like a migraine was kicking in.  She needed to take some medicine and lie down in her dark bedroom.
“Sure.”  He stood there quietly.
She grabbed her coat but did not put it on over her black sweater she was wearing.  The day was already warming up and she felt heated from the fire burning inside of her asking herself, what was she doing with all of this – Darling, a coffee shop, a man that was younger, when originally, she thought traveling and sunning on a beach reading books held much better appeal with dealing with divorce.  Then as if a bolt of lightning struck her, she remembered that when dealing with her mother’s death six years ago, she did everything she could to keep busy and engaged.  Was that what she was doing now?
The moment Blake parked his truck in the alley at the bottom of the metal stairs to her place, they both were quiet as they had been the entire drive there.
Calista spoke up first.  “Thanks again for coming to get me.  I guess I just didn’t want to stay in Kansas for the trip I had planned.  Maybe, dinner one night this week?”  She wasn’t sure where all of this was going.  Blake had obviously broken his no relationship with business rule, but they had not talked about it – this budding sexual relationship – and she did not want to start the talking.  She didn’t want him to go back to his no mixing business and pleasure, but she felt off put by his comments earlier.  Her defenses had kicked in and reacted irrational and now she felt embarrassed to try and repair what her attitude had caused, distance between them.  
“That would be nice.  Hey, you want me to come up with you?”  He casually tossed out with a sly grin, as if no irritations had been arising between them since his comment earlier at breakfast.
She turned and looked at him with a flat smile.  One minute he couldn’t get her out of his place fast enough and all of a sudden, he wanted to what?  “I’ve got stuff.  Listen, give me a call.  I owe you dinner.  It’s the least I can do for you picking me up.  I’ll put you down for free coffee in the new computer in the shop.  Refill anytime you want.”  She smiled and then leaned in for a quick peck on the lips.  Before it could turn, whatever this was, into anything more.  She turned, opened the truck door, was out and slamming it while waving bye.  She could not run up those metal stairs fast enough.  Her heart wanted nothing more than for her to invite him up while her head was screaming at her to figure out what it was, she wanted herself.  She knew she felt like an emotional roller coaster around the man.  What she hadn’t expected was her defensive mechanism to a man just giving her good advice.
By the time she was inside, her head pinched, her mind whirled, and spots were dancing around the room.  Just as she dropped her bag, she bent down and grabbed her cellphone out of it.  Two texts came in.  One from Blake – how’s Thursday?  The other one was from a new unknown number, ‘how’s it feel bitch?  Revenge is sweeter when it’s served up cold.’
She could only imagine the threatening texter meant to say because it was cold outside that the revenge of stealing her truck was what – sweet?  She knew from this text that Melissa was behind the truck theft.  She was certain of it.  A flashback to Blakes comments from earlier pinched her brain.  She let out a huge sigh and thought to herself how she will let the police handle it.  She wasn’t going to reply, just block the new unknown caller number again.  Instead of throwing her cellphone and collapsing in tears in her room.  She took a migraine tablet, grabbed a banana off the counter and peeled it back.  After her first bite, she had her clothes off, her bath running with hot water and scented essential oils mixed with bathing salts.  She turned on her music to fill her loft with meditation relaxation mix.  This car theft thing was not going to get the best of her.  Clay and Stephanie were not going to get the best of her.  Blake on the other hand, after last night and this morning, he had taken the best of her and sated her to satisfaction.  Perhaps taking it slow was the course.  He was busy, she was busy, and the holidays always had her preoccupied.
Calista looked at her phone, turned it off for while she sat in her bath soaking.  She had at least an hour before the rental car would be downstairs to drop off her car as promised.  She would work around the shop for a bit, and then once she got things settled, she wanted to come back up here, do some yoga and take a nap.  Because having sex with Blake was far more intense than it ever was with Clay.  She needed to get back into sexual shape, more yoga, more body work like waxing and regular pedicures.  She smiled inwardly thinking how sex with a man like Blake was worth all the extra effort.
Later that day after the café closed, after spending an hour chatting excitedly with Jenny and Jackie about the next fund raiser, as she laid in her room, eyes drifting off to sleep, she realized that silence in the heat of the moment held more power than yelling, acting out or revenge.  From now on, karma can have its way with Clay and Stephanie, and Melissa for that fact, that is if the police haven’t already arrested her.  She was ready to get on with her life.  She texted Blake, be it several hours later from his text, but keep a guy waiting and he’ll wonder.  “Thursday works for me?”  
Unfortunately, his quick reply back felt like a knife to her heart.  “Best not.  Busy week.  Some other time, later this month, maybe.”  This yes no, hot cold, thing they had going on was going to exhaust her.  Was he not the one that asked if Thursday for dinner worked, she screamed in her head?  Just as she was about to turn her phone off, he texted again.  “Sorry.  Really, I am.  Something unexplainable just came up.”
Calista frowned into her cellphone after looking at the picture of naked Blake in the shower that she had taken.  She realized that as two mature adults, that had busy lives, perhaps he really did have a big project come up.  However, she could not help but text something.  “You’ve got to eat sometime.  Just swing by the café someday and meal is on me.” 
Her cellphone dinged quickly with a few texts.  The first one was from Blake – “Will do.  And thanks.”  She had to wonder what he was thanking her for, and then she remembered the previous twenty-four hours.  She could only assume that his inability to commit was a huge part of their attraction going further, perhaps she should take his lead as she could use some time to straighten her own thoughts out.
Just with that thought she clicked on a text from Cole that simple read – “Mom!”  She could text back what, but his mom with an exclamation mark meant a lot of things.  Usually he was mad at her.  She really did not want to deal with her teenage man child.
She turned her cellphone completely off.  No Blake, no Cole, nobody was going to bother her for the next hour.  Blake had a way of turning cold on her just after heating things up.  As far as Cole went, she would always love her son.  He was caught up in a strange time right now.  Being young and dealing with so much is not always easy.  She would call him after her nap.
As her mind whirled back to Blake, while her eyes closed, she thought how she did not want to go chasing some young guy around, playing the yes let’s do it, now let’s not.  She just wanted to make it through the Christmas holiday without a mental break down and come the New Year, maybe she needed to just take a break from Darling, from Blake, and from anything that made her feel any type of emotion.  Her revenge was done.  It was time to repair her soul.
How beautiful it is to stay silent when someone else expects you to be enraged.
Chapter Twelve
Peek a boo, I see you.
“Mom?”  Cole’s voice bellowed out in a questioning tone on the other end of the cellphone.
“Cole?  I thought we were okay texting.  I’m in the café working the counter until my relief staff comes in.”  Calista chimed out quietly as there were a few patrons sitting around the café, drinking and socializing.  The Christmas display with retail gift items patrons can buy was starting to look thinned out, so she jotted a note on a post it and stuck it next to the register – restock retail.
A deep breath of air rushed out as Cole breathed into his cellphone.  “I promised dad that I would just stay here for Christmas and not complicate things by going out to Kansas.  I wouldn’t even be able to stay but a day because I have to work the day after Christmas and what if a blizzard comes.  Airlines, driving, no matter how you look at it, you moving to Kansas really complicates things.”  His voice was rushed, and his explanation seemed legitimate and thought out.
“I understand Cole.  I know, I guess I just needed to feel some distance.  But hey, when you do come, I think you’ll see why I like it here.  Folks are laid back and yet still hip, well at least the peeps your age.  I’m going to miss you.  Maybe, I can come up there for a weekend after the new year.  I’m looking to take a break here as things are going so well.  The shop is actually doing great that I can be a part time employee and travel a bit.  How would that sound?”  She quizzed him with hope.  “Maybe I’ll come your way after the holidays or we could plan a trip for next summer, back to Ireland, like we talked about?”
“That would be easier mom.  And yes, I would love to go back to Ireland.”  He sounded relieved.
“I’m going to be blue for Christmas without you.”  She sang out in a tease to her son.
“Me too, mom.”  He laughed.
The moment they hung up, a middle-aged man with grey temples and a red flannel shirt walked in and Calista barely had time to wipe a tear from her eye.
“Everything okay?”  The customer asked even though she had never met the man before.
“Son can’t make it here for Christmas.”  She chimed up.  “Welcome to Dioltas Hide Out, what can I get you?”
“Well not some revenge, but I’ll take a Winter Breeze coffee, two vanilla bean scones, and that red energy drink.”  The man piped out as he pointed to a monster energy drink in the display case.
Calista smiled.  “Sure thing.”  Inside her head, she was seething over the revenge comment.  The name of her place was not going over like she had planned.  Blakes voice in her brain about changing it, reverberated around.  As she made the man his peppermint white chocolate coffee, she realized that this town was big, yet small.  Rumors were that, rumors, but possibly doing the interview with a spin on a name change, could stop all of that.  It was time to move on, and the revenge was not part of the game anymore.  It was her past, she just wanted a future, maybe with Blake in it as her mind body and soul ached for him, but was he too soon after so much?
The moment she handed the change back to the man, she piped up.  “Have a wonderful day, and Merry Christmas!”
“You do the same.”  He remarked casually before turning to walk out of her shop.
Not two minutes after Sally showed up, Carl showed up too.  The place was busy, and Calista had a scheduled hair appointment later today with Remi that she really did not want to cancel.  When she texted Carl on his day off, he promptly texted back a strong yes with a need for as many hours as possible.  She put notes in her phone to go over a schedule change to make him forty hours through the holidays.  Thinking that should take care of her need for more time off to plan holiday stuff and not to have to call Melissa in, not that she planned to.  However, she wanted the police to do their job before she officially fired Melissa.  Just keeping her off the schedule would please her enough for now.
In the back office of the café, Calista closed the old wooden door.  She had not done a thing to really tackle the organizing of the office.  She had planned to wait until Milly was gone.  She did not want to step on her toes as Milly was still the acting full-time manager.  However, with her feet on the desk, and leaning back in the old wooden office chair, she realized the office was not conducive to how she liked it.  She grabbed a legal pad and pen from the bookshelf next to the desk.  She hit her Bluetooth earpiece to on.  She dialed in the number to the local journalist that Blake had suggested.  While the phone rang, she leaned back in the chair further, and began to scribble notes on how she wanted to set up her café office.
“This is Montgomery?”  The younger woman’s voice answered her cellphone.
“Tessie Montgomery?”  Calista asked.
“The one and only.”  The woman chimed up.
Calista liked her voice.  It was confident, catchy and that had her attention.  She put her feet off the desk, sat upright in the wooden desk chair, set the pad and pen on the desk, and looked at the old outdated John Deere calendar on the opposite wall.  “Miss Montgomery, this is Calista Miller from Dioltas Hide Out Café.  Did I catch you at a good time?”  She offered up.
“I was beginning to wonder when I would hear from you.  Blake’s friend, right?  Listen, if you had not called me today, I was going to track you down.  I’ve got three days to get a story on you and the shop and then it will hit press this next weekend.  Blog by end of day three.  Some folks around here still want their paper to read, buy my blog followers are the bread and butter of this towns unofficial news, if you get my drift.”
Calista laughed.  She really liked this young woman.  She had some ump to her mojo, and that was the kind of women Calista liked at her old coffee shop.  At one point and time, Stephanie was like that, but looking back, she wondered did the ex-friend act like that because that was what she liked?  Maybe Stephanie had no idea who she was.  Maybe Stephanie’s act over the last few years was just a cry for help and Clay took advantage of her?  She shook her head of the thought of the two of them, because that was not her focus anymore.  “I was hoping we could meet soon.  I’ve got a hair appointment in an hour.  What’s your schedule like Miss Montgomery?”
“Call me Tess.  Whose doing your hair?”  Tess quizzed
“Remi at Darling’s Saloon.”  Calista offered.
“I might swing by and ask a few questions then to get started, if you don’t mind.  Then maybe tomorrow around ten, take some shots of the café and the new remodel.  I stopped by a few times, but we seem to miss each other.  Darling Café was a major hangout for me back in high school.  Now, I’m usually out catching stories, and settling in at Finnigan’s in the evening to write.  Jackie and I go way back.  It’s how Blake knows me; in case you’re wondering.”  She offered.
The woman was quick and forward, she would give her that.  As far as Blake, she had wondered, maybe her jealous spike meter went up when she realized that she had sexual attraction to Blake and could not seem to get enough of him.  She answered the woman with a simple tone.  “That’s fine.  If I miss you at the salon, see you tomorrow at ten at the café.”
“Will do.”  Then Tess hung up without another word.  One thing was for sure, Calista quickly realized the gal had that superfast way of thinking and doing.  Something, back in her youth, she charged forth with, but as she got older, a lot more thought went into everything, and she knew she overthought, over planned so much of her life, that maybe, just maybe, the sex with a stranger thing was the turning point she had been looking for.  Then again, she still had a new life to start living, and experiencing.  The old two, Clay and Stephanie, were now a new code word in her brain to avoid – O2.  She scribbled it on the pad and then scratched next to it.  No more O2.  It would be her motto to move forward.
The moment that Calista walked into Darling Hair Saloon, heads turned.  She was sure it had nothing to do with the fact that her red hair that was fading into a soft strawberry blonde that caught the women’s whispers.  It was her, and the café, and that was not something she wanted, but she got it.  She feigned a weak smile, as she slipped her sunglasses up onto her head.  “Calista for Remi.”  She offered up to the high school age receptionist.
“She’s finishing up on a client.  Have a seat.  I’ll let her know you are here.”  The young gal replied.
“Thanks.”  Calista smiled and turned to look for a seat, while half the room of women smiled at her, the other half were shooting daggers.  ‘What did I do now?’  She asked herself as she veered towards the smiling half of the room, who put down their magazines, cellphones, or electronic devices as if they waited on her very first word.
“Good afternoon, Merry Christmas.”  She offered up.  She noticed that some of the woman looked to be waiting for her to sit and say something.
The first woman to speak up was in her twenties.  “I’ve got an appointment to go strawberry blonde like you.  I follow Remi’s tweets, but she couldn’t get me in today.  I love your hair.”
“Thanks.”  Calista offered up with a flat lined smile that she was trying awfully hard to look genuine.
A few of the not so approving side of woman seemed to be glaring at her.
Another woman sitting by her chimed up.  “I heard that you helped Sally with some revenge on that ex-boyfriend of hers?  I heard that you’ve helped a lot of women in this town.”
Calista’s head pinched; her smile flattened more as her brain whirled with thoughts of what have I done.  Then, just as if Blake was in the room with her, she thought, what would Blake say.  She took a deep breath and let the air out before replying.  “I might have said a few things to a few people out of suggestion, but that does not mean I condone revenge.”
“But it’s in the name of your café.  What’s so bad about just keeping it Darling Café?”  A woman from across the room chimed up.
Calista pressed her lips together and realized she had a Chinese fire drill on her hands in the form of multiple independent woman in one tight space called the salon.  This could go south if she did not think before she spoke.  “Darling Café was Milly’s.  I guess when I bought it, I figured I should give it a new name.  As far as the Dioltas part, I’m Irish and well, the meaning of revenge was to start my life fresh doing what I love.  I love serving the community great coffee and fresh baked goods.  Not to mention, energy drinks, because they are women’s Viagra so to speak some days.  As women, we do so much, for so many, and every now and then we need a hideout, a boost, a cup of coffee with girlfriends to work it all out.  That’s all.”
A few mumbled sounds chorused out from the disapproving side sounded out while one older strong voiced woman spoke up.  “I suggest you change the name then.  And stop shuffling out revenge advice and start focusing on your new life.”
“Touché.”  Calista chimed out quickly with as much sweet genuine niceness she could muster.  The woman that just spoke gave a vibe of woman in charge.  She continued with a soft voice.  “A good friend just told me to do the same and I think you both are very smart people.”  She laughed lightly, half out of nervousness, and half because the floor of the room seemed to be all eyes on her.  “What would you suggest I do then?  I mean, I have toyed with just dropping the Dioltas part of the café and calling it the Hide Out, or Darling’s Hide Out, but almost everything in this town starts with that, so I was thinking just Hide out Café?  What do you think?”
The same woman spoke up over the few women that were shaking their heads yes, I think that’s great.  “I think you should be careful in a small town like this.  Too many mistakes, and folks don’t forgive.  Be that as it may, you seemed to be well liked for the most part.  Drop the Dioltas, Hide Out Café is catchy.  If women want advice, inspire them to be more than a plot of revenge.  Karma’s a bitch for a reason, I think she does a pretty bang up job of fixing things after the fact.  Although, there are always a few that need a nudge in Karma’s direction.”  She laughed loudly as if remembering someone or thing, just as several other women followed her lead.  
It was barely a second before the older well-dressed woman with an opinion continued.  “I mean, I heard things, and I could not say that I would not have done some of the same things, but time to hitch your wagon and move on, besides, that Blake isn’t going to be on the market long as soon as he decides he’s not heartbroken anymore.  He’s been shooing off woman left and right for two years now.  Then you walk in town, and the game changed.  It’s obvious.  Although, you’re a year or two older than him.”  She smiled which made Calista laugh inwardly just as Remi walked out.
“Calista.  What’s the rush?  You want to touch up the red?”  She offered up happily as she stood in her all black attire of black leggings, black long sleeve shirt, black cape and a recent hair coloring of jet black making her look a bit dark and devious.
“I’m feeling blue.  Blue for Christmas.”  Calista tossed out there as a few women gasped and two asked out loud.  “All blue or blue highlights.”
Calista turned to them and smiled.  “Back to blonde ladies, but my son just called and said he can’t see me for Christmas, so I was thinking a streak of blue to say I’m sad.”
The older outspoken woman tossed out the comment.  “Blake likes blondes anyway.  Just tell him you’re over the ex and I bet he’s yours.”
Calista raised her eyebrows up, enlarged her eyes as she smiled and turned.  The moment she was in Remi’s salon chair she had to ask.  “Who is that woman?”
“Town’s mayor.  She doesn’t keep quiet about anything.  Blakes family and her family go way back.  So, back to blonde?”
“Yes.”  Calista responded while replaying what just happened in the front room of the salon.
“Blue?  Just a few streaks?”  Remi asked.
“I was thinking, peak a boo blue.  Where it kind of shows but it doesn’t.  What do you think?”  She asked as she watched Remi run her fingers through her hair.
“I think Blake will love it.”  She teased.
Calista laughed and wondered, what was it about Blake and her that made everyone so interested in them all of a sudden.  It wasn’t like they went parading around town flirting.  If anything, it was behind closed doors flirting.  So, was it Blake that was talking, maybe Jackie or Blake’s sister?  Either way, that town mayor had her say, and if she was smart, she would follow some of that advice.
By the time, peek a boo blue blondie, was in her silver SUV, driving around town, she realized that she stuck out a bit.  Everywhere she stopped, folks were already talking a buzz, about the café name change, the blue hair, the new car.  She felt like a fish in a glass bowl.  Her last stop was Tully’s shop.  She had been meaning to stop in for quite some time.  She texted her earlier in the day while getting her hair done, that she needed some unique holiday clothes.  The moment she walked into Tully’s store, she felt like she stepped back in time, to a time where retail seemed as if it catered to a woman’s needs.  There was a large crystal chandelier hanging in the center of a comfortable seating area of plush dark blue velvet loveseats.  Calista noticed small carts of drinks and snacks off to the side, surrounded by several well-dressed displays of metal antique metal seamstress mannequins.
Tully walked out in a burgundy Japanese tea robe; her black Indian hair up with chopsticks and a pair of white Japanese slipper sandals.  She bowed in front of Calista.
The minute she stood up Calista smiled with such sincerity.  “Thank you.  I needed that.  I had a day.”
“I heard.”  Tully offered up.  “You need to follow Tess’s blog.  She’s already tweeted out about you.  Comments from the salon and a photo of you with the new hair.  Calista, she likes you.  She doesn’t do this kind of PR push for nothing.  If she likes you, people in town will like you.  It’s just how it works.  Just go with it.”
Calista swallowed hard.  She was ready to react with anger as Tully started in about Tess blogging about her and whether the town would like her or not if one person did or not, but quickly realized, things might actually work out in her favor.  “Can you tell me her twitter name?”  She asked with cheeriness in her voice, but deep down she was trying to grapple with the simple solution of moving far away, to a small happy town, and not thinking of additional ramifications that could happen if she pissed off the wrong person, smiled incorrectly at someone who runs the rooster cage.  She let out an internal sigh, realizing that the worse that could happen was nothing compared to what she went through the last few years.  If she mucks it up here, she will just start over somewhere else, but how would that be when her mind can only think about a potential future with Blake.
“I just texted you by sharing her all her contact info right before I walked out of here.”  She took the Japanese sandals off and set to the side.  In only her white socks, she shuffled to a rack and uncovered its champagne colored silk sheet off to the side.  “Now, let’s talk holidays.  I pulled your sizes and I’ve got some killer looks here.  Talking, fun around the café, date night with Blake – big question mark here, you can answer that later, also, Holiday party clothes, you got a few of those to go to, and I’ll save the va-va-voom New Year’s Eve one for last.”
Calista stood in front of the rack of clothes and let her hands roam over the mostly vintage clothes.  There were a few pieces of modern make, but a look of vintage fashion.  She had always been more of a trendy woman, but some of these pieces she wanted to buy, just to own, not even sure if she would wear them.  “I love them all, I truly do.”
“Fantastic!”  Tully chimed up.  “I’ve got a private dressing room to the right.  I’ll pull the rack back there.  You get undressed and let’s try these babies on.  Sweets?”  She hollered out to a person that was in the backroom.  “I’ll be in the private dressing room with Calista Miller from the Hide Out Café.  Cover the front and UPS should be here soon for the shipments.”
A man’s voice bellowed out.  “Got it.”  
Calista turned to Tully in her first outfit of dark red silk dress.  It was a bit much, but she had a feeling she was going to buy it anyways.  “Hey, I noticed you dropped the Dioltas as you were talking to Sweets.”
“Honey just go with it.  The revenge is over.  It got the town talking, which was actually, pretty clever if you ask me.  But your café was being called the Hide Out shortly after everyone found out you were in town.  Be that as it may, it works.  Play it PR style.  I’m sure Tess will produce a great article on you with follow up tweets.  She’s a gem.  She can boost my business any day of the week.  Now turn around, that silk dress screams Marilyn Monroe style, but you make it sexier.  Although with your peek a boo blue, I think the dark navy blue one for a new year eve party will look stunning on you with your blue eyes.  Where is Blake taking you?”
Calista smiled sheepishly at Tully’s reflection in the mirror and then went back to glance at her reflection in the dress.  She would agree that with blue highlights in her platinum blonde hair, a navy-blue dress would make her eyes pop, however this dress was something she was going to buy whether she ever wore it or not.  It was a statement dress of powerful yet super sexy red, that every woman should own, and find a reason to wear.  After a deep breath, she finally replied to Tully’s suggestion of her and Blake.  “We’re just friends.  I think I would like it to be more but we both seem to be working on moving on.”
“Shoot.  Blake’s been playing protect my heart and bachelor of the year for too many years.  Yes, his heart got broken, but the way he looks at you, or so I am told, it’s a matter of time.”  
Tully reached over into a beautiful cream white sewing basket that was organized beyond Calista’s capabilities.  It seemed the two of them had the love of organization to share between them.  She took a mental note to herself as she responded to Tess.  “Well, he seems to be too busy for me all of a sudden, not that we were anything, but he picked me up when my truck got stolen in Kansas City and on the long drive home, well, we got to know each other.”  Or so Calista thought, to herself.
Tully lifted her head to meet Calista’s eyes as she was marking the hem with pins for sewing adjustments that would need to be made.  Her eyes had a look in them as if to say something mischievous.  “I guess you leaving his house the next morning, was what?  You know, no other woman has been to his new ranch since it’s conception.  Jackie, because Blake babysits once in a while, Jenny, all the time with the boys, and the decorator, other than that, no single female has been to his place, overnight.  Care to tell?”
Calista blushed as Tully unzipped the back of the dress and it dropped to the floor.  In only her black lace bra and panties she turned to the woman and smiled sheepishly.  “I guess I kind of stayed the night.  But he keeps me at an arm’s length most of the time.  I kind of need to focus on me anyways.  Too soon after the divorce.  New business, new town, new friends.”  She reached out and touched Tully’s shoulder and smiled.  “But it does kind of make me feel special that he took me to his place now that I know that.”  She let out a sigh.
“Just keep on, keeping on.  Things will work out.  I guess Blake’s got some big project, Jackie was all hush hush about but really, the man likes to keep himself too busy so that if he stops, he might realize he’s not living his life but helping everyone else out.”
Calista shook her head as she knew that feeling all too well.  It was a hard habit to break; keeping busy to keep herself from dealing with her feelings, yet she had always made that work for her.  Perhaps after the holidays, she will force herself to slow it down a bit, observe life so to speak and then maybe things with Blake will begin to grow.
The next morning, Calista felt her stomach twitch with nervousness over the all mighty and powerful Tess who was about to walk through the doors of her café.  It was all she could do to reclean surfaces or retouch up her lipstick.  She decided to go wear a simple navy poplin dress shirt with dark dress jeans and a pair of her make me lucky black leather ankle boots tucked under the hem of the long length of the jeans.  She didn’t know if the boots were really lucky, but she was wearing them when Blake and she had their first sexual encounter, and before that she scratched off a thousand-dollar lottery ticket back in Utah one time.  So, she could only think they might bring her luck in dealing with Tess.  Hoping her true self came out in the interview.
The moment a skinny twenty something man with a start of a dark brown beard on his thin face walked through her door with two cameras around his neck, she felt the presence of Tess before she walked into the café.  The young man held the door open for her and in walked a short round woman with the eyes of Betty Boop but in blue and a windblown short dark black hair that she was sweeping away from her face.  Dressed in dark jeans, black Sketcher street shoes, and a light blue vintage rock band tee shirt, Tess had nothing scary or fearful in her presence.  If anything, it was as if your high school best friend just came to say hi, but a bit older than high school.  Her face held a very youthful look, which will go a long way when Tess gets older, but for now, it was like hanging with a friend, casual and laid back.
The three of them shook hands as Tess introduced her photographer and younger brother, Drake.  He did not share the round face look or pear shape body, but that was neither here nor there.  Within seconds, Tess and she were sitting in the back corner brown leather chairs talking like college roommates, while Drake walked around taking pictures of the café and them.  Tess’s starting questions were casual, yet leading.  Before long, Calista was pouring out her story in short version, dirty deeds of her two ex’s - ex-husband and ex best friend.  She spoke about her Aunt, what lead her to buy this place, the feeling she got when she first visited the town over a year ago, and how incredible everyone in this town has been to her since her formal arrival.  She kept the not so incredible experiences to herself, but those were her own story to tell, if she ever wanted to.  She found herself talking on until Tess’s eyes sparkled with mischievousness as she glanced over Calista’s shoulder.  
Without even looking, Calista knew.  Blake had walked through her café glass door and like an unseen magnet, he did things to her mind and body without her even looking at him.
Tess stood up.  “Blake.  Just the man I think would make a great customer picture.  Drake set him over there in the corner window looking out onto the town street.  The light filtering in, will add a glow to his handsomeness.  Calista, grab the man a fun coffee mug, make sure it’s hot so the steam will rise.  Let’s do a few of him alone and maybe a few with Calista at the counter handing him something.”
Before Calista could stand and turn to let herself react to the man who commandeered so much of her mental space, she felt a sense of need to touch him, yet she refrained.  With a swipe of her sweaty palms against her dark jeans, she turned her body towards him and smiled.  His smile back, told her that this was all planned.  But by who, Tess, or himself?
“Blake?”  She questioned off and smiled.
“Utah?”  He joked and then added.  “I mean Kansas now.”
“Too cute you two.  Now.  Drake…”  Tess spent the next ten minutes producing shots from over Drakes shoulder and asking Calista and Blake questions about how they met, how Blake felt that his favorite high school café was changing and was Calista here to root herself permanently into the town or was this a passing moment in her life.  Calista answered her with as much honesty as she could afford.  Deep down, this was a passing moment, but when Blake looked at her when she said her plan was to build a business where she could be a partial part of it while traveling the globe, he looked almost hurt as if she had not invited him.   Which she would, if he wanted, but it was her plan before she met him.  And why she would even think of changing her life plan for any man after what she just went through with her ex’s was beyond herself.  A little voice screaming in the back of her brain for her to be her own woman and let no man lead her life plan was taking over in the interview.
By the time Tess was done and walking out of the café doors, Blake and Calista had the room to themselves for a moment of quiet.
“So…” His voice traveled to her ears with hesitation.  “You plan to travel?”  He started up as his right hand gravitated to her new blue peekaboo streaks in her hair.  “I like this by the way.”  He looked directly into her eyes with a sweet smile, the kind he gave her after they had sex and he was looking at her for comforting affection.  Her body melted towards him slowly until the door chimed with an older female patron and she stepped back briskly with a flat smile.
Blake followed her lead and stuffed his hands in his denim pockets in front causing his chest muscles to bunch up.  It was a move that screamed, my hands are off, you happy now.
Calista went to the counter to help the customer, who decided to linger at a table, glancing occasionally at them as they now stood across the room from each other.
Blake finally approached the counter and asked Calista for a vanilla scone to go while he pulled a sparkling water out of the cooler next to the counter.  He plopped a twenty on the counter to pay just as the customer finally decided nothing juicy going on, so they will leave.  As soon as the door closed, Blakes hand touched Calista’s as she handed him the scone in the brown paper bag to go.
Blake started as he removed his hand.  “I usually don’t take on projects this size that I am working on, but it will be done soon.  Maybe we could spend a little time together?”  He suggested casually yet questioningly.
That would be nice Calista thought to herself as her mouth sounded off a not so sure, “sure” sound.  Calista had to wonder, was he blowing her off.  He used the words a little time together, not would you like to go out on a date, how about I swing by later and we go to dinner.  Instead a moment of silence ensued between them, when Calista could not stand it any longer.  She took a step back and began to rearrange a few brownies and rice crispy treats wrapped in plastic on a basket next to the register.
Blake blinked his eyes in a questioning fashion and then he felt his heart tried to guard himself from heartbreak.  “I’m sure Tess will write a great article.  She’ll follow up and use the pictures for PR.  Send her a request and she’ll release the photos for you to use free of charge, although most folks send her a gift card to their business.  Tit for tat, and all that.”
As he said the last sentence, she couldn’t help but laugh with a childish bubbly feeling.  He had a masculine way of sounding childish, probably the active uncle in him.
“That’s the smile I wanted to see.”  He teased.
“Anytime.”  She offered back.
“Then soon, after this project?”  He suggested a casual date.
“Anytime.”  She offered again, but this time, she felt herself feel sad that he wasn’t committing to a time, date or place.  Her smile faded and in doing so his eyes looked sad as well.
The door chimed with three teenage patrons and Blake was turning to go with a casual see you around in his exit.
Two hours later, Calista had relieved herself of café duties to hole herself up in her office.  She needed to do a full operation redo office revamp, and pronto.  She needed to get Blake off her brain and her mind onto something productive before she screamed in frustration or broke down crying over the Christmas blues.
A few hours later, Blake felt himself engrossed in Tess’s blog about Calista that Tess had decided to forward to him before publishing.  He found himself reading it over a few times.  It was as if he was finally understanding what really took place in Calista’s life.  He was starting to understand now that they were two hurt souls that meet and needed one another so badly that the only thing they could do was push each other away – to avoid the hurt, the pain, that comes with falling in love.  Or was it only him, that was pushing, and Calista was just protecting her heart?  He thought of all the moments they had together, and she was always willing to try until he pushed her away just a little bit that she would become guarded to a fault.  He shook his head and closed his iPad cover flap which automatically turned it off.  He set the device on his antique drafting board and realized, if he didn’t want her to travel without him, maybe he should give her a reason to stay.
He stood up to lock his office up, when his cellphone rang.  The call was urgent, and it was regarding the project he was neck deep in dealing with.  As he answered his phone, he promised himself, that this was the last project that consumed him and kept him from what he wanted, and that was to get to know Calista more and possibly fall in love, if he wasn’t already.
Everything heals.  Your heart heals, your mind heals, your body heals, wounds heal.  Repairing is a reminder that bad times don’t last, and happiness will be back.
Chapter Thirteen
She remembered who she was, and the game changed.
“Hello, Mrs. Forest?  This is Calista Miller from the Hide Out Cafe.  Did I catch you at a bad time?”  Calista offered up as her plan formed in her head, while her fingers scribbled out, pen to paper, the list of people she was going to invite over for a last-minute impromptu holiday gathering.  Christmas was in a few days.  Over five people told her they had nowhere to spend the holidays with other people.  Milly’s plans to go to her sisters in Oklahoma got cancelled when a last-minute surgery had to be scheduled.  Ben her baker had no family.  Sally was feeling lonely after Jimmy got hauled off to jail, and all her loser friends blamed her.  Then, when the Forest boys had stopped off to help her set up her new ten-foot pre-lit Christmas tree a week ago, they mentioned that their mom and dad had split up, and she had not even gotten the tree up at the house.  Larry mentioned he would be alone for the holidays, and then there was Remi’s comment about no family in Darling, and now with no boyfriend, the holiday would be quiet.  This was Calista’s chance to bring together friends to make a fun celebration.  This is what she did and loved doing it.
“Yes!  Hi, Calista.  The boys told me about your tree.  I’ve been kind of procrastinating, but busy, you know.”  Mrs. Forest answered up.
“Yes!  I know!  Holidays are crazy, but I love a good crazy.  Listen, the reason I am calling, is, well, this is my first Christmas without family.  I decided to throw a small Christmas potluck at my place.  On the twenty third.  Just a few of my new friends.  I would love it if you and the boys could come?”  Calista offered up with an opportunistic voice.
“Oh, I don’t know.  With things so crazy?”  Mrs. Forest hesitated.
“I really don’t want no for an answer.”  Calista chimed up jokingly.  “No pressure though.  Six o’clock on the twenty third.  Bring a dish if you wish.  It would be nice to have some sort of celebration this year, seeing as it’s a new year for me.”
“Well, can I get back to you?”  She offered.
“Absolutely.”  Calista responded as she put them down as a yes on her guest list as her boys already told her they would drag their mom there if they had to.  
With the next meeting tonight for the book club, Calista was certain that more questions about her life were going to be asked.  She had written down and memorized passive answers, while working on putting the gift baskets together that were up for auction.  Several stores had donated items, she told them she would include their business cards, along with a short story card about how the gift baskets sold, solely benefitting the Holly Street Clinic’s new day shelter. 
A little over a month ago, an anonymous donor stepped up and bought the empty building next door to the Holly Clinic.  They pulled permits and were working on construction, all the while the day shelter for the women was still open.  Nobody seemed to know who or what was doing this huge charitable thing, but Calista was just glad that come the new year, the place would be operational.  The money made from the auctioned baskets would then buy holidays gifts that the new director Sherry Walters would purchase tomorrow.  Short notice, but Calista was certain they would at least raise two thousand dollars by the end of tonight.  Sherry Walters was another newcomer to Darling that Calista realized that she had to ask if she had a place to celebrate the holidays.
By the time the meeting was underway, Calista already had her brain spinning with what types of food she wanted to serve, little gifts to wrap up for her guests, maybe a party game, or a holiday movie.  All of that stopped when her phone dinged with a text from Blake while his sister Jenny was sitting in her wheelchair, in front of everyone, auctioning off the baskets.
His text simple read, ‘thanks’.
She texted back while she felt her heart warm and her smile spread across her face as she typed back.  “For what?  I hope this is a nice thanks and not a snarky you did it again blondie text.”
“Nice thanks.”  Her phone dinged and little bubbles showed he was still texting, so she waited.
“I liked how your blue felt in my fingers, blondie.”  He texted again.
She paused and took a deep breath which caught Sally’s attention looking over her shoulder.  Calista quickly held her cellphone to her chest against her burgundy cashmere sweater.
“Who made you smile?”  Sally asked.
“Nobody.”  Calista whispered back and then decided to sneak off to her office to finish this texting thing with a phone call.  “Hold my seat, I’ll be right back.”
The moment she sat in her office wooden desk chair, her brown leather heeled boots up on her desk, leaning back in her seat with her dark denim jeans crossed at the ankle, she heard his voice answer his phone and her heart felt a pinch of anxiety and nervousness like a school girl.
“Calista?”  He drew her name out like he was stroking her skin.
“Blake…”  She breathed out his name like he was already in her.  She smiled and thought how she ached for his touch when he walked away from her the other day, but she knew, he had to be the one to reach out to her.
“How’s the auction going?”  He asked casually, flirtatious tone sliding away.
“Great.”  She replied quickly, wondering is this a friendly call, a late-night bootie call, as it was eight o’clock, or a simple how’s my sister handling the auction with Jackie.  So, she informed him.  “Your sister and Jackie are quite the team.  Very impressed on how they are taking bids from the women in the room and selling baskets online to other’s that could not make it.  There will be a few Uber rides home, not to mention, a few walked here when they came in with a bottle of wine or two.  I think my book club social meetings are evolving into something else altogether.”  She laughed.
“Sometimes things need to evolve, in order to be great.”  A tone of seriousness was in his voice.
“Did you buy a basket?”  She changed the subject.
“I did.  Two actually.  One for Jackie, and one for my sister.  They both sent me pics of the ones they liked.  You did a great job putting them together.  They look professional.”  He added casually.
“One of my many rare talents that has evolved over the years.”  She giggled as the last glass of wine seem to be starting a buzz.
“I think the few talents I’ve experienced with you have been pretty good.”  He teased.
He was flirting with her, a bit, but also just reaching out.  So maybe now would be the time to invite him to her friend’s potluck for Christmas.  But first, she must reciprocate the tease.  “You have talents that are quite pleasurable yourself.”
“I do?”  He asked fishing for a compliment.
“You do.  Jenny showed me your artwork.  The wood and metal sculptures you do.  The sign you made for Tully’s shop.  I finally made it by there.  I wouldn’t mind using you for the shops new sign now that the old one I ordered isn’t fitting for the name, I decided to officially drop the Dioltas out of the name of the shop.”
He was quiet.  So, she questioned out.  “Blake?  You there?  Did I lose you?”  She looked at her cellphone to see if she lost the signal.  As she did, she heard his faint voice answer her.  
“I’m here.”
“Phew.  I thought my cellphone dropped our call.”  She laughed.
She heard a deep breath in and then breathed out.  “I just got a text.  I need to go.”  He made the excuse.  She could hear it in his voice.
“Okay.  Well, on the twenty third, I am having a small Christmas potluck for a few of my new friends that don’t have a place to be on Christmas.  You are welcome to come.  Not that you don’t have a place to be, or a family to be with, but my son can’t make it and well, I would love it if you came.”  She blurted out fast before he hung up.
“I’ve got a lot going on right now.  I’m going to have to pass.”  He sounded regretful, but she realized this push pull, tease me and leave me, act was starting to wear on her heart.
“Oh.”  She sounded out softly as she set her feet back on the floor and stood up from her desk chair.  The sound of laughter coming from the front room pulled her back to reality.  Tonight, was about raising money for a great cause, being around other likeminded women and if the one man she could not seem to get off her brain did not know which direction this, whatever it is, was going, she needed to just let it go for now.  Keeping busy had gotten her through tougher times, the holidays were not going to suck with a few friends and a whole lot of keeping busy.
“I’m sorry.”  He offered.  “I’m just really busy right now.  Listen.  I just wanted to call and say thanks.”
She could just bet he was busy.  Playing property manager, single man playing the field around town, building a small fortune with his sister’s inheritance, she could just bet.  Her jealous envious voice was building in her head when her hand slapped the desk to remind her to stop it.
“What was that?”  He sounded concerned.
“Sorry.  That was my hand.  Something slippery on the floor in my office.  I almost slipped and fell in my boots.  My hand hit the desk.  Listen.  You’re welcome.”  She tried to sound as genuine as she could while her heart screamed at her head.  This man is going to break you, worse than Clay and Stephanie ever did.  You need to just get away.
“Good night, Calista.”  He said her name with sorrow and then hung up before she could even say goodbye.  She let out a deep cleansing breath and realized, she was in dire need of a change.
Calista made it back to the meeting, made it through the night with a huge smile on her face as she drank a few more glasses of wine.  The moment she locked up the café, knowing that Sally was going to open in the morning with Ben, and their new full time assistant that Sally found, a young man who wanted to learn the café business, Clark; since the gal from yoga class did not work out.  The three of them could open, and she would do what she did best which was running errands, paying bills, bookkeeping and trying to get her heart back on track.  Her last check to her retirement plan showed the stock market had a stellar year, she was ahead of schedule for retirement.  She wondered if she really even needed to work here, well, other than the basics.  It was not like back in Utah where she gave it sixty plus hours a week.  Here, just like the slower pace of Darling, she was figuring out quickly, that twenty hours a week was plenty.  It was time to devise a plan.
With the back door to the shop closed, Calista had her brown heeled boots in hand.  Her slip-on black safety shoes on her feet as she climbed the metal stairs covered in snow.  She glanced at the motorcycle under the metal stairs parked and thought about climbing on and going for a drive, which was completely stupid.  Two more inches of snow was expected, and she had a buzz going.  Driving drunk was not her style.  It was just the idea of taking off, running from her dilemma with Blake, and just letting her mind erase as the road unfolded in front of her that gave her the brief moment of insanity – driving a motorcycle in the snow.
She opened her apartment door and locked it behind her.  Then she convinced herself that she just needed to take a bath, drink a hot tea, read a book and fall asleep.  That was her plan.  Instead, she texted Clay.  She knew it was a mistake, as Cole swore, he did not have her cellphone number, but she had something she needed to say.
“You win.  I moved on just as I see you are making new plans with Stephanie.  I don’t know if she had anything to do with my stolen truck, but please ask her to move on as well.  I’ll stop if you two stop all this nonsense.”  She hit send and thought what the hell am I doing?
Her phone dinged ten minutes later.  “Calista?  Is this your cellphone number?”
“Yes.”  She texted back.
He did not reply.  Shit, she thought to herself.  Stephanie probably saw the text and answered his phone.  Now the evil temptress will have her cellphone number to do what?  After waiting fifteen minutes for a reply, Calista realized, it did not matter.  If she had to change her cellphone again, she would.  If Stephanie wanted to waste her time, energy and money on revenge, she would handle it.  For now, she just wanted to make some kind of amends with those from her past.  But talking to them did not seem like a way to do it.
She took a deep breath, turned on some soft music in her apartment through her phone.  She hit the Keurig machine to warm water to make a cup of hot tea.  While that was warming, she went into her bathroom, turned on the light, started up the bathwater to warm, lit a few candles, and then turned the bathroom light off.  By the time her tea was in hand, her body was naked, she was standing in front of her bathtub and a few tears fell down her face.  This was a temporary setback.  The holiday blues, she knew all too well when she lost her mother five years ago about this time.  It was time to just let herself feel the warmth of the bath surround her body.  There was nothing she could do about Cole, Clay, or Stephanie.  Cole, she would see this summer for sure, he promised her.  Clay and Stephanie getting married, well, may the priest that marries them, curse them as well.  She took a sip of tea and then set it down on the small table next to the bath.  It was still too hot to drink.
The moment the warm water stroked her body, she thought of Blake.  He was a temporary rebound that was starting to feel like so much more.  She had never really been alone, and it felt scary at times.  But tonight, she wondered, was he really too busy?  He reached out to her but then took a pair of imaginary scissors and cut the cord.
Just as she put her head under water for a second, letting the warm water soothe her heartache and her headache in a swoosh of water, she heard her cellphone ding underwater.  When she finally made it back up, there was a reply from Clay.  “It’s time.”
Time for what she thought.  So, she texted back.  “Clay?”  When nothing came back within a few minutes, she realized that Stephanie being Stephanie, was probably toying with her.  She would just get a new cellphone number tomorrow and chalk this up as a huge tipsy too much wine drinking mistake.
On the morning of the twenty third the time flew by and Calista began to realize that all good things come to those who are patient, and time flies by when you are crazy busy.  Calista had found ways to keep her mind and her body busy.  She had a few last-minute preparations for tonight’s friend’s potluck Christmas celebration.  She had not heard from Blake, other than briefly running into each other around town.  He looked a bit haggard and acted as if he was being rushed by this top-secret project, he was engrossed in.  She had kept the banter light and even mentioned tonight’s celebration again, which the last time she mentioned it, he smiled and told her if he got a few things done early he might be able to swing by.
Her entire day was spent checking things off her list in preparation for the evening.  The moment her first guest Remi arrived she felt the party spirit rise in her soul.  This was something she had always pulled off quite well, a holiday party.  Tonight, it was about keeping company with those she was just getting to know and celebrating the holiday spirit.
Milly was the second to arrive, and then she was followed by Sally and the new hire Clark.  Ben called to say he wasn’t feeling well, but Mrs. Forest showed with her boys.  The liquor store owner, Mark, down the street from her café, who she just met today, showed up with a few more bottles of holiday alcohol.  Larry showed up with his sister.  The last of the expected was Jackie and her new boyfriend Conner.  She had invited Jenny and Tully but they both said they could not make it this year, leaning on the note that this would be a yearly thing for Calista, which perhaps it might be.
The first hour swept by with plenty of eating and drinking.  Calista had started to almost forget about wanting Blake to come, but she was happy that tonight seemed to be making her forget about the strange text from Clay or perhaps it was Stephanie, forget about Cole not being able to come, and forget that her heart attached itself to a man that was not sure of what he wanted.
Blake found the last two weeks to be excruciatingly busy.  This new project he took on with a short time frame, had him remembering what it was like to work a real building project.  It was one thing to renovate one of his own buildings, it was another to have several high-ranking donors involved, all with opinions on how things should be built, with constant changes.
Every time Blake saw Calista around town or tried to see her when he knew she was in her coffee shop, he felt that pull of attraction, sexual or otherwise, that told him, he needed to act on his feelings before some other man around town decided she was an incredible catch.  He had heard she had been asked out on a few dates, all to be turned down, which made him wonder on her interest in him.  Jackie and Jenny had been trying to convince him that Calista was worth the chance to see where things went.  Then after reading the article on her, he felt his heart pinch with feelings he had not had since his ex-fiancé.
With much relentlessness from Jackie that he had to stop by to Calista’s celebration, late or not late, he realized that being an hour late was rude, but once he could tell her what he was up to, she might understand.  The moment he opened the door to everyone at her place, to the roar of laughter and holiday music, he felt lulled inside.  It only took Calista less than ten seconds to realize he had walked in the door.  He felt the warmth of her small hand grab his cold one as she pulled him inside further into her apartment.  She let go of his hand just as she laid a quick peck on his lips.
“Let me take your coat.  Food’s hot and delicious.  What can I get you to drink?”  She offered up with a look on her face of utter happiness.  He liked that look.  He had seen something quite similar on her face, but it was after an orgasm.  Tonight, it was a different kind of happy he observed.  It was as if she was in her element and no one could bring her down.  Just looking at her smile, warmed his insides, and made him realize that perhaps, all of his rush-rush my private business is too important, really wasn’t that important at all.  Maybe he could have carved some time aside for her, at least reassure her that once this project was done, and the donors made the announcement to the town, that then he could talk about everything he was currently a part of.
“Blake?”  Calista smiled as she waved a hand in front of him.  “I think I lost you there.”  She joked.  Which she had as he had been staring at her, thinking of all the intimate times between them, swirled up with all the times his pigheaded I’m not ready for a relationship, I don’t mix business with pleasure, cost him his own loss of intimacy between them.  What they had experienced, had been so incredible, that he realized they may have not met on normal dating terms, and they certainly had a lot to learn about each other, but tonight he wanted to somehow make that up to her.
Blake grabbed Calista’s hand, pulled her close to him and leaned down to whisper into her ear.  “I want you tonight.”
As she pulled back with a blushing to her face and subtle laughter to her voice to try and hide what he just said; she answered that with a wink and then joked loud enough to dismiss his whisper as nothing anyone should concern themselves with.  “Well then, cowboy, let me take your coat and make you a drink.  Jack and Coke?”
“That sounds nice.”  His lips curled upwards as his eyes darted around the room to see who all came to this festivity that had created such a holiday happiness on his Calista’s face.  It took only moments to notice that he realized, she was a woman moving on with her life, making new friends from all over town and she was not going to be held back by two ex’s that made her life a mess.  He only had one ex, and that one moved on fast, while he still held his heart out of reach from any woman, particularly any woman that he did business with.  It was in this holiday moment that he truly realized how pig headed he had been about Calista and his own life, that if he did not do something to assure her soon, that he might lose her to someone else in town that was interested in her, which was plenty of men by what his sister had told him.
When the party wound down, and Blake was the second to last there, Calista convinced Milly that a cab needed to take her home.  The old gal had just too much to drink.  Waiting on the cab with just the three of them in the room was excruciating, knowing all night Blake had whispered into her ear, sexual temptations and then went about socializing at the party like he had never said a word to her about what he was going to do the second he had her naked.
To keep busy, Calista made sure things were as cleaned up as they needed to be, while Blake sat on her couch, looking at her as if he was already peeling her clothes off one slow inch at a time.
The second Milly was safely in the cab and on her way, Calista wiped her hands on her holiday dish towel and then draped it over the oven handle.  She turned to Blake who was already standing by the door after walking Milly down the stairs.  She took a step towards him and the second she was within arm’s reach, he pulled her into him, wrapped her up in his arms, running his fingers through her hair as he held her face up to him, his lips dropped to hers, their mouths opened, their tongues twisted, their breathing wavered in long and short heavy breaths.  This was a moment of no turning back for both of them this time.
Within a short time, their bodies remembered each other, craved each other, and Blake had every intention of making Calista smile again tonight like the night he had her at his home.
He slowed his kiss to a soft slow kiss and then pulled away as he had her backed against a wall, one arm over her head, his eyes looking down into hers, their breathing slowed to a break in the storm of lust as he started whispering, “be patient with me, that’s all I can ask right now.  I know you’ve been through so much and I don’t have the right to ask, but I think if you just give me some time…”  his voice trailed off as his lips dropped to her mouth again.  His body pressed against hers, with them completely dressed, it felt like a wall between them, just as those words he spoke made her realize, he needed to be slowly led to the fact that things between them were something.  
What that something was?  She could only guess it was the beginning of an incredible relationship.  Lord knows, the sex between them was better than she ever had.  It was herself that thought she would not be able to let a man in, at least not this soon, but it was him, who was still hurt, still not trusting, and perhaps, so many other things going on in his life, playing dad to his nephews, helping Jackie and his sister that he felt bad if he took time for himself, to let himself feel something for another woman might take away from all his responsibilities.  Then there was this building project Jackie said he was not allowed to discuss until some announcement.  His kiss began to erase all these complicated thoughts from her mind, but they were still dressed and that told her that he might be having some complicated thinking of his own.
The moment the kiss softened; Calista pulled her lips away.  “Blake?”  She whispered as she looked up into his softened eyes.  “Take me to my room.”
With his hand guiding her to her bedroom, that had been curtained closed to keep the guest to the main part of the loft, he did not look at her, but straight ahead.  The second he stopped in front of her heavily draped bedroom, he let go of her hand and looked at her while starting to open a section of curtains aside.
She stopped right next to him and looked up at him.  “Stay the night.  I’ll be patient, I just want you as my Christmas gift tonight.”
Blake smiled with a curve to his lips and then slowly began to undress himself as Calista closed the bedroom curtains behind them.  The soft led candles already lit in her room provided a soft glow along with a small room diffuser of holiday mix smell.  Her dark red cashmere wrap sweater quickly came off her shoulders, dropping to the floor, as she looked up into his eyes.  They were almost completely naked but the air between them warmed as his eyes ran over her body, wanting to take her in visually as she stood before him in only a dark red bra and panty set, all lace, all sexy and the heels she had on made him want to take her that second, yet he waited.
Calista saw the hard cock pressed up inside of his underwear.  She slowly knelt before him as her hands gently guided his underwear to the ground.  The moment she knelt down, looking up, his cock wrapped in her hand, and her mouth about to take him, she wanted to please her man until he could want nothing more than just her, all the time.
The heavy breathing and moans from his mouth as his hand gently rested on the side of her head, was reassurance of his pleasure.  Yet, he did not leave her on her knees for long.  
Within seconds he had her wrapped up in his arms, kissing her tenderly as he guided her to her bed.  The moment he had her on her back on her bed with her hair spread out like a halo all around her head, he took her foot with her red strapped heel and kissed the inside of her ankle.  He let his mouth trail kisses all the way down her leg until he started gently kiss her red lace panties.
“Blake?”  She moaned with a questionable teasing note.  He was taking his time, slowly kissing every inch of her, his mouth wandering up her stomach to her red lace bra where he let his tongue dance over her nipple poking at the lace.
She took a stuttering breath of anticipation as his fingers pushed the lace aside on one of her boobs and he began to suck on her nipple.  She liked slow and easy, but not after being teased and whispered to all night about what it was that he was going to do to her.  She wanted him in her now and the slow easy kissing could happen right before they make love a second time.
Her nails scratched along his back as she pleaded.  “Fuck me now Blake.  I want you.  I need you in me.”
He pulled his body back and up while looking down into her blue eyes as he watched a look of wanting and pleading for him.  He would never get tired of that look, the way she displayed in wanting him.  Tonight, it was about confirming to him about how good it felt before, so maybe he could just move forward and ask her to marry him.  He knew that was what was going to come next, not tonight, but soon, because what electrical thing that drew him to her, it wasn’t going away, only growing stronger.  His obligations be damned come new year, but for now, he did what any responsible man would do, he rolled on a condom from his pocket as Calista shimmied out her bra and panties.  
By the time her heels dropped to the floor, Blake was already gently spreading her legs apart for him to position his body.  Nothing felt sweeter than the moment his cock entered her tightness, her legs wrapped around him as her hips raised a bit for him to push in deeper.  Her fingers pressed into his back as her words filled his ears with pleasure.  “I want you Blake.  I want all of you.  You feel so good.  So right.”  He couldn’t agree more as he stroked in and out of her.
It was the moment his sated body collapsed against hers as their orgasms synched within seconds that he heard her say words that scared him.  “Every time you do this to me, I fall more in love with you.”
He wanted to say it, but he hesitated.  He wanted to say I love you.  It was so easily rolling out of his mind, but his tongue stopped.  It wasn’t until she was sitting up on her elbows looking over his sated body and kissing his chest, his neck and then his lips that he let himself say it.  “I think I’m falling in love with you Calista.”  In those words, she kissed him passionately letting her tongue deep into his mouth.  The second she pulled away, he made himself add the words he could tell caused her to feel a bit distant.  “Just be patient with me.  Just be patient.”
As her naked body cuddled up next to his, he finally heard her respond.  “I can do that Blake.  For you, I can do that.  Just don’t break my heart.”
“I won’t.”  He rushed out.  And he knew he wouldn’t because he knew how it felt to be hurt so bad and he could not do that to her.  But he still needed time.  Time to finish this project uninterrupted, time to figure out how she would be a permanent part of his life and time to figure out if things did not work out, what he might do to protect his heart.
As they parted ways that night, the cold night air surrounded them as a heated kiss between them begged them both to stay the night together, however Blake insisted he could not.  His words of I have a lot going on right now, please be patient with me, replayed over and over in her mind.  Those words told her that maybe he wasn’t ready for a relationship.  She now had a full understanding that the stranger at the bar she fell for, was still working through his own heartache as well.
It takes both sides to build a bridge.
Chapter Fourteen
Waking up next to you makes up for all the anticipation I had to go through.
“Merry Christmas Mom.”  Cole made her heart melt as she answered his phone call.
“It’s not Christmas yet.”  Calista teased.  “But Merry Christmas to you too.  Did you get my packages at your fathers?  There was ten of them.  I want pictures to make sure Stephanie didn’t switch out packages.”  She teased with a sense of seriousness.
“Dad made sure.  He was home when the packages arrived and placed under the tree. But I’ll send you pictures anyways.  We’re not opening them until tomorrow.  Because…”  His voice trailed off with sadness before adding.  “Maybe it would have been better for me to fly out there even if it was just for a day.  Today has been hard mom.  Harder than I could ever imagine.  I don’t know what the fuck dad is thinking.  Stephanie’s a bitch and I don’t think I want to even be here tomorrow to open gifts, just the three of us, like a family, a family I don’t want or like and this was stupid.  The whole day was stupid.  Rushing here and there, pretending like this or that, when really, dad looks agitated.  I think he’s made his biggest mistake ever mom.  I think him marrying Stephanie on Christmas Eve was like the worst thing ever that a dad could do.  It sucks.”
Calista pulled in a deep breath and held it through all his cussing and frustration.  She was not alarmed nor surprised since she got word on Facebook about the wedding bliss fun.  But listening to her son speak such harsh words and frustration, she had to wonder was he saying all this to make her feel better or was he truly miserable.  She spoke with slow sincerity.  She had so much she wanted to say, so much great advice, but her own pain of knowing that Clay and Stephanie picked the one holiday they always spent together as friends to now be married, felt like a knife to the heart.  “I’m sorry Cole.  Try not to take it personable.  One day your holidays will be about you and your new family, new wife, kids even, and all of this will just be a memory.”
“At least tell me that you friends party went well.”  He asked.
Calista remembered every single moment, from the start to the end where Blake admitted he loved her too, but she didn’t go into all of that.  Cole would have lost interest half way through.  “It was spectacular.  I have made some great friends.  I even have a guy I’m kind of dating.  So, your old mom is doing just fine.  I was sad to not be with you but we both originally thought you’d be in Europe still, not enrolling early in school.  Try not to let this get to you.  I got you some great stuff off your list you gave me.  And a few surprise gifts I think you will really like.”  She teased out.
“Did you get me the new PlayStation…”  He rambled on with questions about what she might have gotten him.  Instead of saying yes, I got that or no I did not, she laughed. 
By the time she hung up with Cole, she was restless.  Last night had gone well.  Everyone seemed to be having a wonderful celebration, but it was midnight on Christmas Eve, and Cole’s news made her feel melancholy.  
She looked at her Christmas decorations around her apartment.  Her place could easily had been photographed for an interior design magazine.  This she could do well.  However, a lot of other things in her life were not going as planned.  She wondered if the choices she made were now catching up to her.
Wanting a cup of spiced coffee, she realized she ran out last night and threw on her warm black sorrel boots over her thick black socks.  Her black leggings had a little bit of tissue lent from the ones she used to wipe her eyes after a few silent tears fell while talking to Cole.  The snow was lightly falling so she grabbed her blue ski parka and zipped it up over her dark blue turtleneck she had on.  The light blue knit hat with a pom pom on top that Milly knitted her matched her jacket perfectly.  She slipped it on over her head and stuffed her fingers into a pair of warm black mittens.  She figured she might take a walk outside along the closed-up shops, while drinking her coffee, and enjoying the quietness of the late evening her life was providing her.
Calista walked out the front door of her shop, spiced hot coffee in a to go cup in hand, and carefully double checked that she locked it behind her.  Just a walk up and down the street, she told herself.  
As she begins to walk in the snow, making small footprints from her snow boots on the snow dusted sidewalk, she felt herself turn to go a certain direction first.  It had been less than twenty-four hours, but she missed him.  He was probably at Jenny’s helping her get things ready for tomorrow at her house, but all the same, she wandered that way towards his office just several doors down from her coffee shop.
The moment, she reached Blake’s shopfront, she saw the lights on in back and wondered if he was there.  She had never actually gone inside but thought of it more as a sacred place for him.  The door was locked so without thinking her right hand that wasn’t holding the hot coffee reached up and knocked hard on the shop glass.  Not thinking really, just wondering, was he there?
The moment Blake walked out, looking exhausted and unruly with his flannel shirt open to a white tee shirt, his blue jeans looking like they needed a wash as something dusty was on him, she thought he must still be working on his ‘project’ he was so secretive about.  Yet his look of embarrassment mixed with shock that Calista was at his window, something she had never done before, brought her concern as an older woman she had seen him with before out on the street came walking out from the back lit room as well.  His look of awkwardness caused Calista to feign a smile and turn to walk the opposite direction away from his shop.
Blake felt frustrated.  He needed to explain but didn’t want to frustrate Calista.  They had texted on and off all day, but he saw the look on her face.  His fingers trembled as he typed.  “It’s not what you think.”  
Calista didn’t reply back.  
Blake dialed her number and excused himself from the chair fundraiser for his project to explain what she saw.  Her phone went to voice mail as his hurried voice barreled out.  “Calista, honey, it’s not what you think, that is if you are thinking anything.  This is work.  This lady is here to finalize, oh shit.  Just call me when you get this.  I don’t want you mad or hurt.  I would have introduced you to her.  It’s been a long day and I am exhausted and have regretted almost every minute I have wasted on this project instead of being with you.
Calista had turned her cellphone off after his text.  Her heart was feeling heavy.  Coles news, albeit something she knew, still weighed on her heart as her son was the one so affected by it all.  Which she should be feeling great, because the news was not making her sad, however, she had an evil thought about what could go wrong for the holidays for Clay and Stephanie.  As for Blake, obviously had plans on his Christmas Eve with someone else.  Just like her hair, she was feeling blue.  She turned the corner at the end of the street.  She let the snow fall on her as the silence of the night felt soothing yet, encumbering.  The moment she reached the bottom of her stairs to her place, she stopped.  Instead of going back up to her apartment loft, she got in her SUV and decided to just go for a late-night Christmas Eve drive.
It had been a while since she just drove around some of the neighborhoods in Darling.  She did it a few times when she first arrived to get her bearings, and to understand the demographics of the town in comparison to her shop.  GPS is a wonderful tool, but sometimes, getting lost and finding one’s way home without it can have a strange empowerment.
She noticed several homes still had their Christmas lights on at the late hour.  The drive of colorful lights, mixed with the sound of Christmas music playing inside her car, she realized a few tears were trailing down her cheeks.  With a quick wipe of her fingertips she realized her feelings were a mix of relief and sadness.  Thinking about Clay marrying Stephanie so soon after the divorce made her sad, even more so sad for Cole as the timing was crappy.  He made it clear that he was going with the flow on this but he struggled with the divorce all the same.  Then there was Blake.  She wanted him, friend and lover, but she did not want to push.  She knew that waking up tomorrow on her own would be tough.  But she also knew the decision she made to put all revenge aside, make amends and move forward, was her new way of thinking.
By the time Calista made it back to her alleyway to park, she noticed Blake’s truck was parked in her spot.  She saw his face being illuminated by his cellphone as he was looking into it and typing something.  Just as she parked behind him with her headlights already off, she turned her cellphone on to several dings.  It was Blake.  “I’ve got a gift for you.”  His last text read.
She looked into her cellphone, squinted her eyes at disbelief and then turned her car off, shoved her cellphone into her shoulder bag and got out of her car at the exact same time as Blake got out of his truck.
“Merry Christmas.”  His thick deep voice filled the air with a cherry note.  He walked around to the back of his truck and unlocked the truck cover and rolled it back.
Calista walked towards him in disbelief.  It was one am in the morning and he was at her place bringing her a gift, that meant something.  “Merry Christmas yourself.  Sorry, I turned my cell off.  I had some thinking to do.  It has been a strange evening of conflicted feelings.”  She responded slowly as she looked inside his truck.  In the bed of his truck was a very detailed wooden sign with the name Hide Out Café in metal iron scripted type.  It was custom made, obviously, but was this what he had been working on that had him so busy he couldn’t spend time with her, she quizzed internally.
She looked at the sign, and then looked at him with her body sideways to him and her head facing over her shoulder in his direction.  “It’s gorgeous.  It’s perfect.”  She cooed as her knitted gloves came off and her fingers touched the sign.
“Do you like it?”
Her eyebrows raised as her eyes opened wide.  She touched the detailed wood sign again that was at least two feet high and six feet long.  It was gorgeous.  “I love it.”  She finally replied.
“Phew.”  He joked with a word she was known for using often around the café and in town; he used his hand pretending that he was wiping sweat off his forehead.
“But why?”  She turned to him and looked with an expectation of an honest answer.
“Why?  I honestly wanted you to have something special for your shop sign after I found out you decided to not make it officially the revenge café.  Jenny and Jackie told me that you admitted to the ladies at the social meeting that you wanted the café to be more of a place where folks come to take a break, old and young.”
She took a step towards him and stopped.  “But, the only other sign you made for anyone in town, was…”  She stopped herself from saying the name of his ex-fiancé.
“I know.  But you’re different.  We were friends first.”
“Is that what we are Blake?  Friends?”
“I don’t know.  I thought so.”  He offered.
She lightly laughed as the snow falling was getting thicker, filling her blue hat and his hair with white sticky flakes.  “Well, in all actuality, we were a heated mess the first night we met, but yes, friends for sure.  I would love to spend time and see where we can take this.  I’m extremely attracted to you.”  She offered up with confidence that even if he shot her down tonight, she would have let him know her true feelings.
“I want more.”  He spoke up as his steps put him directly in front of her, his lips found hers as his hands tangled up into her hair.  The moment their kiss parted, he added.  “I wanted more from you the moment I realized you weren’t in Utah, but in my Kansas.”
She laughed lightly.  “Me too.  Let’s get this sign into the shop.  Then do you have time to come upstairs for a hot tea?”
Something hotter than tea will be served this Christmas Eve night.
Chapter Fifteen
By the stroke of midnight, as the bell tolls twelve, I promise you a new year that is magical.
Calista had spent have the latter part of the day getting her hair and nails done to match the navy-blue dress from Tully’s.  The nights weather was cooperating as much as it could for New Years Eve in Darling Kansas, but it was cold out; which is why the last-minute arrival from Tully’s shop was well received.  A off white winter coat with navy trim for her to wear over her dress until she got into the heated ranch barn where the festivities would take place.  Blake was taking her to the event that was the talk of the town, by invitee only, Culver Ranch New Year’s Eve Ball.
Now, just a year ago, Calista would have laughed heartily at someone who suggested that she, of all people, would be going to a ball, in a barn, in Kansas; yet here she was getting ready to do just that.
With a bit of in trepidation that the only other person that was invited to this that she knew, besides Blake, was Jenny.  It was a family tradition along with several other well to do people in town and the surrounding area.  Jenny had reassured her that it wasn’t as all fancy as she thought, but high heels or fancy cowgirl boots, wear your best to impress was the motto.
Standing in her dressing room, trying to decide which purse to take, the sound of Blake calling her name from below the loft brought a flutter to her stomach.
“I’ll be down in a second.”  She called out from the dressing room.
“Take your time.  I hate being the first ones there and there is at least an hour and half before the awards ceremony.  It’s your choice if you want to stay after that.”  He resounded out as if he was yelling out to her, but she could hear him just fine in the dressing room.
She did a once over in the mirror and smiled at herself.  She looked incredible and she knew it was part the dress and the other part all the orgasms she had in the last few days from Blake.  It was as if since Christmas Eve, he found a way to be inseparable from her even if he had work to finish up on the new women’s shelter addition project.  His super quiet can’t tell anyone project came pouring out as he felt he had to explain himself that night.  While her own emotions came crying out over her ex’s getting married.  That night was a turning point for both of them and she thanked God for that.
As she started to sashay down the stairs of the loft to the main living area, the look on Blakes face as he turned to face her, told her she had done herself up right.  Her hair was swept up in an updo, thanks to Remi, and her dress made her feel like a movie star.
“You sure know how to make a guy want to strip you naked and not take you out in public.”  He teased.
She winked at him as she walked off the last step and began to walk towards him in a sultry fashion.  “And you sure clean up nice cowboy.”  She wrapped her arms around him all dressed up in a semi-formal black tux, and leaned in for a soft sensual kiss, not wanting to mess up her lipstick and then pulled away.
“And yes, to answer you from earlier, I want to stay until midnight.  Leaving any earlier on New Year’s Eve is wrong.”  She turned from his arms and reached for her off white winter coat from Tully, holding it out for him to help her slip into it.  As soon as he did, she looked down at her feet.
“Darn.  I have to switch out to my winter boots to go down the back stairs.  No matter, I packed an overnight bag by the door.”  She slipped her feet out of her silver strapped heels and handed them to him.  “Would you be a darling and put those in my bag?”
“I can and I can even promise you one thing better.”  He walked her shoes over to her bag, put the heels inside as she asked.
“What’s that?”  She slipped her feet into her snow boots that did not make her outfit sexy but was a necessity if she was going to make it safely down those outside snow-covered steps.
“I can offer to put the original inside door back in that goes from the living room to a hallway between buildings and out to the front sidewalk.”  He beamed proudly, knowing full well after their first night together at his ranch, he wanted to do that for her, but got sidetracked with the women’s shelter project.
“Why Blake…”  Calista teased as she gave him a coy look.  “That might make me think you want something in return.”
He lifted her overnight bag onto his shoulder, thinking to himself, he loved the feeling of knowing she wanted to go back to his place for the long weekend like they talked about over Christmas Day.  He imagined an entire weekend of naked intertwined bodies sweaty and sated before teasing back.  “I only want to see you smile like you do after, you know.”
She opened her back door out to the alleyway as she casually added.  “That I can do.”
By the time they arrived at the party, and got out of the truck so the valet service that the ranch hired to park cars and trucks out in the fields of snow and muck, Calista was ready for the midnight bell to ring twelve.  The entire half hour drive to the Culver’s Ranch was nothing but sexual teasing, rising the tension between them to a degree of way past hot passion.  Yet, somehow the blast of cold air as they climbed out of his truck, and the humming of conversations coming from within the heated barn enticed Calista to realize this was their first official out in public date.  She took a deep breath in and turned to look at Blake as he grabbed her hands with an excited expression on his face.
“Shall we?”  His head nodded towards the large barn doors that had a smaller tent in front of the doors with blasting heaters to help keep the cold air out of the barn.  
Calista looked around and noticed that this was the type of party one only threw on a expensive budget, unlike her small friend get togethers she always loved to throw.  She could only imagine the type of money that was floating around in the barn this evening.  She observed the decorated barn which looked like a rural wedding might take place inside as yards and yards of tulle were draped everywhere, a crystal ball hung in the middle of the room with lighting to cast shimmers everywhere.  Strings of lights illuminated the ceiling and side walls while covered in white flowered vines.  The center of the room was a wood dance floor surrounded by several round tables well decorated for the evenings event.  One would not be able to tell it was a barn from the inside, but more of a rustic building.  She wondered if a furry animal had ever step foot in this barn or if it was strictly built for this type of event.
While taking it all in, Blakes hand squeezed hers, assuring her it that none of the frivolous thoughts running through her brain truly mattered at the moment.  What mattered most was the award that Blake was to receive in not only designing the new shelter but playing project manager to the construction of it all.  In finding that out, Calista forgave him for every dismissal moment since their first night together at his ranch, however Blake was having trouble forgiving himself for putting the project first, as he had mentioned everyday that they had been together since Christmas Eve.
As the first moments into the barn settled into Calista’s brain, she realized she was among those she could easily associate with.  Jenny was only moments behind them.  She arrived with an old family friend that was a few years older.  She was dressed in a dark red cashmere sweater with black dress pants.  The sparkling crystals in her dark brown hair was a nice touch from Remi.  Her wheelchair had a dark red fur throw on the backside of the seat, incase her legs got cold in the barn.  Within seconds, Jenny and Calista had an entire conversation going about her boys and Christmas day, while the men were discussing the Chiefs going to the Superbowl.
As Calista chatted so comfortably with Jenny, Blake kept tossing glances of endearment at her.  It all seemed like a fairytale for a moment, so she looked away for a second to catch her breath and in doing so she turned and stubbed her toe on Jenny’s wheel chair.  
“Oh my god, I am so sorry.”  Both Jenny and she exclaimed to each other in a breath and then began to laugh.
“Around me, you might want steel toed boots on.  I’ve been known to run over a toe or two.”  Jenny joked.
“It’s completely me.”  Calista leaned down to Jenny’s ear and whispered.  “I’ve been so nervous all day.  I don’t know why, and Blake keeps staring at me.”
Jenny cupped her hand and whispered into Calista’s ear.  “That’s because he finally realizes how much in love, he is with you.”  Then she grabbed Calista’s hand and squeezed it gently before letting it go.
Calista cupped her hand and whispered back.  “Perhaps that is why I am so nervous.  I fell in love with Blake before he could admit we are good together, but tonight something feels different.  It feels more real.  Like I’m in his life now and before we were just a secret.”
Jenny started to laugh heartedly before whispering back, trying to stifle her giddiness.  “Oh honey, I think everyone in this town knew you two were in love before you two did.  But I knew.  I’ve known since that first night you two met.  I mean to say, he mentioned that first night you two met shortly after he found out you rented the loft and I could tell; he had found someone to pique his interest.  And that is not an easy thing for anyone to do.”
Calista straightened up and let her hand touch Jenny’s shoulder before she felt Blake come beside her and practically lean himself into her.  Their hands intertwined and they both let out a sigh of appreciation for one another.  This felt right, Calista thought to herself as they turned to look at each other endearingly.
By the time they had champagne or beer glasses in everyone’s hands, along with plenty of appetizers handed their way by wait staff making their way around the heated barn, an event coordinator indicated by music and dimming lights that the awards part of the event was to begin.  Blake wasn’t the only one getting an award tonight, apparently, this was the night the local area awarded those for great achievements over the year.
The conversation stayed light and casual until the moment, Blake excused himself, to talk to the mayor.  Calista watched Blake join the mayor and the older woman she had seen him around town with join him at the podium with the mayor.  Just as Blake and the woman were being introduced, a strange voice whispered in her ear.  “Isn’t it just incredible what Blake did for the shelter?  I mean it was all Mrs. Worthington’s money, but Blake handled the plans, the crew, everything in such a short time.”
Calista turned away from the award ceremony as the mayor began talking in her Mae West type voice; the voice she remembered fondly from the hair salon day where the woman let her know their opinion.  She turned a bit to notice the strange man who whispered in her ear just as the mayor was handing the award to Blake while shaking his hand.  The stranger, an older man she never met before, but looked vaguely familiar smiled at her as his attention went back to Blake receiving the award.
Calista turned her full attention back to Blake as the sounds of clapping broke her thoughts from the man standing next to her back to Blake up on the stage looking her way.  They placed another handshake for the media before they both walked off stage with another vaguely familiar woman, the one she saw in his office Christmas Eve.  The moment the three of them headed towards her, Calista felt confident that the reason Blake had been avoiding her was well worth it, however she could only have wished he communicated better with her about it.  She smiled to herself knowing that at least they were working on that - their communication.
“Calista, I’d like you to meet Mrs. Worthington.  Dad, I’d like you to meet Calista.  Calista this is my dad Jake.”
Calista said hello to both and shook Mrs. Worthington’s hand and then turned to say hello to Blakes’ dad, the man with an older yet familiar face.  “Hello.”  She offered up as the older man took her hand and kissed it.
“Well hello to you too darling.”  He offered as a slight blush rose up on Calista’s cheeks.  There was no doubt where the charm came from in his family.
“Dad here, found Mrs. Worthington to come meet the needs of the clinic.  In the meantime, I guess they found each other.”  Blake announced with a bit of joking to his words.  Calista could only imagine the story behind all of this.  She had never had the chance to talk to him about his entire family, only the Jenny and Pete side.  There had been casual mention of their mother’s death over Christmas day but was quickly hushed in a vibe about we don’t talk about it much.  
“Well it’s a pleasure to meet you both.”  Calista offered up politely.  
It was in the next few moments, that unanswered questions began to be answered.  As Blake’s father spoke proudly of his son, his accomplishments and of Jenny’s ability to keep him in line while their dad was traveling about the country, meeting people.  Which brought Calista back to thinking about how sad Blake looked when she spoke about traveling abroad herself.  She had to wonder was Blake worried, back then, when she made the comment, that she would leave him to travel?  Which she did plan to still travel, but only now she was hoping he would travel with her.  She pocketed that thought for a later conversation, one for when they were more serious than now.  But as everyone talked and she included herself in all of their conversations so casually, she kept wondering, how serious were they?  Overnight bags and hot sultry sex every night was perfectly fine with her, but what about next month, next year, as things become more of a true relationship.  Blake interrupted her thoughts with the suggestion they take to the dance floor.
The moment their bodies were intertwined in a slow easy step back and forth to a love song under the dimmed lights, Calista was welcoming the reprieve from all the social banter.  “You should be very proud of yourself.”  She offered up into his right ear.
“It was something this town needed, but I could have done with a much better schedule and not so many cooks in the kitchen, if you get me drift.”  He talked softly into her ear.
“I completely understand that feeling.  I think that is why I always wanted to be my own boss.  Although I know sometimes, I annoy my employees at the Hide Out with demands, right now, it seems like everyone is getting along great.  So great that I don’t feel like I need to spend sixty hours a week or more like I did at my old coffee shop back in Utah.”
“Well, I only regret not telling you or at least finding time to spend with you.”  He whispered softly.
Calista let her lips find his for a soft reassuring kiss.  When she pulled back, she spoke honestly.  “One thing you will come to find out about me Blake, even after all this talk of me being the Revenge Queen of Darling, is I really do like to just move past things, move on, and plan for a better future.  I saw my error in the revenge department.  I’m ready for a future here, with you if it works out.”  She blew out a breath of air in fluttered anticipation.  She knew the feelings were there, growing, planning, but was he ready to move on.
Blake whispered into her ear.  “I want to spend the new year getting to know you, Calista?  Even if that means spending less time fishing and more time with you.”
“I like to fish.”  She teased.
“You do?”  He sounded excited.
“I do.  But yes, I think all business niceties aside, I want you for pleasure and I want to get to know this Blake you have been hiding from me the past month.  I had no idea that you were the man behind this.”  She questioned flirtatiously.
“I didn’t want anyone to know.  It’s like I get infatuated with something and I just have to fixate on it or keep busy; I like to keep myself occupied to keep me out of trouble.
“I can understand that.”  She thought of her two years of planning her divorce and move here.
“Do you?  Because, after the night I found out that you were my renter in my apartment and building shop, I kind of found it hard to not want to fixate on you.”
She laughed while thinking as they danced.  She had read all his signals as immature, when in reality he was working on getting over his own hardship.  They were two ships in the night that passed and lost course.
To mine own self be true, I would be lost without you.
Chapter Sixteen
Is it bliss when the rain stops and the sun shines? 
Can one person’s clarity bring happiness to another?  That was not something that Calista was really thinking about, not until a certain phone call ended in an unusual way.
Some of the coffee shop regulars had stayed past closing to discuss the Valentines benefit they were working on for the shelter.  Calista had run upstairs through her new connected doorway from the outside front of the shop.  Blake had surprised her after the new year with the offer to reopen the hallway from the front to her loft which connected to living room area of her loft.  She had gladly accepted several of his offers since that dance on New Years Eve, some of them life changing, but this one was simply put, a life saver as those alley metal stairs deemed more dangerous in the frozen winter storms they were experiencing.  By the time she made it back down with her notebook full of hand-written notes, she felt an air of suspicion in the front area of her café.  Standing in silence in only black leggings, her black winter ankle boots and Blake’s navy blue and gray army sweatshirt she stole from him the other night, she realized all eyes were on her as she entered the room.
“Calista?”  Jackie held up the café cordless phone in her hand as the room came to a hushed quiet.  “I think you might want to take this call.”
Calista looked at Jackie with a tilted head and curious smile on her face as she walked towards her quickly, dropping her red mead college ruled notebook on the table of six women and one man, that had become the regulars in the group.  The large black sharpie marker adorned an ornamental heart and the words Valentine Benefit neatly graffitied the front of the notebook.
Jenny, Tanesha, Remi, Tully, Milly, Sally, along with Larry the plumber, stared at her with wide open eyes, some with their hands under their chins as if they were awaiting her news from the call of the phone that Jackie was holding up.  Curiosity was striking her imagination as she reached for the phone and Jackie whispered two words that sent a striking shiver through her body.  “Your ex.”
Calista had to wonder how he found her, since she changed her cellphone immediately following the night that she drunk texted him, or more so Stephanie received his text, but that was neither here nor there at the moment.  What worried her first was if Cole is okay?
Cautiously, Calista whispered out a meek ‘hello’, not sure if by the statement ‘your ex’ if it was Clay or Stephanie.  Things had been quiet in that arena since New Years but somehow her apprehension was building as the silence laid on the other end of the line; that was until his deep soft-spoken voice rattled her nerves unexpectedly.
“Calista?  It’s Clay.  Before you get worried, everything is alright with Cole.”  He rushed out the last sentence to assure her that was not why he was calling.
“Clay?”  She said his name as she turned to face the group of organizers for the fundraisers, who had also become her dear friends.  “How did you find me?”  She put a palm up in the air as if to say what gives and gave a questioning look to her friends.  Cole had promised not to tell his father or Stephanie where she was at or her new cellphone number.  The fact that he called the café looking for her, worried her, nonetheless.
“I did a little detective work.  Don’t worry.”  He rushed out the last sentence again.  “Stephanie has no idea where you are or that I found you.  Best to let those barking dogs lay.”  He awkwardly joked and then cleared his throat.  “I see you and your Aunt bought a small café in Kansas.  I like the pictures someone took of you and the handsome man.”  He paused.  “You look more in love with him, than you and I ever looked in any of our photos.”  He went quiet and Calista was at a loss for words. She knew the pictures he was referring to.  They were used in several social media feeds for the café, not to mention her own new Facebook account had them on it.  She thought once she blocked Stephanie and Clay, that they would never find out.  Then again, she had taunted Stephanie with a picture of Blake to prove she could get a better man.
The silence crept on for ten seconds which felt like minutes while everyone’s attention was on Calista.  Her breathing slowed after a huge breath out.  Her smile plastered on her face to tell her friends that she was okay; when, in reality, she had to wonder, what was Clay up to.
He finally spoke up.  “I don’t know if this is a good time to talk.  Stephanie has left to see her mother in Chicago.  She’s fallen seriously ill and well, I know you had been close to her mother at one point, and she’s not doing well.  Not that, that is not the reason I called.”  He went quiet again.  Normally he was one to avoid serious conversations, but this time it seemed like he wanted to talk.  For the sake of Cole, she thought maybe it best she took the call in private.
Clays voice started to say something when Calista turned her back to her friends and interrupted his next words in a whispering voice.  “Clay?  I am in the middle of something, but I can take a few moments to talk; if you need to?”  She questioned out.
“Yes.”  His reply was soft and questioning.
“Okay.  Well, you called the café shop number.  It’s closed but we are working on a local fundraiser.  Give me a second and I will call you back on my personal cell phone number.  It’s probably a good idea you have it for Cole, but if by God you let Stephanie know this number, I will cut your balls off with a dull knife.”  She half threatened; half laughed.
“I won’t.  I’ll put you under Bob Ross.”  He laughed.
“Give me five minutes.”  She quickly replied and hung up without saying goodbye strictly out of nervousness, not out of rudeness.
“So that was the old ball and chain?”  Larry chimed up which surprised everyone.  The rest of the females could sense her duress.
“It was.”  She replied with raised eyebrows and soft-spoken voice.  “Listen, I need to call him back.  Nothing serious.  Cole’s okay, but I suppose it’s time I finally talk to the man.”  Thinking to herself the last time she spoke to him, he was tied up in their old bedroom, on their old bed naked, pleading for a last act of sexual mischievousness that she had no intentions on playing out.
A few “suppose” echoed the room, as they all looked at her with concern.  She set the café cordless phone back on its charger and then walked back to the table they were all sitting around.  “I put just about everything I can think of in this notebook.”  She flipped open the red notebook to a neatly scripted and organized page full of to do and explanatory information on their next event.  The women’s fund raiser for the shelter had become a monthly event.  This time they want to have valentines for the women, a chocolatier demonstration and a motivational speaker on how to move forward from a major stressful event in one’s life.  A speaker, Calista found herself through a podcast that was willing to speak to a group of women staying at the shelter via internet Q and A.  Jackie had mentioned a fondue potluck, while Jenny wanted to address the new disability quarters needed for some homeless women at the shelter.  Either way, research had gone pen to paper nights ago, Calista felt these guys could make up their own decisions and let her know, while she handled this personal business.
“I’ll only be a bit.”  She offered up to the room as she grabbed her purse and iPad.  Then she looked at the group staring at her from around the table.  “But if I am not, Sally can you lock up.”  Sally was now officially manager in training, while Melissa had been officially fired because it was her who had planned the take a trip and steal your boss’s car situation.  Things were much calmer now that Milly was back to keep on eye on Melissa.  Calista would not hire her back, but she didn’t press charges either because the insurance already paid her for the stolen car.  Besides, every day, Calista noticed that now that Sally was given the roll of manager in training, her confidence level had risen far above where Calista could ever have imagined, thus giving her and Blake the extra time they found ways to have fun with each other.  This is how she had imagined her shop, but just didn’t imagine it getting there so quickly.
Blake was due soon to help with the next benefit, so she looked to Jenny next.  “Tell Blake what’s up.  Have him come straight upstairs.”
“Will do.” Jenny spoke supportively.
Remi offered up.  “You okay?  You look a little flustered.”
Calista meekly smiled.  “I’m fine.  It’s just weird that he called here.  Cat’s out of the bag so to speak.  At least for him.  He promises not to tell Stephanie, but I know her, it won’t be long she’ll be rearing her ugly head this way.”  She paused thinking of Stephanie’s mother and her health.  “Or not.  Hard to tell.”  She passed off the comment as a nonchalant thought, but her mind was already softening over Stephanie’s mother who was a kind decent human being, unlike her daughter.
The trek up the stairs to her place felt heavy footed, but she got herself settled in on her couch after grabbing a bottled water out of the refrigerator, left her door unlocked and grabbed her cellphone out.  She was hesitant in calling but the moment her fingers dialed his cellphone number, she knew this was a long overdue phone call.
The moment Clay answered the phone with her name, the conversation felt a bit surreal.  “Calista?”  He questioned out.
“It’s me.  Now you know my new cell phone.  Use it sparingly.”  She joked, just like the painter Bob Ross might have suggested on using a color.  Bob Ross was an inside joke between them, Clay and herself, one they never let Stephanie in on.  It felt nice to hide something from her for a change.
“I will.”  Clay offered in a serious tone.  There was a long pause between them, so Calista took a sip of water and then grabbed an empty yellow notebook that was sitting on the table in front of her.  
She put Clay on speakerphone.  “Can you hear me okay?  I have some work I need to do while we talk so I put you on speakerphone.”
“I can.  Ah, ever the great multi tasker, still doing two jobs at once.”  He teased.
“You know me.”  She half joked, but he didn’t know how cold and callus she had gotten from the affair; how mangled her heart was for two years, how all the scheming left her feeling hollow instead of successful.  That was until Blake came into her life.  Blake, and all of her new friends.  In a sense, she was extremely thankful for his affair.  Before she knew it, she said the words.  “Thanks.”
“For what?”  He asked inquisitively.
She clicked a black pen to push the ink nib out and started to write the words thankful on her notebook before replying.  “Well, not to sound snide, but my life here in Kansas is great, and if it weren’t for you and the…”  She paused as a nasty foul mouth word almost slipped out of her mouth and then corrected.  “brunette.  I never would have found what I found here.”  She replied just as Blake quietly walked through the interior door to the room and shut the door soundlessly behind him.  She put a finger up to her lips and he nodded that he understood.
Clay awkwardly laughed for a second.  “Cole told me you are engaged to be married this spring.  I assume the man in all the photos you are dreamily staring at on your social media accounts is him.  Handsome.  A bit younger don’t you think?”  The room got quiet as Calista looked at her handsome man quietly walking towards her with a huge smile on his face.  He was dressed in a brown wool blazer winter coat, which he was trying to quietly take off, a pair of dark brown dress pants and a deep charcoal cashmere sweater she bought him from Tully’s with a lighter charcoal grey soft tee underneath.  He was dressed in his new normal business casual which she loved to dress him up in.  He had a business meeting earlier that day with the final payment from Randy at his old bar along with Randy’s new business partner, Jackie’s new fiancé Conner, who had money to invest.  As she looked lovingly at her new fiancé who was trying to quietly sit on the couch next to her, she heard Clay clear his throat and mumble a few words.  On the off chance he might say something she did not want Blake to hear, she decided to set the record straight.
“I don’t mean to interrupt, but you should know that Blake just showed up and he is here in our place together.”  She proudly announced.
“Oh.”  Clay paused.  “Hello, Blake.  Cole has told me a lot about you.  All good of course.  Thanks for having your friend fly him out to see his mother for a weekend.”
“No problem.  I thought it was important he was here when I officially asked for Calista’s hand in marriage.”  Blake offered and then dropped a soft kiss on Calista’s lips.  When he pulled away, he offered.  “I can give you two privacy if needed.”  Offering more to Calista than Clay.
“That won’t be necessary.” Both Clay and Calista replied in unison, while Blake raised an eyebrow out of curiosity towards Calista.  She laid her left hand on his thigh and winked.
Clay spoke up first.  “I suppose I should apologize for all that I put you through.”  He cleared his throat, but before he could continue, Calista had rehearsed what it was she wanted to say to him for so long once she found a man like Blake.
“Clay?  Sorry to interrupt but I must accept your apology and say this.  We were once happily married, or so I thought.  Yet there was always something missing.  In our marriage that is.  I guess we married young, started a family young and I just felt okay with that.  Stephanie and you both betrayed me, I have decided to forgive you for that.  Doesn’t mean I am okay with it, but let’s just say, getting back into a new life that felt so much like me has led to some pretty spectacular people.  So, your apology is accepted and please lets just start this next phase of our lives in peace.  Cole will meet someone special one day and we will see each other on and off.  Not that I want to see Stephanie ever again, but I can be polite.  If she can.”  The last sentence came out with a slight laughter to it.  
Blake stood up to excuse himself.  Calista watched him walk to the bathroom and close the door behind him.  They had been switching off staying at each other’s place almost every night since New Years Eve.  Only a week after the gala event, did Blake choose a sweet romantic setting at his house to ask for her hand in marriage.  A simple, yet perfect for them moment, made up Calista’s mind.  This was the kind of man she wanted in her future.  A strong, sweet sentimental man, that knew how to make her smile in a lot of different ways.  Then his surprise in flying Cole out to Kansas, arranging a nice family gathering at the bar while he planned for Cole to tell his mother that Blake had his approval to marry her in front of everyone.  It was a moment; she would never forget.
Clay’s voice interrupted her own internal thoughts rebounding over the memory of Blake asking her for her hand in marriage and the previous nights lovemaking.  “I guess you won’t be surprised to know, Stephanie and I are already getting a divorce.  We’re splitting assets.  I got a new job in California and Cole is trying to decide if he wants to stay here or go with me.  I asked if I could talk with you first, you know to finally apologize, tell you the news first about Stephanie and well…”  His voice trailed off.  
Calista screamed internally at him.  Well what?  You think I want you back?  Who the fuck cares if Stephanie and you are getting a divorce?  But instead of verbalizing it, she took a deep cleansing breath and blew it out.  “Probably for the best Clay.  I mean about you and Stephanie.  It was more of the thrill of the hunt then the prize at the end.  How’s Cole handling all of this?  I mean, I would hate for him to move farther away from me, but I did move away from our old…”  She paused as she almost said home, but really, she could not get herself to say the word home, because now this was her home and although Cole was not here in physical form, he was in spirit and her new home, new life, with Blake and her new friends, her café and this town.
What Calista did not know was that Blake was standing a distance behind her but could still hear the conversation pursue.  His own internal fears of the words that Clay and Stephanie were divorcing caused him to stop in his footsteps of walking towards her.  He had wanted to hear what she had to say unedited from her.
Clay spoke out to her pause.  “He’s actually just busy between classes and two part time jobs.  I tried to get him a fulltime job at the bank before I left, but he seems to like his two part time gigs.  I don’t know.  It bothers me that his work ethic for his generation seems, so different.”
Calista spoke up quickly when Clay paused.  “Well I will talk with Cole, now that you have talked to me, but by all means Clay, let’s not play the let me talk to your mother first game.  Your life, your news, is just that.  Divorcing Stephanie does not really affect me one way or another.”  She breathed in and continued as she breathed out.  “Actually!”  She spoke up at the same time as Clay interrupting him, with a voice that was rather joyous and loud.  “I am thankful.  She wasn’t really good for either of us, all three of us if you include Cole, but our marriage was not really a happy one, but an existing one.  I might have divorced you without Stephanie.”  She boldly announced.
Which must have struck a cord with Clay’s ego, not knowing that Blake was not in the room, or so Calista thought.  “So those last two years of you begging me to stay with you, were what?”  He maliciously announced with pride.
Calista calmly asserted out a firm answer without a second thought.  “A desire to save our marriage for Cole, but, in reality, once I drove every single mile away from you two Clay, you and Stephanie that is, I realized, I just didn’t want Stephanie to win, so I begged.  I didn’t want to upset Cole after another one of your affairs, so I begged.  But when I got to Kansas, I realized I deserve a new life.  One where a man does not cheat on me, and friends that don’t stab me in the back.  I guess my only surprise is how quickly I found that new life.  Cole knows how happy I am now.  I think, perhaps, after the damage you did to our lives, you should be happy for me too.”
Without hesitation, he replied.  “You are right.  I am happy for you.  Sorry.  I have a lot of things I am working through with a therapist.  Sorry, Blake.” 
The last sentence shocked Calista as she herself almost forgot that Clay may have thought Blake was in the room.  Perhaps his dig at her begging him, was a self-preservation of pride.  Although she was glad that she got to answer him just today as to why. She had not wanted to save her marriage, she had wanted to win, and then she wanted to divorce him on her terms.  How happy she is now that she had not wasted anymore of her own valuable time with him and Stephanie.  
In the moment of losing herself to his apology, and the empty sounds from the room, a bold victorious voice filled the air.  “No need to apologize Clay.  Calista and I are very much in love.”  Just then his strong firm hands landed on her shoulder as he stood behind her on the couch and he softly began to massage her knotted muscles in her neck.  “I should advise you however, that I am very protective of Calista…” a slight pause elapsed before his tone changed, “and twice your size and five times richer than you.  You’re not the only one that did your research.  However, I love your ex-wife and your son Cole.  He’s a bright young man I will be proud to call him my stepson.  I think we will all do just fine.  You in Cali and us here in Kansas.  Cole can decide where he wants to be for the time being and in the future.”
Clay spoke in a more dignified professional tone.  “Well, yes.  I should leave you two alone now.  I agree Cole has to make that decision.  Congratulations Calista.  You deserve a happy life.  If you need to communicate with me regarding Cole, please feel free.  Congratulations Blake.  I wish you two a very happy life.”
Calista heard the preservation turn into sadness in his voice towards the end; a sound that she was sure Blake could not interpret.  Sometimes when you have been with someone so long, as she had been with Clay, she knew the sadness she detected in his voice.  He brought on this loneliness and it was not hers to deal with.  She quickly rushed out.  “Sounds great.  Good bye Clay.  We’ll talk again.”  And she quickly hit the end button on her cellphone before he could reply.  
It wasn’t that she had second thoughts, it was just that emotionally she could not deal with the fact that the father of her son had major regrets, as he should, and he sounded humbled, as he should.  She also worried how much Blake heard and what he was feeling right now.
His hands stop massaging her neck gently as his voice softly filled the room.  “That was a bit awkward.  Sorry if I sounded harsh and protective there for a second.”
Calista turned her body on the couch and laid her cellphone off on to the coffee table as she looked up at the man who captivated her every thought since her first night in Kansas.  “No.  No.  You were very sweet, and I think it was strange for everyone.  That’s the first time I’ve talked to him since I left him the night before I got here.  I guess it had to happen sooner than later.”  She let out a huge sigh of relief that it was over as Blake sat down on the couch next to her.  His hands went together between his knees as his head lowered down and his body leaned forward.
Calista leaned into him, wrapped her arms around him and laid a kiss on his shoulder.  He was a larger than life man, but he was giving her the vibe of something was wrong.  Instead of prodding as she normally would have, she remained silent and just leaned her body into him.  It wasn’t long before he spoke up.
“No regrets then?  I mean, now that you know it’s not working out with that other woman?”  He quizzed as he let his eyes lift while his head turned to look at her.
“None.”  She pulled him towards her, their bodies slowly intertwining on her couch until their mouths passionately began to kiss while their hands were touching each other in a reassuring manner.  Only moments passed until they both rolled apart to be laying next to each other on the couch.  Blakes hands held her from rolling off the couch, while his smile was telling her that Clay had left the room and their thoughts.  That is until he frowned and spoke up.
“Is it too soon for you?  A spring wedding?  Do you want to take your time on all of this?  I mean I get that you like planning everything, but do you need time?”
Calista quickly laid a kiss on his lips and then pulled back to situate herself to get up off the couch.  She wanted to change out of what she was wearing, but most importantly she wanted to drag her man back to her bed, make love, pack her weekend bag to stay at his house and discuss her moving in sooner rather than later.  The shop was covered for the next few days.  Other than the shelter fundraiser, she wanted to spend the next few days with her man, planning their wedding.  She had found a special wedding planner notebook and it was already filled with ideas, with help from some of her new best friends.  When she finally stood up, she looked down at him as he rolled onto his back on the couch to look at her with his hands behind his head.  He was unreadable at the moment.
“I don’t need time to think about anything.  I would marry you tomorrow, in fact, I would marry you tonight.  But first, you have to get me naked, so I can change clothes, so I can pack for a long trip to stay at your place the next few days.”
He smiled and started to sit back up on the couch as he looked up at her while she offered her hand for him to take.  “So, let me get this straight?  You need me to get you naked so you can change clothes?  You do know what I will do to you once I have you completely naked?”
“I do.  And I am counting on it.”  She turned her body to start to pull on him to drag him to her bedroom.  “Besides.”  She cast back a taunting flirtatious glance.  “I plan on convincing you for the next few days, that moving in together now, rather than later, would make our life so much more fun.”
In one fair swoop, Blake was up off the couch, and Calista was up over his shoulder, while he laid a few gentle pats on her behind.  “You naughty girl you, making plans to ravish me are you?”  His voice held such sexual laughter, yet the fact that he was strong enough to pick her up and carry her felt so insanely sexy to her.
She let her hand rest over and down to reach his butt and she laid a hard smack against his rear-end.  “Hope your well rested cowboy, cause this Kansas girl has the next few days planned with nothing but naked entangled bodies getting hot and sweaty.”
Blake softly set her on the bed as he quickly undressed.  The moment his naked body was gently climbing on top of hers, he had a look of pure joy on his face as he finally responded to her plans.  “I’ve got nothing but ideas on what to do to your naked body, Calista, but first I want to make love to my future wife.”
With the stroke of their naked bodies touching, neither of them gave another thought to the people in their lives before they met that caused such havoc.  For now, it was just them, just two lovers connecting and a grand new future ahead of them.
Nothing is as sweet of a revenge as no revenge at all, only the completion of success for the one they thought had fallen.  Seek not the revenge against those that did you wrong, seek only the power to succeed in what is right and makes you happy.  All else will fall into place.  That is why there is karma.
THE END
Author Note: This book and my other recently published book, Finding One To Call Her Own, have a special meaning to me.  Sweet Revenge has a little bit of me in it.  It was more of statement I would make to myself as soon as I got back into writing.  I took two years off from writing to grieve the loss of a loved one.  In the chaos of ugly matters, I found that sometimes the best revenge is none at all.  Sitting back and watching Karma do its thing is serendipitous.  In the matter of months of my loss, I chose to distance myself from those that acted worse than I ever thought possible.  I won’t deny there were moments that I imagined what I wanted to do to serve a platter of revenge on those that had tried to hurt me so.  But yet, my inner peace would not let them drive me down the dark and windy road of revenge.  Instead, I witnessed revenge upon their own doing, from afar, until one day I woke up and decided to forgive them, without their apology, forgive myself for letting this consume me in a way I could be spending that energy elsewhere.  That was my new super power.  That is revenge, in a better form – live the life that suits you; do not let the ones that hurt you, destroy the incredible you.  Instead, wish them well and let them deal with their own feelings that will arise once they realize what they have done, what they have lost.  Not everyone will offer forgiveness but forgive those that hurt you and you can find your own inner peace.  That is a much better way to live.
In this book, there are metaphors for roads taken, choices made, things undone, and there is plenty of revenge being served up.  Better to write about it, then to actually do it.  
Never piss off a writer, because they will cold cock you upside the head, run you off a steep cliff, knock you down the stairs, clog up your pipes, screw up your sewer system, and maybe even find a better life – all in imaginary fun of course.
Calista who contemplated doing more than she actually did, and quickly came to realize her time was being wasted on revenge.  She spent energy on finding ways of making revenge an art, only to realize, her time was better suited doing other things – like Blake.
When I am not writing, I am running a small business.  Unlike Calista, I don’t have just twenty hours a week of work.  When I can, I like to write, and novels take time, patience, and a whole lot of work that most readers can never comprehend, only other writers.  I can write three chapters, only to kill them off my screen and replace them with something better.  And that, is what my character does, she replaces her ex with someone better.  In the meantime, she replaced her damaged soul with a renewed sense of belonging once again to something she cherished.  That is what I have done.  I found peace and tranquility in doing the things I loved, taking back my life.
Be kind to others and burn the bridge of those that try to bring you harm.
Some might say take the high road, but always be looking in your rearview mirror for karma to kick their fucking ass.  And when it does, rip that rearview mirror off that car, toss it on the long dirt road called New Adventure, and just forget about them.  Life is short and can be sweet.  Its challenges will reward you but always remember that you are someone special and no one deserves to be treated poorly, mentally or physically.  Always ask for help if you find yourself in that deep dark place.  There are kind people everywhere and they just might be your new friends or family.
As a self-published author, I appreciate you taking the time to read my romance novels or erotic short stories.  Pleasing reviews and social media claps are always invited.  Kat
Other Available Books
FINDING ONE TO CALL HER OWN – Adult Romance Novel - Allie’s life was putting her in one testing predicament after another.  First her boyfriend cheats on her, then her car breaks down, and all the while her business is going belly up.  In better days, she could handle it, but as of right now, she felt like she had just lived the worse year of her entire life.  With a huge passion for movies and cupcakes, the two things that have always kept her sane, especially through a cheating boyfriend and a failing business, Allie wanted something to call her own.  Who would believe that this is the time for finding the perfect man and quite possibly a new business?  
THE GREY SUIT CLUB – Adult Romance Novel - In Felicity’s attempts to keep her career altering plan quiet, she does just the opposite by creating office gossip that might cost her the new client she brings to the firm.  Will she tell both men to stay out of her life, or will she decide with her heart for once?  An unconventional offer that leads into a sultry mix of business and pleasure while distorting the lines of corporate business structure to one woman’s advantage.  Fate, sexual pleasures, and exchanges can sometimes work out when only two are involved, yet sometimes a woman can feel lucky when there are choices for her to make.  
JUST ONE LOOK – Adult Romance Novel – Meeting the right man at the wrong time can all change with just one look.  Romance was the last thing on Melissa’s mind after a nasty divorce from a discovered cross-dressing husband and a crazy new boss.  However, some friendly adult mind erasing sexual fun sounded like just what she needed, that is until she finds herself falling in love with the man that can change her attitude with just one look.
SINFUL DESIRES – Erotic Short Stories. Some desires are so sinful; they make you want to explore the wild side. These short erotic romance stories have women who like to make their wicked pleasures a reality. They like to pick their man and seduce him while succumbing to their desires of pleasure.
BREATHLESS - Erotica Short Story - A desire so quick it flashes through her body like a jolt of intensity. The mere sight of him left her breathless every time she saw him. The images of their naked bodies intertwined in a heated mess caused her to take pause in what she was about to do.
CAUGHT - Erotica Short Story that starts right out with the devilish deed of high-powered sex with revenge. One woman's ambition to be caught by her ex having sex with a client is all too carefully thought out. The thrill of getting caught and seeking revenge is suddenly replaced with the true feelings she has for her client. Is it love at first sight that finally wins over her determination?
INTENSE - Erotica Short Story - The moment it happens, it is so intense that it will not be forgotten and the only thing you want is for it to happen again.  When a woman sees something she wants, that the desire drives her so insanely wild she will do just about anything when she gets it, she will succumb. Even if she must be a submissive lover, far different from her dominate nature.
SWEETLY INKED - Erotic Novella - From the moment the bet was made, the sexual attraction started. One simple dare, on live radio, could not be taken lightly. Being a woman of honor, not to mention the curiosity of the attraction to the man and his voice on air that proposed the dare, the loss of the bet would only be completed once her virginal skin was sweetly inked. How far will a woman take it?
SPANKED - Erotica Short Story - From the moment, the friendly bet between two neighbors was spoken; the flirtatious teasing transpired to the point of pleasure. The sexual attraction started months ago with a desire on both their parts to be so much more. One simple dare from his gorgeous mouth taunting her at a chance meeting in a nightclub had her so frazzled with anticipation. She wondered if she could take it lightly and 
REACTION - Erotic sexual situations in a romantic setting evolving into a short story to remember. Reaction happens when two elements combine and create an explosive nature of response. Celia spent the last two weeks dealing with the reaction between her body and her new coworker Conner. Somehow, he ended up here with her in her bed, naked and sated.
A YEARNING FOR MORE - Sometimes once is not enough. Being able to experience something over again with variety makes the spice of life even more exciting. Four Erotic Romance Short Stories, steamy sultry tales that ignite a warm passionate feeling within. What's your favorite spice - Dangerous Reaction, Misbehaving, Naughty Nighttime, or City Lights, what do you yearn for?
A WILD RIDE - Erotic Short Story - Passionate glances and short words exchanged were not the sexual satisfaction they were looking for. They both needed an explosive exchange of primal carnal sex to suffice their desires. What happens when their bodies ignite with passion and nothing stops them from pure sensual satisfaction? A willing desire to have more.
IMPULSE - Erotic Short Story - A sudden impulse to take some time away from her usual surroundings can land a woman in a situation that is filled with sexual desire and lust from long ago. When a man captures your attention and your desires are not fulfilled, your desire for him will only explode once you are given another chance. A remote cabin and an early-morning surprise are a chance at a destiny unfulfilled.
WANTING HIM - Erotic Short Story - Jade had this dream before, yet each time the dream was more explicit, enticing and erotic. Every time she woke from her seductive dream, she would replay the memory so fresh on her skin. There in her dreams she saw the man of her recent desires. His thick dark-brown hair styled professionally yet it held that sexy bad-boy appeal. His honey-brown eyes that would light up... 
SENSUAL - Six erotic filled romance short stories that will ignite the fire within. Sensual erotic stories with a touch of romance that will bring you a warm tingling feeling and enough passion to light your soul on fire. Each short erotic romance has a man, just for you. Can one air force pilot fulfill a woman's dreams of doing it while a mile high? 
ONE MORE TIME - Erotic Romance Short Stories in one book that will tantalize your steamy reading needs. Several stories of hot sexual desire, fulfilling you with yearning and fantasy. Each sensual story is written to entice your need for a romantic story that leads only to fulfillment with a romantic notion of sexual fantasy and tantalizing description of each steamy scene. Leave your worries behind and let the sensual play begin.
THE WILD ONE - Adult Mystery Novella - The Wild One is an adult mystery romance written for mature audiences. With a mystery to solve, a client to protect and a past that is catching up with one very sexy female with the call sign Malcolm, there is bound to be erotic suspense in the air.
TOUCHED - Erotic Romance Novella with bonus short story. Pleasuring a woman comes in all forms; this is something every man should know. However, when you are the employee of a very attractive boss, you have to take things slow, finding multiple ways to pleasure her, before you convince her, that you are all the man she needs. So much sex in such a short time can only lead to one thing.
SENSATIONS - Erotica Short Story - There is something about a man in uniform with the emblem of a hero, muscles so big and strong you want him to rescue you. Every woman fantasizes about a hero. Summer was about to meet hers. Over nine thousand words of erotic sexual fantasy evolving from self-satisfaction to lingering longings fulfilled, as an erotic short story unfolds. 
WILLING - Erotica Short Story - Freedom of desire can have a powerful effect upon a woman. When they see something they like, are they willing to release their inhibitions and succumb to sexual desires so strong? Perhaps shyness can keep one from attempting their desires that are aching to touch. 
PERFECT COWBOY – Book One – Romance Novel.  A heart-warming, sultry experience, of a modern cowboy romance. A down-home country girl who has been given the heart wrenching task of looking for the replacement for her boss, who has been like a dad to her all her life. His recent heart attack brought new meaning to everyone’s life at the ranch. Her true dream to marry the perfect cowboy might just come in the form of her new boss!
COSMOPOLITAN MAN - Book Two – Romance Novel.  Opposites attract yet when the attraction is this hot, you just have to add fuel to the fire instead of putting it out. One simple down to earth cowgirl can't seem to work this cosmopolitan millionaire out of her system. His international experience did not prepare him for the way his body reacted to someone as sexy and explosive as her. Just when he thought the deal was done... 
LUCKY CATCH - Book Three – Romance Novel.  Some woman just cannot help but fall for the dangerous badass. Some men think the only way to get the woman is to become that badass. All Claire wanted was a good man like Joe, after years of dating the dangerous ones. All Joe offered her was friendship. Little did she know that her sexy looks and sweet demeanor was all Joe could think about.
COWBOY KISS - Can one rodeo-winning cowboy steal the heart and kiss of one Daisy May? You bet your bucking bronco. This steaming duo finally take the chance to express their sultry attraction to each other, and in more ways or positions than you can count on. In a steamy shower, old barn, handmade custom kitchen table, or in front of the fire, these two find ways to make the ecstasy elevate. 
SANTA BABY - Holiday Adult Romance Novella What do mistletoe, a sizzling hot redhead and a smoking hot bartender do if thrust upon each other with undeniable lust? They meet in the middle of course. Instant attraction and lustful illusions can lead to something so wonderful during the magical time of year.

Legal: This is a fictional story with no reference to real people or places.  Any similar names are strictly coincidental and have been created in the authors mind for pure fun or reference.  If the story lists an actual city or state, all information in the story is purely reference or to give the reader a mental idea of the location but does not in any way dictate the true nature of that area.  Any reference in a story by this author that could be seen as prejudice is not a true semblance of the author's ideals, it is strictly to create a character in the story and allows the reader an idea of how that character might think or feel.  This book cannot be given away for free on any blog or computer reader site.  This book must be purchased from a reputable site that may list the book for free for a short promotional period.  Any blog or reader site that offers the free book must link the reader to a reputable site where they have to download directly to their reader, thus giving the author credit or payment for the receipt of this book. If you need to purchase any additional copies or have fraudulently downloaded the eBook and would like to do the respectable thing and pay the small price to purchase the book, please see my web page on Smashwords.com.  Any blog or eBook site that would like to use the book cover, synopsis or place an editorial review may do so within the legal limits.  Any slanderous hater type reviews will be challenged and asked to be removed.  All honest perspectives will be considered in future writings, however reading a book is like looking at art – to each his own.  If adult romance erotica is not your thing, please do not download the book and write a bad review as that is in bad taste.  All reviews on Smashwords.com are read and considered by the author, I do not have time to search all sites for all reviews.  If you want your review to be read and considered, please log on to Smashwords.com and leave your book review on my page.  This book, under no circumstances, should appear in print in any language except English.  If this book has been bought in another language, it is a forgery and therefore an illegal copy.  The author holds the rights to reprint this book with alterations under a different author name in order to reach a broader audience.  
Cover Art:  All photos used for any cover art for the Kat Von Wild books have been purchased for use from Big Stock Photos.  Any alterations to the purchased stock photo images was made by the cover artist to create a unique book cover from the original art and in no way was meant to deface the photo art purchased.  Each stock photo purchased came with rights to alter said photo for artistic purposes, such as cropping, color change, title placement, and additional Photoshop work as needed.
Title of the book: If the title of this book matches that of other books, it is in no way meant to replicate or simulate the other book or books.  This book was written in its entirety from the writer’s mind, as was the creation of the title to match the story of the book.  Under no circumstances, should the cover and title of this book match another book as it will be seen as a forgery and legal action will be pursued.  The cover artist altered the stock photo and created a unique book cover that should not be replicated.


Sweet Revenge
Romance Novel by Kat Von Wild
This book contains sexual content that is suitable for mature audience only.  Published at Smashwords.com and Copyright 2019 by Kat Von Wild  This eBook is licensed for your personal enjoyment only and strictly fictional.  All persons, places or incidences are creative endeavors of the author.  This eBook may not be re-sold or given away to other people.
Look for other titles by Kat Von Wild on your e-reader or at http://www.smashwords.com/profile/view/KatVonWild
Devious deceptions can lead a woman to do things she never imagined.  With a new life all planned out, a new business to grow, her past still haunts her.  Every scorned woman loves a bit of sweet revenge and with only one thing on her mind, Calista is about to find out what better things there are to concentrate on.  One tall, dark, and handsome just might make her revenge worth the forgetting. 
Table Of Contents
Chapter One
Chapter Two
Chapter Three
Chapter Four
Chapter Five
Chapter Six
Chapter Seven
Chapter Eight
Chapter Nine
Chapter Ten
Chapter Eleven
Chapter Twelve
Chapter Thirteen
Chapter Fourteen
Chapter Fifteen
Chapter Sixteen
Author Notes
Other Available Books

If there is one thing women know how to do, it’s revenge.  Mix revenge with a man that can make a woman change her mind with every orgasm he gives her, and Calista might keep coming back.  Things get heated between the sheets, while revenge is being served with a carnal twist to the ex that did her wrong.
Small business entrepreneur, Calista Miller, recently had her life shattered by extreme measures.  Best friend and husband don’t mix, and when they do, divorce is served up with a heaping platter of sweet revenge.  A fresh start with some calculated cold hard cash was Calista’s for the taking.  Will she screw it up by getting muddled in a sandpit of vengeance, or will one sexy stranger named Blake Jones, make her realize that her new life is sexually satisfying enough to forego the agony of retaliation.
Once a coffee shop owner in the Utah suburbs, Calista now finds herself in the middle of small-town Kansas, making new lifelong friends, while wondering if she could ever truly trust women again.  However, once they seek out her help for revenge on those that have done them wrong, in ways that the law should handle, she sees the camaraderie beginning in her new life.  It isn’t until a few strong women show her how revenge is not the way to a satisfying life, does Calista start to see a future without a thought to her ex.
Her list of revenge ideas was long but what started to motivate her in a positive way was the list of her ‘new life’ check list.  In a rush to get out of town, with her ex tied up to their old bedpost – naked, Calista’s sex with a stranger gets box checked on her newfound freedom bucket list.  She had no idea that it would bring her face to face with the man, daily, challenging her to rethink where her energy is best spent – revenge or between the sheets pleading oh yes, like that.  With the new stranger’s sexual suggestive ways, and hardworking hero reputation, will it stop at a one-night stand, or two, and will their last kiss goodbye, really be just that – the last kiss.
If ex’s turn into oh my god yes’s, what could be so wrong with a new life as a divorcee?
Chapter One
There’s no looking back now baby.
With one last look in her rearview mirror, Calista’s glaring bright blue eyes and ash blonde hair glanced at her reflection, as she settled back in her seat.  The vision of her white picket fenced covered in yellow climbing roses, situated in front of her perfectly manicured yellow and white house, left her with a sudden queasiness of confusion as she sat in the driveway with her car directed towards the street.  She shook that raw emotional attachment to her house aside as she knew the right thing to do was what she had planned for far too long and that was to move far away and fast.  Now that she had her lying cheating husband tied up in their old bed, she felt a rising bravado she needed to pull away from the scenario she once thought was forever.  Listening to the howling pleas from her ex from the upstairs bedroom window as her car window was rolled down, she smiled to herself thinking this was just the tip of the iceberg revenge she wanted to seek.
She pushed the up button for her window, turned up the volume of her satellite radio station to hard rock, put her black cat eye sunglasses on her face, and put her car in reverse.  
The pleading sounds of his voice replayed in her head as she drove down the street that she had driven on for so many years as a faithfully married woman.  “Calista!  Please!  I beg of you.  This is not funny.  You can’t leave me here, naked, tied up to our bed.  Can you?  Calista?”
But she could, and she did.
The divorce papers were signed and filed, the house was sold, the furniture – what she had not sold, the movers would take to his new place, and their son who recently graduated from high school was taking planned time off before college to travel through Europe.
This wasn’t some fly by night incident.  Nope.  Calista knew from the moment she married her husband that his wandering eye might be a problem.  However, she was raised to rear her man like she should rear her child; keep them in line when they stray.  But this time he had strayed just a little too close to home for her liking. 
From the moment she caught on that an affair was stirring between her husband and supposedly best friend, she took measures into her own hands.  She plotted, schemed, and did things her upper class Ivy League Society mother would never approve of – God rest her soul.  It must have been the genes from her fly by night biker father that Calista never met, that caused her to act so callously, then again, cheating on their marriage with her best friend, behind her back, revenge came easy.
Dressed in only a black tee shirt, dark casual jeans and black kickass boots, she had her medium length long blonde hair up in a ponytail, however her painted face for alluring sex with the ex was still on her face.  She left the black negligee on the bed as a reminder for Clay and dressed as fast as she could to get out of their old bedroom before he could talk her into letting him out of the handcuffs – boy he had tried in the few minutes it took for her to get dressed.
The minute she dropped her silver Honda CRV off at the dealership that was buying it from her, she had a plan to put in motion mixed with a full steam of revenge putting her on the fast track to a new life.  
The Car Mart that offered her a written bid for her CRV was only blocks away.  The Uber ap on her phone was going to arrange for her to be picked up as soon as she put in the request time.  The check should already be cut.  She only had papers to sign and then she would have the Uber car take her to her storage lot, where her truck she paid cash for, sat loaded with all her boxed up personal belongings along with her new cell phone.  There was no way Clay was going to track her down after she just did what she did, at least not in the immediate future.  Although, their son Cole, would eventually need to contact her.  But at least for the first few days, until she got her bearings in her new life, she wanted no way for that man, or her ex best friend, to find her.  No way.
She turned into the Car Mart parking lot and turned her car off.  The female buyback agent she was dealing with was currently standing out front smoking a cigarette.  This was not the first time she sold a car to Car Mart, as it made getting a new car so much easier than trying to sell herself.  She knew the drill; it would be quick and painless.  And in just a few hours, she would have her new truck out of storage loaded with what little she wanted to bring from her old life to her new one.
Her new life included a check list of revenge, all the way to success marked as - make them regret the day they betrayed you darling.  First up was getting settled into her new place, a loft apartment above her newly acquired coffee shop – two states away.  Then came making the business successful along with a few personal upgrades.  All the while, tormenting her betrayers with occasional revenge strategies that could never, would never, be linked back to her.
Somewhere on that list of get it done, you’re a free woman now, was to have reckless abandoned sex with total strangers.  The kind of sex where you meet a man, in a bar or bookstore, she did not care, and you make an irresistible flirtatious offer.  That was something her high society upbringing never allowed her to do, and now that her time had come, she was going to do those wicked things she never got to, before it was too late.
At thirty-nine, Calista had found the life of a doting wife and mother, along with being a successful coffee shop owner, quite content.  Sure, she had thought something exciting was missing from her life, but then again, didn’t a lot of older adults feel that way.  Life had rolled on, sometimes with uphill struggles and midlife battles, only to be tampered down with a success here or there.  That all changed the moment she caught her best friend Stephanie, kissing her husband Clay, at a five-star hotel in the heart of downtown.  Making out like two long lost lovers seeing each other for the first time.  Everything in her life stopped at that moment.  She felt as if she just jumped out of the roller coaster cart and fell flat on her face, all the way down to the ground while internally screaming – no...
It might have taken her a few years to gather her bearings, two of them to be exact as she made plans in secrecy to take him for all she could before divulging the tormenting secret.  In those two years, Calista had often hoped that Clay would come around and dump Stephanie, all the while she had hoped Stephanie would get run over by a train, or maybe a large trash truck – now that would be spectacular.  Neither of those lovely ideas took place.  Instead, she made plans, sold everything off she could without anyone noticing.  Jewelry that Clay gave her for gifts through the years, valuable antiques she bought whenever her sad mood struck her and she over shopped, a rare coin collection that her grandfather gave her, and her alone, after her wedding, telling her that if she ever needed some get out of town cash, the coins were worth more than she could imagine, which they were.  She put all her money in her Aunts account, and started planning a new life, one she would execute the day the papers were signed.  She had always been a planner, but these plans she made, she would have given everything up for Clay to admit his wrong doings and promise to never do it again.
The moment Clay admitted to the affair, with Stephanie by his side, as if they were proud of their accomplishments, Calista no longer cared about forgiveness or working it out.  Her entire mindset reared its ugly head and drove as fast as it could down the highway named Revenge.
Calista found that turning forty soon had its benefits and its faults, however, being just shy of her actual fortieth birthday, she had to wonder if she could have done a better job of keeping her marriage intact?  One singular word mentally echoed out into the hollows of her now empty storage unit; ‘nah’.
With her black F-150 truck loaded with only ten large boxes of personal items, most of them new clothes she bought for herself the first year after the affair started, she was ready to head to her new place.  Therapy shopping had always been an escape of hers, but shopping for clothes that you were not even going to wear until the divorce was done, somehow had felt even more gratifying while charging them to your soon to be ex-husband’s credit card and telling him that you bought him a new business suit or two in his closet.  Luckily for her, he was never good at paying attention to those kinds of things.
The drive to her new place in Darling Kansas was going to be long.  She had every intention of driving straight through.  Sitting next to her twelve pack of Monster energy drinks was a brown envelope; it held the keys to her new apartment and lease papers.  She had never met the landlord but when she bought the coffee shop business from the previous owner with her Aunt, over a year ago, she inquired about the empty place upstairs.  After a quick look around, it held all the bare bones of a fun brick industrial looking loft and back then had hoped it would still be available by the time she rolled into town and claimed her coffee shop.  Luckily for her, it was.
With the business signed over to her silent corporation from her Aunt, the apartment was ready to move in, and the previous coffee shop owner had only a few months left on her commitment to run the place until she could move here and be settled in.  It was time for her to stake her claim in Darling, Kansas, and make a fresh start with her life.
Part of her new life was a huge slice of pie called revenge.  Part two of her revenge plan needed to be set into motion.  Clay had to be wondering if she was going to send someone to untie him.  Which, she was.  She closed the storage door, grabbed the no trace disposable cellphone, and she dialed in the local police department for her house. 
“Nine one one, what is your emergency?”  A calm female voice answered.
“Is this the Salt Lake City Utah emergency?”
“Yes mam, what is your emergency?”
“This is Joan Fraser at 4219 Elm Street and I just noticed a strange man breaking into a house across the street that just sold.  I think he’s in the upstairs master bedroom.  I just saw him in the window a moment ago.  Strange man, brown hair, slender build, average height.  He’s wearing a business suit.”  Calista calmly offered up as she snickered to herself; he was wearing a business suit before she convinced him that sex one last time with his ex was a great idea.  Which he was totally agreeable to until she slipped handcuffs onto him that were attached behind the metal post of their bed.  Luckily for Calista, her neighbor Joan was happy to back her up but not actually put the call in.  If only she could be there to see the look on his face as the cops come into their old house to discover a naked man on their old bed – the bed she left him in the settlement because Stephanie was bold enough to tell her that they had sex on it, more than once.
Just about the time the police show up, a courier was going to show up at her ex best friend’s business, a whole in the wall art gallery that she ran downtown.  In the courier package, held a video on a sim card of their consensual sex along with dated photographs, slick glossy eight by tens of sex they had over the last three years.  There was enough proof there to let Stephanie realize that all she really is to Clay is another piece of ass.  He liked the thrill of the play, the allure of chasing a married woman, the ability to screw two women at once, but what he probably would not like is the actual commitment that Stephanie was expecting out of him when the dust settled.  And now that he had to pay an alimony check to Calista every month for a large portion of his income, Calista could bet that Stephanie was regretting her decision to sleep with a married man for the last time.
After hanging up the disposable cell phone once she was reassured that the police were on their way, Calista avoided answering anymore questions.  That was what her neighbor Joan was for.  Joan had always disliked Clay from the minute they met over fifteen years ago when they moved into that house.  The cute adorable upscale suburbia home, yellow with white trim and the complete white picket fence.  It was cottage adorable, but now it felt like a horror show.  Although, to be honest with herself, there were some incredible memories in that house and neighborhood, it was just that Clay and Stephanie’s affair tarnished most of those incredible memories.  Calista could only imagine how many times those two stole away for a kiss or more.
The moment the sim card was out of the cellphone and on the highway, Calista knew there was no tracing the call back to her.  Or so she hoped.  That was why over a year ago, she found evidence that Clay had been stealing from the bank he works for.  That proof alone, was used as a negotiation for making the divorce end in her favor.  Not to mention the fact that she threatened him that if anything happened to her, the information would get to his employer at the bank.
There was a long list of revenge she was going to take from this moment on that could never be linked back to her, but for now, the biggest two pieces of the divorce puzzle just got put in their place.
Sometimes you must give people a taste of their own medicine.
Chapter Two
One sip, then two.
The coffee shop was just like she left it, one year ago when her Aunt Caroline and herself visited the current owner to enquire about purchasing it for Calista’s future.  Darling was a small to mid-size town in the heart of the states, yet it was growing at an increased rate over the last few years.  Which, not that the middle of flat lands had always been her ideal place to settle down for a bit, but it was a short half day drive from where her Aunt, who was like a mother to her, lived.  This business was the closest productive coffee shop available, and it made sense, at the time, because starting from scratch was too much to deal with. 
The town’s base of clients would be middle class like herself, well at least like she is now.  Clay and she had done well for themselves, and she had been raised by a rich mother, but her father, biological father whom she never met, was a low income man, or so her mother had said several times; which put Calista in the mindset of she is middle class, not upper class, not poor due to her retirement fund, but just where all the folk she liked to hang with was at – normal class as she commonly joked about it.
Business seemed average, but it could be better.  She had a plan to spruce the place up, change the name, spark the town’s interest a bit in her business and perhaps a bit in her.  She had plans of select promotions to the ones that would most likely frequent her shop.  For her, it really wasn’t so much about making a ton of money, but more about making a success of the shop.  This was going to be her business, her home, for the next few years until she reached her goal of over a million dollars in her retirement, which she was getting close, and then after that, she had visions of finding a nice non-cheating man to settle down with and perhaps, travel around the world together.  Seeing as her goal was to do this by fifty-five, she still had a bit of saving to do, however, if the stock market stayed bullish, and all her other investments paid off, the last two hundred and fifty thousand she got from her share of the house, was going into investments.  She has always been a saver by all means, and a spender when pissed off.  Clay had pissed her off, and boy did she spend while still married to him, but that tab was on their marriage expenses.  Now she would save, and make do with a lot less, putting her closer to her retirement goals.  Taking two steps at a time to get there if she could.
By five o’clock in the evening, the next day, she had pulled into the back of her now closed coffee shop, only stopping for a few hours rest at a Travel Inn.  She had felt exhaustion in her bones, yet the excitement of a new life was marching her forward.  She wanted to do all she could tonight, and then wake up tomorrow with absolute good intentions of a new life.  The coffee shop was closed by three so, Calista was glad to wait until tomorrow to introduce herself to the staff and get her feet wet with the business.  As she pulled into the alleyway, where the entrance to the loft apartment was just up a set of industrial metal stairs, she saw the two guys she hired off Craigslist.
She parked the truck after reversing it towards the stairs.  She got out and offered out her hand to introduce herself to both of the young teenage men.  “Shaqeem and Malek Forest?”
“Yes mam.”  Both of them spoke up while taking turns to shake her hand gently.
“I’m Calista Miller.  The new owner of the coffee shop, but also the new renter up those stairs.  I promised you that I would pay you forty each to move the boxes from the truck to the apartment.  You cool with that?”
“Yes mam.”  They both spoke up again with big white straight I’ve already done the braces teeth smiles beaming in contrast to their darker skin.  She put their age somewhere around late teens, and by the work wanted ad in the local Craigslist listing she had a feeling she might need their help at the shop every so often.  Their reference of their mother as the bank manager checked out when she called her a few days ago.
“Awesome.  Listen, tomorrow, I’ve got a furniture delivery that will be coming in that I could use help with.  You said you live close to here.  Mind if I call or text you when that comes in?  I need the furniture brought upstairs and three things need to be put together, the boxes broken down and taken to the recycle place.  Twenty an hour each?  Interested?”  Calista offered up. 
This time, their yes mam held much more enthusiasm.  By the time they got the boxes up and cash in hand, Calista had learned they attended high school just down the street, their dad managed the Ace Hardware two blocks over and their sister who just turned sixteen was graduating early with honors and was accepted into an elite IT school for gifted programmers.  They had talked her ear off, hauling the heavy large boxes up the stairs, for which she had struggled to get in her truck with a dolly and ramp.  
She looked around the empty industrial loft style apartment and imagined how just a few simple female touches, and a lot of long luxurious draping, and the place would be hip, to her anyways.  For now, she was hungry, and her cooler of snack foods held no appeal.  She wanted a meal and a beer or two, and decided to hit the place she saw just on the edge of town coming in; it was a bit out of the way back but a place where no one might ask too many questions, seeing as she did not have all her answers in place – but she would soon.
Finnigan’s neon green light was flashing on and off for a few seconds as if to say stay away, but Calista knew that it meant the neon sign repair man needed to come out soon.  The parking lot held about fifteen or so trucks, and several small two and four door cars.  All in all, about forty cars wrapped around the painted dark green sided building.  She decided to park towards the back with the other trucks.
The moment she walked into the pub, she found an empty bar stool off to the right side of the main bar, not too far from the lady’s room, and far enough from the regular tables, she felt she would have a nice view of the room for people watching; something she found soothing over the last year of her chaos.
The brunette female bartender greeted her with a big smile, sparkling cider brown eyes, thick lashes, full thick lips that sounded out a sincere greeting as she laid the bar coaster down on the counter.  “What can I get you?”
Calista had always been a wine drinker, something her and Stephanie shared a passion about.  She briefly let the memories of their planning wine country tours steal a few brain cells while she cleared her throat and replied with her new drink.  “Honey whiskey, ginger ale with a twist of lime, on the rocks.”
“Coming right up love.”  The cheerful charisma of the waitress lingered after she smiled at her and turned to make her drink.  There was an instant connection, friend connection, one that she would proceed with utmost caution as any female friend of late had let her down.
Calista tapped her fingers on the counter.  She still had on the same clothes from yesterday, her hair was down and still held a bit of wave to the curls she had put into it for the seduction of Clay.  However, her makeup had faded, and her mascara was starting to flake that caused her to blink one of her eyes.  That blinking must have made the older drunk gentleman three seats over on the bar think that she wanted him to come to her.
“Sho, howza bout I buyz youz a drink?”  He slurred with a bit of alcohol and cigarette to his breath.
Calista gave him a flat line smile and replied with ease.  “I’m meeting someone here.”
He slurred something out and got up, while leaving his glass stein of beer on the counter and headed to the men’s bathroom.
Calista slid his beer mug a few seats back where he had been sitting hoping he would forget all about her when she got back.
“Who you meeting, darling?”  The bartender asked as she put her drink on the coaster.
“Anyone but him.”  She joked back.
“I hear ya.  Hungry?  We’ve got a club sandwich special, homemade chicken noodle soup, or some great hamburger specials.”  She slid a menu on the bar top towards her.
“Yes!”  The enthusiasm filled her voice as she had eyed the shelled peanuts on the bar as something that she might consider eating just to get food in her.  “Starved actually.  Just drove straight through from Utah since yesterday.  I’ll take the club sandwich special.”
“Chips or fries?”
“Chips.  No, fries.”  Calista answered smiling.  “Sorry, a bit lagging on decision making these days.”
“I hear ya.  Want a small cup of soup until the sandwich is ready?  On the house.  Jackie, by the way.”
“Calista.”  She offered her hand to the woman.  The moment they shook hands, something about the woman seemed familiar and friendly.  This was a good sign to her new life.  She hoped.
Jackie quickly turned, keyed in her order to her computer, walked to the back soup and salad bar, poured some chicken noodle soup into a cup, placed it on a plate with a spoon and a few packages of crackers.  When she returned, she set it down and smiled while taking the towel bar off her shoulder and wiping the spot where drunk man’s beer had settled for a brief moment.
“What part of Utah are you from?”  She asked gingerly.
“Salt Lake.  But I’m now a Darling resident.  Just bought the coffee shop down on main; going to live in the apartment above for a while.  Just making new roots.”  Calista offered up with enthusiasm.
Her eyebrows raised, and a smile crept up as she flipped the towel back over her shoulder and put one hand on her hip.  “What’s wrong with the old roots?”
“Lying cheating ex-husband and ex-best friend.”  Calista whispered out as she took a packet of crackers and crumbled them before opening onto her soup.  Jackie’s eyes opened wide in surprise and sorrow as Calista took her first spoonful of soup.  The chicken broth full of flavor mixed with homemade noodles left her with a feeling of home, her old home, her old homemade soup she made for her ex-husband and son so many times on cold winter nights.  Today, it felt homey.  It was as if this was her first meal in a new place and she would remember it.
“Ouch.”  Jackie offered up while watching Calista approve of the homemade soup.  “Best leave those two to their own accord.  Karma will take care of them.”  She turned her attention to a new couple that just came up to the bar.
As Calista ate her meal, she thought about what Jackie said. There was no way in hell she could just let those two go live their life, free of any agony like they imposed upon her.  She had her initial revenge, and it was sweet.  However, she had a Pinterest private board full of revenge ideas she was going to let loose on those two, one month at a time.  It was her revenge of the month idea.  Each month, both of them, at different times, would get a different revenge that they could not connect back to her.  This way, their son Cole, would not get upset, and Stephanie was such a believer in Karma that she might think that the shit was happening to her for betraying her best friend.
By drink three, her meal was mostly eaten, and the pub was losing its dinner crowd for its midweek evening drinkers, Calista knew she should stop drinking, however her new choice of drink was feeling smooth to her mood and her internal defense of they were small glass servings let her decide to order a last one.  “One more, and then I’ll call it quits and head to my new empty apartment.”  Calista offered her empty drink in the air to Jackie.  They had been chatting on and off.  Jackie was a single mom of a little boy and had a little experience with revenge on an ex-boyfriend that left her for another woman while pregnant; that woman shot him dead.  Come to find out he was married all along – so three women scorned and one man down.  After he got killed, Jackie decided to take the high road that Calista did not see herself traveling.
The moment her last ordered drink was placed in front of her, the sound of a man’s thick timbering voice filled the air in a greeting fashion to other patrons.  She turned to see a man with dark brown hair, cut short, and a very nice muscular build, give a wave to another guy leaving with a woman out the door.  The second he turned to the bar, he looked straight at her and smiled.  His smile turned her insides to mush.  She looked away and took a sip of her drink while mentally rethinking about the image of the man she just exchanged glances.  His features were that of a strong man with a presence, and by the way people reacted to him, he appeared to be well liked, and well known.
With three more sips underway, Calista watched him out of the corner of her eye as he sat at the bar one seat away, telling Jackie what he wanted to drink.  She felt this undeniable pull of attraction to him.  Firm muscles, nice jawline, light green eyes, she thought.  She glanced quickly and then back to her drink.  She took a long sip.  He had a distinct smell of some manly like soap, not a heavy cologne but a musky clean smell.  She took another sip thinking how just his presence next to left her with sexually stirred feelings.
Calista set her glass down and took a deep breath in while her mind went to a dark place – sex with a stranger.  But how did she go about it?
Within seconds he turned to her and smiled while staring at her.  The moment she glanced up from her drink that she kept holding with her hands wrapped around the glass as if it was a safety thing, she looked at him and smiled.
“Blake Jones.”  He offered his hand.
She looked at his large hands and saw the hands of a man that used his hands for living.  “Cali.”  She offered back her old nickname she used to go by without a confirmation of her last name, besides, Jones was probably a fake last name.  The moment she took his hand in hers, she felt it, something tingly, sexy, or her fourth drink was getting her tipsy in less than two hours.
Jackie set his cut glass drink on the counter, gave them both a smile and turned to help another customer.  She was getting busy, and Calista knew she should be heading back to her new place.
She watched him take a sip of his drink, which looked to be a Jack and Coke.  He had strutted into the bar like he owned the place but was dressed casually in jeans and a black tee shirt like herself.  His work boots told her that he probably did some kind of construction for a living, thus the large strong hands, ones that she began to mentally envision cupping her breasts, while his mouth dribbled kisses on her neck, and his naked body was pressing against her.  She cleared her throat and turned to glance around.  She saw the entrance to the lady’s room that was darker than the rest of the place, with a sign pointing to the storage room.  She mentally did a thought of sex with a stranger in a storage room, on a crowded week night at a bar – wondering if that was even conceivable from herself?
“What are you drinking?”  He asked her as she glanced back at him with heavy breathing after mentally envisioning the man stripping her naked, and passionately brought her to orgasm.
For a brief second, she swore he asked what was she thinking, sex of course, but then realized he said drinking.  She raised her eyebrows and looked down at her glass still half full while clearing her throat; she felt nervous sexual energy between them, the kind she had not experienced since she had her first time back in high school – Clay had not been her first and would not be her last.  A wicked smile curled her lips and she replied.  “Honey whiskey and ginger ale.”
“Um, a whiskey woman.  I like that.  Jack is my guy.”  He winked.
He was flirting with her, or so she thought.
“You from around here?”  He asked her.
“Utah.”  She replied with a smile still tingling on her face as she kept envisioning his lips, manly lips, sucking on her tit, her neck, her wet spot between her legs which was only getting wetter the longer he looked deep into her blue eyes as if he too was envisioning what she was mentally experiencing.
She watched him take a long sip of his drink that emptied half of his short crystal glass.  He waved to Jackie and caught her attention.  “Two more.”  He signaled at his and Calista’s glass.  Her glass had plenty left, and was her last drink, however, she did not want to be rude.
“So, Utah?  How’s your day been?”  He drawled out in a sexy matter of fact kind of way which caused her body to tingle.  She supposed that he thought calling her Utah instead of Cali was cute.  Perhaps he forgot her name.
“Cali?”  She offered with a smile.
“I remember.”  He drank back the last of his drink and set it down with a smile that said, darling I can make you one happy woman.
She glanced over his body and then back to his eyes.  His physique was fit, manly fit, with broad shoulders, trim waist, nice legs by what she could tell with the way his jeans filled out.  He was flirting, and she really had no desire to rush back to an apartment where she had planned on pumping up an air mattress and rolling out a sleeping bag as her bed for tonight.
“Well, Kansas…”  She teased back.  “My day has been productive, how about yours?”  
“Can’t say it’s been bad, had better, but then it’s only Wednesday and I am more of weekend kind of guy.”  He casually tossed out while looking over her body once more.
Jackie approached them with two drinks and a huge smile.  They both nodded their heads to Jackie and tossed out a ‘thanks’ in unison as she turned to walk away.
Calista took a long sip of her drink and thought, Uber could drive her home.  The moment her empty glass set on the countertop; his hand reached over to touch hers.  “Save my seat.  I need to grab something.  Please don’t leave.  I’m not done talking to you.”  His last sentence drawled out slow and sinful, just like the mental orgasm she could only imagine he could give her.
He took a big sip of his new glass of whiskey and drank most of it back.  When he set his glass down, his eyebrow raised, his eyes glanced over her body, and he smiled that wicked smile that warmed her insides.  He turned from getting up from his stool and she watched him walk towards the back-storage room, because the men’s bathroom was on the other side of the bar.
She reached for her new drink, slammed it back with a huge gulp, and then shivered from the rush of the alcohol.  She waved her credit card at Jackie and had a decision to make.
The moment Jackie approached her with a smile, she had a feeling something was up.  “Blake’s got it.”
“He does?”
“Yeah.  I know him.  He owns part of this bar.  You can thank him in the storage room, where he is most likely grabbing a bottle of Jack to take home.  Big weekend fishing trip.  Leaves tomorrow and won’t see the guy back until Sunday.  Does it all the time.”
I guess Blake doesn’t work that much, Calista thought to herself.  “I should go thank him.”  She stood up and wavered for a second while a slightly buzzed smile creased her face.
“You should.”  Jackie smiled back and then turned to help a customer.
Calista grabbed her purse and pulled a ten out to tip on the counter.  She turned herself towards the direction of where she knew Blake to be, but wondered, if he kissed her, would she kiss back.  Staring in his direction, she remembered the way his words rolled off his tongue like a flirtatious invitation, the way his eyes roamed her body, he was interested.  It felt good to have a man want her this way, and if sex with a stranger got checked off her list, well so be it.
The ladies room was on the way.  She stopped in there to pee and freshen up, wasting a few minutes.  If he was still in there, she would thank him with a kiss.  If he wasn’t, she would pass by him, and wish Kansas, aka Blake, a good evening.
The moment, the heavy storage door opened, the sound of two men talking filled the room.  They both stopped and turned to look at Calista.  Blake’s green eyes traveled her body again like he was undressing her.  
“I’m sorry.  Jackie told me to come back here and thank you.”  She stumbled out not quite sure how to handle this situation.
“See you Sunday night Blake.”  The short round gray haired man padded him on the shoulder and then turned to leave the room.  “Night miss.”
“Good night.”  She offered up not quite sure what to think or say.
Blake held up a travel size bottle of Jack Daniel’s Honey Whiskey.  “I was having a hard time finding this.”
She took a few steps inside and blinked.  “Jackie said you got my meal, and drinks.  However, I am happy to pay you back.”
“Nonsense.”  He offered her the bottle of honey whiskey and nodded his head as if to say take it.
“Thanks.”  She slipped it into her black shoulder bag and stood there unsure as to what to do next.
He turned to a large stack of thick cardboard boxes of alcohol behind him and took one off to set on the floor and then he turned.  “You’re welcome.  Sorry, I thought I said that, but I guess my mind was elsewhere.”
She raised her eyebrows and frowned.  “I completely understand.”
He took a step towards her which landed within inches of her body.  Sexual heat stirred within her as his fingers went under her chin and lifted her head up to look into his eyes.  “Do you?”
Do I what?  Calista rambled inside her head while not replying with her voice, instead she opened her mouth hoping his lips would drop to hers.
The moment they did, her purse slipped off her slumped shoulder and her hand caught it to set on the floor, all the while his hands wrapped up into her hair, his lips still pressed and pursuing her to deepen the kiss.  The moment she let her hands wrap up behind his head, the kiss deepened.  Their tongues touched, the whiskey flavors exchanged and twirled in a magical dance.  Their breathing became heavy and their lips parted for only a second to reconnect with just a twist of each other’s head.
She liked the feel of his hand on her neck, the way his smell filled her nostrils, the slight buzz of alcohol causing her to not feel so cautious anymore, instead allowing her mind to wander to the possibility of naked sultry sex as her hands yearned to touch other parts of his body.  
She felt her hands reach for his shirt, her fingers flitter over his stomach muscles which twitched for just a second.  As soon as she had his shirt off with his help, he was reaching for her black tee shirt and it only took him seconds to have it over her head and on the floor next to his.  Leaving her in a black lace bra that unclasped in the front, and one very sexy well-muscled man in front of her half naked.
Their kissing went back to passionate senseless need and desire when laughter from outside the storage room roared with a female crackle.  Blake pulled away and put his finger up.  “Hold that thought.”  He took quick strides to the storage door and locked it with a click to the side.  He turned back to Calista who by now was wondering how far she really wanted to take this.  One long hard look at his upper naked body, his muscles, the curve of muscles that indented at his hips, something Clay never had, she let out a stuttered breath and realized - all the fucking way.
Within seconds, he had her backed up against the stack of heavy cardboard boxes.  He was kissing her neck and sliding his fingers around her left breast to find her bra clasp.  Her nipples hardened with excitement at his lingering touch.  Her bra was unhooked, his hot wet mouth found her taut nipple as her head tilted back, her eyes went upwards in pleasure and a moan escaped her mouth to match her feelings.  Thank fucking God, a man built to make her moan.  A slow easy “yes…” hissed out of her lips in a sultry vibration. 
The moment some cool air rushed over her wet licked nipples, she turned attention from the ceiling of the storage room to the side of Blake’s head that was now licking and sucking on her neck as his hot breath sounded excited; his manly presence wet her core.  
She craved this, wanted it, hell it was top of her new life bucket list.  Complete stranger, those words dangled in her brain.  He was part owner of the bar, not a complete stranger.  People seemed to know him well, but it’s a fair size town, how much would their paths cross?  However, that fear faded fast as her shoes and jeans were now being worked off her at a pace of a hungry man.  His lips kissed her belly, her inner thigh, and then gently kissed her recently tended pussy, all bald and smooth for her seduction for Clay, was now actually being touched and kissed by a man she knew for only a brief few words.  Yet, the way his fingers parted and licked her for a brief second, she did not care about Clay, about Stephanie for that matter, she just cared about careless fun sex with a stranger – in the storage room of a bar?  Then again, beggars can’t be choosers.
“Blake?”  She heard her voice betray her as her mind wrapped around the fact that she was in a sexual fantasy of sultry touch while completely naked in front of a stranger.  Her next words surprised herself as it made Blake smile.  “Fuck me.”
He stood back up from bringing her pleasure between her legs as he mustered out the words with a cocky smile.  “I intend to.”  He pulled a condom packet from the back pocket of his jeans and tossed it on the stack of heavy cardboard boxes behind her.  
As he started to remove his shoes and jeans, she toyed with him.  “Come prepared often?”  It was as if her mind and mouth were not working together.
“Not really.  Compliments from Randy.”  His shoes banged against a box off to the side as his jeans were being pushed down.
“Randy?”  Her breath sounded lustful as she caught her first glimpse of his well-built legs; legs that were sturdy, full of muscle and nothing like Clay’s pigeon legs she always thought he had.
“Yeah.  The guy that just left, the owner.”  Those words filled the room but not Calista’s ears, because her eyes were now on the nice size of Blake’s cock, and he was rolling the condom on while her legs spread on their own.
The was a mere second pause between them as he stood before her, hard cock, muscled body, a few years younger than her but that was not important.  What was important was the way her mind thought of nothing but sex and lust for the first time in over three years.  She was leaning naked against a stack of boxes in a storage room, legs slightly open, mouth practically drooling, eyes glazed over with lust, and all she wanted to do was beg for this man’s mercy with throws of passionate yes and more oh yes.
His first move was to kiss her again, kiss her senseless while his one hand held her face, his other hand lingered over her body, between her legs, touching her wetness and then dipping in.
She felt herself cave from his touch of his finger inside her, his lips kissing her neck now, his mouth sucking and moving over the sensitive area under her ear.  His heavy lustful breathing feeling her ears as she heard another passionate moan escape her lips.  It was a moan of pent up frustration, a nasty divorce, betrayal and anger, that wanted to scream out and escape, yet, instead, a soft heavy stuttered sigh mixed with an ‘oh yes’ sound filled her ears.  She was not in control of her body – Blake was.
The moment he stopped kissing her, his finger left her, his hands dropped to her ass and with slight bent knees he picked her up and placed her on the box.  “Perfect.”  He announced to no one but himself.  She had to wonder, the minute he walked in the room, was he scouting for the best place to have sex?  Who cares, she internally mustered as he was back to kissing her, placing himself between her parted knees, and letting his hands have their fill of her body.
“Fuck me, Blake.”  She moaned into his ear; her eyes barely closed as a vision in her mind whirled with erotic fantasy come true as the sensation of how all this risky sex felt.  Although the door was locked, she had never had sex in a public place before.  After tonight, she could check two things off her list.
His lips left hers as his hand placed itself just under her butt cheek, while his right hand grabbed his cock and guided it into her.  With the movement of his hands pulling her in and up onto him, they both moaned out in pleasure from the sensation.
There was no talking, thinking, just heavy breathing, touching, from both of them, as his thick hard cock slid in and out of her wet pussy.  All the while, the only sound other than the distant patrons on the other side of the door, was a distinct clinking of glass shifting in the box beneath her as he leaned against the boxes for leverage, competing with their heavy breathing of satisfaction.
She felt her breasts gently slide against his chest as she started to lean backwards a bit, causing her head to tilt back as her pleas of more pleasure left her lips.  She cast a glance up into his eyes that were now focused on her but fighting the urge to come first.  His pace quickened; his arm muscles were beginning to bulge from the work of holding her average frame.  The weight of his body slamming against her, touching sensitive parts of her, and the fact that she was doing something so sultry and sinister on her first true night of freedom, made her mouth plead and beg for more.
“Oh my god, Blake, yes, please, yes, like that, I need this.”  She burst out with a plea as her brain shut off, her toes curled while the magical electric currency woman know and love as orgasm, something she had not felt in a very long time – pulsed through her veins like the sweet elixir she craved.
With only a few more push pull strides of his cock, he slammed against her, groaned out a sound resembling a hissing yes, before his sweaty forehead rested against hers, curling a bit of his body away from her.  That was when she heard him whisper something that made her smile.  “I like Utah, you’re pretty fucking spectacular.”
A light laughter filled her lungs and escaped her mouth in a careless fun filled way.  It was joined by Blake’s manly chuckle.  They had accomplished something she never thought she could or would do.  And in her lifetime, she always wondered, what it would be like; now she will never wonder again, only crave it over and over.
In the short time that it took for both of them to regain their composure, in a bit of awkward silence, they got dressed.  Blake handed her purse to her and pointed to the back door off to the side.  “I don’t know if you want to go back out front.  I take it that head shaking thing means no.”
She laughed softly with a smile curled upon her lips.  “Not really.  Although, it’s a quaint little pub I’ll never forget.”
“Let me walk you to your car.”  He offered.
“Truck.”  She replied quickly.
He shrugged his shoulders as if to say potatoes, pah-ta-toes.
She watched him unlock the storage room door and grab his cellphone out of his pocket.  He texted something quickly and then slid the phone back in his back pocket.  His hand touched the small of her back, leading her to the back door.  “I’ll follow you out Utah, I’ve got this thing to get ready for.  Jackie knows the storage room is available if she needs to restock.”
She motioned her head in acknowledgement.  She didn’t think heavy conversation was needed.  He wore a condom, she was willing, and quite frankly very able.  He thought she was from Utah, and if he ever stopped in her coffee shop, he would find out that she was now Kansas.
Nothing surprised her more when he turned her around at her truck, dropped another kiss on her as if to say he could go again, which she could easily have done, however the wear and tear of divorce and driving had taken its toll.  When he pulled away, with her head still in his hands, he asked her in a serious tone.  “You okay to drive?”
“I’m good Kansas.  Keep it sexy.”  She put her two fingers on her lips, kissed them, and then pressed them to his.  The moment she saw him staring her direction in her rearview mirror, as he watched her drive away towards town, she smiled with complete and utter satisfaction.
Parting is such sweet sorrow.
Chapter Three
My, oh my, what do we have here?
Calista had just enough energy to blow up the small twin air mattress with the foot pump, which felt like it took forever, open the box that had her new pillow and blanket, and set her alarm on her phone.  She went down for the count, fast asleep, in her clothes, makeup still on, and didn’t even brush her teeth.  She felt every inch of exhaustion.
Unfortunately, five hours later, she woke with an amazing amount of energy to get her life unpacked and on track.  She had a lot to do, and sleeping was the last thing on her mind.  Although, sleeping with the stranger, Blake Jones, now that held some serious appeal.  Fortunately, she was hoping there were plenty more of those Blakes ambling around town for her to have adventures with.  The town wasn’t huge, but it wasn’t so small that everyone knew each other’s business.  It was the perfect size to kick off her new life, and if she kept her wits about herself, it would be her home for many years to come.  A home, far, far away from Clay and Stephanie.
As for her son, Cole, he had plans to travel when he wasn’t in college, so maybe he will travel her way a couple times a year.  Sure, she missed him, but she had raised him to be independent, and that meant her not depending on him for her emotional needs.  He had always had a wandering soul that loved exploring.  Now was his time to explore the world before exploring the college experience.  Clay and she had saved up for this, seeing as they agreed to only having one child.  Her upbringing had allowed her a bit of travel and worldly experience before settling into her first year of college.  Meeting Clay and marrying him, by her second year of college, had not been the plan but a baby on the way and full-time schooling, was supported by her mother’s ample wealth.  Calista had wanted every opportunity for her son that she had and more.  Besides, the nasty divorce and peculiar circumstance Clay had put them in, any distraction for the both of them was good.  Although, she did miss her son dearly.  Perhaps a quick text to let her only son know how much she missed and loved him would make her feel better.
Calista had packed a box of kitchen essentials and some basic food.  Enough to make herself a bowl of oatmeal and coffee.  It was only five am and the new employee meeting was at ten.  She had five hours to kill, a body invigorating itself while thinking of her new life, almost like an adrenaline booster, and one certain revenge she needed to pull off.
Clay had mentioned that he was moving into Stephanie’s house.  What Clay and Stephanie did not know is that two years ago, when they were still oblivious that she knew all about them, she put Stephanie’s thermostat ap on her iPhone, along with her garage ap, and her security system.  After she got her new cellphone number, she had everything transferred to her new phone.  If Stephanie had not changed her passwords, which there was a very good chance she had not as she didn’t want to be bothered with that tedious task, then Calista was going to turn the air conditioner on in her home, when it was only fifty degrees outside.  She was going to open and close the garage, a few times, which should set off the security system.  She made a fresh cup of coffee, sat on the wide wood planked window ledge under the eight-foot industrial windows that looked out to the edge of town.  The sun wasn’t even up yet, so she stared out into the black darkness as she opened the ap and started her evil deeds.  
The thermostat ap showed the heat was on.  She turned it to air conditioning and dropped the interior temperature that was showing seventy degrees to sixty-two.  She took a sip of coffee.  She clicked on the garage ap.  She hit open and watched a display that the garage was opening.  She smiled and laughed at herself.  She waited for the alarm to go off on the security ap, but that ap would not work correctly.  She went to shut the garage door back down and nothing happened.  It was four am back in Utah, she was sure that maybe it was an ap error.  She closed the ap out, reopened it and then she tried again, and it closed this time.  She took a deep breath and wondered, why was she even bothering with this, what if they thought it was an ap error and not her.  She opened and closed the garage one more time and then realized that without being there to see their reaction, it wasn’t as much fun.  Back when the two were dating behind her back, she did stuff like this all the time, playing the innocent bystander while one or the other was trying to figure out why weird things happened to them.  That had been fun.  Being far away and not even sure if they were there, not so much fun.
She took another sip of coffee and decided to check todays weather in Darling, Kansas.  High of seventy-two with a cool front coming in the evening.  She opened her notes, read through the employee’s names to remind herself.  Milly Rockford was the previous owner and still the acting owner slash manager.  Benjamin Hit was the main baker, followed by three other employees that helped with baking, store front and overall store maintenance – Sally, Melissa, Carl.  She made a note to pull records to find out last names of the other three and put their contact information into her cellphone before the end of the meeting.
With her first cup of coffee down, she wanted to walk around the place again.  When she was last here, the place needed a good cleaning.  However, now it had been cleaned up to sparkle, which made her feel better about her landlord.  She found her tape measure and began to walk around measuring windows for drapes and taking notes.  By the time she made it up the large wooden industrial stairs to the small enclosed room, which was probably once an open loft before, she realized that with her migraine issues, she would need a dark place to hole up and unwind.  She opened the door to the enclosed loft and realized it was a lot smaller than she remembered and having to run down those stairs every night to go to the bathroom was a bit too far.  This would be the glamour walk-in closet she always dreamed of having.  Noting the size, she put long mirror and chandelier on her list of things to buy.
In the space under the loft, there was those large eight-foot windows.  They did a decent job of holding out the cold, but it was the light that concerned her.  When she had a migraine, she needed it dark, other than that, she loved having natural light flood in her place.  She measured the area, the windows, and then noticed a few things, like outlets, and an exposed wire that needed fixing.  Not a big deal; she could do it herself but having a landlord to fix things was a lot easier.  
She realized last night that the old small tub was replaced with a much nicer soaking tub.  The sink pedestal that was there before had a small white cabinet and white base sink along with the fact that the toilet was new.  Not that the old stuff was old, but it wasn’t a bathroom she could be proud of.  She opened her notes and typed in a few things the bathroom would need to make it sparkle a bit; she wanted to make it girly and spa like.
She had four hours to go.  She figured that she would take a quick shower, and while her hair dried, she would at least get unpacked what she had time for.  
Five minutes to ten in the morning and Calista was walking down the metal steps in a pair of black leggings, black ankle boots, burgundy tunic poplin top, her blonde hair up in a twist with curls framing her face.  She had her iPad and cellphone along with her small laptop in a black leather bag with silver studs around the top.  The air was still a bit cool, but she was going to be inside, meeting everyone, taking notes, setting up shop so to speak.
The moment Calista walked in the back door, Milly and Benjamin greeted her.  They looked to be ordering baking supplies.  
“Good morning, Calista.  I see you arrived alright.  Benjamin, this is the new owner Calista Miller I informed all of you about.”  The silver haired lady with arthritis in her hands gestured like a game show host to Benjamin.
“Good morning, Miss Miller.”  The short skinny oriental man, who looked nothing like a typical baker who would be a bit overweight from eating his own cooking, held out his hand to introduce himself.  He had a Cajun accent that flooded Calista’s brain with memories of a trip to New Orleans when she was younger.
“Good morning.”  Calista replied as Milly set a hand on her back and a motion of her other hand palm out to the front area of the coffee shop as if to lead her that way.
“Everyone else is out front.  Melissa and Carl must leave in a half hour, but Sally will be here all day.  As soon as Benjamin is done getting his order in, he’ll be out for the meeting, and then he does all his baking in the early hours, so he’ll be leaving after the meeting.”  Milly offered up in explanation as the two walked from the kitchen area to out front where the customers are.  Milly walked Calista to a small set of tables pushed together where there was a small set up of morning food for everyone to nibble on.
“Help yourself to something to drink.  Gang, this is Calista Miller, your new owner and manager once I finish out in a few weeks.  Calista this is Sally, your full-time staffer, like Ben.”  A very thin brunette somewhere under the five-foot-high stood up and offered her hand.  Her brown eyes had a twinkle and her grip told Calista that she might be small, but she was a worker.
“And this is Carl.  He’s a part or full-time guy. Whichever you need him for.  He takes college courses at night, so I never try to have him open.”  Up stood a very tall sturdy built looking young man, all of maybe twenty.  He still had teen acne on his face and an awkward stance as if he wasn’t quite used to his large frame.  He shook Calista’s hand and smiled without a word.  Calista figured he was shy.
Milly laid a hand on Melissa’s shoulder and stood behind her.  “This is my sister’s granddaughter Melissa.  She works part time, most of the time, but in a pinch, she’ll pick up extra hours.”  The heavy set young twenty something brunette with green eyes held up her hand to shake Calista’s without getting out of her seat.  As their hands touch, Melissa’s phone dinged with a text.  She quickly smiled and mouthed a hello, and then reached for her phone to read her message.  Whatever text came in, it must have been funny as Melissa had a huge smile on her face.
“Good morning everyone.”  Calista offered up and then sat down at the table just as Benjamin came in to sit down.  With everyone including Milly sitting down, Calista started to hand out a small packet to each employee.  One that had a few minor changes to Milly’s pay and compensations.  It stated the corporation’s agenda and that once Milly retired, she would be searching for a full-time manager to work coinciding with herself.  As she started to talk and explain the packet, several customers ambled in while talking.  If Calista had not known better, town chatter was out about a new owner and some looksie-loos were coming in to check her out.  Although, she might just be assuming this, however, they were more interested in glancing her way, while Milly got up to help them.
As Calista continued to go over benefits with the employees that worked full time, several more customers came in and Benjamin kept looking at his watch.  “Benjamin, why don’t you write down your contact info here on this legal pad for me.  You and I can arrange a time to spend some time together.  I can help with baking as needed, but I believe it’s clear in the package, I am a hands-off manager in that sense.  As for the rest of you, please write your information after Benjamin and then in the next few days we will spend some one on one time together.  Sally, if you wouldn’t mind, helping Milly get caught up with the customers and then you can come spend a few minutes with me since you’re on the clock.  Carl and Melissa, I’ll pay you for the full hour for the meeting, but if you have questions, my door is always open, or should I say, my cellphone is always on hand.  Milly will still be acting manager for a while as I integrate myself into the café.  Any questions?”  Calista offered up as if she was begging them not to, at least not at the present second as a few more customers just walked in.
Calista observed Benjamin’s rush to get out of there, she hoped he wasn’t put off by her in any way.  Baking was not her favorite thing to do and losing a baker would be a huge set back.  As Carl scribbled his name hurriedly, he jumped up to help Milly and Sally as there was a custom bakery order he needed to get out of the kitchen’s deep storage refrigerator.
It was in that moment, that Calista realized, this little coffee café she looked at a year ago, seemed a lot busier than she remembered, which was good.  She also observed Melissa, busy texting on her phone and eating, yet she had not put her information down on the yellow legal pad.  “Melissa.  If you would not mind.”  She pushed the pad with a pen on top of it, in front of Melissa, practically nudging her cellphone to the side.
The young gal plastered a sarcastic sure thing look on her face.  She scribbled fast and then slide the pad back to her while looking for her next direction.  
“You can go.”  Calista offered.  “Unless, that is, that you have questions.”
“Nope.  Milly told me all about you when you bought this place a year ago.  I’m going to run.  Carl said he would close for me today.  I have plans tonight.”
“Enjoy.”  Calista offered up casually as she reached for the legal pad to slide into her black bag.  It was as if Melissa could not have bolted out of the café fast enough, causing Calista to make a mental note to be on watch for her.
Within seconds, the café settled down, and Carl was leaving, Benjamin was gone out the back door to go buy supplies, and Milly and Sally were sitting at the table telling Calista about the locals catching wind there was a new owner at the café.
As the two women talked to her instead of asking her a million questions, which was a big relief, she felt her mind ease up from anxiety over what today’s meeting might have gone like - bonkers, instead it felt right.  Calista knew that she had spent most of her adult life planning, because that is what she is, a planner.  Her plans to save her marriage failed, but as her plans to divorce, divert money to her later needs and now revenge, she realized it ate up so much of her energy that she would rather divert that to making her new coffee shop successful, instead of focusing on revenge.  Not that she was going to give that all up.  However, a quick flash of Blake Jones naked body filled her mind as a sly slow smile creased her lips of the delicious memory of the man.  Her first night in Darling had been a major success in that sense.  As for sleeping on an air mattress, her back was tingling with a slight pain of a rib out.  Sitting, listening to the two women talk to her, Calista knew that her new place that she was going to call home, was going to be just what she needed.
Shortly after the coffee shop was closed, Calista walked up the metal stairs at a quarter to four.  The meeting with the staff went well, she thought to herself.  She could see how once Milly officially retired, she would need to hire two part-time or one full time, because she had no intentions of being there every day.  The place was big enough and busy enough to keep two full time staffers, a full-time baker, two part-time, and herself.  None of the part time staff gave her the first impression of management material, but then again, she was learning to doubt her first impressions over the years.  Stephanie’s first impression was besties for life; now she looked back and wondered how she missed all the signs.
Opening her apartment door, she realized that her bed and new furniture could not come quick enough.  She almost wished she had a place ready to just step into fully furnished and she would have just put her own embellishment on.  Yet the moment she closed the door to see the sunset through her main area windows she realized that the view, the feel of the place, had a vibe she could really get into.  Clay would never have lived in a place like this, and that was what made it so much more attractive.  A few more days until her furniture was here and set up would not kill her.  She stretched her back thinking how the air mattress could do some damage.  As she opened the fridge and grabbed a bottle water, she realized that grocery shopping was top on her list.  Then she laughed to herself, thinking just below her, she owned a coffee and café shop that had pretty much had a fully stocked refrigerator in it.  She would raid the stores fridge until she got her big shopping trip in.
With a water bottle in hand, iPad on her lap, and cellphone on the ledge next to her ass, she decided that she wanted Chinese for dinner.  She placed an order online and then her cellphone rang with an unknown number just as she was about to call her Aunt Caroline.  “Calista Miller?”
“Is this the new tenant above the café on main?  I got your text but I’m a bit detained at the moment.  Mind if I swing by later to take a look at the list you texted me?”  A man’s voice that sounded familiar but had an irritated edge to it drawled out his questions as if he was not sure who she was.  
Calista had signed the lease with a female under a corporation name.  She was beginning to have second thoughts about the landlord being easier rather than she just taking care of things herself.  She thought of all the years of trying to get Clay to do some man things around the house and how it ended up being easier to hire someone or learn to do it herself.  Same went for her coffee shop back in Utah, he had never helped with anything there.  She smiled into her phone as she replied nonchalant.  “No hurry.”
“You sure?  I could be there in a bit, it’s just…”  His voice trailed off as if he wanted to say something.
“Absolutely.  If I don’t answer, let yourself in, I have food being delivered and then I am going to take a long hot bath.”  A mental vision of soaking with some lavender scented bath salts, a hot tea, and some soft music had her mind twirling happily with how life was so much easier now that she was divorced and only truly responsible for herself.  Although, after last night’s sultry fun, an occasional strong set of arms to wake up in would be nice.  Just not all the rest of the ridiculousness that came with being with men.  She smiled to herself thinking about her new free of men life.
“Sounds good.”  His voice brought her back to reality as he spoke out and then hung up without saying goodbye.  
Calista put the phone number in her contact list as landlord as he never introduced himself.  Not a big deal, once the few things on the list got fixed, she saw no reason to have the man come by for the little things.
All day she had been taking a few moments to put things in various online shopping carts for her place.  Online shopping carts like Amazon, Wayfair, and Overstock were overflowing with necessities.  She wanted as much of her new life to be filled with new items as much as possible. She ran through her Wayfair and Amazon carts one last time and hit purchase, whereas her Overstock cart she was wavering between two almost identical items and told herself to make up her mind and hit the purchase button after dinner.  Twelve hundred dollars later, curtains, cushions, small furniture and some décor were going to be shipped here in the next week.  She decided that she needed to drive over to the Walmart on the other end of town to buy bath accessories and kitchenware.
While glancing over her list of things she needed to purchase, a flashback to the finalizing of the divorce crept into her mind.  Clay had told her to keep all household items as they really had no monetary value as he put.  But they did.  Twenty years of living together, hosting dinner parties with elegant dinnerware, china, crystal and elegant furnishings, she knew the value of everything he did not want to quibble over.  So instead of keeping really any of it, she had a huge successful, I’m divorce estate sale.  Perhaps it had been foolish in the sense she would never have gotten the monetary value of what she paid for everything, but she wanted to start her new life fresh; no china dish or serving platter was going to bring up memories of the past.  Everything she came here with was nothing that associated her with Clay.  So that meant an entire new life starting from scratch, but she was ready for it.  A smile creased her lips upwards as she remembered the only thing that she left in the house for the new homeowners was their old Ethan Allen four poster bed, mattress, and bedding.  She had no need for it; that is other than her exit plan with Clay that day.
In the meantime, she had the basics to get by, but having the closet setup was a must as her boxes of clothes were everywhere.  She had found a rope to make a makeshift clothes line and hung up five outfits for the next few days.  She grabbed her cellphone, texted the Forest boys and asked if they could meet her at the shop after school to discuss putting up a closet organizer for her.  Her phone dinged with a yes.  That was her signal to take a break in planning and organizing.  Food would be delivered soon, and she wanted to take a bath after she ate.  She moved her air mattress makeshift bed setup to the room under the loft.  She found a small lamp that was left in the small closet in the now bedroom, along with a small fan.  She plugged the little silver lamp with no shade in and the lightbulb was good.  A bit bright, but she could see better in there now.  
Half hour slipped by her almost like a minute in time as a loud solid knock came at her door.  “Just a minute.” She hollered out.  In all the moving and unpacking, she had taken off her burgundy poplin top and slipped on a black tank top that was now a bit dirty.  She grabbed her wallet out of her purse and opened her door without looking through the peephole.  There standing in front of her was Kansas, aka Blake, the complete stranger from the bar she had sex with last night.  With her eyes opened wide as her mouth formed a complete O, the man of great talents spoke out just what she was feeling.
“My of my!  What do we have here?  Utah?”  Standing before her in a dark flannel shirt opened to a very dirty looking navy tee shirt, with his hands in his pockets of his worn denim jeans, was a man with a smile of desire on his face as his eyes were scanning her body like it was an engine he wanted to start up.
Calista blinked her eyes a few times, before answering.  “Kansas?”
“You’re a bit shy of Utah darling?”  His voice sounded like he was taunting her, teasing her to submission.  “I guess it’s my lucky day.  You’re my new tenant?”
She shook her head yes as her mouth softly whispered out in shock.  “I guess so.”
They both stood there silent for a mere few seconds.  The air felt calm and almost warm like or was it the electricity between them heating them up.  The only sound was their breathing while their eyes held contact until a small red four door car pulled up to the bottom of her stairs.  A magnetic lighted sign on top of the car told her that her food was here.  “Sorry.  Come in.  That’s my food I just ordered.” 
She stepped aside while he took a few steps inside.  As soon as he went pass her, she practically ran down the stairs to meet the driver.  She handed him the cash and told him to keep the change as he handed her the warm brown paper bag of food.  As soon as she made it back up the steps by running, she thought of how awkward this entire situation felt.  The moment she walked inside, he was standing there looking like a rough around the edges cowboy with his dark brown hair unruly and his flannel shirt open to the mud on his shirt and a look on his face of how can I satisfy you darling.
With a huge breath released as she closed the door, she set the bag of food on the counter and turned to look the man in the eyes.  “So!  You’re my landlord?”  This time she put a tone of excitement mixed with certainty in that statement.  A certainty that she might need to find a few more reasons for her sexy landlord to come around.
“You can say that.  And you’re not in Utah anymore?”  He quizzed.
“You can say that.”  She casually tossed the statement back at him while her lips smiled, and her eyes just examined his body while she set her food delivery on the counter next to where he was standing.  Last night at the bar he was a clean cut, hardworking guy, kind of look.  Tonight, he looked like he had been working hard.  Then she remembered Jackie saying he had plans to be fishing.  “Fish not biting?”  She added.
“Oh, they’re biting alright, but I’m not fishing.  Family thing.”  He looked down at himself before looking back to her with a smile.  “I’ve been known to be a dirty kind of guy, but this is my nephews doing.  I was going to head home and shower first, but I figured once I did that, I might not want to come all the way back here.”  He let out a breath and shook his head as if to say no, while he let out a slow low whistle.  When he finished, he said the words again.  “My oh my, you are a surprise.  You were not who I was thinking I would be coming over to visit.”
She cocked her head with a half-smile and shoulder shrug.  “Well, it’s me.  Listen, you can come back tomorrow or while I’m gone at work the rest of the week during the day.  I was just about to eat and…” 
He interrupted her with a smile and sultry draw to his sentence.  “Take a bath.  Naked.”  
She raised her eyebrows and laughed with her face.  She could tell he was flirting with her.  Thing was, there were no curtains, no bed and no stack of boxes to have sex.  Her place was out. And it wasn’t like he was asking her to have sex, but the way he was looking at her, she knew when a man wanted her.  In only her black tank top and black leggings, she felt his eyes roam every square inch of her body.  Just as she was about to say something, he turned around and surveyed the room.
“Living large here Utah?  Got plans for furniture?”  He turned back around to look her body up and down while his lips smiled the words, sex.
“Yes.  I do.  Can I offer you some Chinese for dinner?”  She was starving and had not eaten a thing all day other than her oatmeal and one muffin from Ben’s fresh batch of cooking.
He patted his belly.  “Nope.  I’m full.  Sister fed me meatloaf and mashed potatoes.  Look, I don’t have any tools with me.  I just wanted to take a quick look at the list you sent me and make sure we agree on what needs to be done.”
“Oh.  Okay.”  She heard the deflation in her own ears.  What was she expecting?  A follow up to last night’s rendition?  She walked to the frayed wire and motioned for him to follow.  By the time she showed him the few things on her list, she noticed his body language had changed.  He went from let me bang your box again, to don’t keep the light on for me kind of guy.  She let her mind think of other things like all that she had to do while she followed him to the door, listening to him talking about swinging by to fix the things in the next day or two.
He opened the door to outside which caused a sudden rush of cooler air to blow in.  He turned and looked at her as if he was going to say something but stopped himself.  Instead, he wrapped her face up in his hands and started to kiss her until her knees felt weak.  The moment the cold air rushed over her wet lips, she was ready for more, drag him inside more, do it on the air mattress more, but instead, he said this.
“I don’t mix business with pleasure.  And you are pleasure, but now you’re business.”  He let out a huge breath of air and shook his head from side to side.  “Damn Utah, I haven’t stop thinking about you since you drove away last night.  But I’ve got these rules.”  He took a step back on the metal platform landing as a huge cold wind blew Calista in the body, causing her to wrap her arms around herself to warm her bare arms and to protect herself from a man turning her down before she asked.
“I’m good, Kansas.”  She joked with a sensual smile curling her lips, while her heart pinched with a sadness that this could not be something more so fast, so quickly after her divorce.  A rebound man like this could do her some good.  Instead, she stepped backwards and said her goodnights.  “See ya around Blake.”
Her hand was on the door and about to close it when his right foot went inside the doorway jam and his right hand put his palm on the door.  “I suppose we will.”
She smiled and started to slightly push the door against his hand.  His foot withdrew, and his hand lowered as his husky voice sang out.  “Thanks for the memories, Utah.”
With the door shut, Calista leaned against it with a huge smile on her face.  “Thanks for the memory, Kansas.”  She whispered out with her back against the heavy metal door.  Things in Kansas were just getting good, business or not, her stranger was no stranger, and she liked the feeling she got just thinking about him.  Now if only she could make him see that business and pleasure do mix well. 
Rebounding is a blast when you got the right man.
Chapter Four
I’m not a bitch but a survivor of unfortunate events.
“Cole, darling, how’s France?”  Calista blew into her caramel macchiato and then adjusted her listening ear buds in each ear while her son appeared agitated on his skype video.  Calista had situated herself in the quietest corner of the coffee shop in a worn brown leather chair that was due for replacement, which was on her list for her remodel.  Her mind was on her shop, and Blake, but her brain told her to focus on her son who had a mad look on his face at the present moment while he was staring at her from her laptop.
“I’m in the UK.  Plans changed.  I sent you my new itinerary.  But I guess you were busy tying dad’s naked body to your old bed.”  His voice was clipped with irritation, although she thought a small smile might have creased his lips by the change in tone in his voice.  She knew he felt loyal to both parents; they both loved him and raised him right.  Asking for loyalty to one or the other was difficult and yet, he took the divorce quite well.  Or maybe, Europe was his way of escaping the realities of what new adult responsibilities would unfold for him.
She gave him a meek oops I’m sorry look and glanced around the practically empty coffee shop. It was the lull time where sales indicated they were always much slower.  She had two on staff at all times and had just posted an ad for a mature adult to do opens from five am to ten am, part time.  She could do it, but a part of her wanted the freedom to work on promoting the shop, handling all billing and payroll, and then taking the rest of her time to just enjoy life.  This shop supported five employees including the owner before her.  If it was up to her, she would make the shop support a few more, including her work, so that she was free to travel.  However, this wasn’t Salt Lake City, Utah, this was Darling Kansas, a fraction of the size and economy.
“Hey!”  She chimed up with excitement.  “I saw your pictures from Ireland.  Way cool.  You know I wanted to take us there on a vacation before you got too old, you know too cool for your parents.  Maybe someday we could go back there, together, as mom and son.”
His smile was conveyed in his voice as he chimed out.  “I’m never too cool for you mom.  That would be nice.”
A moment of silence sat between them as they smiled at each other into their laptop cameras.  Cole in some cheap looking hotel or hostile, and her in the back-corner spot of her café where she could see the incoming customers and the Melissa at the countertop who was slowly cleaning the glass case in front of her.  She was on top of her let go list if she didn’t find a way to work a bit harder around the place.  She jotted a note on her legal pad to have a talk with her before next pay date.
“Hey mom?”  Cole spoke up first.  As he did, the front door chimed with a customer.  Calista looked up over her laptop and saw the man that left her with a senseless kiss last week, and a warning that he did not mix business with pleasure.  It was as if he gave her a good-bye kiss, when all she wanted was to drag his ass into her apartment, into the building he owned, and replay their scene, or something similar, from the bar that first night they met.
Cole’s voice talking to her serious broke her trance with Blake who stopped just inside the door and looked her directly in the eye.  “Promise me you’ll lay off the revenge shit with dad and Stephanie.  Dad says he wants to make a go of this with her.  This is his second chance and you did something to try and screw it up.  Although, he won’t tell me what.”
She turned her attention away from Blake, and back to Cole with squinted eyes glaring while her sensual smile turned into a lopsided tight-lipped frown while thinking about Clay and Stephanie.  She could just bet that Clay would not tell Cole what it was she did.  “Sorry.  Look, I’ve got someone that just showed up for an interview.  I emailed you my new cell number.  Don’t share it with dad.  I’ll look at your email.  Let’s talk longer tomorrow.   I’ve got to get back to work.”
“Promise me mom.”  Cole’s voice pleaded as her eyes were drifting back to Blake smiling at Melissa.  Was he flirting with her?  A mental grr growled inside of Calista’s brain while a soft sensual smile placed itself on her lips strictly out of memory of how the man’s lips felt on hers.
Melissa’s voice softened to a flirtatious whisper as she announced the store’s new name.  “Welcome to Dioltas Hide Out Café.”  
Blake shot a glance towards Calista with a questioning look on his face over the name.  Obviously, this was the first time he had heard there was a name change.  The new sign was on order and would be out front in the next few days, that is unless the manufacturer gives her another delay.  
Calista casted a sensual smile in Blakes direction but then he turned and answered a question from Melissa in what looked to be a flirtatious manner.  Not that she thought he might, do anything with Melissa.  She was young and frumpy looking, although the young probably did not matter to a man.  A huge sigh exited her lips as she looked back to her laptop.
“What, honey?”  She softly spoke out as she looked back at her camera.
“Mom, you are obviously distracted.  Where are you anyways?”  Cole asked with concern until some pretty brunette popped into the background behind him on camera and his laughter informed Calista that they were more than friends
“Sorry.”  See whispered knowing full well that she had to tell Cole about the coffee shop, well at least where she was living, and not that she owned it just yet.  That would be too soon.  She did not want him to know about all the planning and conniving she had schemed before the divorce, not until many years from now. 
“Look, I promise, no more tricks.”  She whispered as she placed her hand on the top of her laptop about to close it.  She could not believe herself.  For once, she was more interested in a man other than her son or husband.  She loved Cole with all her heart, but it was time for him to go be his own person while she picked up the muddled broken heart his father shattered, and standing at the counter, now flirting with twenty something Melissa was the man her mind could not shut down on.  Business or not, pleasure was on her brain.
Cole’s voice broke her focus on Blake with an exasperated tone.  “Where are you living now, mom?”
“Kansas.”  She said it loud enough that Blake stopped smiling at Melissa handing him his coffee, and turned to look at her with an intent gaze of what?  Sexual lust or irritation?  Curiosity or desire?  Good lord, she was an internal mess of questions.  If he had not kissed her the way he did when they last saw each other, she might have believed his words of not mixing business with pleasure.
“Mom!?”  Cole shouted in both question and excitement.
“What?  I really do have to go.  I’ll text you tomorrow as scheduled?”  She smiled and then clicked off skype and shut her laptop down just as Blake stood in front of her, sexy in his dark denim jeans, light blue Henley shirt with enough buttons open she knew the muscles that lay beneath.  His brown hair had been tousled by the wind that was outside.  Fall was in full swing and leaves were tossing everywhere outside in the wind.
“Kansas?”  Blake questioned with authoritative tone.
She turned her head towards Melissa staring at them but kept her eyes focused on Blake.  She glanced for a mere second at Melissa and then back to Blake.  “Melissa, can you go do those dishes in back.”  It wasn’t a question but a request, however the girl could not seem to take her eyes off the two of them, Blake standing over her, and her sitting in the brown leather café chair, laptop on the table in front of her, and the sexual tension in the air.
“Now, please?”  She practically hissed at the young adult child.
With a puff of air to show exasperation, Calista stood up.  She had on a nice pair of dark denim boot cut jeans, her brown leather three-inch heeled designer boots and a very nice snug fitting dark green cashmere sweater that she bought herself two Christmas’s ago.  A long dangling silver and light green stone necklace hung from her neck.  Blake reached out and touched the necklace in his fingers before he looked back into her eyes.
“Melissa?”  Calista motioned to the back room with her head as she hissed her name in question over her shoulders before looking back at Blake and staring directly into his light green eyes.
The young brunette bolted to the back in frustration.  Calista did not know what was worse, the young help, or her sexual frustration around Blake.  He let go of her necklace and smiled.  “You have a nice day Kansas.”
She raised an eyebrow.  The other day he called her Utah right before he kissed her and now, she was Kansas.  Was this his way of stating their relationship, whatever it was?
She watched him turn and reach for the door before she practically stammered out.  “Hey, Blake?  The stove upstairs isn’t working, and the hot water is barely hot.”
He stopped with the front door to her coffee shop open and turned with the door handle in hand.  The wind from outside blew some fall leaves inside as he spoke out with certainty.  “I’ll be by later to fix that.”  His eyes glanced over her body like he was saying he would fix her need for another sweet orgasm, putting his business rules aside.  Then he turned and walked out of the door as if he did not have a single sexual frustration lingering in the air, but boy did Calista.
What better way to work out that frustration than to startup operation ROE – Revenge on ex’s.  Calista had promised that she would not pull anymore dirty tricks on Clay and Stephanie to Cole – or did she?  It didn’t matter, because Calista had waited a long time to make this happen, the saving, the planning, the proposition that he leaves Stephanie – which he didn’t, so she pursued other legal matters in her own hands, all the while calculating what her next moves were.  Cole was a man now, and he might be mad at her if she got caught at what she was about to do, however she had no intentions of getting caught. 
Operation ROE started all the way back to the day she saw Stephanie and Clay making out like two horny teenagers in the parking lot of the downtown hotel.  She watched them get in their cars and drive away, while she sat in hers with the prescription from her doctor for a yeast infection.  She felt physically miserable, but mentally she was shattered into a million pieces that day.  A yeast infection, meh, a woman gets over that quickly anymore, but a marriage with an affair with your best friend, that is a lifetime of pain and sorrow.  
Calista got revenge every chance she could.  She poured clay mixture down Stephanie’s pipes month one, flushed as many condoms as she could month two, broke a few sprinkler heads, oh on accident of course, and poked holes in the water line to the water heater so that a slow leak gradually flooded the basement one night while Clay and her both happened to be out of town.  By the time the plumber’s bill was more than a cost of a vacation in the Bahamas, by end of year one, Stephanie still had no idea who or what was causing this.  Calista did, and she made Stephanie think she was going crazy by convincing her that the plumber was out to cheat her with odd excuses on plumbing repair.  As for Stephanie’s husband at the time, he was so oblivious to everything going on around him that the affair came as a complete shocker to him.  
By year two of the cheating, Calista got sneakier.  By now she was really hoping Clay would tire of Stephanie and she could approach him about marriage counseling while vacationing somewhere tropical, instead, she watched the two get sneakier with their planned hotel visits, stolen kisses on baby cam’s nobody knew were placed at both houses, and a hired professional detective to put everything on paper or digital image, so that come time for when she asked for a divorce, Clay could make his choice.  Unfortunately, his choice was Stephanie, although Calista was sure he might have changed his mind once he could not get out of negotiating the fact that since they were married for twenty years as of that year, he had to pay a lifetime maintenance fee, as she had made her coffee shop appear as it did not pay her much of a salary compared to his.
Now, after all of that, Calista felt somewhat settled.  Sure, she missed Cole, but it was his time to spread his wings – in Europe and hopefully after that, off to full time college.  That was what Clay and she agreed on and saved for.  She had a new life, in a new town, with a new business, and now that things were falling into place, she still had a check list of ROE to complete.
First up, update social pictures and status from divorced to single and searching.  She had professional modeling pictures taken before leaving Utah.  Some just great shots of her out golfing, fishing, and drinking a coffee.  All with the intent to look as if someone else caught her in a glamorous moment looking twenty pounds lighter, with perfect hair, makeup and outfit.  Then there was the boudoir photo shoot.  Now she was not planning on posting any pictures of herself in the nude, but classy, well styled seductive pictures, those she was going to post.  Some of the pictures, she had emailed to close friends back in Utah, who promised to post at her request.  Those who were in the know after the separation, came out of the forest of long forgotten friends and offered up if there was anything that they could do for her.  Her neighbor was the first, as it turned out Clay was not a well-liked guy.
With a click or two, photos would be posted across several joint acquainted social networks of both Clay and Stephanie’s.  She could only hope Clay has a ping of regret while Stephanie felt threatened, she could lose Clay back to Calista.  Not that she would take him back, yet she wanted the fear instilled in her anyways.  Clay on the other hand, she knew if she allowed him, he would climb back into a hotel bed with her in a split second.  She knew her ex-husband well, and as she was posting pictures and looking quickly over to ones that were recent of Clay and Stephanie, she realized her mind was screaming at her, ‘you’re better off now!’ 
Somehow that smart voice screaming in her head did not stop her next move; the well paid photoshop pics of both Clay and Stephanie, looking quite a bit heavier and pale in pictures that had them looking worse for wear.  The time was now for those friends to receive those pictures to post on their accounts as well.  This way, it didn’t look like Calista was exacting the revenge, but the lot of friends they all used to socialize with on occasions.
Calista got up from her last hour of ROE activity and wanted a bottled water.  The moment she grabbed it from the cooler, a few patrons came in, and Melissa was still in back.  With her best hostess voice, she introduced the new store name and took care of her customers.  Everyone was friendly and curious who the new owner was, which gave her thought as to how to not just promote her store, but also about who she was and why she selected Darling Kansas as her new home.  She would call her old friend Tally, who worked PR magic for a living.  Have her come up with a blimp to have published in the local paper, and online in social media.  Maybe hire a local photographer to take some pictures of the coffee shop with its new name, but perhaps after she did the closed for the Thanksgiving holiday makeover she had planned.
There was so much to do on her list for the shop and decorating her apartment, that ROE was losing its appeal, especially since she could not be there to witness her secretive revenge or see their reaction like she used to.  Those small moments of crazy reaction from Clay and Stephanie had kept her sane as the plan of divorce was working into motion.  However, Blake was not losing any appeal to her.  He was sexually rendezvousing in her brain, her sultry dreams at night, taking up every bit of space he could.  Just as one customer mentioned his name as the person about some local town news, her body tingled with excitement.  With just the mentioning of his name Calista felt the stroke of her dying coals being brought back from just an ember to a red hot fire of sexual need and desire.  That was not part of her new life plan – or was it?  It certainly would make life more interesting.
Once the small late day rush was gone and closing time was in an hour, Melissa finally showed up from the back room.  “Ben’s on his way by.  He said he has to get all of tomorrow’s baking done early tonight.  I was wondering if you wouldn’t mind if I grab some of the two-day old stuff to take home.  Milly usually throws out in wrapped clear plastic bags and hangs on the trash bin in the alley for any homeless or local takers.  I need to head out early, I’ve got an interview at the Target for holiday help, which by the way, I was hoping you don’t mind working me around their schedule, you know, give me a few less hours?”
Calista gave her a flat lined smile and no emotion on her face as she spoke.  “That’s fine.  We can review your schedule tomorrow.”  She paused with a weak smile and then added, “Good luck with your interview.”  Mentally she already had fired the gal, if it weren’t for the fact she was related to Milly.  However, the schedule would reflect her lack of desire to work, not just next week, but the many weeks to follow.  She had decided that by the new year, Melissa had to be permanently replaced, but first she would have a heart to heart talk with her tomorrow, just to show she was trying to keep her on; for Milly’s sake. 
As Calista watched Melissa, take her time gathering her purse and coat, she pulled her old iPad out of her brown leather laptop bag.  She finger-pressed an ap for photo sharing that they once shared pictures between.  She added the two hundred images of artfully edited images of pictures of herself and Clay naked from one hot sultry summer night just months ago to the account, naming them Stephanie pic 1, Stephanie pic 2, and so on.  She clicked order pictures under Stephanie’s online photo account and billing, all to be sent to her house.  She smiled as Melissa went to the back room for a second and came back thinking how Stephanie most likely forgot about the account.  Calista had already removed her credit card information and account billing, so that the favor could not be returned in kind.  In that singular moment of waiting for Melissa to gather her stuff, clock out and leave, Calista revealed in the evil planning and internal laughing about revenge and she hit her order button for Send Them Poop dot com.  In that order, she requested that a large pile of poop be placed under Stephanie’s four door Camry in her driveway, in the next week.  At a cost she thought worth it.  She paid the extra for the stinky stuff.  Stephanie was a freak about her driveway and her car.
By the time Melissa was finally getting on her coat, Calista had placed an order on Stephanie’s amazon account that she still had the password and log in to, for a case of Depends adult underwear.  To add a check off and done to her all things shitty list to do to Stephanie, she had one last thing to do, but she was saving that for when Clay and Stephanie moved into their new place.  She clicked her old iPad to shut down, slid it in the laptop bag, and pulled out her new iPad, one that neither Clay nor Stephanie knew her id or passwords to.  She flipped it over to the engravement she had put on herself when she bought it, ‘to freedom’.  It was in the moment her fingers slid over the words, she realized her freedom came at a heartbreak price, but she was not broken.
As soon as the glass door closed on Melissa’s round bottom, Calista put a note in her phone to basically cut Melissa’s hours until Melissa is on the bottom of her schedule – which usually meant her employee was about to be fired.  She had lazy employees in all her years of ownership, but Melissa was a master of doing absolutely nothing for the last twenty minutes of her paid time at the shop tonight.  Instead, as Calista did her revenge, she watched Melissa flitter around pretending to work, almost making it harder on oneself to not work, rather than work.  She knew she had to train these employees like her old store, but she had hoped to do it a small bit at a time.  With only three weeks left on the contract with Milly, the previous owner, she knew she had to step up her game, promote the business, bring in quality mature workers who wanted and needed hours.  In the meantime, two more late day customers were walking in.  Calista knew what to do without even thinking about it.  She could make a stranger feel like her best friend, and a customer leave her store feeling like this was their coffee shop.  She was good at this and this was the thing in life she enjoyed calling her lot in life.
Her new-found freedom just found its wings.
Chapter Five
The mirror of a man’s heart is in his actions.
Blake Jones was mystified by what changes had taken place in his life in the last few years.  First, his fiancé left him for another man, a wealthier man, or so she thought.  Then, his sister got into a car accident, leaving her in a wheelchair permanently.  That was after she found out her husband was cheating on her and got a woman pregnant.  The car accident was caused by her drinking too much at the very bar he used to own, but now his buddy Randy owned most of it until he could pay him the rest of the money – Blake was still part owner.  While dealing with his absentee fiancé, crippled sister, and helping with her divorce with two small boys to still take care of, Blake had to bury his brother in-law Pete, who was shot by girlfriend number three with her daddy’s shotgun.  Girlfriend number two to Pete, was Blake’s old high school acquaintance Jackie, who Pete also left a child with.  Jackie was out of work and six months pregnant when Pete got killed.  Jackie had no idea that Jenny was his sister since she was living in Kansas City ever since graduating high school, and she had never met Pete for a date in Darling.  All of that was just a few years ago; life was settling down, that was until the night Utah sat at his bar and begged him to make her a very happy woman.
Life had been difficult, but he had it under wraps.  His plan moving forward was to help raise Pete’s kids as a fulltime uncle with Jenny.  They took Pete’s life insurance policy and formed a business.  They bought up real estate when the market was in dire straits, Blake took care of the properties and collected rent, and now that things were back up and booming, they were selling off land and buildings for a nice profit as they saw fit.  Jenny gave Jackie a hundred thousand, of the two-million-dollar life insurance policy she had on Pete.  Blake tried to convince Jenny to give her more, and for Jackie to take more, which she wouldn’t, but Jackie was happy just to get a job at his bar.  Both women had guilt and anger over what happened that he often felt torn between them, helping them, until he finally got them to see that together, they made a better team.  It took a long time, but Jackie and Jenny were now best friends, raising kids together, and laughing every time they went to visit the woman in jail that shot Pete.  Turns out, the woman that had shot him while he was with another woman.  Oddly the three women formed a bond, while Blake, got social update pictures of his ex-fiancé with some older rich guy.  He figured it best to never let her know his net worth now, or she might try to come back into his life, which he did not need.  He was happy taking long fishing weekends alone, playing uncle to his nephews, and not putting himself in a position of a broken heart anytime soon.
He knew that he had been missing that feeling a special someone can put in a man’s life.  Nothing is better than waking up naked next to a woman you made love to the night before.  He missed that.  But he did not want the drama that went with it.  So, for now, it was hook ups on social aps or short-lasting relationships with women that did not live in his town.  Which was hard, seeing as Darling had doubled in size the last few years and new eligible women had asked him out, yet he didn’t want a relationship with someone that didn’t work out being too close to home.  With each swipe type meetup in a different town, he felt emptier on the inside as he was not willing to share any part of his life with these strange women. 
Maybe it was the fact he finally finished building his ranch.  He had a decorator known for her industrial farmhouse décor furnish his new home.  This was his new place, built by his design, everything had his touch on it; no ex-fiancé bought this or that, that he had come home to every night and stare at.  No trace of the previous single life turned engaged that went horribly wrong.  He had built his place with pride, yet every night as he sat on his rustic designed deck with natural waterfall and large stone firepit, watching the sunset, he yearned for a woman to be there with him – a mature no strings attached woman.  He was sure that was what him and his new home needed, a no drama, no strings attached, wealthy woman.  He scoffed at his own thinking while shaking his head in a no fashion.  “Needle in a haystack, boy.”  He mumbled to himself while walking and thinking.
Yet, today, stopping in to get a coffee at his favorite coffee shop, there was Utah – aka Calista.  Yes, he remembered her name, but somehow calling her by the state she said she was from, it kept it less personal.  The thing that they did in the storage room, that was fun, and very personal.  Fun for him, and by her reaction, a well desired fun for her.  In the past, his quick hookups always moan, yes like that, or god yes, but the fact that she clearly stated that she needed it, well, that was his first clue she was a woman in need.  Which, he did not need in his life.  No matter what her story was, he was not ready to be a part of it.  Not yet.
Finding out that Utah was his new renter in the empty apartment above his favorite coffee shop, minor hiccup.  However, knowing she is a Kansas now, Darling Kansas at that, it could cause an issue if she turns out to be a crazy stalking new woman in town that just wants his services, not that he wouldn’t mind servicing her again.  Her body was rocking, not to mention the fact that it was nice to find someone who just, like that, no questions or commitment asked of him, was willing and able.  Real nice.
Blake tossed his empty coffee cup into the trashcan outside his architecture office a few doors down from the coffee shop.  He unlocked the doors and stepped inside.  He was a business of two, Jenny and himself.  However, most days she worked from home handling all the mundane business stuff while allowing her to hang with the kids when they were not in school.  He just liked having an actual office away from home, seeing as this was one of his own buildings he bought back before all the chaos began.  It was as if the place had become his professional man-cave.  It was a place he designed industrial art products out of metal and wood in the back area, while maintaining a very manly looking professional front office, antique drafting table and all.  He designed his first home that he had built for himself in this office, Jenny’s handicap home to fit her new needs, and the place he designed ideas just for fun.  His architectural degree wasn’t being put to too much use these days, but it was the place that made him feel like he was contributing to himself and this town in a way he knew best how to.
The moment he sat on the antique wood stool and set his hands on the empty wooden worn smooth drafting table, he thought of Calista.  Her outfit she was wearing did not seem like something an employee would wear.  Maybe she was just using their wi-fi?  Although a flash of her instructing Melissa, made him wonder, was she the new manager Milly talked about a month ago.  He shook his head to himself thinking how so much had changed in the last year and he just had no desire to keep up with the town gossip.  Although, now that he was remembering, her mouth moved with words, but he wasn’t listening.  Instead he was envisioning that very mouth on his hard cock, sliding it in and out, looking up at him with her intense blue eyes and blonde hair.  That look on her face that told him that they were just beginning to have fun.  He chuckled to himself as his hands roamed over the feel of worn smooth wood of his architect desk.
He started to wonder, if they would be crossing paths often.  He mentioned that business and personal did not mix when he met her at his rented loft the other night, but then the kiss he left her with, told him, maybe his hard-fast rules could be broken, at least one more time.  A quick mental question flashed in his mind, ‘would one more time be enough to get her out of your system?’
‘Pfft.’ Blake made an internal puffing sound.  She probably just wanted him to come by again and finish off that kiss with another mouth moaning orgasm, which held some appeal as just the thought of it had him semi hard.  That stove worked fine last time he checked, and as far as the water heater, he might have forgotten to turn the temp back up after the last short-term tenant left about three months ago, since then, he was thinking of selling the place, or making it into an office as the light in the main area was incredible due to the unobstructed views of the western horizon.  
A text from his sister Jenny dinged on his phone.  He pulled it out of his back pocket and set it on the metal strip on the bottom of the drafting table to lay it flat in front of him.  ‘Milk, eggs, and a pound beef.  Home for dinner?’
He didn’t live there, but he sure did spend a lot of dinners there with her and the boys.  She was probably on her way to get them from school and he was planning on eating at Finnegan’s with Jackie and her four-year-old son Mack.  Jackie had a new guy she wanted him to meet, and get a background check on.  He texted Jenny back.  ‘I’ll get groceries for dinner to eat tomorrow.  Eat at Finney’s tonight.  Jackie wants us to meet a new guy she’s hooked up with.  No better way to break him in.”
His phone dinged again.  ‘Great plan.’
Jenny had a wheelchair disability van with a driver that would take her during most day hours wherever she needed to go, and on call for evenings.  However, Blake just liked doing things for her to make her life easier.  It wasn’t like he had a nine to five hard working job thanks to her; it was more of a luxury job that benefited from Pete’s death.  Not that he had wished this on Pete, he had always thought of him as a bit of a roaming eye type of guy, but he would have rather they divorced.  Pete and he had been drinking buddies, shooting pool, catching fish, and messing around mechanically when the house needed to be the woman’s place.  Be that as it may, Blake knew from his upbringing that he had to step up and be the man for everyone involved.  All the more reason, Kansas, did not need to commandeer his time with drama.  Because if there was one thing he could sniff out, it was drama.
The grocery store by Jenny’s house was his first stop a little after four. He had his hand cart filled with two breads, two dozen eggs, the beef – two pounds because he never understood why she asked for a pound at a time.  He was about to grab two one-gallon milks by the handle out of the dairy case into his right hand, when he heard a familiar voice.
“Hey Kansas?”  Calista stood there with her very full grocery cart of all thing’s household and kitchen pantry essentials.  Stocking up for the winter for three, plus occasional parties, was an old habit; she was shopping for one now and at the looks of her shopping cart she was not doing so well as she had obviously over shopped.
Blake grabbed the milk and turned with his body towards her.  He glanced at the way her tight-fitting sweater was drawing his eyes to the curves of her body.  He glanced at the necklace she was wearing that he touched earlier.  It gave him thoughts of touching that necklace on her naked body.  He tried not to smile when he replied.  “Evening Kansas.  Got a party you shopping for?”
She blushed as she thought he might have caught her staring at his bulge between his pants, if she did not know better, she was noticing that he appeared to be semi hard.  “No.  Just an old habit dying hard.  I like stocking up early for the winter season.  Farmer’s Almanac states this will be a cold snowy winter.  Utah had some serious cold winters but I’m in Kansas now.”
“You don’t say.”  He joked with her and could not help smiling at her cute little ways of checking him out and sending body language signals that would land them right back in that storage room, naked, doing the bang the box of bottles game.  He liked that game.  Would not mind doing that game again.
“Any hoot, you look like you’re ready to check out.  Thanks for stopping by my new coffee shop.”  She smiled and started to continue towards the yogurt section.
“Yeah.  Good evening.”  He started to walk away and then realized what she just said.  She, owned the coffee shop?  The one he had been going to for years.  He noticed a name change, and a lease change was mentioned by Jenny, but he had not realized that a new owner was finally taking over his beloved coffee stop.  He shook his head side to side.  He’d be damned if she went and made it all frilly.  It had looked the same for the last ten years since Milly opened it.  He knew Milly had talked about selling it, but he had to wonder was Calista just a transitional owner or was his favorite bang the box of bottles blonde going to be in his life – day after day?
He set his milk jugs on the conveyor belt as the young male teenage cashier asked how his day was going.  “Huh, yeah great, and yours?”  Blake asked, not really caring but just trying to be nice.  In his normal unique charisma, he plastered a smile on his face while his mind ticked away at the idea of Utah, now Kansas, was going to be in his life in a passing permanent passion and not in the one night stand I am attracted as hell to this stranger sitting at my bar woman.  He joked with the guy about the last Chiefs game being a blowout, while his mind flashed sultry images of Calista under his control in the back-storage room of his bar.  Then he paid his bill and turned to head outside to what looked like small snowflakes.  A flash of Calista’s sexy lips making conversation about the Farmer’s Almanac like it was a sexual deed flashed in his brain as he mentally spoke to himself with a smirk on his face.  ‘Maybe Kansas was right.  Maybe, it was going to be a cold snowy winter.  Maybe she’d be willing to be his naked snow bunny and play games in his bed with the fire crackling against a full-blown snow storm?’
“Why, Blake Jones, looks like the smiley bugs taken a bite out of you.”  A familiar voice passed him in greeting as he looked down to see his first-grade teacher walking into the store with a head shake.  
“Have a lovely day, Miss Kent.”  He voiced over his shoulder as he took his steps towards his truck.  If he had stopped to acknowledge her fully, he might be there long enough to see Calista ring up that cart full of groceries, and that was not on his evening agenda. Nothing could ruin a man’s imagination of naked snow bunny play like your first-grade teacher.  With a bit of bulk between his step, and a smile still on his face, he opened his truck by remote and realized it was going to be a long cold winter if he didn’t figure out a way to get Calista out of his every sexual thought during most of his day.
Blake took the groceries items into Jenny’s.  No one was home.  She probably had already headed over to the bar for dinner.  Jenny’s boys liked to play pool before the real pool players showed.  They were probably hungry, and Jenny was most likely talking to some of the staff.  It had been a long journey of AA meetings and visits to the bar without drinking before he felt confident that she had figured out how to handle the memories from the accident.  Finnigan’s had been their place as a family.  Slowly, it was becoming that again.
The restaurant bar atmosphere seemed calm, while the boys were filling their plate with everything but salad from the salad bar, Jenny was talking about tenant agreements, a property inquiry and something else, but Blake had his mind on the last time he was here with her, Calista.  Right in his back-storage room, he had ravished the woman into an incredible orgasm only to follow up with a successful feeling for the evening.  It was the first time in a long time that it felt that good, and that was why Jenny’s talking went in one ear and out his other.  Only Calista’s image of her naked body in the production of pleasure kept flashing through his mind.  However, the moment Jackie walked in with her date, a small part of Blake made him puff his chest out and give a firmer than normal handshake.  It was his big brother act, that probably didn’t need to be displayed, but all the same, Blake felt the need.  His attention got turned around to the real reason he was here tonight, to protect his friend’s best interest – not to date another loser like his dead brother in-law Pete.
“Blake, Jenny, this is Conner.  Conner, this is Blake, his sister Jenny, and my bestie, her two boys Colton, and Drake.”  Jackie proudly announced her adoptive family to her date.
“Pleasure.”  Connor offered out with a sincere smile.
Blake sized the man up in under five seconds by accessing his looks first.  The man had darker skin, brown eyes, a slight curl to his thick dark hair.  His hands were big and had a few calluses on them, along with the fact that his feet matched Blake’s size thirteen shoe, or so it seemed.  He wore plain jeans and a blue flannel shirt, which was about dress up code for these parts.  His smile had sincerity to it, as did the way he looked at Jackie like he won the lottery.  For now, he’ll pass, Blake thought to himself.  
Jenny, the smaller, feminine version of Blake, started right up asking questions and laughing with the new couple.  There was no mistaking that Blake and Jenny were sisters, and no mistaking that Jackie could easily pass as a taller, darker version of Jenny.  They looked like family and felt like it as well, and that was all Blake needed.  Not some newcomer from Utah with her soft pouty lips, flirtatious blue eyes, and soft blonde hair.  Not some erotic mature sexual energy she put off every time their eyes met.  Not the way her hands devoured him with her touch, her soft purring sounds of pleasure, and not, not the way she made him want to put all standards of business and pleasure don’t mix out for the wind to blow away.
Blake cleared his throat and asked Jackie where her son was at.  Not really listening to her explain that he was at the babysitter for the night.  He half listened to Conner talk about how he managed a local refinery, how Jackie’s new red highlights really looked great and then finally, without warning, the conversation turned to the new Dioltas Hide Out Café.  The very place that was owned, by the very woman, who was sexually occupying his mental space with ideas of how to make her moan in pleasure while everyone sat around talking casually.  The coffee shop was the last place he wanted to talk about.
Blake waved his hand in the air for the waitress attention.  He needed a drink.  Just one, which he usually did not drink in front of Jenny at the bar, but just the fact that the one person who rattled his balls with her bare hands, name was being mentioned while he was out with his family.
“I heard she is a divorcee?”  Jenny quizzed Blake.
“Blake met her, the other night, actually her first night here, isn’t that right?  Blake?”  Jackie had a snarky tone of amusement to her voice.  He turned and looked at the two women as if he did not hear a word they were saying.  
“Conner?  You a Chiefs fan?”  Blake offered for a distraction.
“Since birth.”  Conner bolted with pride.
The two men kept the conversation around football and local weather, while Blake affectively ignored Jackie and Jenny who carried on the conversation between themselves, luckily only mentioning Calista’s name one more time.  Blake heard himself repeat the farmer’s almanac quote from Calista and his cock flinched.  Just thinking about the woman constantly had him filled with a desire that he needed to work out of his system.
The night could not move on fast enough for Blake as he finally escaped the bar to head home after resolving a few issues for Randy.  He felt exhausted.  To be exact, exhaustion from thinking about box banging a certain blonde.  He continued to scrap some snow and ice off his platinum silver GMC Denali truck windows.  The family had gone home by six thirty while Jackie was heading out to the movies with Conner.  He replayed his entire bizarre day in his head, and all he could conclude was that he needed answers.  The sooner the better.
Before he knew it, he was staring up at the metal stairway, in the alley behind the coffee shop, that led to Calista’s apartment.  Long ago, there was an interior door and stairs that led down to the empty hallway between the building next to the coffee shop.  However, it got bricked over and Blake thought how it might be nice of him to unbrick it so that she had inside stairs to walk up and down, that led her out to the front street.  The empty building next store had an interior door in its loft that also took those stairs.  Architecturally, it could be done, but it was not something he would tend to right now.  Watching Jackie, all happy and giddy on her date, made him realize that he had not been on a date in over six months.  A real date, not a social hook up.  He thought about pulling his phone out and swiping for a local hook up, instead, he climbed the metal stairs, feeling his legs getting heavier with each step.  What lies beyond the metal door at the top, was an enticement he was not sure he could handle to turn away.  However, business and pleasure never mixed well – like oil and water.  
Calista listened to the knock on her steel back door while her mind had been trying to forget all about Blake.  The moment she looked through the peephole and saw him standing there in his Carhart denim jacket, snow falling lightly around him and an intense look on his face, she hesitated in opening the door.  “Just a minute.”  She hollered over her shoulder as she grabbed her dark purple jersey knit robe that had been draped on a chair by the door.  She tied it at the waist, tight.  All she had underneath was just a navy-blue tank top and gray jersey knit pajama shorts.  No underwear, no bra, and denying that after seeing him, twice today, that she had a few new naughty thoughts about her Kansas man.
The minute she opened the door, while mumbling that she forgot about asking him to stop by, he seemed irritated.
He stood just inside of her door, after she closed it.  He looked around and noticed that in a very short time, the woman had a chandelier up hanging from the twenty-foot ceiling rafters.  There were heavy rich looking gray velvet type curtains over the eight-foot windows; they were closed.  A lot of salt wood looking furniture, mixed with some industrial farm house pieces that looked like the stuff the designer put in his house.  She had a lot of dark purple and gray tones everywhere, faux led candles that were lit, and fur pillows in gray and cream.  Large one’s piled on the floor, small ones all over a decent looking L shaped dark gray couch.  Her entire place was an open loft floor plan, but she had some kind of seriously expensive looking dark curtains, that were closed in the area that was the bedroom of ten-foot ceilings.  Above that area was a small closet storage area with a set of stairs he designed and put there.  It gave the open floor plan an option of small bedroom upstairs enclosed, or large closet and bedroom downstairs.  He was afraid to ask what was behind the thick dark curtains in what he was sure was the bedroom.
Calista took his silence and staring as a compliment.  She had outdone herself in decorating the place in such a short time.  Thankful for quick delivery of her decorating items and quick work of her teenage hired handymen.  The Forest boys had spent several days after school, hanging curtains with their dad’s expertise, putting together furniture, picking up supplies and decorative orders from a shipper that came in but was too big or heavy for her to bring up.  They pulled it all together day by day.  In fact, she wasn’t totally sure until the boy’s mother Tanesha stopped by to see the progress and covered her mouth with her dark hand while tears dribbled down her cheeks.  Her two boys had been talking for days about what they had been doing for her, and how it got them thinking about starting their own home fix up business.  She mentioned that until then, they thought Xbox gaming was their future after high school.
Calista finally spoke up to Blakes look of astonishment.  “Let me take your coat. Would you like a hot tea?”
“Huh, what?”  Blake turned his attention back to her.  His eyes trailed from the place her robe tied, up her body, stopped at the perky nipples poking out of the robe, and then up to her eyes.
“You got a minute for a hot tea?  I just got out of the shower and was thinking about a hot tea and a movie.”  She smiled while her hand was out to take his coat.
“No.  I can’t stay.”  He shook his head no as his hands wanted to not only take his clothes off but hers as well and find out what was behind those thick dark curtains that were drawn.  “Wait?  The water heater.  You told me it wasn’t working.”
“I got it fixed, the temperature needed to be turned up, but there is a leak.  Slow drip.  I emptied the tank this morning, a lot of rust gunk came out of the hose. I think it might need a new water heater soon.  Other than that, the stove is shot.  Not that I cook a lot. I had bought a convection microwave and I picked up a hot plate at the hardware store, but yeah, no stove.”
“Let me take a look.”  Blake turned his attention to the stove first. 
As Blake messed around with the stove, first by testing buttons, then by pulling out from the wall to make sure it was plugged in, Calista felt her nipples peak with excitement.  His body in motion, even with clothes on, peeked her sexual interest even though his resounding words of business and pleasure don’t mix echoed in her brain.  She mentally scoffed at that idea and reminded herself that she had ample years of the dating scene to conquer.  Although, her mind could do nothing but think about how nice it would be to find a man like Blake to pass time with when she wasn’t busy with the shop, and with passing time, she was thinking about the sexual pleasure kind of time.  She leaned back against the wall, folding her arms under her breasts, and smiled down at Blake who just cast a strange glance up her way.
Blake had to wonder, was the seductive way she just positioned herself so that her robe opened to maybe nothing underneath on the bottom and her cleavage calling to him like a canyon he wanted to explore with his tongue.  He quickly got up from his knees after closing the lower stove drawer and towered over her body that was only inches away.  He paused because his body wanted to untie that robe and fuck the ever-living pleasure out of the woman looking up at him with blinking blue eyes.  Instead, he turned and went to the kitchen sink to wash his hands, not that they were dirty, just that he needed a moment of distraction, and cold water might do the trick.
Blake spoke out over the running water.  “Sure thing, it’s toast.  Not a huge expense, I might have a good working one over in my storage center for all my rental buildings.”  A place that was stocked with his industrial art furniture, appliances, and anything associated with remodeling and repair.  
He turned and could not help but softly smile at Calista as he dried his hands on her purple kitchen towel that had been set next to the sink.  He walked by her and motioned with his hand towards the utility closet.  “I’ll take a look at the water heater.”  It was due, he knew that, but had kind of put it on the bottom of list of things he needed to do; now it got moved to the top, but this was a job for a local handyman named Larry Stiles.  He just did not think being in this woman’s apartment, with her dressed like that, sex in a robe, it was like she had just done her hair and makeup for him, although she looked good at the grocery store, and even better naked on a stack of liquor boxes.  Holy shit, he needed to get out of there.
“I told you.”  She chimed up cheerfully as he turned from being on his knees to look at the leak on the water heater closet.  She handed him a hot tea, which he took out of politeness, but he was not going to stay.
The smell of cinnamon spice tea filled his nose.  She was looking at him over her gray coffee cup with words on the side, that said, ‘Fill Me Up’.  Holy shit, he imagined his cock filling her up.  He set his hot tea on a wood and metal coffee table he wouldn’t mind knowing where she bought it.  He shook his head no.  He needed to get out of there before he did decide to take his cock out and stick it in her hot warm places.
Calista set her tea down on the table next to his and reached out for his hand.  She could not deny the feel of his hand in hers was alluring, but the resistance to hold her hand told her that he was uncertain as to why she grabbed at his hand.  She smiled at him and tugged.  “Come on.  Let me give you a quick guided tour around.  I bet the place looks a bit different.  The Forest boys worked for me the last week and half, getting the place together.  I could hardly sleep until I got the place in order.  The café is next.  Over the holidays.  I have a slight remodel for the place.
He dropped her hand and she turned to him while he gave have her a raised eyebrow flat smile look. 
“Don’t worry.”  She teased with a smile that almost spoke out like, hey, Blake, come stick your cock in my mouth and I’ll let you plant your face between my legs.  Or so he thought to himself.  He shook his head and listened to her mouth moving and talking, although the words were not completely registering.  
“I’ve owned a coffee shop before; all my remodels have received great appreciation.  I actually, thought about being a decorator once, but my mother insisted a degree in business was in accord while I raised my son.  My business degree made me a coffee shop owner back in Utah.  Although, I could have been a coffee shop owner without one.  Business degree that is.  It was just a choice back then, more or less, my mother’s choice, but I followed through with it, even though my heart was really into helping people and decorating.”  Without even a single deep breath she continued talking more out of nervousness, rather than chattiness.  “To the right, is the dining table for four that can expand to seat eight.  Not that I really know eight people that might want to eat here yet, at least not until I get a stove.”  She laughed.  “Upstairs is my dressing room.”
Blake remained silent while she walked up the stairs in only her skimpy robe, purple fuzzy socks and a happy go lucky gal kind of look on her face, as he followed her thinking only of stripping her naked on the stairs he built.
The moment he walked into the small room of ten by ten feet, he felt a waft of female energy breeze over his body.  It was well lit.  Another hanging chandelier, a large cream-colored plush chair with a matching ottoman.  Those fuzzy pillows everywhere, mixed with the same grays and purples as accents.  Floor to ceiling leaning mirror, and more clothes, shoes and accessories than he needed to see.  The only thing that held its appeal was a lingerie bag from a well-known retailer sitting on the floor, and some lacey things placed on the floor next to it.  He let go of her hand and turned to walk down the stairs while talking over his shoulder.  “It’s nice.  Really.  Listen, I’ve got a guy that will call you.  Larry Stiles the local plumber.  My business has a contract with him.  Sorry, but I’m running late.”  
He was already at the bottom of the stairs.  The moment he turned to see her standing at the top of the stairs with a hurt look he half smiled.  “Sorry.  Quickly, show me the rest.”
She practically ran down the stairs in a flittering fashion, causing her robe to expose some short shorts underneath.  Good lord, he needed to get out of there before he took the robe and everything else off her body while begging for a fashion show of lingerie down those stairs.
She pulled hard and fast on the thick dark gray curtains.  As they rolled on o rings to the side, there was purple sheer material everywhere.  She pulled a set aside on o rings and in the room, was another chandelier, dimmed to a very soft warm light.
Blake stood there, staring at a huge king size bed.  No light was peeking in anywhere.  It was dark out, but usually this space had some filtered outdoor street light coming in.  The room was a deep dark dungeon of sex lounge look, purple, gray, creams, fur, pillows, candles – everywhere.  There was a huge rectangular ottoman that looked like a couch without sides, and in that instant, his cock was hard, his mouth watered for her naked skin and for the first time around a woman in a long time – he was utterly speechless.
Calista spoke up first.  “So that’s basically it.  I have a huge writing desk that once it’s delivered, the boys need to put together, but that’s going in front of the front windows out there, facing to the street and beautiful horizon view.  Shoot, if I live here long enough, I might inquire about buying the building.” She thought he might like her décor job, but then again, he was just staring at her bed.  She wanted his opinion but sensed something was extremely rigid in him tonight.  It was as if was on guard.
He turned to her and looked her straight in the face.  “I own the building, and this apartment.  That might be hard to buy seeing as I have no plans on selling it, which reminds me, how come your name is not on the lease for this or the coffee shop?”
She was taken aback by his sudden frosty demeanor.  She closed her robe with her right hand as if to protect her heart and felt her eyes water.  “Okay.  I guess I did not know you owned it.  The paperwork stated JBJ Enterprises owns this and my shop.  My corporation, CCM, leases both.  First C is for my Aunt Caroline who was more of a mother to me than my deceased mother.  The other two initials, obviously stand for Calista Miller.”
It was in that moment, that memories flooded her, emotional ones and her eyes watered and her nose ran.  She wiped an eye before he could see the tear that was about to fall, and she sniffed her nose.  “Sorry, allergies.”  She turned away from him and looked at her place.  She was proud of her design and all the hard work the Forest boys did on her place.  So what if she could not buy it, she would call it home as long as Blake let her lease it.
“Sorry.”  His apologetic voice whispered out, while his large hand landed on her shoulder trying to turn her.  When she finally did, he stopped resisting.  He pulled her body to his, letting his lips drop to hers, pursuing her hot wet mouth that tasted of a salty tear.
She fought him at first, but then her body succumbed to his desire expressed in his kiss.  
He felt the need to kiss and hold her as long as he could, because he was not going to take it any further than that.  He did not have a condom and he knew he had to stop.  By the time he did, she was trying to get his coat off as her robe had fallen slowly off her shoulders.
“I can’t.”  He stopped her and stepped backwards a step as he considered her confused pained face.  “Look, I have a personal thing. I don’t mix business with pleasure, and you darling are business.  You and your CCM corporation could cause me some serious issues if things went…”  He paused not sure what the right word to use would be.
“I see.”  Calista’s instant defense took over.  Her head went high, while her robe fell the rest of the way off.  Her nipples were poking out of her navy blue ribbed tank top, as her mouth issued words of dignity her body did not feel.  “I appreciate you stopping by.  If you can just share the plumbers contact with me, I’d appreciate it greatly.”  She turned to her shoulder bag that still had his whiskey travel size bottle in it, that was setting on the couch next to where they stood.  She reached in, grabbed a calling card with the corporation name and phone number.  
He stared at the card.  It was all there in print, her corporation information and the local PO box he knew, his was there too.  
He stuffed the card in his back pocket and wanted so badly to say I’m sorry and then strip her naked, fuck her until she thanks him for what she needed so badly on her new boudoir bed décor.  Instead, he frowned and looked down before looking at her; she had a distant hard edge to her face now.  For the best, he told himself.  He had digits of a willing blonde in town, that he could get a quick relief with, thinking it was Calista and no one would be the wiser.
By the time Blake left her loft, the chill from the outside air, stayed inside.  As she poured herself a tall glass of red wine, her phone dinged with a text from his cell, sharing a contact.  She accepted the contact and put Blake’s cell phone number in her phone under his corporation name.  Then in name she put Kansas – giving the man a sense of stranger’s name again.  She opened her sleep aid prescription pills, took two instead of one, with a large swallow of wine.  She figured she would call the plumber in the morning; she was in no mood now.  Which got her next plan in action.
She was tired of men ruining her mood.  She had worked hard on this place and it looked spectacular.  The moment she had Blake in her apartment she wanted to strip him naked and fuck his brains out, no commitment or drama.  Having him this close, tasting his lips, his tongue mixing with hers, she was beyond horny.  Instead, he had to go all “I don’t mix business with pleasure’.  She let his words in his voice repeat in her head while she practically gulped her wine down and poured another glass.  She clicked her phone’s Bluetooth and sultry music poured out of the hidden speakers in the main area.  She dimmed the lights and reached to turn the heat up, which was included in the rent.  She was going to heat this place up.  She walked to her closet upstairs, wine glass in hand.  She looked around her dressing room and imagined a naked Blake sitting on the cream chair, hard cock, begging her to come to him.  She slipped her tank top off over her head, pulled her pajama shorts off, and dressed in a pure silk lavender knee length slip.  By the time she was walking back downstairs, to refill her wine, vibrator in her other hand, she had the perfect movie to watch in mind, and it was not some women’s life time movie show. 
Snuggled on her couch, soft cream fur blanket under her, female mixed with male orgasmic moans coming from her tv, she set her refilled wine glass on the wood coffee table, leaned back into a set of pillows and hit the on button of her personal pleasure toy.  
Really, who needs a man, when you got contract labor and a vibrator.  
Chapter Six
Redhead Seeks Revenge
As Calista sat in the beauty shop chair at Darlings local main hair styling salon, where all that is anyone in Darling went, she had a mission.  Dioltas Hide Out was doing okay, but she wanted to get out and socialize with the types that would get business to her coffee shop.  What better place than the main beauty shop in local downtown Darling, two blocks from her coffee shop, one block from the police station and right by the high school where those teenagers with disposable income needed to start frequenting more often.
The gal that was supposed to give her some fall color lowlights was running behind with her previous client.  Nothing new, Calista was used to that.  After spending an hour this morning talking to Larry Stiles the plumber aka older man flirt, she left him talking to himself in her apartment to fix the two things that needed fixing, the stove and the water tank.  After last night, she was fixed good and happy with two orgasms, before crashing hard, naked on her couch, with the heat blasting her place at seventy-five degrees all night long.  She chuckled internally thinking about the heating bill Blake was going to get; but she knew she would probably be more reasonable with the heat after last night.
She blocked out her entire day to run around town and hand out her promotional cards.  The beauty shop card was every fifth coffee free with twenty-percent off all lunch items.  Rarely, did a hair dresser frequent a coffee shop before nine am.  It would be more likely for a late lunch run that she would see the employees from this shop.  The police station, she wanted to hand out cards for fifty-percent off every purchase as long as they wore their uniform in the coffee shop.  This would give her place better security.  The previous owner Milly had several break ins, and one robbery the year before she bought it.  The last stop was the local high school DECA club where they are to hand out punch cards for every tenth drink is free under five dollars in exchange for her speaking to the class about running a small business.  If there was anything, she knew well, it was teens, and there was a good chance they’d make this a hangout if they felt welcome.  She had the new digital register set up to help her counter help with all her promotions she had planned.
By the time her new hairdresser gal, Remi, was ready to do her hair, she had her mind going a million different directions but somehow always ending with the kiss Blake left her with.  It was passionate yet, withholding, as if he wanted to tell her that yes, as she already knew, he was an incredible lover, but that he was not hers – but then again, she had not been trying to give him the available vibe.  If anything, she held her head high and backed down when he turned her down.  But that kiss he left on her yesterday, that made her think of a million and one different things about Blake.
“Calista?” Remi called out in question.
This was her second trip to see the gal, but she must have forgotten who she was.  She needed to get to know her, ask her questions about herself so that she would remember her.  She did a great job on the trim last time, that she was ready to explore a bit of fall colored lowlights to spark up her October mood.  Weather was changing – why shouldn’t she?
“How’s your day going?”  Remme chimed out as she wrapped the black cape around Calista and clipped it in back.  She began to run her fingers through Calista’s hair which felt heavenly.
“Good.  And yours?”  Calista replied while looking at the slender dark-haired girl in the mirror.  She had some shade of dark blue streaked through her black hair.  Her dark brown eyes had quite the makeup job on it, only someone of youth could easily pull off.  Her pale skin had a slight sunless tan look to it, which their spray tan specials were prominently promoted on the shop front window.  She looked to be in her mid to late twenties and the tattoo of two names on her wrist made her think they were kids but could be something else.
“I’m a bit tired.  Late night last night.  I went to the pub on the edge of town.  Finnegan’s.  Two for one shots and large happy hour buffet.  I am working through a bad break up.”  Remi’s voice lowered to a sad tone on her last few words and then she forced a happy smile on her face while looking at Calista through the mirror in front of them.
The bar, Calista remembered well.  Her first night in town and she decided to recklessly check off shag a stranger off her list.  That stranger, Blake, was now her landlord, and someone she could not get off her mind even though she wanted to as a break from men might do her some good.
“Do you know the place?”  Remi asked, which broke the mental image of Blake plastering her against the storage room wall, kissing her, taking her clothes off, and then the moment when he lifted her onto some heavy-duty box with something glass in it and began to stroke his cock in and out, causing the glass to jingle – that memory was broken by Remi’s voice asking if she knew the place.
“Uh, yeah.  Decent place, I guess.”  Calista answered as Remi dropped her hands to her shoulders.
“We should go there sometime, ya know, gal’s night out.  Now, what are you thinking?  Appointment notes stated fall colored lowlights.  I love this color of blonde by the way.  It appears to be natural?”  Remi’s voice held a note of sadness while she asked Calista, practically a stranger, to go hang out with her at a bar.  
Calista had to wonder, she knew her age of thirty-nine did not always look thirty-nine, on most days, she was called out for looking mid to early thirties.  But she was new in town and making friends was in her top agenda.
“I’d love that.”  Calista quickly chimed out while glancing up in the reflection of Remi in the beauty chair mirror.  “So, I was thinking fall colored lowlights.  Maybe some red, some caramel.  But while I was sitting out front, I saw this picture of a woman in a soft reddish blonde hair and thought, damn that is pretty.”
Remi smiled in the mirror at her and pulled a section of her hair up in her hand and then out.  “Low lights or red colored highlights for the fall is like on every woman’s check list right now.  Not many women, can pull off that shade of red, but you can.  It would look spectacular.  If you don’t like it, my last half of my day is empty, we can always change it and I’ll only charge you half the cost of new color for the second color.  Sound good?”
The thing was, Calista did not have all day to play beauty shop.  She had a huge list of things to do and a quick color job was one of them.  Could she really pull it off, a complete color change, versus some low lights in her soft light blonde colored hair?  Did she have the time?  She looked at Remi in the reflection of the mirror and gave her answer with a very wide smile and a nod of her head.
Two hours later, Remi was done styling her hair and then turned her into the mirror for the first time.  She looked at the soft red strawberry blonde before her.  Her blue eyes popped, her smile spread as she looked a bit vixen and a whole lot of someone different than the blonde hair woman that she had been all her life.  She ran her fingers through her hair and played with it.  Remi had done a great job.  This was her color, at least until winter.  Then she wanted to go with streaks of light blue on the underside that only showed when the wind blew her hair, or she wore it up.  She had seen it on a Toni and Guy ad in the hair color book out front and thought, now that would be daring.
Remi stood behind her, bent a bit so her head was above hers.  “You like it?  I mean, because I love it.  I want to take a picture of you and put it on my social feed.  I can get some new business with this color.”
“Sure.  Why not?  Just, please mention the coffee shop.  You know, as business promo.  I’d appreciate it.”  Calista answered with a huge smile on her face.  She could only see a sexy woman, who did not look sad after being recently divorced, looking back at her.  If this color looked great on a few other women and gave them the idea to come change their color, why not.  
Just as Remi stood up and turned to take a few steps away from the chair Calista was sitting in, standing behind her just a few feet away, was Blake, staring at her reflection in the mirror.  She had no idea why he was standing there; it wasn’t like he knew that she had an appointment today, but the look on his face was totally unreadable.  If he was attracted to her before, was he now.  Did he not like redheads?
Calista smiled at him and waved.  It was the moment he looked blankly at her staring, then turned to walk straight out of the store, that she did not care if he liked red heads or not.  But she did.  An imaginary image of a newspaper headline popped in her head.  Redhead seeks revenge.  She wafts that image out of her brain with an imaginary swat.  It wasn’t revenge she was seeking on Blake, but one of his sensual hungry man kisses that led to things that only made her moan.
She let out a huge sigh and thought to herself that if he didn’t like it, so what.  She would go find a new stranger to check off her list.  Seeing as Blake turned out to not be a stranger at all, but a man she saw almost every day around town, in her shop, and then when she had apartment issues, which in the beginning it was a lot.  But watching him walk away, little headlines of revenge popped in her head.  A loud metal clank sounded out, bringing her back to reality as another hairdresser’s color bowl dropped on the ground.  It was in that moment, that Calista realized all this revenge was not getting her the satisfaction it once did, and Blake, she did not want revenge, she wanted him – all of him, deep inside of her and more than once.  That thought curled her lips into a very satisfied looking smile.
Calista’s day carried on with comments from complete strangers regarding how beautiful her hair color looked on her.  It put an extra pep in her step and a smile around everyone she greeted for the rest of the day.  Everyone she handed discount cards to acted as if she was doing them a favor, instead of what she feared, which was them not wanting an outsider, of Darling that is, pushing their business on them.  Darling had a small town feel but was not the typical small-town size.  It had been growing rapidly in the last few years and from what she could tell, if you have some major players in the retail in town, they will come.  Most of the surrounding towns were much smaller, so maybe running a few ads in those local papers, might bring out of town patrons to her coffee shop when they came in town to stock up at the brick and mortar retailers that were not in their small town.
Back inside her place after a long day of promoting, she tossed her shoes off at the bottom of the stairs to her upstairs loft.  She thought about changing, but there was a good chance she wanted to stop at happy hour at Finnegan’s.  Not to see Blake, although that would be a benefit, but to see Jackie who caught up with her as she was walking out of the police station.  They had talked briefly about her hair, and Jackie convinced her to come put a flyer up at the locales bulletin board wall at the bar.  She already had a few pre-designed, so printing one out and going there sounded like a hell of a better plan than being alone in her loft.  Not that she didn’t love it, now that it was almost done, but she liked to keep busy, planning, listing, running, and when the silence settles in, so does the sadness over her ended friendship and marriage.  Most days it was easy, but there were those days, when the dishes were done so to speak, that she would sit for a moment in silence and think, never in a million years did I think this would be my life.  Wine tours with Stephanie, Europe traveling with Clay and Cole, and most importantly a life with love, happiness and family all surrounding her.  This new life was panning out, but the loneliness crept in one inch at a time when she was home alone.
The day had been warm but checking out the five-day weather forecast on her cellphone, a cold spell was moving in tonight.  She sat down on her sofa with her feet tucked under her, setting her cellphone off to the side, while she checked out the mail that she picked up from the post office, one piece at a time, tucking each white envelope behind the other.  When she was done, she tossed the stack of mail on her salt oak coffee table and sighed.  She would just make a few notes for tomorrows itinerary and then run up to her dressing room, find a warmer top to wear, slip on some sexy but sensible black boots in case of snow, and head out to the bar where the fresh memories of Blakes naked skin tingled against hers.
Her cellphone buzzed with a text and picture from Jackie.  In the picture, Jackie was holding up a napkin with a pen written message that stated, get your butt over here.  Her text simple read, ‘Redhead contest – winner, winner, gets a free chicken dinner.’  That caused a huge smile to spread on Calista’s face.  She got up off her couch, set her cellphone on the charger as she mentally contemplated what fun outfit to wear to Finnegan’s.
Just as she was about to ascend the stairs to her dressing room, a hard knock resounded at her outside door.  She turned to walk towards thinking who could that be?
“Calista, it’s Blake.”  His serious voice caused her to stop in motion.  Was he here to give her a hard time about the red hair, the fact that she accidentally dialed his cellphone and hung up after he left the hair salon, although she knew it wasn’t an accident, just her fingers wanting what her heart could not?  
She took a deep breath and hollered out.  “Just a minute.”  She looked down at the soft blue tunic silk top she had been wearing all day.  It looked fine.  She fingered the long-beaded necklace she was wearing and thought about the last time he touched her jewelry like he wanted her naked wearing it.  She fluffed her fingers through her hair and took a deep inner breath to get her confidence up just as she reached for the door to unlock and let the man in that had her on a yo-yo over what?  Whatever this thing was they had going on.
So, with a cockiness to her tone, she opened the door, leaned against the doorway seductively and teased out.  “What is it Kansas?  Business or pleasure?”  
She watched his large hand set itself palm flat against her door above hers and asked.  “May I come in for a second?”  He sounded all business, so she took a step aside.
With her breast peeking through her V-neck tunic length blue top, her nipples poking out past her white bra showing the darkness of the outline of her nipple and her simple black leggings just begging him to strip them off, Blake stepped in the apartment and did not answer those questions with a word but a lip searing kiss of the tongue twisting kind.  He was quickly figuring out he had no control around the woman, trouble or not, he wanted to be in her – deep.  The red hair only made it more so.
Somewhere or somehow, Blake had the door closed and Calista out of her soft blue tunic top.  He had his hands full of her breasts before he breathed out his first words. “Why the red?”  
His mouth was pulled away from hers.  His light green eyes appeared bright and shiny as he looked deep into her blue eyes for an answer.  Her breathing was so heavy she could barely answer.  “Why not?”  She whispered as her hands began to tug at the dark navy-blue shirt he had on.  The buttons were tight in their spot and she wanted to just rip the shirt off, buttons popping and all.
He looked deep into her eyes and hesitated before his mouth rushed back to hers.  His kiss held passion and frustration.  The rush to be in her was the hardest desire he would have to forego.  For now, he wasn’t thinking, he just showed up at her back door, wanting nothing more than to run his fingers through her new red hair, stroke every inch of her naked skin and slide his rock-hard cock inside of her, but instead he had to stop before that.  He had to have control, he reminded himself internally, while his hands and mouth were touching every bare inch of skin that he could get his hands on.
It took only a few steps, once he picked her up and she wrapped her legs around him fully clothed, before he had her lying flat on her back, on her big plush L shaped couch.  This couch with all of its pillows and blankets, all fuzzy and fur, it felt so girlie, yet so sexy with her laying on it looking up at him as if she was mentally pleading with him to fuck her, yet this time, unlike the last time, she said nothing.  She didn’t beg, plead or ask.  She just looked at him with desire and a softness to her smile that told him she wanted this.  He wanted it too, but he knew he had to stop himself before he went completely inside of her.  He would pleasure her, tell her that he has a loss of control but that his business and pleasure rules still stand.  This was just him, coming here, to taste her.
Before Calista could say anything, or wanted to say anything, she was looking up at the man she just could not get out of her head.  This is just sexual fun, she repeated over and over in her head.  You don’t know anything about him, really.  She told herself internally.  However, the moment he had her completely naked, while he was still dressed, and his tongue was dancing around her skin with his hot wet mouth teasing her, pleasing her and making her moan soft pleasuring sounds, she was lost.  Her will versus her desire was battling it out.  She wanted his tongue lashing he was teasing her with, but she wanted his hard cock in her.  God, she could only hope that he brought a condom.  Her body moved in reaction to his touch, his tongue, his fingers sliding in and out of her hot wet pussy while he looked up at her licking her clit.  She looked up to her ceiling, away from his glance of satisfaction as he ate at her pussy, filling her with his fingers, and making her think that this was just what?  
She told herself to stop thinking about the what and enjoy the now.  She raised her hips a bit in reaction to his mouth.  She let her hands hold her breasts as her fingers toyed with her hard nipples.  Her new red hair had a section that had fallen across her face a bit as she turned her head sideways during a long drawn out intensity that caused her to bite her lip and keep her from screaming.  
It was in the second that her body shook with a tremor of delight, that her lips could no longer bite back what she needed to scream.  “Oh my.  Fucking.  God.  Blake!”  She screamed his name; her fingers grabbed his dark brown hair and shoved his face hard into her pussy as she literally felt her entire body become a tingling sensation of electricity.  
He had her good.
It was quiet for a minute as the world around her, her world, tried to regain a bit of consciousness.  He was kneeling one leg on the couch between her legs, one hand on her knee, wiping his mouth with the inside his shirt he never took off and looked down at her.  She got the distinct feeling that perhaps, this was all that was going to happen.  She sucked in and breathed out a deep stuttering breath before asking.  “Can I return the favor?”  Not that she was a cock in mouth gal all the time, but she loved to make a man happy, hoping he would finish off inside of her.
His eyes said it all.  He had a smile of satisfaction on his face that he made her happy and the huge bulk under his dark denim jeans, told her he wanted more.  
“I had not planned this.”  He smiled and winked, acting causual.  “I did not come prepared.”  He stood up and took a step back.  
She leaned up on her elbows, letting her new red hair cascade down behind her as she closed her legs and bent her knees to lean them sideways.  “I can take care of you.”  She offered softly.  Knowing full well that she wanted his entire hard cock inside of her wet pussy and not just in mouth but if this got them this far, maybe next time they could play the bang the box game.
“I shouldn’t have come.”  He offered quietly as his demeanor changed suddenly.  
Calista watched his facial reactions that started to show a bit of defense begin to return; a signal he had given her before clearly stating that this was as good as it was going to get for now.  Someone, somewhere, had hurt him.  Because no normal man would do the things he does to her and refrain.  What business and pleasure did he mix before that caused him to be so cautious?  She blinked hard and fast to keep tears from falling that she felt stinging the backs of her eyes.  She raised herself up and grabbed a large grey feather pillow, setting it in front of her, like a shield, while quizzing him.  “Maybe you shouldn’t have but you did.  Come.  And I came.  And I am just offering the return favor.”  Her voice was not the sexy sultry vixen she wanted to sound like.  Her tone was deceiving her over her hurt.
“Calista?”  Blakes voice sounded out in questioning as he took a step back and looked at his surroundings as if he just realized what he had done, where he was, where he placed her before he slid his large muscular fingers in her, his mouth planted firmly between her legs.  “I…I don’t think I can do this.”
She stood up and had a firm grip with her right hand on the pillow that was still covering a part of her body.  “What is this?”  She seethed in slithering tone.
“This.”  He motioned to the couch, and then looked towards her bedroom where it called to him like a siren in the night.  “Us.  Sex.  Casual sex.  I don’t do casual sex.  I mean I do, I guess I don’t do casual sex with people I have to do business with.”
She dropped the pillow from her body but kept a grip with her right hand as the large pillow rested half on the couch and half against her now standing next to the couch.  “And why not?”  She smiled but it wasn’t a heartfelt smile, nor was it a come let me lick your cock smile.  It was a what the fuck smile.
“Do you?”  He asked with an inquisitive look on his face.
“Hard to say.”  She jutted out.  “Seeing as you’re the first business associate that I might even consider.  But hell, if I take my business elsewhere, who’s to say.  I just might.  I’m a free woman after all and I like sex.”  And then for added measure right before she threw the pillow at his head as hard as she could she added a sting to her tone.  “With or without men!”
No surprise.  He dodged the pillow and then took a step back.  With a calm voice he kept stepping back while talking.  “You are my renter.  I own your lease on your coffee shop and I think incase things went, I don’t know, crazy, then this might not be the best for both of us.”
She followed him with her eyes as he walked backwards and slowly turned her naked body towards him.  Her head high, her eyes wide and a fuck you tone to her voice.  “Well, I’m not crazy but you most certainly must be, because when a woman like myself, asks a man if he wants a blow job, he does not turn it down.”  She blinked hard to keep the tears back while her jaw tightened, and white lights started to dance around her head.  Her euphoria of her orgasm was gone, and a nasty migraine was tapping on her head.  She watched his jaw clench and release a few times before his soft voice echoed out into her home, actually, his building and her temporary home, but it was the place she wanted to call home by staying here a long time.
He cleared his throat and looked away as he spoke with guilt.  “I’m sorry.  It’s all my fault.  I have no control around you.”
He started for the door as her voice pleaded out.   “But why then?  We are grown adults.  If this is business, why can’t we make it just business?”  She could hear her own words clawing at the room, begging for salvation, wanting him to change his mind and in doing so, give up her own dignity, just to have a few great orgasms.  The old her would have thought she was crazy, then again, she lived the last few years of her life with two people that meant so much to her, just treat her as if she was no one.  Just as Blake was treating her now.  That she was just business he had a hard time keeping his hands off of.  Where was her dignity now?  She wondered as a tear fell down his face.
He started to say something but stopped at the sight of her tears and wavering in her voice as she pleaded to him, naked in front of him.  “Just go.  I don’t want to do this.  Just go.  I don’t like fighting.”  
She turned and walked into her bedroom.  The last image he saw of her was her sensuous naked body tempting him to follow while she closed her dark thick curtains behind her.  How he wanted to just go back in there, strip off his clothes, let her wrap her sweet juicy mouth around his cock and then slide it in her hot wet pussy until she withered from another orgasm.  Instead he softly talked to the air.  “I am sorry Calista.  It’s me. Not you.  I am truly, truly, very sorry.”  He cleared his throat and offered up what he could not promise.  “I won’t do it again.”
“Never say never.”  She whispered out, not even sure if he heard, but he did.
Blake heard the three words that sounded so pitiful.  He knew who hurt him, but what or who hurt her.  Jackie and Jenny had been mentioning things they heard, but he was not one to listen to rumors.  Those were things he usually tuned out.  The minute he closed her door and started down the metal steps, which each step felt like a cement block for his foot was landing on each metal grated step, he knew he had done something so stupid, so selfish tonight.  What was wrong with him?  Two consensual adults having sex, he swipes that way once in a while.  But Calista, after that first night they met and more, he knew, something about her, some alluring sexual part of her called to him, made him yearn for her, want her in more ways than sex – and that scared the ever-living shit out of him.
Blake’s heart pinched, and his mind reeled with the question – what had he just done?  He walked to his truck, started it up, without thinking he drove straight to his bar, where Jackie took one look at him and glared.  She must know.
“Just an iced tea tonight Jackie.  And the number three burger special.”  He adjusted himself on the barstool as Jackie leaned forward with a grimace on her face.
“A little-known fact – Jack!”  She said the name as if it was a mix of his name and you are a fucking asshole.  She continued.  “Not everyone is caught up in the Blake Special.  Some women might fall head over heels in love with you because I guess they think you’re sexy.  I know you for the kind human being you are, as for sexy – not my type.  As for Calista, that woman has her shit together.  Especially after everything she’s gone through.  She is sweet!  She is kind!  She is funny!  And, if I was a lesbian, she would be top of my got to get me some of that list.  You are one stupid asshole!”  She turned away as if she was going to help another patron that just sat down a few stools away, then she turned back towards Blake glaring, marched right back in front of him, leaned back over the counter towards him and sounded out her thoughts through a whispering seething noise that caused Blake to feel a pinch of pain behind his eyes.  “Not to mention the chemistry I caught onto the moment you two looked at each other.  She’s not some fly by night, I will leave you for an older richer man.  If anything, her finances match yours, or at least as close as any woman in this town might get to.”  She stood back up and glared at him.  “One Jackass burger special coming up.”
Blake was left speechless as Jackie walked over to her computer monitor to put in his order.  By the time she put his iced tea on a coaster in front of him, she seemed a bit calmer, so he thought he might try his hand at asking.  “Did she call you?”  He quizzed as Jackie turned to help another customer.  
By the time she walked by him, she hissed at him as she walked back and forth from behind the bar counter. “I texted her.”
She went and helped another customer and when she walked back by him with a glare she mouthed ‘asshole’ and walked by.  Blake rolled his eyes and could only imagine what caused Jackie to text her and when the hell did his kind of sister become bff’s with Kansas.  Holy shit, this was not the kind of mess he wanted to roll around in.  All the better he just leaves this situation alone.
His jackass special as Jackie called it was slapped down in front of him and a bottle of ketchup was smacked against the bar top next to his plate.
“Listen, Jackie.”  He started up with his soft toned voice he used to comfort his sister a million times.  “Things are complicated for me right now.”
She put her arms across her chest and made a humph sound.  “Not really all that complicated Blake.  As you and I are here right now, millions of people across the world are getting their hearts broken one way or another.  To not love is a loss.  To not pursue love is a tragedy.  I remember you telling me that one time.  Thing is, Calista is a fun mature woman that yes, she too got her heart broken, but she chose to move here and make a new life.  Perhaps she wasn’t thinking something like this would happen so fast to her, but then again, she said she’s not looking for serious right now.  She was supposed to come here tonight and win the redhead contest.  By the way, you get to judge and hand out the prize.  So, stick around a bit.”  She walked away before he could say a word.
As Blake ate his hamburger, he contemplated texting Calista, but his pride stopped him.  Or maybe it was the fact that if she forgave him, he would do something mean and replay the entire incident again.  He figured no communication was best for now.  Until he could get himself on track.  
When Jackie finally had a moment to stop back by him, she was less pissed off.  “By the way, Calista did not say anything to me.  She just texted she wasn’t feeling so hot and could not make it.  However, I just saw her an hour before that, and she was doing great.  Then, I happened to swing by the hardware shop and happened to take the alley way and saw you coming out of her place.  When I called her, she sounded sad and when I asked her, she said she was, but it was nothing I needed to be concerned about.  This is me, putting two and two together.  You and her,” she finger-motioned sex, “that first night you met, in the back room.”  She wildly motioned to the back room.  “Then, knowing you Blake Jones, you couldn’t get enough of the woman.  Remi is here tonight and said she thinks somethings up by the way you two were looking at each other at the salon.  Jenny said you talk about her a lot but then stop.  Whatever is going on in that brain of yours you better figure it out.  If it’s just sex, then let it be that.  If it’s more, you might be pleasantly surprised, seeing as Jenny and I have done a little digging on the woman.  But we are not telling you what.  Just that we approve.  So, pull that head of yours out of your arsh.”  She giggled as she always used the word ‘arsh’ instead of ass as a form on parental cussing.
“Jesus...”  He drawled out in exasperation. 
“Oh, he’s not gonna help you if you keep this shit up.  Go do some good humanity thing, like you always do, and leave the poor woman alone, otherwise, man up and ask her out on a real date.”
“It’s none of your business, Jackie.”  He said it jokingly but as soon as he saw her reaction, he realized she had not taken it that way.  Ever since she became a mother, her fun joking side took a back seat more often than not.  
“Is it, Blake?  Because I think you know it is.  You are like a brother, an uncle to my son, but as a sister, I feel it is time to move on.  An older, wiser woman, would do you some good.”  She paused at his reaction to the words older and then added.  “Who cares if she’s a few years older, she doesn’t look it.”  
Blake interrupted her before she can say anything more.  “I don’t care about age.  Hell, besides age between men and women these days is a far different thing than in our parent’s time.  It’s me, not wanting to deal with her, and her recent baggage.  I just want a nice quiet life, nice quiet wife.”  He stammered knowing himself, that he was asking for the impossible.
“Do you, Blake?”  She teased and started to walk away before turning to look at him with a solid bit of advice.  “Nobody, and I do mean nobody, has a nice quiet anything – we all come with baggage, yourself included.  Ask yourself if your life would look better with her in it or out of it?  Sounds like she keeps following your lead.  Besides…”  Jackie drew out the last word with a teasing smile.  “I think you like you some bit of crazy darling.  I truly do.”
Blake just shook his head no as he laughed softly while smiling at Jackie walking away.  Her words echoing in his head, were starting to sound true.
“I think you like you some bit of crazy darling, I truly do.”
Chapter Seven
Women unity in mind is more powerful than a solar plant.
Calista cleared her throat while standing in front of group of twenty or so woman, plus or minus, that were here to experience Dioltas Hide Out Book Night.  Dressed in a deep burgundy tunic sweater top, black leggings and her knee high dark brown boots, she felt comfortable and confident about herself.  Tonight she offered free coffee, and complimentary baked goods as an enticement for the socially promoted women’s only book club.  It was like a reading club, but instead, others brought recent best sellers in excellent condition to be exchanged or auctioned off, with proceeds going to the Holly Clinic off Route twenty-two.  The Holly Clinic, as Calista had come to find out, was a health clinic that turned its extra building that wasn’t being used into a day space for homeless women and children only.  They were not permitted for a full homeless shelter, but a place during the day, where someone who needed it, homeless or not, but mostly homeless used it, for a shower, fresh meal, child care, and a computer to send out resumes or look for listings for affordable housing, which did not seem to be too much of.  
She cleared her throat in front of the crowd of women.  “Welcome to Dioltas Hide Out Coffee Shop, easier to just say Dioltas, but you get my drift.”  She chuckled with a warm-hearted sound she missed hearing from herself.  She looked around and smiled while thinking to herself, this, she missed this, being around other possibly likeminded women who were gathering together, not to get drunk or sell products, but to exchange thoughts and ideas.
Calista’s idea was to gather once a month, however, the turnout was better than she had hoped, and there was already chatter amongst the women before she announced the start of the event, that these women wanted to do something that made a difference.
“Yes.  You in that lovely red sweater, where did you get that?”  Calista started off the meeting by taking questions from several raised hands, which had not been her plan, instead, she wanted more of a casual open discussion, books exchanged, the rest auctioned off from which she had bought several just published best sellers from Amazon prime earlier this week to be placed in her store, but instead, decided to auction off for the cause.  What she had not expected was large book bags full of great books.  Tonight, was going to make a difference, she was sure.
“Several amongst us want to know, why the name change to Dioltas Hide Out?  Not Darling Hide Out, or just The Hide Out Café?”  She smiled and raised her hand again.
“Yes?”  Calista asked with a smile to the same woman she just asked her question from.
“The sweater, Tully’s Thrift Store on Main.  It’s five blocks from here.  She buys from estate auctions all over the world and then eBay’s them.  If you’re lucky, you get to buy before it sells on eBay.  It’s a rare vintage label in perfect condition.”
Calista raised her eyebrows and formed her mouth in a hmm formation.  “Is Tully here?”
A slender woman in her early twenties stood up.  She was ravishing looking.  She had on a vintage sweater of pale pink, which played nicely against her darker complexion, and dark denim jeans with some type of custom embroidery about the front pocket stitching.  She looked to be Indian ethnicity with her thick dark black hair perfectly flat and shining.  Either way, her brown eyes sparkled, her smile was wide, and her voice had a singer note to it.  “I’m Tully.  Sorry, I wasn’t expecting a sales pitch.  I think everyone here knows me but you.  We should talk sometime and get to know one another, but for now, I am dying to know – what is the meaning behind Dioltas?”
Calista’s eyes grew big with surprise.  She had not expected everyone to catch on to the name so fast.  She thought she was clever, but these smart women knew better.  Dioltas in Irish meant revenge.  With her strong Irish lineage on both her parents’ side, it seemed a fitting name.  Perhaps, her personal revenge should not have seen its way all the way to Kansas from Utah and put into her coffee shop, but at the time it seemed awesome, right now she was doubting herself.
“Uhm, wow!”  Calista started and then cleared her throat before taking a deep breath.  “Short version is so much easier than the long version, but before I do that, please understand that tonight is about raising awareness for the Holly Clinic, which a new friend just told me about the other day.  Thank you, Jackie from Finnigan’s Pub.”
A slight round of clapping filled the room.  Jackie stood up and then motioned for everyone to be quiet.  Because like most of these women, she wanted to know why the name revenge in the café.
“Okay.”  Calista started.  “I’ll tell you the short version.  The one where I look totally innocent.  The long version with details will come years down the road, after I feel I can trust you and perhaps several drinks of whiskey.”
“What kind of whiskey?”  Someone shouted from the group.
“Yeah, how many bottles to make you tell.”  Someone else shouted.
Calista giggled.  “Not many, but I’m was not going to answer that.”  She cleared her throat and fast blinked her eyes for a second.  “In the big picture of things, my new friends, I picked Darling Kansas.  I don’t know why.  Maybe it was the name, the place far away from where I came, or maybe it was the feeling I got when I came here with my Aunt, who is like my mother to me, and we bought this coffee shop almost a year ago, at the same time I served my soon to be ex-husband with divorce papers.  When I came here, the town spoke to me.  And believe you me, I wanted to be one of those women that got divorced silently while sneaking off to a tropical local, but something happened when I came here.  I can only describe it as my soul found music.  Strange, but true.”
She raised her eyebrows from looking down at her shoes, letting her lips press hard together as she realized she had a very captivated audience.  It would be so easy for her to start crying right now.  Tell her entire sob story to all these women, who she was sure most of them would console her, however she was over the consoling part, on to the revenge part and if she needed to explain her decision to name the café coffee shop Dioltas, so be it.
A deep breath in and Calista started her brief explanation.  “Three years ago, my best friend, whom we raised sons of the same age and were close friends themselves, decided, with my husband, that they should get caught having an affair.  But they did not know that I knew.  For two years, I calmly, cautiously calculated my revenge and escape from a marriage I kept hoping he would decide she was not the better choice.  In the end, financially I won.  However, they are currently buying their first place together as we speak.  I thought of revenge as an end to the means, however, that slowly changed.  The two boys are no longer friends.  My son has lost what hero status he stamped on his father and replaced it with the image of a middle-aged man gone awry.  I, on the other hand, had decided that revenge comes in many forms.  Seeking revenge on someone is…”  she paused and then said it, “fucking satisfying, pardon my French.”
The room lit up with laughter as all faces had been staring at her with sympathy.  She had not wanted tonight to be about her, so she quickly ended the explanation.
“However, the best revenge is to seek higher ground, burn that bridge and not look back or go back, find what makes you happy, make a list and check it often putting yourself on top, which I have for a change.  At forty, I am a mother of one son who is traveling Europe and plans to come back and get a masters in college.  He is healthy, happy and well adjusted.  That was my accomplishment for the last twenty years.  As for my marriage, there were good times, great times and several memories now marred by the two exes’ in my life.  I wanted revenge that felt like I had arrived.  I am in the best shape of my life physically or at least I haven’t felt this good since my twenties.  I hired a nutritionist, a personal trainer for those two years the two were cheating behind my back, thinking a better body, a happier me and he will choose me.  When he didn’t, I still won.  I look and feel good.  I wanted a business that made people feel good.  Serving coffee and baked goods, in a warm friendly atmosphere while spending some of my time giving back to society, with events like tonight, that is my revenge.  I tell myself every day that I felt lost in the chaos I called divorce that I’m back baby.  I’m back to the me I was before I met those two, and I am back to putting myself first, making lists and checking them off with success and plans.  And that in a nutshell is why I named this place Dioltas Hide Out instead of the other suggestions.  I guess I wasn’t thinking totally clearly yet.”  She chuckled.
Someone spouted out.  “You’re forty?”
Another woman chimed in.  “Seriously, thirty-five maybe at most, but where’s the gray hair?  The wrinkles, the midlife weight.”
“Ladies, tonight is not about me.  However, liposuction and Botox can be a good friend to keep in the emergency bag.  Seriously, nothing like a bit of revenge in the looks department to help a gal out.  This long hair, it’s a weave, the red hair – for the first time I might add, is compliments of Remi at Darling Hair Salon, these boobs, had a boob job in my twenties, because I was flat as a board.  This face, it saw a facial at the spa a lot during those two years that lying cheating, you know what kept telling me that he was late night at the office.  But I digress.”
“No.  Tell us more.”  Someone shouted.
“How about if you come back for the next monthly meeting and auction for the Holly Clinic.  It will be close to Christmas by then and we will be wrapping spa packages to give to the women who visit the clinic and small toys for the kids.  Food donations will be taken as well.  In the meantime, Jackie, if you would not mind taking over as this is your idea after all, I need to run upstairs to my apartment, I forgot I left my curling iron on with the excitement of getting ready.”
As Jackie stood up and came front and center, Calista found it hard to keep her composure with a smile on her face.  What she just did, what she just talked about, was now three years of hard pain staking heartbreak that she had only talked to a therapist about, but after tonight, obviously not enough.  She felt things she had tucked deep inside of herself, hoping it would only eek out at the time most convenient for herself.  Tonight, was not it.  Those questions were hard to answer, even if she only gave the short version.  The long version was painful and full of memories where she was not at her best.  
Calista took the cold metal steps to her apartment one hard step at a time.  Light snow had fallen and even with the metal non-slip tread, in her heeled dress boots, she needed to realize that she had to wear nonslip shoes on the stairs, and just change into her dress boots or shoes once down the stairs.  A small thing to deal with as the winter snow season approached, but she was tough, and she was creative, and damn it she was not going to cry until she had a tissue under her eyes to catch the tears.
The minute she opened her apartment door, she realized that she was not the one that had turned most of the lights on.  She stepped inside cautiously and looked around.
“Oh hey!”  Blake came around the corner with a metal tool in his hand and a look on his face that he was happy to see her.  
If Calista remembered correctly, the last time he left, they broke off, whatever it was that was going on between them, just as he suggested that what was going on between them did not keep going on.  In that brief second, his sexy smile made her forget that she was about to come up here to cry.
“Uh, hey?”  She softly whispered out but kept staring at him as if he was a nice plate of desert that kept morphing into a pile of spiked nails.  Her internal vision of wanting to eat him up versus the dangerous vision of what he kept doing to her.  She really did not need this right now.
“Sorry.”  He offered up gingerly.  “Jackie mentioned the thing going on downstairs tonight.  Kind of cool of you to offer your shop.  Listen, I never finished fixing those few little things on that list you texted me.  I know we, I mean I, kind of ended the other night with I’ll just send someone over to finish, but I figured, you know, that I should just do it while you are not here seeing as I’m not busy or anything and anyways, I left you some flowers over there on your table with an apology note.  That is if you can read my handwriting.”  He chuckled softly remembering how the blonde he dialed up last night had not worked out like he planned.  There had not been a good substitution for Calista, but he still wanted to keep this as friends, for now.  He had been harsh that night, and this was the only way he really knew how to apologize.
Her eyes opened wide while her mouth licked her lips with desperate need to kiss him.  In that moment, tears started to fall.
Blake could have shot himself with a forty-five.  What the hell was he doing getting involved or apologizing to a weepy dramatic woman.  But he had been known to be a great shoulder to cry on, a hugger of all champs, and a means to the end of sadness – which usually ended in sex.  
He wrapped his arms around her tight and kissed the top of her head.  “It’s only flowers and an apology.”  He teased.
She pulled out of his hug a bit too quickly for his liking, which bothered him tremendously.
Calista held her head high, although it felt incredible, his hug would lead her to more despair she could not handle right now.  I am a strong woman, she told herself internally before softly speaking out to Blake who seemed put off with her distance.  “It’s not that.  Sorry.  I just had a moment downstairs.  It’s nothing really.  I guess you caught me off guard.  I was coming up here to cry for a second, get it all out, regain my composure and freshen up.  Jackie is heading up the entire thing.  I just got caught off guard.”  She turned to the decorative mirror she had put by the door.  Wiped her eyes with her fingers and then took a few deep breaths as she plumped her curled red hair with her fingers.
Blake looked at his feet as he spoke out.  “Sorry.”  He knew that feeling all too well about finding composure after a breakup.  Jackie had given him an assumed reason for Calista’s moving here.  That was the main reason, he just did not see this going anywhere.
Calista turned and smiled.  “It’s nothing really.  I guess I’m just bummed everyone knows my real age.  That, and the fact that those clever women figured out Dioltas meaning.  Listen.  Lock up when you leave.”  She slipped her cute heeled boots off and slipped on her black Sorel Winter ankle boots she had set under the table by the door.
As she closed the door, she faintly heard the question that matched Blakes confused look on his face.  Either he was confused about her age, concerned, or the name Dioltas?
By the bottom of the steps her phone dinged with a text from Blake.  “Revenge? Huh? Age?”
She texted back.  “Forty as of last night.  Thanks for the birthday gift.”
He did not text back.  Perhaps it was in his apology note, she really did not care at the moment, because if she had stayed in her apartment a second longer, she was going to find a way to convince that sexy fix it landlord of hers to strip his clothes and hers and bring her revenge satisfaction delight – which meant more than one happy o was coming out of her body.
Sometimes a woman must hold her head high and move on.
Chapter Eight
Breaking up is hard to do.
Blake checked his list for things to fix note for Calista’s’ apartment.  He gathered his tools into his toolbox.  He wanted out of there before, she got back.  The coffee shop said she was expected to be most of the day running errands.  He left last night without finishing.  It wasn’t her age that bothered him.  He had been with older woman.  Calista did not look forty and if he had known it was her birthday, he might have let the business thing go for some personal birthday pleasure.  It was the fact that she was just starting to get her life together after a bad divorce and friend break up.  He did not want to be hurt by being the rebound guy again.  Not to mention she lived and ran a business in his buildings.  He knew that just keeping this thing between them as business associates was best.  The problem was that he wanted nothing more than to strip her naked and make love to her like a real man knows how, over and over, waking up in the morning naked and satisfied.  That was something his mind thought he was ready for, but not his heart.
Just as Blake turned from locking the apartment door, he felt something in his awareness of his surroundings.  As he turned, there at the bottom of the stairs looking up at him like a red headed sinful treat, was Calista.  He loved blondes, but the red on her gave her an edge look that spoke volumes in the naughty department.  Her lips curled up in a sinful manor as she stood at the bottom of the stairs looking up at him.
“My oh my, what have we here?”  She teased and started to walk up the stairs.
“Just finishing up.  You should be good to go.”  He replied coolly, as if her presence didn’t make him rock hard between his legs.  He tried to act casual as he took a few steps down the metal steps.
Each step they took, they looked at each other, drawing closer, Blake wondered why he was so hard edged about not mixing business with pleasure, then he remembered his ex-fiancé used to be his renter in a shop, which led to a disastrous heartbreak when she dumped him.  Every time she called him for repair, it was like a knife to his heart.  Nothing made him happier than to see her shop close for good.  Well not exactly, not seeing her around town, that made him find a way to get over his heartbreak.
Calista stood in the middle of the stairs blocking Blake from going any down further.  She smiled up at him with a naughty thought she kept to herself.  Her day had been a great success on the errand front.  She wanted to freshen up and head into the café for the rest of the day.  Her intentions were to not fly over the employees like a mother hen but keep them guessing as to when she will stop in, maybe keep them on their toes.  But right now, the way Blake was looking down at her from one step ahead, him blocking her from going up, she wanted nothing more than to take him back up into her bedroom for a midafternoon delight.  “Blake!”  Her excitement was in her whisper of his name.
“Calista…”  He drew her name out like a long shattering orgasm.
They both took a deep breath, took a step to the side and faced each other on the metal stairs, same step, looking at each other.  Blake reached up and gently pushed a long strand of red hair out of her eyelash that the wind just blew in.  She smiled at him and then her phone rang with Cole’s ringtone.
“It’s my son.  I have to get this.”  She grabbed her cellphone out of her shoulder bag as Blake continued down the stairs without a word goodbye.
As he sat inside his truck watching the apartment door close behind Calista, he thought to himself, a son.  She has a son.  He had not even thought of that being a part of his life.  He only thought of having her to himself, no strings attached.  But there were strings, plenty of baggage, and this was what he did not want in his life.  His sister and her kids were his family.  His desires could take a backseat for now.
Just as he started up his truck, the café shop back door opened, and Milly ambled out to wave him down.  He pushed the window button down and looked at the gray-haired woman that he bought his coffee from for as long as he could remember.
“Blake.  Glad I caught you.  I just called Calista, but her phone went to message.  We’ve got a problem.  With the plumbing.  Mind taking a minute to see what happened.  I was just about to see if Calista was upstairs.”
Blake turned his truck off and climbed out of his truck.  “I just saw her as I was leaving her place to finish fixing a few things.”
“Uh huh.”  Milly smiled at Blake while he rolled his eyes with a smile.
“Seriously, Milly.  You know me.”  He slipped his keys in his pocket, opened his back door and grabbed his small tool bag out.
“Uh huh.”  She smiled again with insinuation.  Blake was going to let it go for now.
“So, what’s wrong?”  Blake asked as he followed the old woman back inside the café.
Calista sat with her phone to her ear while listening to her son but thinking of the interaction that Blake and she had earlier as they passed on the alley staircase.  “I know mom!”  His crackling voice sounded exasperated, while trying to hide the tears.
“I’m not saying I told you so, but… ok, maybe it sounds that way and lord knows I hated that when others said that to me during your father’s and I’s divorce…”  her apologetic voice was quickly interrupted.
“This is not about you and dad mom!”  He practically screamed into the phone before disconnecting.
He was mad.  She could get that and if him yelling at her over his girlfriend dumping him then she would hold strong.  Although, he was right; this was not about her divorce to his father, this was about life throwing a wrench in his plans, or more like a whack upside the head – she should know.
She had a sense this was coming.  He decided to go off with two friends and tour Europe, and typical in fashion for Cole, he thought his girlfriend Katie should be waiting for him.  He was so much like his father some days, she wanted to scream.  In fact, sitting here, staring at her now silent phone, she could only imagine what was going through his mind.  In that instant, a migraine pierced her forehead and she set her phone down, walked into her bedroom, shut the curtains, and began a ritual she knew so well.
In the darkness of her room, she had closed her eyes, and tried to listen to the sound of her breath slowly adjusting to a rhythm.  What Cole was going through was nothing compared to finding out your best friend was sneaking around behind your back with your husband.  What was harder, was keeping it a secret, until she had proof that was without a doubt for the lawyer, along with a financial plan that she set into motion the day she found out.  
Outside of her room, she heard her phone ring and then stop.  She heard a ding from a text, and then another.  If it was Cole, she would call him back as soon as the Excedrin Migraine medicine kicked in, but for now, she had to breath and focus.  Her pain was not his.  She knew he was resilient and in two weeks, Cole would be out bar hopping in Dublin with his two buddies and there would be a girl.  For all she knew, maybe Katie had already figured out that his year in Europe meant for him that she stay solid and faithful, while he could taste all of the female flair in foreign countries.  Cole was his father, she knew that, and did not try to rationalize her own son.  Someday when he got married, she would have to keep her mouth shut and fingers crossed that he finds the one woman that he will not want to cheat on.  
As for Clay, he cheated before the marriage, during without proof, but along came Stephanie and she never would have thought that her best friend since Cole was born would be the one that he cheated on her with.  They shared so much raising their boys together, that she never would have dreamed of Stephanie and Clay doing what they were doing behind her back.
Thinking about it was not making the migraine go away, it was making it worse.  Her cellphone ringed again from the other room and then stopped.  Another ding sounded out and if she wasn’t stricken with the worse migraine in a long time, she would have conjured up the strength to go get her phone, bring it back into her darkened room and answer it, if it was Cole.
She rolled over onto her side, pushed her extra decorative pillow between her knees while reaching for the soft lush lavender throw blanket that she laid on the empty king size bed side.  The side that she shared with Clay for twenty-two years.
She felt her mind start to slow, realizing she was in such a better place now.  With Cole in Europe, he would get over this breakup with his friends, she just needed to stop talking to him about her failed marriage, and just listen to him until this too shall pass.  
Calista let her mind start to relax and thought about positive things.  Life had been getting better day by day.  The coffee house was making a great profit, which was part of her plan.  Her Aunt Caroline was doing great on her last Viking cruise; the social updates had brought her comfort.  The women in town seemed friendly every day that went by.  And then there was Blake, her mind always seemed to wander back to the man the enticed her with just a look.  He was like no other man she had been around.  He evoked feelings from just the memory of him, yet she knew that sometimes damaged people hurt people.  Was Blake that kind of guy?  Or was he so badly damaged his heart just would not let him fall in love again?  Calista did not want to be with a man who couldn’t be in love unconditionally.  Physically they were a match, but emotionally, perhaps they both still had a lot of healing to do.
Her phone dinged with a text again, but the sound was faint as her breathing and memories of sex with Blake was beginning to lull her into a restful state of napping.  She was never great at totally falling asleep, but a fifteen-minute nap, especially when a migraine hit, she was the boss at that.
Moments later, a feeling of someone sitting on her bed stirred her to slowly awaken.  However, the instant a large manly hand set itself on her shoulder, she bolted straight up in bed and began to scream while her hands where flying in the dark, trying to fend off whoever it was.  
“Calista?  It’s me, Blake.”  He removed his hand from her and got up from her bed.  He tossed her phone onto the bed next to her and then turned to reach over and turn on her small lamp next to her bed.  “I’ve been calling and texting you.  You didn’t answer and then when I knocked, I got worried.  Listen, a pipe burst at the café.  Larry is fixing it right now, but I thought you might want to know, it wasn’t a break, it was intentional.  Somebody fucked with your plumbing and I thought you might want to come see for yourself.”
She rubbed her eyes but kept a glare on her face as if to fend off his sexual energy that was causing her insides to turn with lusting heat.  He had awoken her from a sex dream, one where he was the major player in it, and she was being incredibly satisfied and about to scream out his name.  Thank goodness, she didn’t.  Standing now before her, he looked not like the man in her dreams that was licking her to utter pleasure, but like the man who had told her more than once that he did not mix business and pleasure.
She rubbed her eyes and grabbed her cellphone to look at it without saying a word to him.  There were several texts and calls from both Blake and the two gals working at the café.  As far as her son calling her back, not a word.  He hung up because he was pissed, and he wanted an apology from her first.  As usual, she would do it, but deep down, she could only hope that his buddies would get him through this, as she had her own battle to fight still, two actually, her sexual attraction to Blake that would do her no good, and the revenge she wanted to continue instilling on the two people that made her life a living hell for two years – Stephanie and Clay.
Blake cleared his throat and raised an eyebrow at her as he was expecting an answer from her.
“Sor…” she stopped herself from saying the entire word – sorry.  It was the one thing she knew she had to stop doing, apologizing for everything, when really, she did not need to apologize for him letting himself into her apartment that she rented from him.  “Wait a minute here.”  She rolled off her bed, set her decorative pillows back in place along with the lavender fur throw on the bed just right, and turned towards him wanting nothing more than to strip the man down naked and have crazy passionate no emotions attached sex with him.
“Come down, don’t come down.  I just thought you might want to see what Larry pointed out to me.  Pipe is getting fixed, but it wasn’t a bad pipe but an intentional break, so the cost is on you.”
She grabbed his arm and applied a grip hold to his bicep which was thick with muscles that Clay never had.  “Did you…”  She stopped midsentence as the touch of his skin under her hand did things to her no man had ever done.  It was a primal feeling of lust and need pulsing through her hand, carrying it through her body, making her nipples peek out.
He raised an eyebrow at her and looked down to her.  “You might want to tell the girls to quit getting so excited when you touch me.”  
His light laughter and motion to pull his arm out of her grasp left her feeling sexually frustrated mixed with altogether ready to scream.  He was walking out of her bedroom, leaving the curtains open behind him which led in a flood of noontime daylight.  She squinted her eyes and put her hands over her nipples.  Sure enough, the little traders, they had poked through her white tee shirt and white bra.  But how could he tell in the darkness of her room with only the small lamp on behind her.  Then again, she probably woke up with them that way from the dream she had been having.  Either way, he always seemed to get the last laugh when it came to her sexual frustration with him.  She mentally put buying padded bras on her list of things she needed to cope with being around the man.  Another bottle of whiskey, padded bras, dark sunglasses – to avoid eye contact, and zipper for her lip.
She reached for her navy cardigan sweater she had tossed on her bed before laying down.  Slipped it over her head.  It was in that moment she realized she had taken her jeans off to lay down.  She had been standing in front of Blake, half naked and he did nothing to make her completely naked.  She was not the type of woman to throw herself at a man.  She wanted him, sure, she thought to herself as she slipped her dark denim jeans back on.  She wanted him bad, she thought to herself by the time she had her keys and cellphone in her bag and was locking her door behind her.  But having him and wanting him were two separate things.
By the time, she made it down the metal stairs to the alleyway, the back door of the café was open, and Larry was packing his tools away into his white plumbing van.  Blake was in his truck and some thin young blonde was sitting in the passenger seat.  She turned her attention away from Blake and tried to focus on what Larry was saying to explain the intentional damage done to her plumbing in the cafe.  “What’s up Larry?’
“Well, as far as I can tell, someone cut your main waterline in two places so that as soon as the water was turned on this morning, the pipe would burst open.  Basically, flooding your kitchen area.  However, whoever did it, knew what they were doing.  They knew that the water would take the pressure down but not off so that your gals working this morning would not catch on right away, until the water started flooding out from behind the storage closet and out into the main part of your back-kitchen area.  Pretty sneaking if you ask me.  I mean if you’re going to cut pipes and have them leak, that’s how I would do it.”
As Larry kept explaining, Blake finally drove off down the alley passing them, at a speed one only takes off in to either show off, or show they are pissed.  He couldn’t be that pissed.  It’s only water, the building is brick and what’s a little drywall repair and mop up?
“Well, I’m sorry Larry.  I don’t know why one of the girls didn’t come get me first.”  She offered up wanting to mentally bang her head with flat palm because she had no reason to apologize.
“Oh, that’s alright.”  He lifted his shop vacuum up into his white work van full of plumbing repair essentials and then reached for a double carbon copy old style receipt book.  “I guess you could have saved yourself some money, ya know, mopping the water up but here’s my bill.”  He handed his handwritten bill to her but without letting it go as her fingers touched it to grab.  “Although, if we could do some kind of exchange, I could say, lessen the bill, or forget it all together?”  He quizzed while they both had their hands on the bill for his labor.
She felt her migraine kick back up.  Larry had been picking her up since the morning she called him about her apartment.  He is ten years older, and nowhere near the type of man she liked.  she would pay the bill.  She frowned and raised an eyebrow to toy with him a bit, let him down easy, and then write him a check.  “Larry?  I thought we talked about this.  I’m taking a break from men right now.”
He let the bill go out of his hand and looked down at his feet while slightly laughing.  “Oh no.  Nothing like that.”  He started up.  “See.”  He started to whisper.  “My sister is Alice.  The one you helped last week with her cheating boyfriend.  Well, word has gotten out that Revenge Coffee Shop, sorry Dioltas Hide Out Cafe, is not just a high energy drink place where you get a kick start for you day, but a secret club of women that are plotting revenge and taking action.”
She stopped him right there.  “Why Larry?”  She put her right hand over her heart and chimed out some sweet southern charm accent.  “I do declare.  I have no idea where you get your information from.”  She teased with a wink and then tucked his bill into her bra for a flirtatious kick.  She watched his eyes wander there to the crest of her boobs for a second and then looked back into her eyes.
“No.  No not that.  Although, you know if you want to take me up on a date, I’d be open to it.”  He started up.  “Honestly, I’m not sure what all it is that you women do late at night?  Drinking coffee or drinking whiskey, but Alice did mention that you were the best at plotting revenge.  See I’ve got this buddy of mine, well he was a friend, and he has been running his mouth off behind my back about how I lie about the fish that I catch.  Now, it’s gotten to the point where I almost punched him the other night.”
She decided to stop him right there.  Revenge on a friend, for twisting the truth and telling tales, not her forte, but revenge of a friend if he slept with his girlfriend, that she would help with.  She put a hand on his shoulder and looked him in the eye with a tilted head.  “Larry?  You know I went through a really bad divorce, right?”
“Yes.  Alice told me.”
“And you know that word has gotten out that I may or may not have, swear on my mother’s grave I will never admit to, a bit of revenge on my ex-husband and ex best friend who hooked up with my husband.  And I may have made some mild suggestions under the influence of Jack to the women.”
“Who’s Jack?”  He spat out fiercely with a tone of jealously.
She laughed lightly and pulled her cellphone out of her back pocket as it had just dinged with a text.  “Jack Daniels; the whiskey.  Excuse me one second Larry, I need to reply to this text.”  She quickly texted back to Sally at the front counter of her café.  ‘Yes, I will be there in a sec.’  “Sorry.  Girls are wondering if I am going to make it in to check on things.  I guess this is what I get for hiring some young gals to serve coffee and energy drinks.  As you were saying?”  She tried to confuse him with the conversation.
“No.  You.  We’re saying?”  He was still interested in her service.
“Ok.  Yes.  Listen.  I am good, no great, at serving up a dish of revenge.  However, it sounds to me like something else is bugging your friend and he’s reflecting his negativity on you, maybe knowing how nice you are that you won’t do or say anything, when really, his back-stabbing lies could have underlining meaning of something else altogether.  Best to just take him out fishing, toss back a few beers and then confront him.  If that doesn’t work, then come find me, will pull a number on him.”  She laughed half meaning it, half wondering why she let this revenge thing get so far.  Then again, she did name her business with revenge in the name, she just did not think the folks of Darling would catch on so quick.  Perhaps she really needed to examine internally what she wanted out of all of this.  Darling was to be a fresh start, not a replay of her last few years which were lonely and full of anguish.
“Listen, I’ll get you a check and drop it in the mail, or if you like I can just send you an electronic payment?”  She offered.
“Actually, if you want, no, never mind.  Listen, mail me a check.”  He finally stammered out.
As she walked into the back doors of her café, she was pretty sure that Larry wanted to switch the bill for date night and as of right now, that was not going to happen.  Money was not a problem, she made damn sure of that, and if she got to the point where she had to exchange labor work for sex or dates, she would just cash in on some retirement.  
The minute she reached the front counter, Sally was on her like lightening.  “Listen, Calista, I am really sorry.  I think Jimmy might have saw me punch in the code to get in the back door one night and after, you know our ugly break up and my revenge you suggested I do to him.”  She paused before continuing, looking distraught and meek before speaking up again.  “I might have told him that you gave me the ideas, and well, he might have decided a little payback was necessary.”  She rambled the last sentence out so fast that Calista knew.  Sally had not kept her mouth shut about who gave her the ideas for revenge and Sally was back with Jimmy.  Go figure.  Never trust someone to do your dirty work.  Things had to change.  She was no longer going to give these women ideas, she was going to make them take a pact, come up with the ideas themselves, and perhaps she might need to convince a few, like she did Larry, to try the higher road first. It was in that moment, the flashback of conversations she had several times with Jackie suggesting the high road was the only road that led to victory, did she wonder why she mistook youth for ignorance.  If anything, the proof that Jackie and Jenny, now best friends, and a hell of a lot richer after Pete died, did something so incredibly difficult, yet the reward paid off.
Calista let out a huge sigh of exasperation, as her mind whirled over Sally’s situation, Larry asking for advice, that she reminded herself that she was just going to keep her chin up around town, and silence worked better than helping others to dig deep up the dirt.  People could burn their own bridges with a torch.  It was as if this was the moment she realized all of the revenge she sought will never bring her satisfaction from the disaster, however a sexual moment with Blake, as frustrating as all of this has become, was the one thing that did bring her some satisfaction, even if most of her satisfying moments were imaginary in her sleep.
Sally’s voice echoed in the distance next to her about the idea she gave her on how to quickly disassemble Jimmy’s motorcycle, so it would not run, might have not been her best idea on revenge.  Men do not like you messing with their toys.  Luckily for Sally a customer walked in that she had to go help, while Calista churned in her mind that a long talk with Sally was overdue, but it had to be done in private, for now a word to the wise was needed.
Calista grabbed herself a cinnamon streusel muffin with a pair of metal tongs and set it on a small white china plate so that she could heat it up for thirty seconds in the microwave.  She waited until the customer was rung up and walking out the front door before saying anything.  “Listen Sally.”  She started up and stopped while she opened the microwave and then shut it.  As soon as she hit the add thirty second button and turned, Sally had a scared look on her face.  “I can only assume what you were doing coming in three Friday nights ago at three am.  Perhaps sex in the back area of my café versus your car or his truck was a great idea, seeing as you both live at home with your parents, but nothing goes on here I don’t know about, for the most part, and I was young once too…”  She paused and thought about the punishment and decided to take the high road.  “I think if, from now on, with Jimmy or not, don’t bring men in here late at night, and for God sake after I change the code on there tonight, do not, do you hear me, do not let anyone know the code.”  She watched the scared frantic twenty something motions her head up and down in agreement that what she did was not such a great idea and she would do what Calista said.
“Now.”  Calista started to continue as she pulled her muffin out of the microwave and then decided she needed a grapefruit red bull to go with it, she reached for the cooler while she kept talking.  “I think, that if you just tell Jimmy that you actually came up with the idea yourself, he might not decide to seek any further revenge.”  She offered up.
Sally shook her head no while looking at her feet and whispering, I guess.
Calista took that as a sign that Sally might be scared of Jimmy and her inner momma bear took over.  She set her red bull and muffin on the counter next to where they were standing and lifted the young woman’s chin up with her fingers while looking into her eyes.  “Has Jimmy ever hit you, threatened you?”  She whispered up in fierce confidence.
“No.  Nothing like that.”  Sally offered but Calista did not believe her entirely.
“Then why are you afraid to tell him it was your idea?”  Calista frowned and reached for her red bull and cracked the top open.  As soon as she took her first long sip, the pungent grapefruitness of the energy drink shook her senses a bit.  She needed a jolt after dealing with Cole earlier and then Blake, freaking Blake who was always on her mind and she needed to do something about that.
“Well.”  Sally started and then stopped.
“Well what darling?”  Calista offered up.
“Well, I kind of think that maybe things with making up were just temporary as I think he might be texting, you know her, the other woman?”  Sally offered up like it was a question.
Calista took in a deep cleansing breath.  She breathed it out and took another large sip of her energy drink.  She had been thinking that maybe this revenge bit was getting out of hand.  It was time for her to dole out a bit of relationship advice.  “Do you want to be with Jimmy?”  She asked.
Sally shrugged her shoulders and then turned to the front door dinging as a new customer just arrived.  
“I’ll take that as an unsure.  Real quick and listen up good.  Nothing gets a man more freaked out than if he thinks a woman is going to dump him or replaces him with another man.  If you want Jimmy, and talking to him doesn’t seem to work, then break up and be seen with another man.  He will want you back.  But if you don’t want to date him anymore, and telling him that you want space doesn’t work, because I have no idea how it works for you generation, each one is different, but then make yourself unavailable.  If he keeps dating that other chick behind your back, break up.  Simply put.”
“But Jimmy doesn’t work that way.”  She meekly peeped out and then turned to go help the customer that was just reaching the counter.
Calista sat down at corner table that positioned her to face most of the store with no one behind her.  She reached for her red bull drink and finished it off.  She got up and went to the complimentary refill coffee station, tossed her can in the recycle bin and reached for one of the many ceramic coffee mugs stacked up with sayings on them.  Today, it was the black mug with the words Wicked on it in gold script.  She was feeling wicked.  Wicked about Blake and a bit jealous of the woman in his truck, but she needed to get over that.  Wicked about getting a little dirt on Jimmy and figuring out what Sally really wanted.  ‘Jimmy doesn’t work that way’, kept echoing in her brain.  The one thing she could not stand is a man who used himself as a physical persuasion to what a woman does not want.  If Jimmy so much as had laid a hand on Sally, there was some serious revenge coming his way - and nobody was going to know about it. 
With only a half hour of mental evil planning, Milly walked in with a look on her face that told Calista, she was done.  She had overheard from the others that when she sold the place over a year ago to Calista’s Aunt Caroline, she had hoped to be done then, but since not too many offers were as good as CCM Corporation, then she decided to hang in there.  She only had about another week before the Thanksgiving holiday closing.  Calista had a feeling that today was her last day.
“Calista, do you mind if I talk with you.  In private.”  The aging woman smiled at her flatly.
Calista stood up from where she had been sitting and motioned that they head to the small five by five foot, one desk, two chairs stuffed in, office in the back kitchen area.  “Sure, what’s on your mind?”
Milly did not reply but rather grabbed a coffee cup with the snow flakes and poured a fresh cup with hazelnut creamer.  “I think this requires a cup or two.”  She laughed.
Calista refilled her own cup with decaf and sugar free salted caramel creamer.
 As soon as Milly sat in the only small wooden chair opposite of the desk chair, she took a deep breath and started right up.  “I have been wanting to talk to you.  I really need to just finish up.  Take a break.  My sister invited me on a cruise in Europe and I have wanted to go visit her for quite some time.  This Thanksgiving being the start of it.  I guess what I am asking is that I need to quit early.  I really want this and seeing as you have the place totally under wraps, making better profit in a week than I do in a month.  Although I think you are the star of all the attention.  Folks come in here to see you, and with you flittering in and out at all hours of the day, they come back more than once to catch your attention.  Your advice.”  She chuckled.  “Which by the way, this small town that grew out of its britches, is still a small town.  Let me give you a bit of advice.  Stop handing out revenge ideas.  Change the café name to something else before the sign you ordered goes up and makes it a more permanent damage on a café that I have built up from nothing and made it my life for the last twenty years.  I don’t mean to sound harsh.”  She stopped talking while Calista had a flat lined smile on her face, a returning migraine, and a realization that Milly, twenty-five years older than her was right in most sense of her meanings.  Deep down she knew it, she just had not really thought things would progress so fast.  In the heat of her revenge design over three years ago, she had not stopped to think that putting this kind of negative energy out into the world, might bring it right back to her.  Broken pipes and all.
“Please.”  Calista offered up softly while wanting to beg her to just shut up, instead she reached across the desk with a folder she already had in place.  It was an exit package.  It gave Milly the final payment two weeks ahead of time.  It gave her a gold star card that allowed her free coffee and tea any time she wanted.  It had a questionnaire in it along with a business card, from the local hometown journalist that had wanted to do an exit story on her.  And most importantly, it had a thank you card for all that she had done for Calista over the last year while she worked out her divorce.  
Calista cleared her throat while Milly asked.  “What’s this?”
“This is me saying thanks.  It is me saying absolutely, I understand.  And by what you just said, I have a lot of thinking do to before next week’s remodel over Thanksgiving.  I’ll give it serious thought.  I will, because you know this town better than me.”
“Well this was easier than I thought.”  She took the envelope in her lap and opened it to look inside.
“The final payment is in there.  I even tossed in a bit of a bonus as things have been going so well.  I would greatly appreciate you doing that newspaper article like we discussed.  I guess just keep it about you and not the new place would be perfect.  I hope you come around often to see the place after your visit with your sister.  In the meantime, please leave me a phone number where I can reach you if I have any more questions.”
“Before I forget.”  Milly stood up and held the yellow legal letter sized envelope under her arm.  “If you want Blake, you need to know his past and he needs to know yours from you.  If you have it in you to be patient with him, you will find he is one of the good guys that’s been hurt.”
“I’ll keep that in mind.”  Calista ended the conversation with a hand to show her out of the office and walked her to the front so that she could say her goodbyes to the staff that was on hand for the day.
Having, wanting, and needing are completely different beasts.
Chapter Nine
Don’t harsh on my holidays.
Calista did not know what was worse, the fact that Sally admitted that Jimmy had pushed her around a time or two, smacked her once extremely hard that it left a mark on her cheek for a few days, or the idea that Sally was saying he was not all that bad.  What Sally did not know, is that Calista did some digging on Jimmy and his dirt ran deeper than she could assume Sally knew.  Jimmy had a rap sheet at twenty-two.  He had been charged with rape, twice, but the charges were dropped.  He had stolen as a minor and once as an adult, always getting probation.  The stealing didn’t bother Calista’s much as the later charges she had read, it was the fact that one of the women he raped at eighteen, was now missing.  She wasn’t from Darling, Kansas, she was from Mexico and nobody seemed to care.  But Calista did.
The night was growing dark and Calista had just pulled up to her extra storage just outside of Darling.  She punched in her code to the Public Storage facility and watched the large black wrought iron gate begin to open.  As she drove her truck inside, she followed the alley between the storage units all the way to the back and far right.  She had picked that unit intentionally.  She parked her truck in front of the door and sat there asking herself, ‘is what you are about to do right, or wrong’?  
She did not have an answer for that, maybe a conscious, but after Sally did not show up to work last night, it did not take long for Calista to find out.  Jimmy had hit her after she broke up with him, and then forced himself on her.  Sally would not talk too much to her about it, so she let it go.  Or so everyone thought.  Leaving Sally at the hospital while her family surrounded her to support her, Calista felt something inside of her break.  
A degree of protectiveness had been growing over Sally ever since her first day of owning her shop.  Day by day, Sally felt like the daughter she never had.  She discovered the young woman’s vulnerabilities to the world and felt a need to protect her where her parents seemed to be failing.  Even while watching Sally’s face bruised to tenderness, her mother was asking her what she did to set him off.  Sally’s father seemed meek and scared against Jimmy’s well-known bully type family.
Calista did what she could by spreading word to those that might be able to help, but until Sally choose to press charges, Jimmy would be a free man and that bothered Calista the most.
A sense of loss of control was arising in Calista and she hated that feeling.  Between Cole not returning her calls, Clay putting an announcement on Facebook that Stephanie and him just got engaged, she was feeling like a raging bull.  A couple of customers had come in this week with snarky remarks to her about the name of her café.  She figured a few might not like it, but at the time, she thought it was clever.  On top of her crappy last few days, she had not seen Blake once, which she wasn’t sure why, but it upset her.  He was like her coffee fix.  Five minutes of flirt and visual could do a lot for a woman.  Cole, she knew would call her soon.  He had a temper like his father.  As for Clay, she should have removed him from her Facebook friends.  She had not gotten confirmation that this was real, or a tease to get back at her like revenge.  It had eaten her up for a day, but as she sat in her truck, thinking now, it was time to stop wasting her energy on Clay and Stephanie.  They ate up three precious years of her life with anger, deceit and she needed to just let karma do its thing on those two.  As for the café name, Milly was right, she would do something to make it correct; yet that was the last thing on her mind right now.
Blake. What to do about Blake?  She thought to herself and then got out of her truck with no clear answers in her brain other than to just ask the man for another night of fun.  Not that he seemed interested lately.
Inside the storage unit, was a small pull string florescent light.  Calista pulled it and looked around.  There, under the light, was the Kawasaki Ninja 300 in black with red accents that she had bought from a guy on Craig’s List, for cash, a few days ago.  She had plans for that bike at one point.  Plans to drive by and blow Stephanie’s brains out late one night, but she smothered that idea out with the image of herself in orange and twenty to life years wasted on that bitch.  However, buying the bike, dreaming of her plan, and doing nothing was actually therapeutic.  Her back up plan was to wait until summer and maybe take it on a scenic drive, not that Kansas was the most idyllic place for motorcycle drives, but she had thought of taking it up to South Dakota or maybe back through Colorado.  Back in high school, she had a friend that taught her drive one, before he taught her a lot of other fun things that involved sexual activity.  She mentally felt herself feel better with those memories.
She walked around the bike and thought how the bike’s original revenge plan of killing Stephanie was just a thought, and she never really planned on using it.  The VIN was removed, the bike had never been plated.  What she was about to do could very well land her in jail – if she got caught.
Instead of freaking out about it, she thought, putting the bike in her truck and covering it for its drive back to her loft – not illegal.  Putting on a man’s foam muscle Halloween costume on under an extra-large black hoodie and men’s jeans and work boots – not illegal.  Putting on a full-face helmet while going out for a drive with costume attire on – not illegal, however driving the un-plated motorcycle - illegal.  Carrying a nine-millimeter Glock with the serial number off of it, not being registered to carry, and taking said gun on her ride – illegal.  But what would really get her into trouble – was what she planned to do with the gun and Jimmy.
With the bike ramp out of storage and now placed on the back of her truck, she wasn’t even sure if she could get the bike in the back of her truck, but she was going to try.
As soon as her storage was closed and locked, Calista knew there was no going back, but she still had time to think about all of this.
No sooner did she get five minutes from where she wanted to situate the bike, Cole called.
“Hey Cole!  How’s it going?”  She chimed with enthusiasm even though her hands were shaking, and her mind was reeling with how stupid all of this was, not even knowing she could go through with it but just planning it, participating in it to as legal as she could, felt gratifying but at any moment, she was going to freak out if she took it any further.
“Not much mom.  I’m back in the states.  I stop by dad’s new place, but I don’t think there is room for me to be staying there.  It’s a two-bedroom condo downtown, and the other room is an office.  Brian is off at college in Cali.  I’m currently couch surfing at a friend’s place and well, I thought about driving out to stay with you, but you said it’s a tiny apartment above a café…”  his voice was questioning but he was not asking for what it is he wanted…yet she knew her son.
“Okay?”  Her voiced trailed out shaky to her own ears as she knew her thoughts should be on her son’s needs and not her own need for revenge.  She took a deep breath and began talking slowly and as calm as she could muster.  “So, yeah.  I guess with you taking off to Europe for the year during the final of the divorce, neither one of us thought about where you might live when you get back?”  She left the sentence off as if it was a question.  When Cole first found out about the divorce, he was a senior in high school and there was no getting any resolution out of him as to what his future held other than traveling through Europe and college as soon as he got back.  When he left for Europe, she decided she would deal with his living arrangements when he got back, knowing full well, Stephanie and Clay would not put a second thought into it.  Stephanie’s son Brian was going to college in California and as far as the plan was, at least what little she had found out, was he was staying there and not coming back to Utah.  
“So, I was wondering?”  He started again but ended the question with no question, which always drove Calista nuts.
“What?”  She could hear the clipped tone in her voice as she was officially irritated with all things male at the current moment.  Blake and the blonde he drove away with the other day and then nothing more from him, Jimmy and his inability to leave Sally alone, Larry and his insistence they just try a date, and Clay who never put his son first, only his dick – and now Cole, who needed his mom to think for him when really at nineteen, he needed to think for himself for a change.
“Well… I kind of spent all that I had saved for Europe, in Europe, so, I could use a loan to get a place.  I’ve got a line up on a job and a roommate.”  He eked out as she could now hear the sounds of the bar that he was probably sneaking into with a fake ID.
“Sure.  Two grand enough?  Listen sweetheart, I am glad you are back and yes if you want to visit soon, I would love that, but I have to go.  I’ll transfer the money into your account as soon as I am not driving.  About ten minutes ok?”
“Thanks mom!  Love you!  You’re the best!”  He practically sang out so fast that she knew that he was excited to be living on his own.  Twenty was young but not too young to have your first live out of parent’s experience.  He had saved his entire youth for the travel around Europe before settling into college.  She had put a lot of thought into this very scenario and realized as soon as the divorce papers were signed, and Clay was handcuffed to their old bed, in their soon to be old house, that as soon as Cole came back from Europe, it might be best that he did not live with either of them, until the smoke cleared - from the bridge that connected their marriage had blown up. Figuratively speaking.
After talking briefly with Cole, instead of driving the motorcycle to park in the dark abandoned parking lot, next to an old abandoned building, in a seedier part of town, she found herself pulling up to the alleyway of her coffee shop.  She put her truck in park and realized that her life had been one hell of a crazy ride the last four years.  Stressful – yes, but more so, five years ago, she never would have imagined her life as it is now.
As she sat with her truck off, in the dark, she remembered her life five years ago.  Stephanie and she had weekly barbeques or dinners planned together with the entire family.  Cole and Brian appeared to be good friends, many different interests, but the closeness of the families had kept the two boys growing up like brothers.  
Sure, Calista had wanted more kids, and so did Stephanie – or so she said, but the cards were not dealt in their direction.  By the time, the boys were in middle school, Calista really felt that as parents they had everything going as planned; retirement on track – check, her owning her own coffee shop close to home – check, business successful – check, Stephanie was a great best friend and like a sister – check, Clay and their love life was average but good – check, Clay’s career was taking off – check, Cole’s plan to travel Europe savings plan building from part time work after high school – check.  Life was pretty damn good – or so she thought.
As quickly as the happy memories flooded in, the bad ones took over.  The original notion that Clay was cheating on her.  The fact that she found ways to keep her head buried in her coffee shop business while Stephanie would accuse her of not spending time with her.  Stephanie had become needy, her marriage was crumbling apart, their family get togethers turned into monthly not weekly, and Clay spent a lot of time away from the house when she was home.  Then, the moment she happened to catch the two kissing in the parking lot outside a luxury hotel downtown, she remembered the anger, the frustration and the immediately planning of revenge.  Which she got.
She spent one full year planning her exit plan from their marriage without a soul knowing what she was up to.  She feigned a womanly organ issue with her husband to avoid having sex with him, not that he really seemed that interested.  She cashed in what she could and hid it in a separate bank account under her aunt’s name, with her permission.  She sold anything of value in the house on Craig’s List under her aunts account.  She made plans to sell the coffee shop, but still work there the last year of their marriage; she sold it to her aunt for next to nothing, who then sold it once the divorce was final.  In other words, she found financial ways to scar Clay, and it was worth every penny.  She bought Dioltas Hide Out Coffee Shop – formally known as Darling Coffee Shop, under her aunt’s name.  
Once the divorce was final, all financial reversals from her aunt to her was slowly, methodically, reversed back to her private off shore account.  As far as Clay knew, she got a deal on a rundown coffee shop far away from him and Stephanie.  That was why she bought it – to move away and start fresh.
She let her mind remember back to the last few months of their marriage, trying counseling first at her request, then a financial advocate, before the lawyers finally stepped in.  As far as Stephanie’s husband Darwin was concerned, he did not fight her, as he was already unemployed and decided to move in with his parents until he got back on his feet.  A hard thing to do when you are just turning forty.  Calista felt bad for him, but then again, he had never been close to her and always took Clay’s side on things.  Perhaps if he had been a bit nicer, she might have advanced noticed him when things were getting bad.
Calista blinked her eyes open from the darkness of her truck, to adjust to the bright overhead alley light that illuminated her back door to her café and the stairs to her apartment above it.  She frowned at the flash of memories of revenge she got on those two.  At the time, it felt so sweet, but in passing the relief to be out of the marriage was what she cherished most.  Her new life was really shaping up, so why was she so eager to seek revenge on a man that could land her in jail?  Why did she want to harm him, when deep down she knew that hurt people, hurt people.  She was starting to feel like a not hurt person.  There was nothing she could do about Jimmy but help Sally recover.  In that moment, she realized her thoughts dissolved in to thin air like dust in the wind.
She grabbed her black duffle bag of manly costume items, opened her truck door and decided to go inside and get something to eat to calm her nerves.  She was now sure that she did not want to go through with all of this.
The moment she set her bag down on the kitchen back counter, she forgot to lock the back door behind her because her mind was on transferring the money to Cole before he freaked out and called her back angry and fearful that she changed her mind.  She pulled her phone out of her purse and clicked the bank ap.  Within in a minute, the money was transferred from her savings account to his checking.  He was down to under a hundred dollars, so she knew it was necessary to give him this money.  She also knew the chances of him paying her back were ten to none.  
She opened the black duffel bag and pulled out the foam muscle man Halloween costume and set it on the metal baking table.  She laid the black hoodie, black bike helmet with a black flip down sun shade on it next to the hoodie, and then laid the Glock next to that.  She pulled out the men’s jeans and work boots that she was going to wear. She set the jeans on the 9mm Glock and the work boots on the floor.  She stared at all of it and wondered what she was thinking?
She frowned and heard her phone ding with a text.  Clay set a thumbs up emoticon and a heart.  She knew her son well.  He would find a job, work, and eventually get going on his college classes, but after the divorce and the last two years of hell at their house, he had needed that year off to travel.  Hell, she needed the year off to travel, but instead, revenge had become her normal, and her coffee shop was starting to feel like home – at least as best that it could.
The sound of someone knocking on the back door, caused her to jump back and grab one hand to her heart and her other towards the gun on the table.  “Calista?”  She heard a familiar but weary voice echo out from behind the door.
The moment Blake appeared with the black inkiness of the night behind him in the doorway of the back room of the bakery, she realized the man standing there could easily had been Jimmy out to seek revenge on her.  She quickly flipped the hoodie over the gun, but not before she was sure Blake saw it.  They both stood there for a moment, her all dressed in black and him in his usual dark jeans and blue flannel peeking out of his dark gray Carhartt jacket.
“Sorry.  Did I scare you?  I saw the light from the shop seeping out into the alley.  I was just leaving my office and decided to drive by this way…”  He paused and didn’t finish as he started to walk towards her.  He put his hand on the costume.  “Going to a belated Halloween costume party or is this something else kinky I might want to know about?”  he chuckled but she could sense the serious tone in his voice.
“I found it in storage.  It’s my son’s.  He’s kind of built like his dad, a bit scrawny, and he wore it as part of a Halloween costume.”  She quickly verbalized her explanation as her body language screamed out scared and lying.
“I see.”  He answered as his hand laid on top of hers.  “And the gun?”
“Uhm.  Protection.”  She mumbled out.  “I found it in storage too.”
“So, whose motorcycle is in the back of your truck?”  He quizzed as his hand pulled away from hers and he took a step back as if to keep the space between them.
“Mine.  It’s my motorcycle.  It was a whim purchase.”  She looked down where his hand had been on hers and thought how crazy it was that she missed his touch and that from one single touch she no longer wanted to seek revenge on Jimmy.  At least, not in the fashion her crazy frantic brain had come up with.  It was as if she was right back to crazy thoughts like she had before with Clay and Stephanie.  The motorcycle was a purchase to kill Stephanie, as was the gun.  Never thinking in a million years she would do it, but just putting energy into buying it and planning it she felt better.  Now, she wanted to put that energy into making love to Blake, but he seemed severely disappointed in her or at least the look on his face did.
The silence between them grew.  Yet their eyes starred at each other, soft, yearning, wanting to say something, yet each of them did not know what the other wanted to say.  The wind slammed the back door shut and Blake turned briskly as Calista clambered to his back for a second.
“The wind.”  He offered up and turned to hold her in his arms.  “I think we are both are a bit jumpy due to Jimmy, but I got a call about fifteen minutes ago.  He’s in county jail and nobody wants to bond him out.  Has nothing to do with Sally, so maybe some time in jail will do us all some good.”  His fingers lifted her chin up and he lightly kissed her lips.
Calista was the first to pull out from the hug and gentle kiss.  If he thought she could handle another night of Blake turn me on and turn me off, he was wrong.  She felt so very fragile at this particular moment, that all she could do was be strong.  She cleared her throat.  “That’s great news.  Maybe I’ll just lock the gun up in the bakery safe.”
“That would be a great idea.”  He offered up and then glanced at his phone that just dinged.
Calista couldn’t help herself.  “Blondie?”
Blake looked confused.
“You know, blondie from the other day.  She was in your truck after you left here, and I was stuck talking to Larry.”
Black chuckled lightly.  “No, darling, you are the only blondie I’ve been interested in for a while now.”
She smiled and looked down at the bakery table and then up into his eyes.  “Just call me red.”  She teased as her fingers touched and curled a piece of hair, knowing the strawberry blonde had faded into a very soft blonde with a bit of red.  Remi had already called her to set up another appointment for next week.  She was ready to go back to blonde.  Red was a thing, for just a fraction of her life.  She might do it again, but she needed to feel like her old self for a while.
She frowned when she realized he never answered about the blonde in his truck.  “Then who was the blonde?”
Without hesitating he answered with a smile.  “Megan, Jenny’s friend.  Her car broke down out front and was in the coffee shop when all the water commotion happened.  She asked if I could drive her home and her husband would swing by to fix her car after he got off work.”
“Oh.”  She responded and smiled.
“Yeah.”  He replied, and the silence returned.
She sighed.  “I feel better knowing Jimmy is in jail.  Now maybe Sally can focus on getting healthy, mentally and physically.”
“That would be great.”  He answered.
“Blake?”  She quizzed the air with his name.
“I’ve got to run.”  His phone dinged again.
“A date?”  She quizzed feeling out the mere suggestion that he turns her down since she was business, but he was still out looking for pleasure.
“No.  Jackie is having an issue at the bar and Randy is home sick with the flu.  I’ve got to run over there.  Care to join me?”
She wanted to; she really did.  But where would it lead?  And after the week she had, she just wanted to forget about her stupid idea she almost went through with and wake up in the morning thinking a new start was in order.  It was time.  The remodel time was fast approaching, and she needed to just be herself for a while.  No revenge.  No man.  No friends.  Just Calista the friendly coffee lady who knew how to make a customer smile.  She shook her head no.
“I get it.”  He offered with a frown.  “Can I at least help you lock up and walk you to your door?”
She laughed lightly.  “No.  Go.  I’m able to take care of myself.  I’ve got a few things to do in the office and then I promised Remi to meet her at the movies tonight.  I’ll be fine.”
Blake looked long and hard at her, and then to the gun and men’s clothes and back to her.  “I’m sure you will, but I wanted to ask.” 
He sounded as if he wanted to say more but than his phone rang.  “Yeah Jackie.  I am on my way.”  He started for the back door and turned and paused as he hung up on words to Jackie that he was getting in his truck now.  “I want you to know, that I think about you all the time, it’s just not a great time for me right now.”
“Me either.  Take care Blake.”  She offered as he walked out the door.
This time there was no sizzling kiss leading to push and pull, I want you, but I can’t do this.  This time it was concern, friendship, an honest comment that he too thinks about her all the time.  Maybe when things settle down for the both of them, maybe not.  But for now, she had no reason to keep the gun.  Jimmy was in jail, and Stephanie was not worth the bullet or time and energy it would take to carry out her fantasy plan to kill the woman that made her life hell for a while.  It took two to tango on that.  They both deserved each other.  She grabbed the gun, emptied the chamber, letting the bullets fall into the trash.  She reached inside the bad dough trash and grabbed a glob of expanded yeast.  She wrapped a bunch around the gun.  Put the blob of yeast and gun inside a black trash bag and chucked it in the trash.  She then walked over, locked the back door that Blake had closed.  She emptied all the trash cans in the front area onto the trashcan that held the gun.  She flipped off the lights, grabbed a few chocolate chip cookies.  She grabbed a coffee cup in yellow that read ‘morning sunshine’ and filled it with milk from the machine.  She took a quick glance at the men’s costume and clothes and set her late-night snack down.  She grabbed the bundle of clothes and costume, tossed those in the trash as well, and then proceeded to her little bakery office to eat her cookies and milk while ordering office furniture and supplies off Amazon.  She did not have a movie planned with Remi.  She felt like a rebel without a cause.  Then again, sultry images of Blake popped up in her head.
A rebel without a cause can easily be entertained by a sexy man.
Chapter Ten
Side roads lead to spectacular scenery.
The day had finally approached.  Calista took her final plans of the remodel and laid them out on two of the café tables pulled together.  She had an electrician on his way over, the Forest boys for help, and all of her employees were required to work today, two days after Thanksgiving.  She had wanted to do the remodel over thanksgiving, but not everyone else’s timeframe matched hers.
It was a quick two-day remodel.  Most of the bones stayed.  The kitchen was getting a new industrial oven, much to Ben’s pleading, she gave in.  Luckily, she found a buyer for the old one, shearing some of the unexpected cost off the price of a new one.  The main sitting area was to have everything removed as a fresh coat of paint was going up, local artist work for sale was going on one wall, while the rest of the shop was to have new furniture and effective lighting to bring the café a nice touch.  The front counter was to remain the same, with a few minor changes.  Luckily the floor guy worked over thanksgiving eve to get all the old carpet in the main area pulled out, and the laminate flooring installed.
As Sally set up a food and beverage catered table in the kitchen area, Calista glanced over her notes of to-do’s one last time.  On the bottom of the notes, in a female scribbled print was – have an adventure.  She smiled at the handwriting.  She was sure it was either Sally or Jackie, who had been coming around a lot more with Jenny as the three got to know each other.  Jackie had suggested that the local interest in her story of divorce was escalating, perhaps putting some rumors to rest would be best.  However, Calista wondered if it was just Jackie and Jenny with piqued interest, or maybe even Blake, who had been rather cold and distant when she turned down Jenny’s offer to come over for Thanksgiving dinner.  Instead, she made sure the flooring was good, things around the café were ready for the remodel, and then spent over ten hours doing her online shopping – having all of her gifts shipped to the shop, except for Aunt Caroline’s.  She was not up for traveling, during the snowy season, so Calista promised her a visit after the holidays.
With almost everyone there, Calista turned her attention to her cellphone, where a text from an unknown sent a message – have an adventure.  She frowned and deleted it.  Someone was trying to be clever.  She did not know who and she really did not have time to figure it out.  For now, the next forty-eight hours was about the shop remodel.  After that, it was all about the book club fundraiser, and then to follow her plans to spend some time with Cole when he finally came to visit her new business and home.  Her plans didn’t include a man right now, because if it happened, then she would deal with it.  For now, it was forward movement in business and personal inner peace.
A strange comment from Melissa at the end of the remodel sat in the back of her brain while they walked out.  “Going on an adventure soon, I hope?  You know somewhere fun for the holidays?”  Calista shrugged it off but with another unknown text suggesting an adventure, she wondered if someone was toying with her.  Then again, the stress of the remodel and this being her first holiday alone, she internalized that she was being paranoid.
The next morning, the finishing decorative touches were going in the café’s front window box that faced the street, Calista was pleased with it.  A few things she would have done different.  She had a more modern edge she wanted to put on the place, but Darling is a laid-back town, of casual hard-working folks.  So, she settled for the industrial café look that was almost universal in any decorator’s language.  Maybe next year, she’ll change a few more things.
As she turned off the lights, she walked out the back door, hit the new keypad with the new code for her, each employee got their own, and decided that she deserved twenty-four hours of just quiet alone time.  Just as she reached the top of her back alley stairs, her phone dinged with a text.  She waited until she was inside her apartment, door locked behind her, and her work boots off before pulling her phone out of her sweatshirt pocket.  The moment she stared at the words from the third text from the unknown phone number, she felt a bit precautious.  The words – want an adventure – stared up at her from her phone.  She was going to get to the bottom of this.
With her personal laptop open on a secured Wi-Fi line, Calista put the phone number into a paid search engine.  It came back as unknown, prepaid phone.  She let out a sigh of relief.  It was probably Clay trying to get a rise in her.  He used to pull these kind of romantic stunts before, but now, since her operation ROE had gone silent, she almost wondered if he realized that she had moved on.  This could be his way of reaching out, telling her he missed her a bit, and wanted to have some taunting banter.  It would not surprise her one bit.  Yet the thought nagged in the back of her head, she never gave him her new cellphone number and Cole promised not to.
As she sent the unknown texter a message back – I’m on one, thanks – she had a small part of her wonder, could it be a stalker.  She blocked the phone number.  As soon as her cellphone was set on the charger, she unlocked her large writers desk facing the window out to the horizon.  She reached inside the drawer, checked that the newly purchased and registered forty-five caliber gun had bullets, closed and locked the desk drawer, and then set the loaded gun next to her phone as a precautionary measure.  For the time being, she would be extra safe in her steps.
By the next morning, Calista awoke with a sense of adventure on her brain.  Screw whoever was texting her.  Her shop was reopening with grand opening specials, but all her staff was on board except Melissa since she had discussed during the remodel the necessity of cutting her hours to on call as needed due to the conflict of available hours since she took a new full-time job elsewhere.  She had already hired a new a young gal from yoga class to start today. 
It was in the first few hours of the business day, that she could see that her employees had the store handled.  What she needed was a long drive to the closest large-scale town to do some serious shopping, maybe stay at a five-star hotel, and get a massage.  A little get away from Darling you deserve it trip.  There were some things she had been wanting to pick up there at a few specialty shops and the drive and night away would feel nice for a change.
By the time she wandered into the back room, Ben and Sally were laughing and working.  “What a great grand opening day so far.  Everything is running so smooth.  Thanks to you two I felt like I don’t even have to be here.  New gal is working out nicely, don’t you think?”
In unison there were head shakes up and down and words collectively of absolutely, she’s great.  Sally was now acting manager in training, and Ben seemed more willing to hang around and work the front counter from time to time.  He had never truly gotten along with Milly the last two years, as she was always questioning his baking, but Calista’s freedom type management, seemed to work well with him.
“I have to run to Kansas City for the day; I plan to stay the night and be back in a day, possibly two.”  She offered up to the two in a fun mannerism.  “I think you can handle it for the next few days.  I’ll most likely be back late tomorrow, after the shop closes.”
Sally walked over to her and hugged her before casually replying.  “You take all the time you need.  Things are running smooth here, just like you planned.  You deserve some time off to shop.”  
“No problem.”  Ben replied.
“Well that’s settled.  I’ll have my cellphone if needed.  Sally I made you that manager’s binder for just in case situations; it’s on my desk.”  Calista looked to Sally as she shook her head yes.
By the time she was in her truck and one hour into the drive, Calista thought that a white truck with dark windows had been following her ever move.  She still had a little ways to go before getting to her first destination.  She pulled off to a gas station and figured she would see if the truck would follow.
By the time she paid for a red bull and a bag of sunflower seeds, she realized that it was all in her head.  An overactive imagination and a quick realization that maybe all this revenge stuff was turning its ugly head on her.  Once back on the highway, she decided to quit focusing on familiar vehicles and just focus on letting her mind listen to the music and enjoy the decent weather for the drive.
Parking a block away from the second shop she planned to visit in Kansas City, she noticed a white truck behind her again.  It had darkened windows, but it looked like every other construction truck around town.  
As she locked her truck and proceeded to walk towards the store, she grabbed her cellphone out of her purse just as a text sound dinged out.
“Hey lady.  Jenny, Remi and I are wanting to discuss the next holiday book gathering slash fund raiser.”  Jackie’s text read.
Calista quickly typed back.  “I’m in Kansas City shopping.  I’ll be home late.  Tomorrow?”
“We’ll stop by bakery around four after shop is closed.  That work?”
“It should.  See you then.”
Calista slid her cellphone back into her purse and looked around.  The white truck was gone.  It had to be all in her head.  She turned back towards the direction she had been walking before her text and realized she had walked right past the store she wanted to visit.
The minute she walked inside the small specialty boutique her cellphone dinged with a text from Melissa.  She read the text.  “Sally told me you are going to Kansas City.  Are you there now?”
“Yes.  I’m actually in this adorable boutique that has some items I wouldn’t mind selling at the bakery this spring.” Things between them had been civil when she cut her hours, or so she thought.  Melissa had sited she wanted to work full time at Target anyways.  Therefore, a casual text conversation of hey what’s up didn’t seem too unusual at the moment.
“Oh.”  Was all Melissa typed back, but the bubbles that she was still typing were popping up.  So Calista waited.
“How long are you going to be?  In that shop?”  Melissa typed.
Thinking back, Calista had noticed a change in Melissa after the Sally and Jimmy incident.  She had to wonder if something was up, but then she realized the early twenty something probably was bored or just wanted out of the shift she had Sally put her in tomorrow for the extra help.  She quickly texted back.  “For a bit.  Why?  Need something?  You okay to work tomorrow?”
“Yup.”  Then the texting stopped.
Calista starred at her text message for a second.  Was that a yup I need something or yup I can work.  She shook her head physically as she rolled her eyes.  She would be none the happier if that employee quit or went to work elsewhere for her side job money.  She took a deep breath and let it out slowly just a short slender brunette sales clerk came out from the backroom area and asked if she could help her.
Two hours later into her shopping, Calista was wrapping the new burgundy flannel blanket scarf around her neck as the cool air was whipping her hair around.  She was sure she parked her truck on this street right here, but it wasn’t there.  She had walked around the block twice, retraced her steps, and checked her cellphone for the picture she took of where she parked her truck.  It should be here, right here but it wasn’t.  She let out a loud sigh and realized, chances were, her truck was stolen.  To make absolutely sure, she decided to press the alarm button on her key fob while walking around clicking the button to see if her horn alarm would start sounding.  Nothing.  It was official; her car was stolen, and she had a sneaky suspicion who was up to the dirty deed.
While fuming over her stolen car, Calista got off the phone with her insurance agent.  She had two choices, or rather a few choices, but the state of mind of getaway bliss was gone, she did not want to stay at a hotel and get a rental car.  Instead, she texted out to Jackie first, then Jenny and Remi.  She just put it out there that her car was stolen, and she was working on getting back home.  Not but fifteen minutes went by, Jackie and Remi texted back.  To stay put, a ride was on its way.  A warm fuzzy feeling filled her heart thinking of her new friends and how helpful they always seemed.  She decided walking aimlessly around town, she did not want to shop anymore, but to find a salon for a pedicure and perhaps a shoulder massage until whoever it was that was going to get her showed up.  It was over two hours from Darling, so it would be a bit; she texted both gals back – whoever picks me up, there is a Village Inn just inside town off highway – I’ll be there.
Both gals shot a thumbs up text.  Which at the time did not seem suspicious at all?  Both gals had become fast friends just as Calista had taken Remi to hang with Jackie at the bar a few times.  
Trying to make the best of an awful situation, Calista had stopped into a small salon while walking towards the Village Inn.  One mani-pedi later, along with a fifteen-minute shoulder rub, Calista was now sitting at the restaurant just inside town off the highway, checking her phone and wondering who it was that was coming to get her.  She had been there for over an hour; she had already paid her check and handed the waitress a hefty tip explaining she needed to stay a bit longer until her ride shows.  A brunette with purple streaks in her hair was her waitress and she had been all too sweet to listen to her ramble on about her stolen car.  
About twenty minutes after she anticipated it would take for someone to get her, she was doubting her idea to get a ride instead of rental car.  In front of her was the second napkin she was shredding while her waitress had just topped off her fifth cup of coffee.  She let out a huge sigh and thought to herself how she just can’t keep this table much longer.  She was focused on shredding the last bits of her napkin when a familiar voice cleared his throat and joked.  “Your chariot awaits you my lady.”
Calista looked up, shocked to see Blake standing there in front of her at the tables edge.  He was dressed in dark dress slacks and a dark navy patterned button-down collared shirt.  His normal wear and tear boots were nowhere to be found, but a nice pair of men’s dark dress shoes.  Calista tilted her head and slowly breathed out his name in question as if he was a mirage.  “Blake?”
“Yes mam.”  He teased as he offered his hand for her to take to stand up.  The moment she did, she felt a rush of sensation that she tittered a second.  She had been sitting so long, mixed with her angered emotions over her car being stolen, or perhaps it was just the tingling rush of need the moment her hand laid inside of his.  “Long day?”  He added for personable measure.
“You can say that.  I thought Jackie or Remi were coming.  But thanks for driving out to get me.”  She offered in confusion.
“No problem.  I offered.  Do I need to get the check, or did you take care of it already?”  He offered just as the waitress walked up and teased.  
“Well if he ain’t a sight for sore eyes.  I’d be waiting that long too if I had a man like him to pick me up.  Maybe I ought to get my car stolen.  Good luck honey.  I hope you get your car back or at least catch who did it.”  She laughed and walked away.
Blake grabbed the shopping bags by the handles that were sitting in the opposite side of the table and put his other hand to Calista’s back as to direct her towards the front door of the Village Inn and out into the parking lot where his truck was parked.  The moment they were inside of his truck, Calista tried to angle herself to look at him while offering up a polite conversation as he started up his truck and waited for a car to pass to start backing out of the parking lot.  “It was sweet of you to offer, really it is.  I had thought about getting a rental car or just staying in town but part of me just wants to get back home.”
“Well, it’s no problem.  I’m sorry your truck got stolen.  Kind of makes your shopping trip cut short.”  He commented as he pulled out into traffic; acting as if this situation between them was just a normal friendly thing, but Calista knew otherwise.  She wanted to walk on the side of caution as it was a long ride and the fifth cup of caffeine jitters was starting to kick in.
“You can say that.  I mean I made the best of it.  I got a shoulder rub and mani-pedi special while waiting.  Paula my waitress was sweet to talk to.  Overall, I think I know who stole my truck and I don’t want her to think she got the best of me.”  She noticed her speech was in hyper speed.
“Your ex’s?”  He offered up.
“Yes, possibly… but mostly no.  I think Melissa from the shop.  Call it a strange suspicion but she texted me asking strange questions; questions like how long I was going to be shopping.  I don’t know.  It could be a fluke but overall it sucks.  Nothing of value was in my truck.  I had packed an overnight bag with a change of clothes and some of my favorite makeup, but I can replace that stuff easily.  I guess I could easily see my ex-best friend doing a stunt like this.  It isn’t like my hands aren’t dirty with a bit of revenge I pulled over on those two, but honestly I don’t know, or at least I am sure they don’t even know where I am living.”  Calista took a deep breath.  She was talking fast and almost immature like.  She was not this person, well at least she was not this person before the divorce.  Somehow the muddled situation brought out the worst in her and that was the part of her she wanted to leave behind.  If this stolen truck situation would teach her anything, it was to not over react, to deal with the facts, and be glad she wasn’t emotionally tied to that truck.  Just as she was thinking it, she spoke out into the silence in the truck as Blake seemed to be mulling over her last quickly rambled sentences.  “In fact…”  She let out a slow easy breath and started to talk slow and easy.  “I’m kind of glad my truck was stolen.”
A quick side glance from Blake with a raised eyebrow looked her way before he went back to focusing to the green arrow to turn onto the merge lane that would take them up onto the highway.
She laughed lightly and spoke softly, her voice competing with the soft volume of the country music playing on his trucks radio.  “I wouldn’t be spending this quality time with you.”  She practically purred.
A huge grin spread across his lips as he was merging into the far-right lane of highway traffic.
“I hadn’t seen you around much lately.  This is a special treat.”  She chimed up.  “You know a gal needs a visual ever now and then, ya know, business with a side of pleasure.”  She teased watching, waiting for his reaction.
The second his lips curled upwards and a soft looking glance was cast her way before he went back to focusing on the highway, Calista knew he wasn’t at all turned off with her flirtatious tease.  Yet, she was not going to take it too far, too soon.  It was a long drive back to Darling.  Before she said another word, he casually tossed out into the air of the truck.  “I’ve missed running into you.  Things got busy for me.  I kind of feel pulled in multiple directions right now.”
“How so?”  She quizzed.
Blake started to talk casually about helping at the bar and he was really hoping Jackie’s new boyfriend was serious about buying him out to partner up with Randy.  How Jenny and the boys seemed to need his every free moment and then he started to talk about a project he was hired to do but his words drifted off to a lull, so Calista intervened before he sounded like he wanted to shut down.  Just be quiet.  That was not how she wanted this drive to go.
“I hear ya.  About the pulled in multiple directions.  I thought moving here things would quiet down so much that I would be extremely bored all the time.”  She reached out and touched his arm gently with his fingers.  “I honestly do appreciate you coming all this way to get me.  It seems foolish now that I just didn’t get a rental, but I was feeling frazzled about my truck.”  She pulled her fingers away, but not before she noticed his eyes drift to her fingers for a second and then to her eyes with a loving manner.
“It’s no problem.  I really needed the break and the drive gave me time away from the office to think through a few things for work.  And a break from Jenny and the boys.”  He laughed at a memory he must have running through his mind.  “Jenny was the one that insisted I swing out to get you.  She can always sense when the boys are a bit too much for me.”
“One son was busy, and often I had his good friend, my ex best friends’ son, from time to time and it felt exhausting.  I wanted more kids when I was younger but as my business in Utah took off, I had a coffee shop there, a successful one at that, well… I guess I just went about life thinking there was more to life than just having kids.”
“There is, but I regret not having any of my own.”  Blake tossed out casually, but Calista could hear the hurt in his tone.
“So, you don’t want to settle down and have kids soon?”  She quizzed, knowing full well she had no intentions of having another child to raise.  She had been there, done that, and quite frankly not everyone was made for having kids, or at least more than one.  Her mother wasn’t.  Her Aunt never had any.  Her ex-husband would never been able to handle it.  Blake on the other hand, she could see him with several kids and a homely like wife, running a ranch, or coaching a soccer team.  She sighed at her own thoughts that she was not a true fit to his picture of familyhood.
“I did.  Want to settle down.  But that did not work out, then Pete died, and I stepped into the roll of uncle and father for my nephews.  Jenny…”  He sighed deep.  “Jenny was a mess.  She still is rather cold to the idea of another man being her husband, but watching Jackie date Conner seriously, she makes comments about missing a man around the house.  I fill in for some of the duties, but hopefully soon she’ll want to settle down again.”
Calista had to pry, because she wanted to know, was she wasting her time and energy on a man that would break her heart if she wasn’t willing to have another child, not that she thought they were even remotely at that stage of interest, but it was out there in her brain so she asked.  “So are you looking to marry, settle down, have kids of your own?”
Blake laughed.  “Are you asking me to marry you?”
“No.”  She laughed nervously.  “I’m asking you what kind of future you want.  Answer fast and don’t edit it.”
“I want to marry.  I want to wake up naked next to a woman that gets me and doesn’t want to use me for my money.  Has something to contribute to our life.”  He tossed her a glance.  “Sorry, that was a bit forthright.”
“No.  Not at all.  I mean don’t you find that at our age, me forty, you at what thirty-six, Jackie mentioned.  Well that at our age we can’t just play footsie and hope both adults are on the same page.  I for one do not want anymore kids, but if I fall in love with a man that has kids, then I will do my best to be a great stepmom.”
“So you…”  He stopped himself from saying what he was feeling, which was the fact that he had been wondering about; did she want to marry again, settle down?
Calista took the silence as he really didn’t want to talk about this, whatever they were talking about, so she changed the subject.  “I was wondering if you knew anyone that might want that motorcycle I bought.  It was kind of a whim purchase.  I think I’ll put it up for sale.”
“I never did ask you that night, so you know how to ride a motorcycle?”  He quizzed with relief the subject was changed.
“Yes, I do.  It’s been a while.  I think I was not thinking straight when I bought it.  Besides, I like riding on the back of a motorcycle with my arms around a man, focusing on the scenery instead of the road.”
“I’ve got a touring motorcycle.  It’s kind of dusty in my garage under its covers but maybe this summer we can take it for a drive.”
“I’d like that.”
“And yes, I know a guy that buys those kind of motorcycles.  I’ll have him swing by the coffee shop next week.  He’s probably already been in to meet you.  Dale Ferguson.”
“Doesn’t ring a bell, but I have met what feels like half the town in a few short months.  I really like most of whom I meet.  I feel very fortunate to have made some good female friends so quickly.  I was worried about that.”
“What making friends?  You’re a natural.”  He beamed with enthusiasm and reassurance.
“Thanks.  No, I know that.  I mean I love owning a coffee shop because of just that, the social interaction.  It’s the making friends I can trust feeling.  I was truly hurt with what happened to me.  I thought it would take years and fester.  I thought revenge would bring me satisfaction.  Which I won’t lie, when I was doing revengeful things to them and they had no idea it was me, nor did they know that I knew they were cheating behind my back, it felt awesome.  Back then.  It felt great.  But now, I look back and think what a waste of time.  I could have just gone on with my life and not had to be so malicious.  Jackie was right, taking the high road and forgetting about it does feel better.  It releases me from the pain, day by day, I think less and less about it and more about all the possibilities in my life, right here in Darling.”
“Yeah.  Jackie tried that one on me too.  I wasn’t revengeful, but I took a long time to get over the hurt.”
“Are you over her now?”  Calista questioned softly.
“Yes.  But weary.”  He tossed a crooked smile her way and then nervously back to the road as if this too he did not want to talk about.
So jokingly she tossed out.  “If there is anything, and I do mean anything, I can do to help you create new memories, you know in that department, you just let me know.  Because my first night in town is a memory that made me feel like my new life was going to be spectacular.”
“I might take you up on that.”  He teased back.
“That’s settled.  Offer is open.  Now, what kind of car do you think I should get next.  Definitely four-wheel drive.  I need the cargo space for the shop, and I was thinking a metallic silver, not like your truck but a dark metallic shade.  A fuel economy SUV…”  Calista kept the conversation light and inquisitive.  She kept Blake in question about his opinions, his degree in architect, his nephews, his sister, how he started his bar, to how he built up his empire of local real estate.  She kept the conversation off ex’s, away from revenge and hurtful feelings of betrayal and before she knew it, they were driving up a long beautiful gravel road where a nice looking ranch sat up on the hill.  He wasn’t taking her back to her apartment, he had driven her straight to his place, a place that Jackie said he never took a woman to yet.
“I hope you don’t mind but my place is on the way before town and I need to feed my dogs.  How do you feel about staying for dinner?  I can do a mean grilled steak and vegetables.”
Without a second thought, Calista acted casual as she stretched her arms and back while answering politely.  “I would like that.”
By the time two black Shepard dogs were fed and out of their kennel to run around on his fifty acres, Calista had accepted a glass of red wine to toast a cheer to Blakes bottle of bear.  
“A toast to new friends and new experiences.”  Blake offered.
“Cheers.”  Calista chimed out before taking a large sip of wine.  She looked around his place.  On the outside, it was very detailed, landscaped, like he put a lot of pride into his home.  An empty home of people she noted to herself.  One that she never took a woman to before, says a lot about a man casually asking her to come for dinner.
As he set his beer down to pull the steaks and vegetables out of the refrigerator, Calista noticed their taste in décor was very similar, less the purple accent tones.  He liked grays and blues, no cream colors anywhere but on the walls.  As for the furniture they both seemed to like the industrial farmhouse look.  Jenny mentioned he had hired an interior decorator to develop the interior of his place, but she also mentioned some of the furniture in his place, he made himself.  While she sipped on her wine, and Blake talked casually over his shoulder while prepping the food to grill, she let her hands run across a few pieces of furniture she was sure he had made.  One in particular, was stunning.  It was a dining table for twelve and it was made from a unique cut of oak with the wood grains splitting in certain parts that a vibrant blue epoxy filled the veins almost like a river running through it.
“This is gorgeous!”  She spoke out with excitement.  “Did you make this?”
Blake turned to look to see where she was indicating and grinned with pride.  “I did.”
She leaned into the table to examine closer the detail work, putting her in a very precarious situation from Blakes standpoint.  With her backside bent over the end of the table, her upper body towards him, while her silky looking blue blouse she had on that was once under a sweater, hung precariously low in front that he could see her blue lace bra and all at once he was hard.  He turned away just as she looked up to him from looking at the table, her blue eyes piercing him with nothing but sex.  All it would take for him to take her on his handmade table was the word go.
The next thing he felt was her hand on his shoulder asking if she could help.  He heard the words, but his mind was buzzing with naked images of their bodies intertwined and him getting a long overdue orgasm from hers truly.  Just as he turned to answer her, she let her hand down and was reaching for the wine bottle to refill.  It was in that moment that he thought the food could wait, but he could not.
He washed his hands in the sink to contain his feelings, hoping this instinctual need to be deep inside her would pass.  The moment he turned from the sink, dish towel in hand drying his hands, he saw the way she was observing him.  She had a sexy smile on her face, her eyes searching his body with desire, her body language relaxed leaning against the countertop and the glass of wine in her hands was the only thing between them that he could think that he needed to set down on the countertop.
The moment his hand reached for the glass to set aside, their open mouths searched each other, their breathing increased, hands were touching, clothes were being tugged at and Blake had to assure her that this time, this time he was not going to stop at her pleasure, this time he had condoms, a king size bed and deep need to be inside her, not once, but multiple times.
With her shirt practically off and nothing but those darn leggings and blue lace bra, Blake pulled away, to take a moment to speak his intentions.  Calista was working feverishly at the buttons on his dress shirt when he stopped her with his hands cradling her face as he looked down into her blue eyes twinkling with desire.  “Calista?”  He breathed her name in question.  “I’m not stopping this time, not at once, not at all, so if you have a change of heart…”
“Thank God, finally.”  She teased as she pecked his lips with a kiss and then went back to working hard and fast at getting him naked.  He had no idea how sexually frustrated he made her.  Fuck business, it was all about pleasure right now and all the rest they would deal with when they had worked their sexual frustration out of their system.
Standing in his kitchen, her in only her blue lace bra and matching panties, him in a pair of dark boxer briefs with a bulge that made her salivate, they began kissing slower, with more intention, easier breathing.  Her nipples poked through her bra wanting nothing more than his naked chest against hers.  She could feel his bulge pressed up against her, but they were still in his kitchen, still leaning against his counter and she wanted to be completely naked, her laying on her back while he slowly eased into her.  
As if he read her mind, he lifted her up, holding her ass in his hands, pressed her against him as the kiss turned carnal.  Tongues were dancing about, lips were pressed and moist, breathing was elevated, and Calista could not help but echo out her desires the moment their lips parted. “Take me to your room, Blake.”
He gently set her feet to the ground and grabbed her hand in his.
“I want you to fuck me in your bed.”  She teased with a smile while adding for pleasure.  “And not just once.”
A primal look of need and frustrations crossed his face.  He needed this, hell, he wanted it again and again since the first night they did it.  But could he handle what followed, after tonight, after things were supposed to go back to normal.  Jackie’s words echoed in his head like a flash – you like you some bit of crazy.  And maybe he did.  Maybe this was what he needed after all.  Before he knew it, it was her leading the way down the hall to the bedroom he showed her before with a quick – this is my home tour.
The minute they stepped foot into his room, Calista noticed that the sun had far passed set and the window curtains had not been closed, the moonlight was illuminating his room through the floor to ceiling windows plastered on either side of the large double French doors that led outside to his firepit area.  It was in that moment, she realized, this long-awaited venture she had sultry dreams about, were just about to come true.  Their naked bodies intertwined in hot passionate sex, going at it, over and over until they were so sated, this crazy burning desire she always felt for him, might relieve her of the ache she felt for him since their very first night.
With gentle strength he laid her back against his bed with a passionate kiss before standing back up to remove the final part that was keeping him naked.  With his underwear shucked off to the side, a condom from his nightstand tossed onto the bed, Calista with her body angled for him to remove the rest of her lingerie, yet he could wait.  He could kiss and lick every square inch of her, getting her naked, knowing that the moment the condom was on his throbbing cock, and he was sliding inside her wet pussy, he could not stop until he was so deep and sated.  Then she spoke out with a sound of pleading sex.
“Fuck me Blake.  Fuck me good and don’t stop at once.”  
He watched her unclasp her bra and shimmy out of it as his lips started to kiss up her legs, his hands spreading her thighs, stroking her skin until the moment his mouth parted her lips to suck on her wetness.  A serenading moan filled the room with pleasure to his ears.  She was his.  Tonight, he would make her cum more than once.  Tonight, she would sleep naked next to him sated and satisfied; come morning he would put a smile on her face once again.  And if this was as far as they took it, he would know, once again, what it felt like to be deep inside her, but he knew it would cause him to crave her even more.  He could only pray that this thing between them, could just keep going for a while until it didn’t.
All Calista could think about as her fingers clambered into his thick dark hair, pushing his head to press hard against her between her legs, while her mind screamed for her to yell out yes! Yes! Yes!  The only sound that left her body as a tremor took over was his name in question.  “Blake?”
His mouth left between her legs and slowly sated kisses on her belly up to her boobs, sucking each nipple for a second before pulling out to suck the next.  His eyes looked up to hers as his words echoed over and over.  “I’m right here baby, I’m right here.  I’m not done with you yet.”
A smile curled her lips at the thought of what she wanted so badly was going to come next.  The moment his warm skin separated from hers to reach over for the condom, Calista adjusted her body to lean towards him.  Her hand reached out and stroked the naked skin on his chest as he rolled the condom on.  She liked the feel of his muscles underneath her fingers, they way he was smiling down at her and how completely aware she was that this man held more power over her in a short time then in all the years she was married to Clay; that thought scared her a bit but she knew the risk was worth the reward, she just had to be patient.
The moment he positioned his body directly over hers, her legs parted as he slowly sank down to meet skin to skin.  The tip of his cock just at the wetness of her pussy but not going in just yet had her breath labored and her hands pulling at him to push inside of her.  It was her words that drove him in, slow and easy, filling her up with his hard-throbbing cock as she whispered out.  “I need you Blake.  I want you, this, us.  Fuck me Blake.”
Blake wasn’t a talker so much in the sense when he was focused on sex.  He was enjoying the sensation of his cock inside of her, the tightness surrounding him from her recent orgasm, the way her body moved with his, her slight gasping sounds of pleasure and moans of approval as each thrust in and out gently brushed her sensitive clit.  He cast a glance down to her face which showed pure pleasure and a smile.  Her eyes intently looking up to him while her mouth formed sounds of pleasure.  It was the moment she sounded out ‘you feel so good’ that he felt his own shutter of pleasure, the tense of his body, the hold of his breath as he looked upwards and closed his eyes.
As his body relaxed against hers, he felt her slowly roll him off and before he knew it, she was on top of him, looking down at him, her faded strawberry blonde hair cascading down over her shoulders with a look I’ve been happily fucked on her face.  The next thing he heard from her mouth not only stunned him but challenged him to arouse the big guy once again.  “I want more of you Blake.  I want to do this all night long.  Because if all we give each other is tonight, I could do it again, and again, and again….”  Her voice had a teasing laughter to it as her mouth lowered down to his for a passionate kiss.  Her breasts touching his chest and the feel of her pussy on top of him made him mentally aware of how serious this could get.  
He hadn’t had sex like this since his early thirties, with what’s her name before he realized for her it was all about money and not love.  Now with his fingers inside of Calista, her body reacting to his touch to finish her off again, her eyes looking lovingly at him as she moaned and encouraged his touch, all thoughts of painful relationships faded and he felt his cock twitch with the need to be inside of Calista once again.
He was almost afraid to reach inside his nightstand for another condom, but the thought of getting someone pregnant stopped him.  As his body rolled away, his fingers left her hot wet pussy, she rolled towards him and her hand reached out to touch him.
“I just need to suit back up.”  He joked.
Her reaction was a smile and a moan as she curled her body away, opened her legs while her hands fondled her breasts, her fingers toying with her nipples causing them to harden.  He looked at her as he rolled the condom on realizing how sexually content she appeared; how comfortable she seemed with touching her own body.  There was no awkwardness between them, not now and not the first night they met in his bar, which appealed to him more than she’d ever know.  Looking down at her body, he did not see a woman of forty but a healthy sexual woman who appeased his appetite.  It felt like they are a sexual match like none other he had before.  In his youth it was immature sex, but as he aged his desire to do things to a woman to please her was high on his list of satisfaction and right now, she looked satisfied yet wanting more.
The moment their bodies touched with tender stroking and a lingering kiss; Calista knew what she wanted.  She wanted to ride her Kansas cowboy and watch his face as pleasure erupted from his body.  She slowly maneuvered him to where she was sitting on top of him, looking down, her body positioned on him, but he wasn’t in her yet.  She wanted to watch his eyes as she slowly slid on top of his cock.  Wanted to see how he reacted to her slow up and down motion, riding him in pleasure while trying to squeeze another orgasm out of him.
The moment she guided his cock inside of herself, she moaned with pleasure and tilted her head back for a second.  Her hands fell upon his chest muscles as she leaned her head back down and looked into his eyes.  Her body began a rhythmic stroke of back and forth, a slight up and down, a squeeze of her inner muscles and then back and forth.  His hands were on her ass, guiding her to go faster, she could feel his need, his desire building and hers was about to crumble.  Within seconds of unison breathing mixed with moans of pleasure.  Calista shattered.  Her body trembled with an orgasm while her mouth moaned out his name.  “Blake…”
As she fell limp against his body, sweat on their skin mixing with each other, Blake whispered softly into her right ear.  “You are the most incredible woman Calista.”
She let that sentence linger down to her heart. Where she knew she had love to give, big love, sexual love, love that last an eternity, and she wasted it on Clay.  Right now, as her body slowly recovered from their sexual acts, all she wanted to think about was how to make this last – forever.
As her mind whirled, her body withered and rolled to the side of him.  He held her in his arms for several minutes before whispering again, but this time it was typical of a man after sex.  “I’m starving.  You lay there all sexy and I’ll go cook us some dinner.”
As he rolled off the bed and looked down at her, she had rolled off to her belly, put her arms under her head with a smile plastered on her face.  “Sounds great.”  She whispered back, but Blake wondered if by the time he made the dinner on the grill if she would even be awake.
It was in that moment he knew; he was lost to a woman named Calista and there was no going back to just business without pleasure.  Because right now, a million thoughts of how to pleasure her sexually and otherwise were running through his mind.
Sometimes the darkness brings the spectacular, like a shooting star erupting across the night sky just as the clouds dissolve and there is nothing but twinkling stars to tease you.
Chapter Eleven
Talk is over rated.
“Oh Darling, you can’t fix yourself by breaking someone else.”  He whispered into her ear and then his naked arms held her closer to his body.
Calista glanced up at him with her arm draped over his chest.  “You make that quote up or does it belong to someone else?”  She quizzed as she was sure she heard that line before, out of her mama’s mouth when she was little.
“Pinterest.”  He whittled a slow easy smile across his face which caused a perplexed look on her face.  Somehow the fact that he looked at Pinterest amused her.  A man so manly with all his muscles and sexual ways, sitting around with his iPad open to a an ap like that, well it showed his intriguing side that she knew was showing the more she got to know him.
“Pinterest?”
“Yup!  My sister sends me pins all the time.  That quote stopped me from breaking a heart that did not deserve to be broken.
Calista rolled her naked body over to raise herself onto her elbows.  She brushed her hair off to the side and looked down into Blakes eyes.  He had one arm behind his head on top of the pillow.  His other arm was under her where he had her wrapped up in his arms only seconds ago, but now she wanted to look into his eyes.  “Having a younger sister to be responsible for must be amazing?  I’m an only child and wanted a sibling so bad, and then once I became a mom, I wanted another child, but we got busy and truthfully, I wondered a lot, how often I might be a single mother.”  Calista shared that small piece of her past with him to follow up on the previous night’s in depth conversation.
“It’s amazingly awful when you’re a teen, but as we grew up, she was there for me just as much as I feel like I need to be there for her now.  She loves being a mom, and Pete had been a great dad.  Lousy husband, great dad.  I keep hoping one day she’ll meet another man to help her, and then maybe I can…”  His words lingered off and then his tone changed.  “So, your ex wasn’t too faithful then, I take it?”
“No.  I mean, he was discrete, but not until he decided that my best friend was a choice.  It’s not like I totally blame him, or totally blame her, I blame them both equally.  He was always looking, and possibly cheating, I had my suspicions, and she was lonely and needy.”  Calista sighed and laid her head on his chest.  “I don’t want to talk about them.”
Blake didn’t either, but he could tell they both had a lot to talk about at some point.  This position they were currently in, naked, sated, happy, wasn’t going to stay that way.  He had himself wrapped up in a project that consumed all his time, then there was Jenny and Jackie, always needing help with the boys; although Jackie seemed to have Conner to help now.  Things were working out in that area of his life, but Randy always needed help with the bar still.  He mentally shrugged off his responsibilities as his hand instinctively went to Calista’s hair and began to stroke it as her face had settled against his chest.  She was breathing softly but enough so that he could tell she was thinking and not sleeping.  He really wished the conversation had not started, because her cheating husband got him thinking about his cheating fiancé.  Perhaps they were not too different after all, at least when it came to being hurt by someone they loved.
It had been an interesting evening with driving Calista back from Kansas City.  He spent more time listening to her chatter on about the coffee shop back in Utah compared to the one here, her son and his accomplishments and her suspicion that Melissa had something to do with her truck being stolen, but he tried to let her know that cars get stolen all the time.  Although her strange texts and written message had an odd timing.  It wasn’t until he found himself driving her home, his home, that he realized that he wasn’t done spending time with her.
What started as a suggestion that she come inside his home for a home cooked meal and an evening fire with a glass of wine before taking her home, turned into carnal need for lovemaking on his king size bed, from both of them.  Now, as he watched the sun slowly rise through the curtains in his bedroom.  He listened to Calista lightly breathing, a relaxed look on her face had returned, and a soft cast of light against her naked skin that was not under the blanket any longer.  He let his mind reel with a replay of last night’s lovemaking, which it had, felt just like that, love.  There was heated passion, the first time, but more of a slow easy exploring, versus a heated I need this bad kind of feeling the second time around.  It was, as if, she was over the I need it phase, and now it felt more like, dare he think it, a relationship phase.
If Jackie had not called him from the bar, desperate about helping Calista because she had her truck stolen and she needed a ride home.  Why did Jackie call him?  Why did she call him to come get Calista instead of just suggesting she get a rental or stay at a hotel, Although he had to admit, the surprise on Calista’s face when he showed up at the Village Inn as she was sitting at the table shredding napkins and drinking coffee, was worth the drive.  Somehow, Jackie failed to say that it was not her that was on the way, but that she requested him to drive the couple of hours into the big city.  It wasn’t like he made that drive a thousand times before, often a couple times a month, but his visits were usually for a swipe on an ap and quick date, or something for one of the buildings or the bar.  He did not mind the drive, but this time, he had his mind spinning with questions about why he was so eager to jump at the opportunity to rescue Calista.  The last thing he needed was another responsibility.
But on the drive back to Darling, she kept insisting that she pay him for his time, that she really could have gotten a rental.  He recalled her repeating that he understands that she is a very capable woman and could handle her own dramas.  He thought of when she said that Jackie insisted she would be right out and it was no big deal, but on the ride home he asked her if the tearing of napkins would help her get her car back and she looked over to him in his truck with a sinful sexual smile and teased, ‘no but it keeps my fingers busy, that is unless you have another suggestion for keeping my hands from being bored.’.  And boy did a few possibilities popped up in his head, sexual possibilities.  It was from that moment he realized this little side adventure for the day, could not have been any more enticing.
As she had fallen asleep after lovemaking, naked in his arms, he laid there realizing how incredible this felt, yet his guard was not down, and his mind was thinking of ways to approach the topic, about where did they go from here.  This was not a relationship – yet, and it definitely, was not a swipe either.  This was two consensual adults, that more than once now, had sex that made him realize how much he missed having a woman like this, one that he was truly attracted to, to be with, versus a match on an ap and a willing participant for a quick date and a quick whatever.  He was starting to realize as each year passed after his heart was broken, by a woman how he couldn’t even say her name in his head, that he missed this, wanted this, but could he deal with another broken heart?
His mind was stopped with a soft hand stroking his body, in all the places that aroused him.  He gently kissed the top of her head and asked.  “Shower?”  
Her hand stopped, and her body crawled up on top of his.  She looked down into his eyes and had a smile on her face.  “Only if we lather each other up.”
The mere fact that she was just as sexually aroused in the evening as in the morning, told him that she did not have the morning after awkwardness.  She was every bit as interested in him – sexually, as he was her.  He guessed anything more could be dealt with later, for now, he let her take his hand and slowly lead him and his morning wood directly into the master bathroom shower.
Sexually sated and sitting at the handmade dining table, Calista’s cellphone dinged with a text from Sally.  She was at the bakery with Ben and she was handling opening.  Sally assured her that she could stay until closing; for her to take the day off if needed.  It made her smile as she realized, when Sally asked for the manager’s position, she was serious.  It wasn’t until Blake’s voice brought her back to the coffee he was pouring and the question of how she liked her eggs.
This was nice, she thought to herself.  The sex was incredible, better than Clay.  The drive brought them past a level of I want you, you want me, but he won’t mix business and pleasure.  Well, Blake Jones, she internally voiced, you just mixed it quite nice last night and this morning.
“You have a huge smile on your face?”  He teased as he cracked eggs over the frying pan.
“You sure I can’t help?  Sally’s got the café handled.  I was supposed to close and train today, but she wants the manager position so bad, she’s doing everything.”
“No.  I got this.  I cook for my sister and nephews all the time, and vice versus.  She cooks a lot of dinners for me to come by and eat.  We’ve made a great team at this.”  He offered
“It sounds like.  Things always go better when everyone works together.”  Her thoughts were distracted by a ding of her cellphone with another text.  Earlier this morning, while Blake was shaving at the sink after their lovemaking in the shower, Calista had put in an order for a rental car to be sent to the bakery.  She already found a car at a dealership that she ordered by phone.  It would be ready next Monday and until then, she would drive the rental car.
Blake quizzed her.  “Sally?”
“No, rental car place.  They are dropping a rental car off at the bakery in the next two hours. I hate to rush breakfast.”  She suggested that breakfast was the end of their sexual escapade.
She watched Blake slide two over easy eggs onto a plate next to some toast with butter.  She loved the way he looked in the kitchen in front of the stove.  Clay had never been a kitchen helper.  A fraud at the grill as he burned things more often than he cooked them, but he always insisted on being at the grill.  In the kitchen, never one meal was made from that man unless it was heat and eat from a box or can.  Blake on the other hand seemed to move effortlessly in the kitchen.  That, in itself, was a sexual bonus.
As he sat at the table next to her, he asked.  “You mentioned you ordered your car last night while driving home.  That was fast.”
“Eh, I guess I know what works for me and the bakery needs an SUV over the truck I was driving.  You know for specialty cake orders.  I had intentions on selling the used truck anyways.  It served its purpose to move me out here and I hope whoever stole it, it runs out of gas in the worst place.”  She chuckled.  “Or gets a flat.”
Blake was quiet for a second as he finished his bite of eggs with toast before stating something that had been on his mind.  “Often people do bad things for the wrong reasons.  If it was Melissa that stole your truck, perhaps it’s better to get to the bottom of why she did it.  Otherwise, you’ve already made a name for yourself in town on serving up revenge.  Naming the café, the way you did, really didn’t help much.  I think if you keep all of that up, it could get ugly, around town that is.  I don’t like revenge; it only gets things all mucked up.  I guess I’m speaking a bit from my own experiences in life, but as for you darling, you are like the star of Darling that moved here, made a name for herself, made several friends, and in the process of dishing out revenge you made a few enemies.  Enemies are like cancer.  Eating away at your soul. Don’t get me wrong, I understand why you did it with the ex’s but as far as all the people in this town, sometimes just listening to their troubles instead of stirring up the pot, is best.”  He could tell by the look of hurt in her eyes and the way she stopped eating by laying her fork across her barely touched breakfast that she was not okay with his forthrightness.  He frowned a bit out of the corner of his mouth before taking another large bite of eggs.  He looked down at his plate of food, forked up some egg and put it on his toast and then took a bite before looking back up to her eyes.  The hurt was fading but a look of defense had crossed her face.
With a long pause of silence between them, staring into her coffee, Calista finally spoke up.  “Look, I hear what you are saying.  I’m not the one giving advice to the women on revenge.  I might have repeated a few suggestions other patrons have come in and suggested.  Perhaps the name was not fitting, but it is what it is for now.  I’m not going to change it because rumors get out, nor am I going to change.  I haven’t done anything to anyone, well except my exes but quite honestly, I have been so busy the last few weeks that I haven’t done anything to them recently.  However, the folks that ask me, I might have suggested…”  She paused wondering, was she encouraging the few scorned women around town to go about and do their revenge damage.  Sally was really the only one and she really did not think the woman had it in her when she made the suggestions, and she did not like where it led.
Blake watched her pushed her plate away from her, which caused him to not want to eat the rest of his breakfast.  He wondered if he made a huge mistake just now, being straight forward about all of this, when he probably should just let her do what it is she wants to do.  But something deep inside of him, the protector part of him, wanted her to fit in this town, to make things work out, so that maybe they would work out.  Making enemies in this town never went over very well for those who chose to go that route.  It usually ate away at them, making them less happy of a person than they were before.  Calista had this way about her that he loved but he could see how all of this could turn its ugly head, like her having her truck stolen.  He sighed and stood up, put her practically uneaten plate of food onto his and walked them over to the sink.  When he turned back around Calista had a false look on her face like she was pretending to be happy but wasn’t.  Her eyes glanced at him and then away quickly while her mouth had a flat lined smile on it.  He wanted to fix this, all of this, take away any pain she ever dealt with, but he knew that sometimes folks just needed a nudge in the right direction and an ear to listen to their troubles.  
He grabbed his coffee cup and began to open his mouth again against his own will.  “I just think you should take Jenny’s suggestion.  Do an interview for the local paper.  Maybe clear the air.  And when you say the last couple of weeks, did you ever stop to think that maybe you need to move on past what those two did to you?”  He drank a sip of coffee and then poured the rest into the sink.  He picked up his keys and put them in his pocket, which made Calista think he was ready to drive her home.
At this point, she knew the conversation was useless.  He had his opinions, right or wrong she didn’t want to ruin what they just experience in the last twenty four hours with an argument over a name of a shop she really should reconsider, the fact that she had overstepped her eagerness to help women with revenge suggestions, when really, deep down, she knew she should be guiding them towards the high road.  It was the road that was leading her closer to Blake and she liked that idea.  However, he seemed like he turned irritated all of a sudden, wanted to pick a fight, create distance, or find a way to say, it was nice, but this was all that it was.  She chose silence and a friendly smile over replying any more to the conversation.
She grabbed her purse.  Her shopping bags were still in the backseat of his truck.  She felt a bit off when his hand went to her back like he was leading her out of his house.  She let out a huge sigh of relief thinking about all of it and thought better to be silent than continue talking to him about it or god forbid fight over something that just wasn’t worth the energy.  Her sigh got her an inquisitive look on his face.
“Everything alright?”  His voice held concern.
She was completely exhausted.  Her little adventure was over for now.  She needed to go make a list of what her forward plans were, for changing the shop name, the interview, talking to the police about Melissa and her suspicions and first firing the gal, or possibly just take her off the schedule permanently.
“Calista?”  He pleaded out her name in questioned.  He was concerned he just ruined their entire new try at whatever this was.
She looked up from her gaze that had been staring at the front door, not realizing she had stopped in her footsteps and was just standing in the front hallway of Blakes house.
“Yeah?  Sorry.  I’m just exhausted.  Somebody wore me out last night and this morning.”  She teased while her mind whirled with questions about what she was really doing.  Any kind of serious talk was the last thing she wanted.  She wanted to go back to where they were teasing each other’s bodies with touch and no words were spoken.
“Okay.  Sorry.  You seemed upset over what I just said.”  He offered as he slid his gray Carhart coat on over his navy-blue thermal shirt.
She flatlined her mouth and then frowned while shaking her head no.  “Nope.  Just tired.  I’ll give the interview some thought.”  She replied as her mind screamed, no you won’t.
“Shall we go?  You said you needed to get to the shop when the rental car is dropped off?”
“Actually, if you can drop me by apartment, that would be great.”  She smiled flatly.  Her head was starting to feel like a migraine was kicking in.  She needed to take some medicine and lie down in her dark bedroom.
“Sure.”  He stood there quietly.
She grabbed her coat but did not put it on over her black sweater she was wearing.  The day was already warming up and she felt heated from the fire burning inside of her asking herself, what was she doing with all of this – Darling, a coffee shop, a man that was younger, when originally, she thought traveling and sunning on a beach reading books held much better appeal with dealing with divorce.  Then as if a bolt of lightning struck her, she remembered that when dealing with her mother’s death six years ago, she did everything she could to keep busy and engaged.  Was that what she was doing now?
The moment Blake parked his truck in the alley at the bottom of the metal stairs to her place, they both were quiet as they had been the entire drive there.
Calista spoke up first.  “Thanks again for coming to get me.  I guess I just didn’t want to stay in Kansas for the trip I had planned.  Maybe, dinner one night this week?”  She wasn’t sure where all of this was going.  Blake had obviously broken his no relationship with business rule, but they had not talked about it – this budding sexual relationship – and she did not want to start the talking.  She didn’t want him to go back to his no mixing business and pleasure, but she felt off put by his comments earlier.  Her defenses had kicked in and reacted irrational and now she felt embarrassed to try and repair what her attitude had caused, distance between them.  
“That would be nice.  Hey, you want me to come up with you?”  He casually tossed out with a sly grin, as if no irritations had been arising between them since his comment earlier at breakfast.
She turned and looked at him with a flat smile.  One minute he couldn’t get her out of his place fast enough and all of a sudden, he wanted to what?  “I’ve got stuff.  Listen, give me a call.  I owe you dinner.  It’s the least I can do for you picking me up.  I’ll put you down for free coffee in the new computer in the shop.  Refill anytime you want.”  She smiled and then leaned in for a quick peck on the lips.  Before it could turn, whatever this was, into anything more.  She turned, opened the truck door, was out and slamming it while waving bye.  She could not run up those metal stairs fast enough.  Her heart wanted nothing more than for her to invite him up while her head was screaming at her to figure out what it was, she wanted herself.  She knew she felt like an emotional roller coaster around the man.  What she hadn’t expected was her defensive mechanism to a man just giving her good advice.
By the time she was inside, her head pinched, her mind whirled, and spots were dancing around the room.  Just as she dropped her bag, she bent down and grabbed her cellphone out of it.  Two texts came in.  One from Blake – how’s Thursday?  The other one was from a new unknown number, ‘how’s it feel bitch?  Revenge is sweeter when it’s served up cold.’
She could only imagine the threatening texter meant to say because it was cold outside that the revenge of stealing her truck was what – sweet?  She knew from this text that Melissa was behind the truck theft.  She was certain of it.  A flashback to Blakes comments from earlier pinched her brain.  She let out a huge sigh and thought to herself how she will let the police handle it.  She wasn’t going to reply, just block the new unknown caller number again.  Instead of throwing her cellphone and collapsing in tears in her room.  She took a migraine tablet, grabbed a banana off the counter and peeled it back.  After her first bite, she had her clothes off, her bath running with hot water and scented essential oils mixed with bathing salts.  She turned on her music to fill her loft with meditation relaxation mix.  This car theft thing was not going to get the best of her.  Clay and Stephanie were not going to get the best of her.  Blake on the other hand, after last night and this morning, he had taken the best of her and sated her to satisfaction.  Perhaps taking it slow was the course.  He was busy, she was busy, and the holidays always had her preoccupied.
Calista looked at her phone, turned it off for while she sat in her bath soaking.  She had at least an hour before the rental car would be downstairs to drop off her car as promised.  She would work around the shop for a bit, and then once she got things settled, she wanted to come back up here, do some yoga and take a nap.  Because having sex with Blake was far more intense than it ever was with Clay.  She needed to get back into sexual shape, more yoga, more body work like waxing and regular pedicures.  She smiled inwardly thinking how sex with a man like Blake was worth all the extra effort.
Later that day after the café closed, after spending an hour chatting excitedly with Jenny and Jackie about the next fund raiser, as she laid in her room, eyes drifting off to sleep, she realized that silence in the heat of the moment held more power than yelling, acting out or revenge.  From now on, karma can have its way with Clay and Stephanie, and Melissa for that fact, that is if the police haven’t already arrested her.  She was ready to get on with her life.  She texted Blake, be it several hours later from his text, but keep a guy waiting and he’ll wonder.  “Thursday works for me?”  
Unfortunately, his quick reply back felt like a knife to her heart.  “Best not.  Busy week.  Some other time, later this month, maybe.”  This yes no, hot cold, thing they had going on was going to exhaust her.  Was he not the one that asked if Thursday for dinner worked, she screamed in her head?  Just as she was about to turn her phone off, he texted again.  “Sorry.  Really, I am.  Something unexplainable just came up.”
Calista frowned into her cellphone after looking at the picture of naked Blake in the shower that she had taken.  She realized that as two mature adults, that had busy lives, perhaps he really did have a big project come up.  However, she could not help but text something.  “You’ve got to eat sometime.  Just swing by the café someday and meal is on me.” 
Her cellphone dinged quickly with a few texts.  The first one was from Blake – “Will do.  And thanks.”  She had to wonder what he was thanking her for, and then she remembered the previous twenty-four hours.  She could only assume that his inability to commit was a huge part of their attraction going further, perhaps she should take his lead as she could use some time to straighten her own thoughts out.
Just with that thought she clicked on a text from Cole that simple read – “Mom!”  She could text back what, but his mom with an exclamation mark meant a lot of things.  Usually he was mad at her.  She really did not want to deal with her teenage man child.
She turned her cellphone completely off.  No Blake, no Cole, nobody was going to bother her for the next hour.  Blake had a way of turning cold on her just after heating things up.  As far as Cole went, she would always love her son.  He was caught up in a strange time right now.  Being young and dealing with so much is not always easy.  She would call him after her nap.
As her mind whirled back to Blake, while her eyes closed, she thought how she did not want to go chasing some young guy around, playing the yes let’s do it, now let’s not.  She just wanted to make it through the Christmas holiday without a mental break down and come the New Year, maybe she needed to just take a break from Darling, from Blake, and from anything that made her feel any type of emotion.  Her revenge was done.  It was time to repair her soul.
How beautiful it is to stay silent when someone else expects you to be enraged.
Chapter Twelve
Peek a boo, I see you.
“Mom?”  Cole’s voice bellowed out in a questioning tone on the other end of the cellphone.
“Cole?  I thought we were okay texting.  I’m in the café working the counter until my relief staff comes in.”  Calista chimed out quietly as there were a few patrons sitting around the café, drinking and socializing.  The Christmas display with retail gift items patrons can buy was starting to look thinned out, so she jotted a note on a post it and stuck it next to the register – restock retail.
A deep breath of air rushed out as Cole breathed into his cellphone.  “I promised dad that I would just stay here for Christmas and not complicate things by going out to Kansas.  I wouldn’t even be able to stay but a day because I have to work the day after Christmas and what if a blizzard comes.  Airlines, driving, no matter how you look at it, you moving to Kansas really complicates things.”  His voice was rushed, and his explanation seemed legitimate and thought out.
“I understand Cole.  I know, I guess I just needed to feel some distance.  But hey, when you do come, I think you’ll see why I like it here.  Folks are laid back and yet still hip, well at least the peeps your age.  I’m going to miss you.  Maybe, I can come up there for a weekend after the new year.  I’m looking to take a break here as things are going so well.  The shop is actually doing great that I can be a part time employee and travel a bit.  How would that sound?”  She quizzed him with hope.  “Maybe I’ll come your way after the holidays or we could plan a trip for next summer, back to Ireland, like we talked about?”
“That would be easier mom.  And yes, I would love to go back to Ireland.”  He sounded relieved.
“I’m going to be blue for Christmas without you.”  She sang out in a tease to her son.
“Me too, mom.”  He laughed.
The moment they hung up, a middle-aged man with grey temples and a red flannel shirt walked in and Calista barely had time to wipe a tear from her eye.
“Everything okay?”  The customer asked even though she had never met the man before.
“Son can’t make it here for Christmas.”  She chimed up.  “Welcome to Dioltas Hide Out, what can I get you?”
“Well not some revenge, but I’ll take a Winter Breeze coffee, two vanilla bean scones, and that red energy drink.”  The man piped out as he pointed to a monster energy drink in the display case.
Calista smiled.  “Sure thing.”  Inside her head, she was seething over the revenge comment.  The name of her place was not going over like she had planned.  Blakes voice in her brain about changing it, reverberated around.  As she made the man his peppermint white chocolate coffee, she realized that this town was big, yet small.  Rumors were that, rumors, but possibly doing the interview with a spin on a name change, could stop all of that.  It was time to move on, and the revenge was not part of the game anymore.  It was her past, she just wanted a future, maybe with Blake in it as her mind body and soul ached for him, but was he too soon after so much?
The moment she handed the change back to the man, she piped up.  “Have a wonderful day, and Merry Christmas!”
“You do the same.”  He remarked casually before turning to walk out of her shop.
Not two minutes after Sally showed up, Carl showed up too.  The place was busy, and Calista had a scheduled hair appointment later today with Remi that she really did not want to cancel.  When she texted Carl on his day off, he promptly texted back a strong yes with a need for as many hours as possible.  She put notes in her phone to go over a schedule change to make him forty hours through the holidays.  Thinking that should take care of her need for more time off to plan holiday stuff and not to have to call Melissa in, not that she planned to.  However, she wanted the police to do their job before she officially fired Melissa.  Just keeping her off the schedule would please her enough for now.
In the back office of the café, Calista closed the old wooden door.  She had not done a thing to really tackle the organizing of the office.  She had planned to wait until Milly was gone.  She did not want to step on her toes as Milly was still the acting full-time manager.  However, with her feet on the desk, and leaning back in the old wooden office chair, she realized the office was not conducive to how she liked it.  She grabbed a legal pad and pen from the bookshelf next to the desk.  She hit her Bluetooth earpiece to on.  She dialed in the number to the local journalist that Blake had suggested.  While the phone rang, she leaned back in the chair further, and began to scribble notes on how she wanted to set up her café office.
“This is Montgomery?”  The younger woman’s voice answered her cellphone.
“Tessie Montgomery?”  Calista asked.
“The one and only.”  The woman chimed up.
Calista liked her voice.  It was confident, catchy and that had her attention.  She put her feet off the desk, sat upright in the wooden desk chair, set the pad and pen on the desk, and looked at the old outdated John Deere calendar on the opposite wall.  “Miss Montgomery, this is Calista Miller from Dioltas Hide Out Café.  Did I catch you at a good time?”  She offered up.
“I was beginning to wonder when I would hear from you.  Blake’s friend, right?  Listen, if you had not called me today, I was going to track you down.  I’ve got three days to get a story on you and the shop and then it will hit press this next weekend.  Blog by end of day three.  Some folks around here still want their paper to read, buy my blog followers are the bread and butter of this towns unofficial news, if you get my drift.”
Calista laughed.  She really liked this young woman.  She had some ump to her mojo, and that was the kind of women Calista liked at her old coffee shop.  At one point and time, Stephanie was like that, but looking back, she wondered did the ex-friend act like that because that was what she liked?  Maybe Stephanie had no idea who she was.  Maybe Stephanie’s act over the last few years was just a cry for help and Clay took advantage of her?  She shook her head of the thought of the two of them, because that was not her focus anymore.  “I was hoping we could meet soon.  I’ve got a hair appointment in an hour.  What’s your schedule like Miss Montgomery?”
“Call me Tess.  Whose doing your hair?”  Tess quizzed
“Remi at Darling’s Saloon.”  Calista offered.
“I might swing by and ask a few questions then to get started, if you don’t mind.  Then maybe tomorrow around ten, take some shots of the café and the new remodel.  I stopped by a few times, but we seem to miss each other.  Darling Café was a major hangout for me back in high school.  Now, I’m usually out catching stories, and settling in at Finnigan’s in the evening to write.  Jackie and I go way back.  It’s how Blake knows me; in case you’re wondering.”  She offered.
The woman was quick and forward, she would give her that.  As far as Blake, she had wondered, maybe her jealous spike meter went up when she realized that she had sexual attraction to Blake and could not seem to get enough of him.  She answered the woman with a simple tone.  “That’s fine.  If I miss you at the salon, see you tomorrow at ten at the café.”
“Will do.”  Then Tess hung up without another word.  One thing was for sure, Calista quickly realized the gal had that superfast way of thinking and doing.  Something, back in her youth, she charged forth with, but as she got older, a lot more thought went into everything, and she knew she overthought, over planned so much of her life, that maybe, just maybe, the sex with a stranger thing was the turning point she had been looking for.  Then again, she still had a new life to start living, and experiencing.  The old two, Clay and Stephanie, were now a new code word in her brain to avoid – O2.  She scribbled it on the pad and then scratched next to it.  No more O2.  It would be her motto to move forward.
The moment that Calista walked into Darling Hair Saloon, heads turned.  She was sure it had nothing to do with the fact that her red hair that was fading into a soft strawberry blonde that caught the women’s whispers.  It was her, and the café, and that was not something she wanted, but she got it.  She feigned a weak smile, as she slipped her sunglasses up onto her head.  “Calista for Remi.”  She offered up to the high school age receptionist.
“She’s finishing up on a client.  Have a seat.  I’ll let her know you are here.”  The young gal replied.
“Thanks.”  Calista smiled and turned to look for a seat, while half the room of women smiled at her, the other half were shooting daggers.  ‘What did I do now?’  She asked herself as she veered towards the smiling half of the room, who put down their magazines, cellphones, or electronic devices as if they waited on her very first word.
“Good afternoon, Merry Christmas.”  She offered up.  She noticed that some of the woman looked to be waiting for her to sit and say something.
The first woman to speak up was in her twenties.  “I’ve got an appointment to go strawberry blonde like you.  I follow Remi’s tweets, but she couldn’t get me in today.  I love your hair.”
“Thanks.”  Calista offered up with a flat lined smile that she was trying awfully hard to look genuine.
A few of the not so approving side of woman seemed to be glaring at her.
Another woman sitting by her chimed up.  “I heard that you helped Sally with some revenge on that ex-boyfriend of hers?  I heard that you’ve helped a lot of women in this town.”
Calista’s head pinched; her smile flattened more as her brain whirled with thoughts of what have I done.  Then, just as if Blake was in the room with her, she thought, what would Blake say.  She took a deep breath and let the air out before replying.  “I might have said a few things to a few people out of suggestion, but that does not mean I condone revenge.”
“But it’s in the name of your café.  What’s so bad about just keeping it Darling Café?”  A woman from across the room chimed up.
Calista pressed her lips together and realized she had a Chinese fire drill on her hands in the form of multiple independent woman in one tight space called the salon.  This could go south if she did not think before she spoke.  “Darling Café was Milly’s.  I guess when I bought it, I figured I should give it a new name.  As far as the Dioltas part, I’m Irish and well, the meaning of revenge was to start my life fresh doing what I love.  I love serving the community great coffee and fresh baked goods.  Not to mention, energy drinks, because they are women’s Viagra so to speak some days.  As women, we do so much, for so many, and every now and then we need a hideout, a boost, a cup of coffee with girlfriends to work it all out.  That’s all.”
A few mumbled sounds chorused out from the disapproving side sounded out while one older strong voiced woman spoke up.  “I suggest you change the name then.  And stop shuffling out revenge advice and start focusing on your new life.”
“Touché.”  Calista chimed out quickly with as much sweet genuine niceness she could muster.  The woman that just spoke gave a vibe of woman in charge.  She continued with a soft voice.  “A good friend just told me to do the same and I think you both are very smart people.”  She laughed lightly, half out of nervousness, and half because the floor of the room seemed to be all eyes on her.  “What would you suggest I do then?  I mean, I have toyed with just dropping the Dioltas part of the café and calling it the Hide Out, or Darling’s Hide Out, but almost everything in this town starts with that, so I was thinking just Hide out Café?  What do you think?”
The same woman spoke up over the few women that were shaking their heads yes, I think that’s great.  “I think you should be careful in a small town like this.  Too many mistakes, and folks don’t forgive.  Be that as it may, you seemed to be well liked for the most part.  Drop the Dioltas, Hide Out Café is catchy.  If women want advice, inspire them to be more than a plot of revenge.  Karma’s a bitch for a reason, I think she does a pretty bang up job of fixing things after the fact.  Although, there are always a few that need a nudge in Karma’s direction.”  She laughed loudly as if remembering someone or thing, just as several other women followed her lead.  
It was barely a second before the older well-dressed woman with an opinion continued.  “I mean, I heard things, and I could not say that I would not have done some of the same things, but time to hitch your wagon and move on, besides, that Blake isn’t going to be on the market long as soon as he decides he’s not heartbroken anymore.  He’s been shooing off woman left and right for two years now.  Then you walk in town, and the game changed.  It’s obvious.  Although, you’re a year or two older than him.”  She smiled which made Calista laugh inwardly just as Remi walked out.
“Calista.  What’s the rush?  You want to touch up the red?”  She offered up happily as she stood in her all black attire of black leggings, black long sleeve shirt, black cape and a recent hair coloring of jet black making her look a bit dark and devious.
“I’m feeling blue.  Blue for Christmas.”  Calista tossed out there as a few women gasped and two asked out loud.  “All blue or blue highlights.”
Calista turned to them and smiled.  “Back to blonde ladies, but my son just called and said he can’t see me for Christmas, so I was thinking a streak of blue to say I’m sad.”
The older outspoken woman tossed out the comment.  “Blake likes blondes anyway.  Just tell him you’re over the ex and I bet he’s yours.”
Calista raised her eyebrows up, enlarged her eyes as she smiled and turned.  The moment she was in Remi’s salon chair she had to ask.  “Who is that woman?”
“Town’s mayor.  She doesn’t keep quiet about anything.  Blakes family and her family go way back.  So, back to blonde?”
“Yes.”  Calista responded while replaying what just happened in the front room of the salon.
“Blue?  Just a few streaks?”  Remi asked.
“I was thinking, peak a boo blue.  Where it kind of shows but it doesn’t.  What do you think?”  She asked as she watched Remi run her fingers through her hair.
“I think Blake will love it.”  She teased.
Calista laughed and wondered, what was it about Blake and her that made everyone so interested in them all of a sudden.  It wasn’t like they went parading around town flirting.  If anything, it was behind closed doors flirting.  So, was it Blake that was talking, maybe Jackie or Blake’s sister?  Either way, that town mayor had her say, and if she was smart, she would follow some of that advice.
By the time, peek a boo blue blondie, was in her silver SUV, driving around town, she realized that she stuck out a bit.  Everywhere she stopped, folks were already talking a buzz, about the café name change, the blue hair, the new car.  She felt like a fish in a glass bowl.  Her last stop was Tully’s shop.  She had been meaning to stop in for quite some time.  She texted her earlier in the day while getting her hair done, that she needed some unique holiday clothes.  The moment she walked into Tully’s store, she felt like she stepped back in time, to a time where retail seemed as if it catered to a woman’s needs.  There was a large crystal chandelier hanging in the center of a comfortable seating area of plush dark blue velvet loveseats.  Calista noticed small carts of drinks and snacks off to the side, surrounded by several well-dressed displays of metal antique metal seamstress mannequins.
Tully walked out in a burgundy Japanese tea robe; her black Indian hair up with chopsticks and a pair of white Japanese slipper sandals.  She bowed in front of Calista.
The minute she stood up Calista smiled with such sincerity.  “Thank you.  I needed that.  I had a day.”
“I heard.”  Tully offered up.  “You need to follow Tess’s blog.  She’s already tweeted out about you.  Comments from the salon and a photo of you with the new hair.  Calista, she likes you.  She doesn’t do this kind of PR push for nothing.  If she likes you, people in town will like you.  It’s just how it works.  Just go with it.”
Calista swallowed hard.  She was ready to react with anger as Tully started in about Tess blogging about her and whether the town would like her or not if one person did or not, but quickly realized, things might actually work out in her favor.  “Can you tell me her twitter name?”  She asked with cheeriness in her voice, but deep down she was trying to grapple with the simple solution of moving far away, to a small happy town, and not thinking of additional ramifications that could happen if she pissed off the wrong person, smiled incorrectly at someone who runs the rooster cage.  She let out an internal sigh, realizing that the worse that could happen was nothing compared to what she went through the last few years.  If she mucks it up here, she will just start over somewhere else, but how would that be when her mind can only think about a potential future with Blake.
“I just texted you by sharing her all her contact info right before I walked out of here.”  She took the Japanese sandals off and set to the side.  In only her white socks, she shuffled to a rack and uncovered its champagne colored silk sheet off to the side.  “Now, let’s talk holidays.  I pulled your sizes and I’ve got some killer looks here.  Talking, fun around the café, date night with Blake – big question mark here, you can answer that later, also, Holiday party clothes, you got a few of those to go to, and I’ll save the va-va-voom New Year’s Eve one for last.”
Calista stood in front of the rack of clothes and let her hands roam over the mostly vintage clothes.  There were a few pieces of modern make, but a look of vintage fashion.  She had always been more of a trendy woman, but some of these pieces she wanted to buy, just to own, not even sure if she would wear them.  “I love them all, I truly do.”
“Fantastic!”  Tully chimed up.  “I’ve got a private dressing room to the right.  I’ll pull the rack back there.  You get undressed and let’s try these babies on.  Sweets?”  She hollered out to a person that was in the backroom.  “I’ll be in the private dressing room with Calista Miller from the Hide Out Café.  Cover the front and UPS should be here soon for the shipments.”
A man’s voice bellowed out.  “Got it.”  
Calista turned to Tully in her first outfit of dark red silk dress.  It was a bit much, but she had a feeling she was going to buy it anyways.  “Hey, I noticed you dropped the Dioltas as you were talking to Sweets.”
“Honey just go with it.  The revenge is over.  It got the town talking, which was actually, pretty clever if you ask me.  But your café was being called the Hide Out shortly after everyone found out you were in town.  Be that as it may, it works.  Play it PR style.  I’m sure Tess will produce a great article on you with follow up tweets.  She’s a gem.  She can boost my business any day of the week.  Now turn around, that silk dress screams Marilyn Monroe style, but you make it sexier.  Although with your peek a boo blue, I think the dark navy blue one for a new year eve party will look stunning on you with your blue eyes.  Where is Blake taking you?”
Calista smiled sheepishly at Tully’s reflection in the mirror and then went back to glance at her reflection in the dress.  She would agree that with blue highlights in her platinum blonde hair, a navy-blue dress would make her eyes pop, however this dress was something she was going to buy whether she ever wore it or not.  It was a statement dress of powerful yet super sexy red, that every woman should own, and find a reason to wear.  After a deep breath, she finally replied to Tully’s suggestion of her and Blake.  “We’re just friends.  I think I would like it to be more but we both seem to be working on moving on.”
“Shoot.  Blake’s been playing protect my heart and bachelor of the year for too many years.  Yes, his heart got broken, but the way he looks at you, or so I am told, it’s a matter of time.”  
Tully reached over into a beautiful cream white sewing basket that was organized beyond Calista’s capabilities.  It seemed the two of them had the love of organization to share between them.  She took a mental note to herself as she responded to Tess.  “Well, he seems to be too busy for me all of a sudden, not that we were anything, but he picked me up when my truck got stolen in Kansas City and on the long drive home, well, we got to know each other.”  Or so Calista thought, to herself.
Tully lifted her head to meet Calista’s eyes as she was marking the hem with pins for sewing adjustments that would need to be made.  Her eyes had a look in them as if to say something mischievous.  “I guess you leaving his house the next morning, was what?  You know, no other woman has been to his new ranch since it’s conception.  Jackie, because Blake babysits once in a while, Jenny, all the time with the boys, and the decorator, other than that, no single female has been to his place, overnight.  Care to tell?”
Calista blushed as Tully unzipped the back of the dress and it dropped to the floor.  In only her black lace bra and panties she turned to the woman and smiled sheepishly.  “I guess I kind of stayed the night.  But he keeps me at an arm’s length most of the time.  I kind of need to focus on me anyways.  Too soon after the divorce.  New business, new town, new friends.”  She reached out and touched Tully’s shoulder and smiled.  “But it does kind of make me feel special that he took me to his place now that I know that.”  She let out a sigh.
“Just keep on, keeping on.  Things will work out.  I guess Blake’s got some big project, Jackie was all hush hush about but really, the man likes to keep himself too busy so that if he stops, he might realize he’s not living his life but helping everyone else out.”
Calista shook her head as she knew that feeling all too well.  It was a hard habit to break; keeping busy to keep herself from dealing with her feelings, yet she had always made that work for her.  Perhaps after the holidays, she will force herself to slow it down a bit, observe life so to speak and then maybe things with Blake will begin to grow.
The next morning, Calista felt her stomach twitch with nervousness over the all mighty and powerful Tess who was about to walk through the doors of her café.  It was all she could do to reclean surfaces or retouch up her lipstick.  She decided to go wear a simple navy poplin dress shirt with dark dress jeans and a pair of her make me lucky black leather ankle boots tucked under the hem of the long length of the jeans.  She didn’t know if the boots were really lucky, but she was wearing them when Blake and she had their first sexual encounter, and before that she scratched off a thousand-dollar lottery ticket back in Utah one time.  So, she could only think they might bring her luck in dealing with Tess.  Hoping her true self came out in the interview.
The moment a skinny twenty something man with a start of a dark brown beard on his thin face walked through her door with two cameras around his neck, she felt the presence of Tess before she walked into the café.  The young man held the door open for her and in walked a short round woman with the eyes of Betty Boop but in blue and a windblown short dark black hair that she was sweeping away from her face.  Dressed in dark jeans, black Sketcher street shoes, and a light blue vintage rock band tee shirt, Tess had nothing scary or fearful in her presence.  If anything, it was as if your high school best friend just came to say hi, but a bit older than high school.  Her face held a very youthful look, which will go a long way when Tess gets older, but for now, it was like hanging with a friend, casual and laid back.
The three of them shook hands as Tess introduced her photographer and younger brother, Drake.  He did not share the round face look or pear shape body, but that was neither here nor there.  Within seconds, Tess and she were sitting in the back corner brown leather chairs talking like college roommates, while Drake walked around taking pictures of the café and them.  Tess’s starting questions were casual, yet leading.  Before long, Calista was pouring out her story in short version, dirty deeds of her two ex’s - ex-husband and ex best friend.  She spoke about her Aunt, what lead her to buy this place, the feeling she got when she first visited the town over a year ago, and how incredible everyone in this town has been to her since her formal arrival.  She kept the not so incredible experiences to herself, but those were her own story to tell, if she ever wanted to.  She found herself talking on until Tess’s eyes sparkled with mischievousness as she glanced over Calista’s shoulder.  
Without even looking, Calista knew.  Blake had walked through her café glass door and like an unseen magnet, he did things to her mind and body without her even looking at him.
Tess stood up.  “Blake.  Just the man I think would make a great customer picture.  Drake set him over there in the corner window looking out onto the town street.  The light filtering in, will add a glow to his handsomeness.  Calista, grab the man a fun coffee mug, make sure it’s hot so the steam will rise.  Let’s do a few of him alone and maybe a few with Calista at the counter handing him something.”
Before Calista could stand and turn to let herself react to the man who commandeered so much of her mental space, she felt a sense of need to touch him, yet she refrained.  With a swipe of her sweaty palms against her dark jeans, she turned her body towards him and smiled.  His smile back, told her that this was all planned.  But by who, Tess, or himself?
“Blake?”  She questioned off and smiled.
“Utah?”  He joked and then added.  “I mean Kansas now.”
“Too cute you two.  Now.  Drake…”  Tess spent the next ten minutes producing shots from over Drakes shoulder and asking Calista and Blake questions about how they met, how Blake felt that his favorite high school café was changing and was Calista here to root herself permanently into the town or was this a passing moment in her life.  Calista answered her with as much honesty as she could afford.  Deep down, this was a passing moment, but when Blake looked at her when she said her plan was to build a business where she could be a partial part of it while traveling the globe, he looked almost hurt as if she had not invited him.   Which she would, if he wanted, but it was her plan before she met him.  And why she would even think of changing her life plan for any man after what she just went through with her ex’s was beyond herself.  A little voice screaming in the back of her brain for her to be her own woman and let no man lead her life plan was taking over in the interview.
By the time Tess was done and walking out of the café doors, Blake and Calista had the room to themselves for a moment of quiet.
“So…” His voice traveled to her ears with hesitation.  “You plan to travel?”  He started up as his right hand gravitated to her new blue peekaboo streaks in her hair.  “I like this by the way.”  He looked directly into her eyes with a sweet smile, the kind he gave her after they had sex and he was looking at her for comforting affection.  Her body melted towards him slowly until the door chimed with an older female patron and she stepped back briskly with a flat smile.
Blake followed her lead and stuffed his hands in his denim pockets in front causing his chest muscles to bunch up.  It was a move that screamed, my hands are off, you happy now.
Calista went to the counter to help the customer, who decided to linger at a table, glancing occasionally at them as they now stood across the room from each other.
Blake finally approached the counter and asked Calista for a vanilla scone to go while he pulled a sparkling water out of the cooler next to the counter.  He plopped a twenty on the counter to pay just as the customer finally decided nothing juicy going on, so they will leave.  As soon as the door closed, Blakes hand touched Calista’s as she handed him the scone in the brown paper bag to go.
Blake started as he removed his hand.  “I usually don’t take on projects this size that I am working on, but it will be done soon.  Maybe we could spend a little time together?”  He suggested casually yet questioningly.
That would be nice Calista thought to herself as her mouth sounded off a not so sure, “sure” sound.  Calista had to wonder, was he blowing her off.  He used the words a little time together, not would you like to go out on a date, how about I swing by later and we go to dinner.  Instead a moment of silence ensued between them, when Calista could not stand it any longer.  She took a step back and began to rearrange a few brownies and rice crispy treats wrapped in plastic on a basket next to the register.
Blake blinked his eyes in a questioning fashion and then he felt his heart tried to guard himself from heartbreak.  “I’m sure Tess will write a great article.  She’ll follow up and use the pictures for PR.  Send her a request and she’ll release the photos for you to use free of charge, although most folks send her a gift card to their business.  Tit for tat, and all that.”
As he said the last sentence, she couldn’t help but laugh with a childish bubbly feeling.  He had a masculine way of sounding childish, probably the active uncle in him.
“That’s the smile I wanted to see.”  He teased.
“Anytime.”  She offered back.
“Then soon, after this project?”  He suggested a casual date.
“Anytime.”  She offered again, but this time, she felt herself feel sad that he wasn’t committing to a time, date or place.  Her smile faded and in doing so his eyes looked sad as well.
The door chimed with three teenage patrons and Blake was turning to go with a casual see you around in his exit.
Two hours later, Calista had relieved herself of café duties to hole herself up in her office.  She needed to do a full operation redo office revamp, and pronto.  She needed to get Blake off her brain and her mind onto something productive before she screamed in frustration or broke down crying over the Christmas blues.
A few hours later, Blake felt himself engrossed in Tess’s blog about Calista that Tess had decided to forward to him before publishing.  He found himself reading it over a few times.  It was as if he was finally understanding what really took place in Calista’s life.  He was starting to understand now that they were two hurt souls that meet and needed one another so badly that the only thing they could do was push each other away – to avoid the hurt, the pain, that comes with falling in love.  Or was it only him, that was pushing, and Calista was just protecting her heart?  He thought of all the moments they had together, and she was always willing to try until he pushed her away just a little bit that she would become guarded to a fault.  He shook his head and closed his iPad cover flap which automatically turned it off.  He set the device on his antique drafting board and realized, if he didn’t want her to travel without him, maybe he should give her a reason to stay.
He stood up to lock his office up, when his cellphone rang.  The call was urgent, and it was regarding the project he was neck deep in dealing with.  As he answered his phone, he promised himself, that this was the last project that consumed him and kept him from what he wanted, and that was to get to know Calista more and possibly fall in love, if he wasn’t already.
Everything heals.  Your heart heals, your mind heals, your body heals, wounds heal.  Repairing is a reminder that bad times don’t last, and happiness will be back.
Chapter Thirteen
She remembered who she was, and the game changed.
“Hello, Mrs. Forest?  This is Calista Miller from the Hide Out Cafe.  Did I catch you at a bad time?”  Calista offered up as her plan formed in her head, while her fingers scribbled out, pen to paper, the list of people she was going to invite over for a last-minute impromptu holiday gathering.  Christmas was in a few days.  Over five people told her they had nowhere to spend the holidays with other people.  Milly’s plans to go to her sisters in Oklahoma got cancelled when a last-minute surgery had to be scheduled.  Ben her baker had no family.  Sally was feeling lonely after Jimmy got hauled off to jail, and all her loser friends blamed her.  Then, when the Forest boys had stopped off to help her set up her new ten-foot pre-lit Christmas tree a week ago, they mentioned that their mom and dad had split up, and she had not even gotten the tree up at the house.  Larry mentioned he would be alone for the holidays, and then there was Remi’s comment about no family in Darling, and now with no boyfriend, the holiday would be quiet.  This was Calista’s chance to bring together friends to make a fun celebration.  This is what she did and loved doing it.
“Yes!  Hi, Calista.  The boys told me about your tree.  I’ve been kind of procrastinating, but busy, you know.”  Mrs. Forest answered up.
“Yes!  I know!  Holidays are crazy, but I love a good crazy.  Listen, the reason I am calling, is, well, this is my first Christmas without family.  I decided to throw a small Christmas potluck at my place.  On the twenty third.  Just a few of my new friends.  I would love it if you and the boys could come?”  Calista offered up with an opportunistic voice.
“Oh, I don’t know.  With things so crazy?”  Mrs. Forest hesitated.
“I really don’t want no for an answer.”  Calista chimed up jokingly.  “No pressure though.  Six o’clock on the twenty third.  Bring a dish if you wish.  It would be nice to have some sort of celebration this year, seeing as it’s a new year for me.”
“Well, can I get back to you?”  She offered.
“Absolutely.”  Calista responded as she put them down as a yes on her guest list as her boys already told her they would drag their mom there if they had to.  
With the next meeting tonight for the book club, Calista was certain that more questions about her life were going to be asked.  She had written down and memorized passive answers, while working on putting the gift baskets together that were up for auction.  Several stores had donated items, she told them she would include their business cards, along with a short story card about how the gift baskets sold, solely benefitting the Holly Street Clinic’s new day shelter. 
A little over a month ago, an anonymous donor stepped up and bought the empty building next door to the Holly Clinic.  They pulled permits and were working on construction, all the while the day shelter for the women was still open.  Nobody seemed to know who or what was doing this huge charitable thing, but Calista was just glad that come the new year, the place would be operational.  The money made from the auctioned baskets would then buy holidays gifts that the new director Sherry Walters would purchase tomorrow.  Short notice, but Calista was certain they would at least raise two thousand dollars by the end of tonight.  Sherry Walters was another newcomer to Darling that Calista realized that she had to ask if she had a place to celebrate the holidays.
By the time the meeting was underway, Calista already had her brain spinning with what types of food she wanted to serve, little gifts to wrap up for her guests, maybe a party game, or a holiday movie.  All of that stopped when her phone dinged with a text from Blake while his sister Jenny was sitting in her wheelchair, in front of everyone, auctioning off the baskets.
His text simple read, ‘thanks’.
She texted back while she felt her heart warm and her smile spread across her face as she typed back.  “For what?  I hope this is a nice thanks and not a snarky you did it again blondie text.”
“Nice thanks.”  Her phone dinged and little bubbles showed he was still texting, so she waited.
“I liked how your blue felt in my fingers, blondie.”  He texted again.
She paused and took a deep breath which caught Sally’s attention looking over her shoulder.  Calista quickly held her cellphone to her chest against her burgundy cashmere sweater.
“Who made you smile?”  Sally asked.
“Nobody.”  Calista whispered back and then decided to sneak off to her office to finish this texting thing with a phone call.  “Hold my seat, I’ll be right back.”
The moment she sat in her office wooden desk chair, her brown leather heeled boots up on her desk, leaning back in her seat with her dark denim jeans crossed at the ankle, she heard his voice answer his phone and her heart felt a pinch of anxiety and nervousness like a school girl.
“Calista?”  He drew her name out like he was stroking her skin.
“Blake…”  She breathed out his name like he was already in her.  She smiled and thought how she ached for his touch when he walked away from her the other day, but she knew, he had to be the one to reach out to her.
“How’s the auction going?”  He asked casually, flirtatious tone sliding away.
“Great.”  She replied quickly, wondering is this a friendly call, a late-night bootie call, as it was eight o’clock, or a simple how’s my sister handling the auction with Jackie.  So, she informed him.  “Your sister and Jackie are quite the team.  Very impressed on how they are taking bids from the women in the room and selling baskets online to other’s that could not make it.  There will be a few Uber rides home, not to mention, a few walked here when they came in with a bottle of wine or two.  I think my book club social meetings are evolving into something else altogether.”  She laughed.
“Sometimes things need to evolve, in order to be great.”  A tone of seriousness was in his voice.
“Did you buy a basket?”  She changed the subject.
“I did.  Two actually.  One for Jackie, and one for my sister.  They both sent me pics of the ones they liked.  You did a great job putting them together.  They look professional.”  He added casually.
“One of my many rare talents that has evolved over the years.”  She giggled as the last glass of wine seem to be starting a buzz.
“I think the few talents I’ve experienced with you have been pretty good.”  He teased.
He was flirting with her, a bit, but also just reaching out.  So maybe now would be the time to invite him to her friend’s potluck for Christmas.  But first, she must reciprocate the tease.  “You have talents that are quite pleasurable yourself.”
“I do?”  He asked fishing for a compliment.
“You do.  Jenny showed me your artwork.  The wood and metal sculptures you do.  The sign you made for Tully’s shop.  I finally made it by there.  I wouldn’t mind using you for the shops new sign now that the old one I ordered isn’t fitting for the name, I decided to officially drop the Dioltas out of the name of the shop.”
He was quiet.  So, she questioned out.  “Blake?  You there?  Did I lose you?”  She looked at her cellphone to see if she lost the signal.  As she did, she heard his faint voice answer her.  
“I’m here.”
“Phew.  I thought my cellphone dropped our call.”  She laughed.
She heard a deep breath in and then breathed out.  “I just got a text.  I need to go.”  He made the excuse.  She could hear it in his voice.
“Okay.  Well, on the twenty third, I am having a small Christmas potluck for a few of my new friends that don’t have a place to be on Christmas.  You are welcome to come.  Not that you don’t have a place to be, or a family to be with, but my son can’t make it and well, I would love it if you came.”  She blurted out fast before he hung up.
“I’ve got a lot going on right now.  I’m going to have to pass.”  He sounded regretful, but she realized this push pull, tease me and leave me, act was starting to wear on her heart.
“Oh.”  She sounded out softly as she set her feet back on the floor and stood up from her desk chair.  The sound of laughter coming from the front room pulled her back to reality.  Tonight, was about raising money for a great cause, being around other likeminded women and if the one man she could not seem to get off her brain did not know which direction this, whatever it is, was going, she needed to just let it go for now.  Keeping busy had gotten her through tougher times, the holidays were not going to suck with a few friends and a whole lot of keeping busy.
“I’m sorry.”  He offered.  “I’m just really busy right now.  Listen.  I just wanted to call and say thanks.”
She could just bet he was busy.  Playing property manager, single man playing the field around town, building a small fortune with his sister’s inheritance, she could just bet.  Her jealous envious voice was building in her head when her hand slapped the desk to remind her to stop it.
“What was that?”  He sounded concerned.
“Sorry.  That was my hand.  Something slippery on the floor in my office.  I almost slipped and fell in my boots.  My hand hit the desk.  Listen.  You’re welcome.”  She tried to sound as genuine as she could while her heart screamed at her head.  This man is going to break you, worse than Clay and Stephanie ever did.  You need to just get away.
“Good night, Calista.”  He said her name with sorrow and then hung up before she could even say goodbye.  She let out a deep cleansing breath and realized, she was in dire need of a change.
Calista made it back to the meeting, made it through the night with a huge smile on her face as she drank a few more glasses of wine.  The moment she locked up the café, knowing that Sally was going to open in the morning with Ben, and their new full time assistant that Sally found, a young man who wanted to learn the café business, Clark; since the gal from yoga class did not work out.  The three of them could open, and she would do what she did best which was running errands, paying bills, bookkeeping and trying to get her heart back on track.  Her last check to her retirement plan showed the stock market had a stellar year, she was ahead of schedule for retirement.  She wondered if she really even needed to work here, well, other than the basics.  It was not like back in Utah where she gave it sixty plus hours a week.  Here, just like the slower pace of Darling, she was figuring out quickly, that twenty hours a week was plenty.  It was time to devise a plan.
With the back door to the shop closed, Calista had her brown heeled boots in hand.  Her slip-on black safety shoes on her feet as she climbed the metal stairs covered in snow.  She glanced at the motorcycle under the metal stairs parked and thought about climbing on and going for a drive, which was completely stupid.  Two more inches of snow was expected, and she had a buzz going.  Driving drunk was not her style.  It was just the idea of taking off, running from her dilemma with Blake, and just letting her mind erase as the road unfolded in front of her that gave her the brief moment of insanity – driving a motorcycle in the snow.
She opened her apartment door and locked it behind her.  Then she convinced herself that she just needed to take a bath, drink a hot tea, read a book and fall asleep.  That was her plan.  Instead, she texted Clay.  She knew it was a mistake, as Cole swore, he did not have her cellphone number, but she had something she needed to say.
“You win.  I moved on just as I see you are making new plans with Stephanie.  I don’t know if she had anything to do with my stolen truck, but please ask her to move on as well.  I’ll stop if you two stop all this nonsense.”  She hit send and thought what the hell am I doing?
Her phone dinged ten minutes later.  “Calista?  Is this your cellphone number?”
“Yes.”  She texted back.
He did not reply.  Shit, she thought to herself.  Stephanie probably saw the text and answered his phone.  Now the evil temptress will have her cellphone number to do what?  After waiting fifteen minutes for a reply, Calista realized, it did not matter.  If she had to change her cellphone again, she would.  If Stephanie wanted to waste her time, energy and money on revenge, she would handle it.  For now, she just wanted to make some kind of amends with those from her past.  But talking to them did not seem like a way to do it.
She took a deep breath, turned on some soft music in her apartment through her phone.  She hit the Keurig machine to warm water to make a cup of hot tea.  While that was warming, she went into her bathroom, turned on the light, started up the bathwater to warm, lit a few candles, and then turned the bathroom light off.  By the time her tea was in hand, her body was naked, she was standing in front of her bathtub and a few tears fell down her face.  This was a temporary setback.  The holiday blues, she knew all too well when she lost her mother five years ago about this time.  It was time to just let herself feel the warmth of the bath surround her body.  There was nothing she could do about Cole, Clay, or Stephanie.  Cole, she would see this summer for sure, he promised her.  Clay and Stephanie getting married, well, may the priest that marries them, curse them as well.  She took a sip of tea and then set it down on the small table next to the bath.  It was still too hot to drink.
The moment the warm water stroked her body, she thought of Blake.  He was a temporary rebound that was starting to feel like so much more.  She had never really been alone, and it felt scary at times.  But tonight, she wondered, was he really too busy?  He reached out to her but then took a pair of imaginary scissors and cut the cord.
Just as she put her head under water for a second, letting the warm water soothe her heartache and her headache in a swoosh of water, she heard her cellphone ding underwater.  When she finally made it back up, there was a reply from Clay.  “It’s time.”
Time for what she thought.  So, she texted back.  “Clay?”  When nothing came back within a few minutes, she realized that Stephanie being Stephanie, was probably toying with her.  She would just get a new cellphone number tomorrow and chalk this up as a huge tipsy too much wine drinking mistake.
On the morning of the twenty third the time flew by and Calista began to realize that all good things come to those who are patient, and time flies by when you are crazy busy.  Calista had found ways to keep her mind and her body busy.  She had a few last-minute preparations for tonight’s friend’s potluck Christmas celebration.  She had not heard from Blake, other than briefly running into each other around town.  He looked a bit haggard and acted as if he was being rushed by this top-secret project, he was engrossed in.  She had kept the banter light and even mentioned tonight’s celebration again, which the last time she mentioned it, he smiled and told her if he got a few things done early he might be able to swing by.
Her entire day was spent checking things off her list in preparation for the evening.  The moment her first guest Remi arrived she felt the party spirit rise in her soul.  This was something she had always pulled off quite well, a holiday party.  Tonight, it was about keeping company with those she was just getting to know and celebrating the holiday spirit.
Milly was the second to arrive, and then she was followed by Sally and the new hire Clark.  Ben called to say he wasn’t feeling well, but Mrs. Forest showed with her boys.  The liquor store owner, Mark, down the street from her café, who she just met today, showed up with a few more bottles of holiday alcohol.  Larry showed up with his sister.  The last of the expected was Jackie and her new boyfriend Conner.  She had invited Jenny and Tully but they both said they could not make it this year, leaning on the note that this would be a yearly thing for Calista, which perhaps it might be.
The first hour swept by with plenty of eating and drinking.  Calista had started to almost forget about wanting Blake to come, but she was happy that tonight seemed to be making her forget about the strange text from Clay or perhaps it was Stephanie, forget about Cole not being able to come, and forget that her heart attached itself to a man that was not sure of what he wanted.
Blake found the last two weeks to be excruciatingly busy.  This new project he took on with a short time frame, had him remembering what it was like to work a real building project.  It was one thing to renovate one of his own buildings, it was another to have several high-ranking donors involved, all with opinions on how things should be built, with constant changes.
Every time Blake saw Calista around town or tried to see her when he knew she was in her coffee shop, he felt that pull of attraction, sexual or otherwise, that told him, he needed to act on his feelings before some other man around town decided she was an incredible catch.  He had heard she had been asked out on a few dates, all to be turned down, which made him wonder on her interest in him.  Jackie and Jenny had been trying to convince him that Calista was worth the chance to see where things went.  Then after reading the article on her, he felt his heart pinch with feelings he had not had since his ex-fiancé.
With much relentlessness from Jackie that he had to stop by to Calista’s celebration, late or not late, he realized that being an hour late was rude, but once he could tell her what he was up to, she might understand.  The moment he opened the door to everyone at her place, to the roar of laughter and holiday music, he felt lulled inside.  It only took Calista less than ten seconds to realize he had walked in the door.  He felt the warmth of her small hand grab his cold one as she pulled him inside further into her apartment.  She let go of his hand just as she laid a quick peck on his lips.
“Let me take your coat.  Food’s hot and delicious.  What can I get you to drink?”  She offered up with a look on her face of utter happiness.  He liked that look.  He had seen something quite similar on her face, but it was after an orgasm.  Tonight, it was a different kind of happy he observed.  It was as if she was in her element and no one could bring her down.  Just looking at her smile, warmed his insides, and made him realize that perhaps, all of his rush-rush my private business is too important, really wasn’t that important at all.  Maybe he could have carved some time aside for her, at least reassure her that once this project was done, and the donors made the announcement to the town, that then he could talk about everything he was currently a part of.
“Blake?”  Calista smiled as she waved a hand in front of him.  “I think I lost you there.”  She joked.  Which she had as he had been staring at her, thinking of all the intimate times between them, swirled up with all the times his pigheaded I’m not ready for a relationship, I don’t mix business with pleasure, cost him his own loss of intimacy between them.  What they had experienced, had been so incredible, that he realized they may have not met on normal dating terms, and they certainly had a lot to learn about each other, but tonight he wanted to somehow make that up to her.
Blake grabbed Calista’s hand, pulled her close to him and leaned down to whisper into her ear.  “I want you tonight.”
As she pulled back with a blushing to her face and subtle laughter to her voice to try and hide what he just said; she answered that with a wink and then joked loud enough to dismiss his whisper as nothing anyone should concern themselves with.  “Well then, cowboy, let me take your coat and make you a drink.  Jack and Coke?”
“That sounds nice.”  His lips curled upwards as his eyes darted around the room to see who all came to this festivity that had created such a holiday happiness on his Calista’s face.  It took only moments to notice that he realized, she was a woman moving on with her life, making new friends from all over town and she was not going to be held back by two ex’s that made her life a mess.  He only had one ex, and that one moved on fast, while he still held his heart out of reach from any woman, particularly any woman that he did business with.  It was in this holiday moment that he truly realized how pig headed he had been about Calista and his own life, that if he did not do something to assure her soon, that he might lose her to someone else in town that was interested in her, which was plenty of men by what his sister had told him.
When the party wound down, and Blake was the second to last there, Calista convinced Milly that a cab needed to take her home.  The old gal had just too much to drink.  Waiting on the cab with just the three of them in the room was excruciating, knowing all night Blake had whispered into her ear, sexual temptations and then went about socializing at the party like he had never said a word to her about what he was going to do the second he had her naked.
To keep busy, Calista made sure things were as cleaned up as they needed to be, while Blake sat on her couch, looking at her as if he was already peeling her clothes off one slow inch at a time.
The second Milly was safely in the cab and on her way, Calista wiped her hands on her holiday dish towel and then draped it over the oven handle.  She turned to Blake who was already standing by the door after walking Milly down the stairs.  She took a step towards him and the second she was within arm’s reach, he pulled her into him, wrapped her up in his arms, running his fingers through her hair as he held her face up to him, his lips dropped to hers, their mouths opened, their tongues twisted, their breathing wavered in long and short heavy breaths.  This was a moment of no turning back for both of them this time.
Within a short time, their bodies remembered each other, craved each other, and Blake had every intention of making Calista smile again tonight like the night he had her at his home.
He slowed his kiss to a soft slow kiss and then pulled away as he had her backed against a wall, one arm over her head, his eyes looking down into hers, their breathing slowed to a break in the storm of lust as he started whispering, “be patient with me, that’s all I can ask right now.  I know you’ve been through so much and I don’t have the right to ask, but I think if you just give me some time…”  his voice trailed off as his lips dropped to her mouth again.  His body pressed against hers, with them completely dressed, it felt like a wall between them, just as those words he spoke made her realize, he needed to be slowly led to the fact that things between them were something.  
What that something was?  She could only guess it was the beginning of an incredible relationship.  Lord knows, the sex between them was better than she ever had.  It was herself that thought she would not be able to let a man in, at least not this soon, but it was him, who was still hurt, still not trusting, and perhaps, so many other things going on in his life, playing dad to his nephews, helping Jackie and his sister that he felt bad if he took time for himself, to let himself feel something for another woman might take away from all his responsibilities.  Then there was this building project Jackie said he was not allowed to discuss until some announcement.  His kiss began to erase all these complicated thoughts from her mind, but they were still dressed and that told her that he might be having some complicated thinking of his own.
The moment the kiss softened; Calista pulled her lips away.  “Blake?”  She whispered as she looked up into his softened eyes.  “Take me to my room.”
With his hand guiding her to her bedroom, that had been curtained closed to keep the guest to the main part of the loft, he did not look at her, but straight ahead.  The second he stopped in front of her heavily draped bedroom, he let go of her hand and looked at her while starting to open a section of curtains aside.
She stopped right next to him and looked up at him.  “Stay the night.  I’ll be patient, I just want you as my Christmas gift tonight.”
Blake smiled with a curve to his lips and then slowly began to undress himself as Calista closed the bedroom curtains behind them.  The soft led candles already lit in her room provided a soft glow along with a small room diffuser of holiday mix smell.  Her dark red cashmere wrap sweater quickly came off her shoulders, dropping to the floor, as she looked up into his eyes.  They were almost completely naked but the air between them warmed as his eyes ran over her body, wanting to take her in visually as she stood before him in only a dark red bra and panty set, all lace, all sexy and the heels she had on made him want to take her that second, yet he waited.
Calista saw the hard cock pressed up inside of his underwear.  She slowly knelt before him as her hands gently guided his underwear to the ground.  The moment she knelt down, looking up, his cock wrapped in her hand, and her mouth about to take him, she wanted to please her man until he could want nothing more than just her, all the time.
The heavy breathing and moans from his mouth as his hand gently rested on the side of her head, was reassurance of his pleasure.  Yet, he did not leave her on her knees for long.  
Within seconds he had her wrapped up in his arms, kissing her tenderly as he guided her to her bed.  The moment he had her on her back on her bed with her hair spread out like a halo all around her head, he took her foot with her red strapped heel and kissed the inside of her ankle.  He let his mouth trail kisses all the way down her leg until he started gently kiss her red lace panties.
“Blake?”  She moaned with a questionable teasing note.  He was taking his time, slowly kissing every inch of her, his mouth wandering up her stomach to her red lace bra where he let his tongue dance over her nipple poking at the lace.
She took a stuttering breath of anticipation as his fingers pushed the lace aside on one of her boobs and he began to suck on her nipple.  She liked slow and easy, but not after being teased and whispered to all night about what it was that he was going to do to her.  She wanted him in her now and the slow easy kissing could happen right before they make love a second time.
Her nails scratched along his back as she pleaded.  “Fuck me now Blake.  I want you.  I need you in me.”
He pulled his body back and up while looking down into her blue eyes as he watched a look of wanting and pleading for him.  He would never get tired of that look, the way she displayed in wanting him.  Tonight, it was about confirming to him about how good it felt before, so maybe he could just move forward and ask her to marry him.  He knew that was what was going to come next, not tonight, but soon, because what electrical thing that drew him to her, it wasn’t going away, only growing stronger.  His obligations be damned come new year, but for now, he did what any responsible man would do, he rolled on a condom from his pocket as Calista shimmied out her bra and panties.  
By the time her heels dropped to the floor, Blake was already gently spreading her legs apart for him to position his body.  Nothing felt sweeter than the moment his cock entered her tightness, her legs wrapped around him as her hips raised a bit for him to push in deeper.  Her fingers pressed into his back as her words filled his ears with pleasure.  “I want you Blake.  I want all of you.  You feel so good.  So right.”  He couldn’t agree more as he stroked in and out of her.
It was the moment his sated body collapsed against hers as their orgasms synched within seconds that he heard her say words that scared him.  “Every time you do this to me, I fall more in love with you.”
He wanted to say it, but he hesitated.  He wanted to say I love you.  It was so easily rolling out of his mind, but his tongue stopped.  It wasn’t until she was sitting up on her elbows looking over his sated body and kissing his chest, his neck and then his lips that he let himself say it.  “I think I’m falling in love with you Calista.”  In those words, she kissed him passionately letting her tongue deep into his mouth.  The second she pulled away, he made himself add the words he could tell caused her to feel a bit distant.  “Just be patient with me.  Just be patient.”
As her naked body cuddled up next to his, he finally heard her respond.  “I can do that Blake.  For you, I can do that.  Just don’t break my heart.”
“I won’t.”  He rushed out.  And he knew he wouldn’t because he knew how it felt to be hurt so bad and he could not do that to her.  But he still needed time.  Time to finish this project uninterrupted, time to figure out how she would be a permanent part of his life and time to figure out if things did not work out, what he might do to protect his heart.
As they parted ways that night, the cold night air surrounded them as a heated kiss between them begged them both to stay the night together, however Blake insisted he could not.  His words of I have a lot going on right now, please be patient with me, replayed over and over in her mind.  Those words told her that maybe he wasn’t ready for a relationship.  She now had a full understanding that the stranger at the bar she fell for, was still working through his own heartache as well.
It takes both sides to build a bridge.
Chapter Fourteen
Waking up next to you makes up for all the anticipation I had to go through.
“Merry Christmas Mom.”  Cole made her heart melt as she answered his phone call.
“It’s not Christmas yet.”  Calista teased.  “But Merry Christmas to you too.  Did you get my packages at your fathers?  There was ten of them.  I want pictures to make sure Stephanie didn’t switch out packages.”  She teased with a sense of seriousness.
“Dad made sure.  He was home when the packages arrived and placed under the tree. But I’ll send you pictures anyways.  We’re not opening them until tomorrow.  Because…”  His voice trailed off with sadness before adding.  “Maybe it would have been better for me to fly out there even if it was just for a day.  Today has been hard mom.  Harder than I could ever imagine.  I don’t know what the fuck dad is thinking.  Stephanie’s a bitch and I don’t think I want to even be here tomorrow to open gifts, just the three of us, like a family, a family I don’t want or like and this was stupid.  The whole day was stupid.  Rushing here and there, pretending like this or that, when really, dad looks agitated.  I think he’s made his biggest mistake ever mom.  I think him marrying Stephanie on Christmas Eve was like the worst thing ever that a dad could do.  It sucks.”
Calista pulled in a deep breath and held it through all his cussing and frustration.  She was not alarmed nor surprised since she got word on Facebook about the wedding bliss fun.  But listening to her son speak such harsh words and frustration, she had to wonder was he saying all this to make her feel better or was he truly miserable.  She spoke with slow sincerity.  She had so much she wanted to say, so much great advice, but her own pain of knowing that Clay and Stephanie picked the one holiday they always spent together as friends to now be married, felt like a knife to the heart.  “I’m sorry Cole.  Try not to take it personable.  One day your holidays will be about you and your new family, new wife, kids even, and all of this will just be a memory.”
“At least tell me that you friends party went well.”  He asked.
Calista remembered every single moment, from the start to the end where Blake admitted he loved her too, but she didn’t go into all of that.  Cole would have lost interest half way through.  “It was spectacular.  I have made some great friends.  I even have a guy I’m kind of dating.  So, your old mom is doing just fine.  I was sad to not be with you but we both originally thought you’d be in Europe still, not enrolling early in school.  Try not to let this get to you.  I got you some great stuff off your list you gave me.  And a few surprise gifts I think you will really like.”  She teased out.
“Did you get me the new PlayStation…”  He rambled on with questions about what she might have gotten him.  Instead of saying yes, I got that or no I did not, she laughed. 
By the time she hung up with Cole, she was restless.  Last night had gone well.  Everyone seemed to be having a wonderful celebration, but it was midnight on Christmas Eve, and Cole’s news made her feel melancholy.  
She looked at her Christmas decorations around her apartment.  Her place could easily had been photographed for an interior design magazine.  This she could do well.  However, a lot of other things in her life were not going as planned.  She wondered if the choices she made were now catching up to her.
Wanting a cup of spiced coffee, she realized she ran out last night and threw on her warm black sorrel boots over her thick black socks.  Her black leggings had a little bit of tissue lent from the ones she used to wipe her eyes after a few silent tears fell while talking to Cole.  The snow was lightly falling so she grabbed her blue ski parka and zipped it up over her dark blue turtleneck she had on.  The light blue knit hat with a pom pom on top that Milly knitted her matched her jacket perfectly.  She slipped it on over her head and stuffed her fingers into a pair of warm black mittens.  She figured she might take a walk outside along the closed-up shops, while drinking her coffee, and enjoying the quietness of the late evening her life was providing her.
Calista walked out the front door of her shop, spiced hot coffee in a to go cup in hand, and carefully double checked that she locked it behind her.  Just a walk up and down the street, she told herself.  
As she begins to walk in the snow, making small footprints from her snow boots on the snow dusted sidewalk, she felt herself turn to go a certain direction first.  It had been less than twenty-four hours, but she missed him.  He was probably at Jenny’s helping her get things ready for tomorrow at her house, but all the same, she wandered that way towards his office just several doors down from her coffee shop.
The moment, she reached Blake’s shopfront, she saw the lights on in back and wondered if he was there.  She had never actually gone inside but thought of it more as a sacred place for him.  The door was locked so without thinking her right hand that wasn’t holding the hot coffee reached up and knocked hard on the shop glass.  Not thinking really, just wondering, was he there?
The moment Blake walked out, looking exhausted and unruly with his flannel shirt open to a white tee shirt, his blue jeans looking like they needed a wash as something dusty was on him, she thought he must still be working on his ‘project’ he was so secretive about.  Yet his look of embarrassment mixed with shock that Calista was at his window, something she had never done before, brought her concern as an older woman she had seen him with before out on the street came walking out from the back lit room as well.  His look of awkwardness caused Calista to feign a smile and turn to walk the opposite direction away from his shop.
Blake felt frustrated.  He needed to explain but didn’t want to frustrate Calista.  They had texted on and off all day, but he saw the look on her face.  His fingers trembled as he typed.  “It’s not what you think.”  
Calista didn’t reply back.  
Blake dialed her number and excused himself from the chair fundraiser for his project to explain what she saw.  Her phone went to voice mail as his hurried voice barreled out.  “Calista, honey, it’s not what you think, that is if you are thinking anything.  This is work.  This lady is here to finalize, oh shit.  Just call me when you get this.  I don’t want you mad or hurt.  I would have introduced you to her.  It’s been a long day and I am exhausted and have regretted almost every minute I have wasted on this project instead of being with you.
Calista had turned her cellphone off after his text.  Her heart was feeling heavy.  Coles news, albeit something she knew, still weighed on her heart as her son was the one so affected by it all.  Which she should be feeling great, because the news was not making her sad, however, she had an evil thought about what could go wrong for the holidays for Clay and Stephanie.  As for Blake, obviously had plans on his Christmas Eve with someone else.  Just like her hair, she was feeling blue.  She turned the corner at the end of the street.  She let the snow fall on her as the silence of the night felt soothing yet, encumbering.  The moment she reached the bottom of her stairs to her place, she stopped.  Instead of going back up to her apartment loft, she got in her SUV and decided to just go for a late-night Christmas Eve drive.
It had been a while since she just drove around some of the neighborhoods in Darling.  She did it a few times when she first arrived to get her bearings, and to understand the demographics of the town in comparison to her shop.  GPS is a wonderful tool, but sometimes, getting lost and finding one’s way home without it can have a strange empowerment.
She noticed several homes still had their Christmas lights on at the late hour.  The drive of colorful lights, mixed with the sound of Christmas music playing inside her car, she realized a few tears were trailing down her cheeks.  With a quick wipe of her fingertips she realized her feelings were a mix of relief and sadness.  Thinking about Clay marrying Stephanie so soon after the divorce made her sad, even more so sad for Cole as the timing was crappy.  He made it clear that he was going with the flow on this but he struggled with the divorce all the same.  Then there was Blake.  She wanted him, friend and lover, but she did not want to push.  She knew that waking up tomorrow on her own would be tough.  But she also knew the decision she made to put all revenge aside, make amends and move forward, was her new way of thinking.
By the time Calista made it back to her alleyway to park, she noticed Blake’s truck was parked in her spot.  She saw his face being illuminated by his cellphone as he was looking into it and typing something.  Just as she parked behind him with her headlights already off, she turned her cellphone on to several dings.  It was Blake.  “I’ve got a gift for you.”  His last text read.
She looked into her cellphone, squinted her eyes at disbelief and then turned her car off, shoved her cellphone into her shoulder bag and got out of her car at the exact same time as Blake got out of his truck.
“Merry Christmas.”  His thick deep voice filled the air with a cherry note.  He walked around to the back of his truck and unlocked the truck cover and rolled it back.
Calista walked towards him in disbelief.  It was one am in the morning and he was at her place bringing her a gift, that meant something.  “Merry Christmas yourself.  Sorry, I turned my cell off.  I had some thinking to do.  It has been a strange evening of conflicted feelings.”  She responded slowly as she looked inside his truck.  In the bed of his truck was a very detailed wooden sign with the name Hide Out Café in metal iron scripted type.  It was custom made, obviously, but was this what he had been working on that had him so busy he couldn’t spend time with her, she quizzed internally.
She looked at the sign, and then looked at him with her body sideways to him and her head facing over her shoulder in his direction.  “It’s gorgeous.  It’s perfect.”  She cooed as her knitted gloves came off and her fingers touched the sign.
“Do you like it?”
Her eyebrows raised as her eyes opened wide.  She touched the detailed wood sign again that was at least two feet high and six feet long.  It was gorgeous.  “I love it.”  She finally replied.
“Phew.”  He joked with a word she was known for using often around the café and in town; he used his hand pretending that he was wiping sweat off his forehead.
“But why?”  She turned to him and looked with an expectation of an honest answer.
“Why?  I honestly wanted you to have something special for your shop sign after I found out you decided to not make it officially the revenge café.  Jenny and Jackie told me that you admitted to the ladies at the social meeting that you wanted the café to be more of a place where folks come to take a break, old and young.”
She took a step towards him and stopped.  “But, the only other sign you made for anyone in town, was…”  She stopped herself from saying the name of his ex-fiancé.
“I know.  But you’re different.  We were friends first.”
“Is that what we are Blake?  Friends?”
“I don’t know.  I thought so.”  He offered.
She lightly laughed as the snow falling was getting thicker, filling her blue hat and his hair with white sticky flakes.  “Well, in all actuality, we were a heated mess the first night we met, but yes, friends for sure.  I would love to spend time and see where we can take this.  I’m extremely attracted to you.”  She offered up with confidence that even if he shot her down tonight, she would have let him know her true feelings.
“I want more.”  He spoke up as his steps put him directly in front of her, his lips found hers as his hands tangled up into her hair.  The moment their kiss parted, he added.  “I wanted more from you the moment I realized you weren’t in Utah, but in my Kansas.”
She laughed lightly.  “Me too.  Let’s get this sign into the shop.  Then do you have time to come upstairs for a hot tea?”
Something hotter than tea will be served this Christmas Eve night.
Chapter Fifteen
By the stroke of midnight, as the bell tolls twelve, I promise you a new year that is magical.
Calista had spent have the latter part of the day getting her hair and nails done to match the navy-blue dress from Tully’s.  The nights weather was cooperating as much as it could for New Years Eve in Darling Kansas, but it was cold out; which is why the last-minute arrival from Tully’s shop was well received.  A off white winter coat with navy trim for her to wear over her dress until she got into the heated ranch barn where the festivities would take place.  Blake was taking her to the event that was the talk of the town, by invitee only, Culver Ranch New Year’s Eve Ball.
Now, just a year ago, Calista would have laughed heartily at someone who suggested that she, of all people, would be going to a ball, in a barn, in Kansas; yet here she was getting ready to do just that.
With a bit of in trepidation that the only other person that was invited to this that she knew, besides Blake, was Jenny.  It was a family tradition along with several other well to do people in town and the surrounding area.  Jenny had reassured her that it wasn’t as all fancy as she thought, but high heels or fancy cowgirl boots, wear your best to impress was the motto.
Standing in her dressing room, trying to decide which purse to take, the sound of Blake calling her name from below the loft brought a flutter to her stomach.
“I’ll be down in a second.”  She called out from the dressing room.
“Take your time.  I hate being the first ones there and there is at least an hour and half before the awards ceremony.  It’s your choice if you want to stay after that.”  He resounded out as if he was yelling out to her, but she could hear him just fine in the dressing room.
She did a once over in the mirror and smiled at herself.  She looked incredible and she knew it was part the dress and the other part all the orgasms she had in the last few days from Blake.  It was as if since Christmas Eve, he found a way to be inseparable from her even if he had work to finish up on the new women’s shelter addition project.  His super quiet can’t tell anyone project came pouring out as he felt he had to explain himself that night.  While her own emotions came crying out over her ex’s getting married.  That night was a turning point for both of them and she thanked God for that.
As she started to sashay down the stairs of the loft to the main living area, the look on Blakes face as he turned to face her, told her she had done herself up right.  Her hair was swept up in an updo, thanks to Remi, and her dress made her feel like a movie star.
“You sure know how to make a guy want to strip you naked and not take you out in public.”  He teased.
She winked at him as she walked off the last step and began to walk towards him in a sultry fashion.  “And you sure clean up nice cowboy.”  She wrapped her arms around him all dressed up in a semi-formal black tux, and leaned in for a soft sensual kiss, not wanting to mess up her lipstick and then pulled away.
“And yes, to answer you from earlier, I want to stay until midnight.  Leaving any earlier on New Year’s Eve is wrong.”  She turned from his arms and reached for her off white winter coat from Tully, holding it out for him to help her slip into it.  As soon as he did, she looked down at her feet.
“Darn.  I have to switch out to my winter boots to go down the back stairs.  No matter, I packed an overnight bag by the door.”  She slipped her feet out of her silver strapped heels and handed them to him.  “Would you be a darling and put those in my bag?”
“I can and I can even promise you one thing better.”  He walked her shoes over to her bag, put the heels inside as she asked.
“What’s that?”  She slipped her feet into her snow boots that did not make her outfit sexy but was a necessity if she was going to make it safely down those outside snow-covered steps.
“I can offer to put the original inside door back in that goes from the living room to a hallway between buildings and out to the front sidewalk.”  He beamed proudly, knowing full well after their first night together at his ranch, he wanted to do that for her, but got sidetracked with the women’s shelter project.
“Why Blake…”  Calista teased as she gave him a coy look.  “That might make me think you want something in return.”
He lifted her overnight bag onto his shoulder, thinking to himself, he loved the feeling of knowing she wanted to go back to his place for the long weekend like they talked about over Christmas Day.  He imagined an entire weekend of naked intertwined bodies sweaty and sated before teasing back.  “I only want to see you smile like you do after, you know.”
She opened her back door out to the alleyway as she casually added.  “That I can do.”
By the time they arrived at the party, and got out of the truck so the valet service that the ranch hired to park cars and trucks out in the fields of snow and muck, Calista was ready for the midnight bell to ring twelve.  The entire half hour drive to the Culver’s Ranch was nothing but sexual teasing, rising the tension between them to a degree of way past hot passion.  Yet, somehow the blast of cold air as they climbed out of his truck, and the humming of conversations coming from within the heated barn enticed Calista to realize this was their first official out in public date.  She took a deep breath in and turned to look at Blake as he grabbed her hands with an excited expression on his face.
“Shall we?”  His head nodded towards the large barn doors that had a smaller tent in front of the doors with blasting heaters to help keep the cold air out of the barn.  
Calista looked around and noticed that this was the type of party one only threw on a expensive budget, unlike her small friend get togethers she always loved to throw.  She could only imagine the type of money that was floating around in the barn this evening.  She observed the decorated barn which looked like a rural wedding might take place inside as yards and yards of tulle were draped everywhere, a crystal ball hung in the middle of the room with lighting to cast shimmers everywhere.  Strings of lights illuminated the ceiling and side walls while covered in white flowered vines.  The center of the room was a wood dance floor surrounded by several round tables well decorated for the evenings event.  One would not be able to tell it was a barn from the inside, but more of a rustic building.  She wondered if a furry animal had ever step foot in this barn or if it was strictly built for this type of event.
While taking it all in, Blakes hand squeezed hers, assuring her it that none of the frivolous thoughts running through her brain truly mattered at the moment.  What mattered most was the award that Blake was to receive in not only designing the new shelter but playing project manager to the construction of it all.  In finding that out, Calista forgave him for every dismissal moment since their first night together at his ranch, however Blake was having trouble forgiving himself for putting the project first, as he had mentioned everyday that they had been together since Christmas Eve.
As the first moments into the barn settled into Calista’s brain, she realized she was among those she could easily associate with.  Jenny was only moments behind them.  She arrived with an old family friend that was a few years older.  She was dressed in a dark red cashmere sweater with black dress pants.  The sparkling crystals in her dark brown hair was a nice touch from Remi.  Her wheelchair had a dark red fur throw on the backside of the seat, incase her legs got cold in the barn.  Within seconds, Jenny and Calista had an entire conversation going about her boys and Christmas day, while the men were discussing the Chiefs going to the Superbowl.
As Calista chatted so comfortably with Jenny, Blake kept tossing glances of endearment at her.  It all seemed like a fairytale for a moment, so she looked away for a second to catch her breath and in doing so she turned and stubbed her toe on Jenny’s wheel chair.  
“Oh my god, I am so sorry.”  Both Jenny and she exclaimed to each other in a breath and then began to laugh.
“Around me, you might want steel toed boots on.  I’ve been known to run over a toe or two.”  Jenny joked.
“It’s completely me.”  Calista leaned down to Jenny’s ear and whispered.  “I’ve been so nervous all day.  I don’t know why, and Blake keeps staring at me.”
Jenny cupped her hand and whispered into Calista’s ear.  “That’s because he finally realizes how much in love, he is with you.”  Then she grabbed Calista’s hand and squeezed it gently before letting it go.
Calista cupped her hand and whispered back.  “Perhaps that is why I am so nervous.  I fell in love with Blake before he could admit we are good together, but tonight something feels different.  It feels more real.  Like I’m in his life now and before we were just a secret.”
Jenny started to laugh heartedly before whispering back, trying to stifle her giddiness.  “Oh honey, I think everyone in this town knew you two were in love before you two did.  But I knew.  I’ve known since that first night you two met.  I mean to say, he mentioned that first night you two met shortly after he found out you rented the loft and I could tell; he had found someone to pique his interest.  And that is not an easy thing for anyone to do.”
Calista straightened up and let her hand touch Jenny’s shoulder before she felt Blake come beside her and practically lean himself into her.  Their hands intertwined and they both let out a sigh of appreciation for one another.  This felt right, Calista thought to herself as they turned to look at each other endearingly.
By the time they had champagne or beer glasses in everyone’s hands, along with plenty of appetizers handed their way by wait staff making their way around the heated barn, an event coordinator indicated by music and dimming lights that the awards part of the event was to begin.  Blake wasn’t the only one getting an award tonight, apparently, this was the night the local area awarded those for great achievements over the year.
The conversation stayed light and casual until the moment, Blake excused himself, to talk to the mayor.  Calista watched Blake join the mayor and the older woman she had seen him around town with join him at the podium with the mayor.  Just as Blake and the woman were being introduced, a strange voice whispered in her ear.  “Isn’t it just incredible what Blake did for the shelter?  I mean it was all Mrs. Worthington’s money, but Blake handled the plans, the crew, everything in such a short time.”
Calista turned away from the award ceremony as the mayor began talking in her Mae West type voice; the voice she remembered fondly from the hair salon day where the woman let her know their opinion.  She turned a bit to notice the strange man who whispered in her ear just as the mayor was handing the award to Blake while shaking his hand.  The stranger, an older man she never met before, but looked vaguely familiar smiled at her as his attention went back to Blake receiving the award.
Calista turned her full attention back to Blake as the sounds of clapping broke her thoughts from the man standing next to her back to Blake up on the stage looking her way.  They placed another handshake for the media before they both walked off stage with another vaguely familiar woman, the one she saw in his office Christmas Eve.  The moment the three of them headed towards her, Calista felt confident that the reason Blake had been avoiding her was well worth it, however she could only have wished he communicated better with her about it.  She smiled to herself knowing that at least they were working on that - their communication.
“Calista, I’d like you to meet Mrs. Worthington.  Dad, I’d like you to meet Calista.  Calista this is my dad Jake.”
Calista said hello to both and shook Mrs. Worthington’s hand and then turned to say hello to Blakes’ dad, the man with an older yet familiar face.  “Hello.”  She offered up as the older man took her hand and kissed it.
“Well hello to you too darling.”  He offered as a slight blush rose up on Calista’s cheeks.  There was no doubt where the charm came from in his family.
“Dad here, found Mrs. Worthington to come meet the needs of the clinic.  In the meantime, I guess they found each other.”  Blake announced with a bit of joking to his words.  Calista could only imagine the story behind all of this.  She had never had the chance to talk to him about his entire family, only the Jenny and Pete side.  There had been casual mention of their mother’s death over Christmas day but was quickly hushed in a vibe about we don’t talk about it much.  
“Well it’s a pleasure to meet you both.”  Calista offered up politely.  
It was in the next few moments, that unanswered questions began to be answered.  As Blake’s father spoke proudly of his son, his accomplishments and of Jenny’s ability to keep him in line while their dad was traveling about the country, meeting people.  Which brought Calista back to thinking about how sad Blake looked when she spoke about traveling abroad herself.  She had to wonder was Blake worried, back then, when she made the comment, that she would leave him to travel?  Which she did plan to still travel, but only now she was hoping he would travel with her.  She pocketed that thought for a later conversation, one for when they were more serious than now.  But as everyone talked and she included herself in all of their conversations so casually, she kept wondering, how serious were they?  Overnight bags and hot sultry sex every night was perfectly fine with her, but what about next month, next year, as things become more of a true relationship.  Blake interrupted her thoughts with the suggestion they take to the dance floor.
The moment their bodies were intertwined in a slow easy step back and forth to a love song under the dimmed lights, Calista was welcoming the reprieve from all the social banter.  “You should be very proud of yourself.”  She offered up into his right ear.
“It was something this town needed, but I could have done with a much better schedule and not so many cooks in the kitchen, if you get me drift.”  He talked softly into her ear.
“I completely understand that feeling.  I think that is why I always wanted to be my own boss.  Although I know sometimes, I annoy my employees at the Hide Out with demands, right now, it seems like everyone is getting along great.  So great that I don’t feel like I need to spend sixty hours a week or more like I did at my old coffee shop back in Utah.”
“Well, I only regret not telling you or at least finding time to spend with you.”  He whispered softly.
Calista let her lips find his for a soft reassuring kiss.  When she pulled back, she spoke honestly.  “One thing you will come to find out about me Blake, even after all this talk of me being the Revenge Queen of Darling, is I really do like to just move past things, move on, and plan for a better future.  I saw my error in the revenge department.  I’m ready for a future here, with you if it works out.”  She blew out a breath of air in fluttered anticipation.  She knew the feelings were there, growing, planning, but was he ready to move on.
Blake whispered into her ear.  “I want to spend the new year getting to know you, Calista?  Even if that means spending less time fishing and more time with you.”
“I like to fish.”  She teased.
“You do?”  He sounded excited.
“I do.  But yes, I think all business niceties aside, I want you for pleasure and I want to get to know this Blake you have been hiding from me the past month.  I had no idea that you were the man behind this.”  She questioned flirtatiously.
“I didn’t want anyone to know.  It’s like I get infatuated with something and I just have to fixate on it or keep busy; I like to keep myself occupied to keep me out of trouble.
“I can understand that.”  She thought of her two years of planning her divorce and move here.
“Do you?  Because, after the night I found out that you were my renter in my apartment and building shop, I kind of found it hard to not want to fixate on you.”
She laughed while thinking as they danced.  She had read all his signals as immature, when in reality he was working on getting over his own hardship.  They were two ships in the night that passed and lost course.
To mine own self be true, I would be lost without you.
Chapter Sixteen
Is it bliss when the rain stops and the sun shines? 
Can one person’s clarity bring happiness to another?  That was not something that Calista was really thinking about, not until a certain phone call ended in an unusual way.
Some of the coffee shop regulars had stayed past closing to discuss the Valentines benefit they were working on for the shelter.  Calista had run upstairs through her new connected doorway from the outside front of the shop.  Blake had surprised her after the new year with the offer to reopen the hallway from the front to her loft which connected to living room area of her loft.  She had gladly accepted several of his offers since that dance on New Years Eve, some of them life changing, but this one was simply put, a life saver as those alley metal stairs deemed more dangerous in the frozen winter storms they were experiencing.  By the time she made it back down with her notebook full of hand-written notes, she felt an air of suspicion in the front area of her café.  Standing in silence in only black leggings, her black winter ankle boots and Blake’s navy blue and gray army sweatshirt she stole from him the other night, she realized all eyes were on her as she entered the room.
“Calista?”  Jackie held up the café cordless phone in her hand as the room came to a hushed quiet.  “I think you might want to take this call.”
Calista looked at Jackie with a tilted head and curious smile on her face as she walked towards her quickly, dropping her red mead college ruled notebook on the table of six women and one man, that had become the regulars in the group.  The large black sharpie marker adorned an ornamental heart and the words Valentine Benefit neatly graffitied the front of the notebook.
Jenny, Tanesha, Remi, Tully, Milly, Sally, along with Larry the plumber, stared at her with wide open eyes, some with their hands under their chins as if they were awaiting her news from the call of the phone that Jackie was holding up.  Curiosity was striking her imagination as she reached for the phone and Jackie whispered two words that sent a striking shiver through her body.  “Your ex.”
Calista had to wonder how he found her, since she changed her cellphone immediately following the night that she drunk texted him, or more so Stephanie received his text, but that was neither here nor there at the moment.  What worried her first was if Cole is okay?
Cautiously, Calista whispered out a meek ‘hello’, not sure if by the statement ‘your ex’ if it was Clay or Stephanie.  Things had been quiet in that arena since New Years but somehow her apprehension was building as the silence laid on the other end of the line; that was until his deep soft-spoken voice rattled her nerves unexpectedly.
“Calista?  It’s Clay.  Before you get worried, everything is alright with Cole.”  He rushed out the last sentence to assure her that was not why he was calling.
“Clay?”  She said his name as she turned to face the group of organizers for the fundraisers, who had also become her dear friends.  “How did you find me?”  She put a palm up in the air as if to say what gives and gave a questioning look to her friends.  Cole had promised not to tell his father or Stephanie where she was at or her new cellphone number.  The fact that he called the café looking for her, worried her, nonetheless.
“I did a little detective work.  Don’t worry.”  He rushed out the last sentence again.  “Stephanie has no idea where you are or that I found you.  Best to let those barking dogs lay.”  He awkwardly joked and then cleared his throat.  “I see you and your Aunt bought a small café in Kansas.  I like the pictures someone took of you and the handsome man.”  He paused.  “You look more in love with him, than you and I ever looked in any of our photos.”  He went quiet and Calista was at a loss for words. She knew the pictures he was referring to.  They were used in several social media feeds for the café, not to mention her own new Facebook account had them on it.  She thought once she blocked Stephanie and Clay, that they would never find out.  Then again, she had taunted Stephanie with a picture of Blake to prove she could get a better man.
The silence crept on for ten seconds which felt like minutes while everyone’s attention was on Calista.  Her breathing slowed after a huge breath out.  Her smile plastered on her face to tell her friends that she was okay; when, in reality, she had to wonder, what was Clay up to.
He finally spoke up.  “I don’t know if this is a good time to talk.  Stephanie has left to see her mother in Chicago.  She’s fallen seriously ill and well, I know you had been close to her mother at one point, and she’s not doing well.  Not that, that is not the reason I called.”  He went quiet again.  Normally he was one to avoid serious conversations, but this time it seemed like he wanted to talk.  For the sake of Cole, she thought maybe it best she took the call in private.
Clays voice started to say something when Calista turned her back to her friends and interrupted his next words in a whispering voice.  “Clay?  I am in the middle of something, but I can take a few moments to talk; if you need to?”  She questioned out.
“Yes.”  His reply was soft and questioning.
“Okay.  Well, you called the café shop number.  It’s closed but we are working on a local fundraiser.  Give me a second and I will call you back on my personal cell phone number.  It’s probably a good idea you have it for Cole, but if by God you let Stephanie know this number, I will cut your balls off with a dull knife.”  She half threatened; half laughed.
“I won’t.  I’ll put you under Bob Ross.”  He laughed.
“Give me five minutes.”  She quickly replied and hung up without saying goodbye strictly out of nervousness, not out of rudeness.
“So that was the old ball and chain?”  Larry chimed up which surprised everyone.  The rest of the females could sense her duress.
“It was.”  She replied with raised eyebrows and soft-spoken voice.  “Listen, I need to call him back.  Nothing serious.  Cole’s okay, but I suppose it’s time I finally talk to the man.”  Thinking to herself the last time she spoke to him, he was tied up in their old bedroom, on their old bed naked, pleading for a last act of sexual mischievousness that she had no intentions on playing out.
A few “suppose” echoed the room, as they all looked at her with concern.  She set the café cordless phone back on its charger and then walked back to the table they were all sitting around.  “I put just about everything I can think of in this notebook.”  She flipped open the red notebook to a neatly scripted and organized page full of to do and explanatory information on their next event.  The women’s fund raiser for the shelter had become a monthly event.  This time they want to have valentines for the women, a chocolatier demonstration and a motivational speaker on how to move forward from a major stressful event in one’s life.  A speaker, Calista found herself through a podcast that was willing to speak to a group of women staying at the shelter via internet Q and A.  Jackie had mentioned a fondue potluck, while Jenny wanted to address the new disability quarters needed for some homeless women at the shelter.  Either way, research had gone pen to paper nights ago, Calista felt these guys could make up their own decisions and let her know, while she handled this personal business.
“I’ll only be a bit.”  She offered up to the room as she grabbed her purse and iPad.  Then she looked at the group staring at her from around the table.  “But if I am not, Sally can you lock up.”  Sally was now officially manager in training, while Melissa had been officially fired because it was her who had planned the take a trip and steal your boss’s car situation.  Things were much calmer now that Milly was back to keep on eye on Melissa.  Calista would not hire her back, but she didn’t press charges either because the insurance already paid her for the stolen car.  Besides, every day, Calista noticed that now that Sally was given the roll of manager in training, her confidence level had risen far above where Calista could ever have imagined, thus giving her and Blake the extra time they found ways to have fun with each other.  This is how she had imagined her shop, but just didn’t imagine it getting there so quickly.
Blake was due soon to help with the next benefit, so she looked to Jenny next.  “Tell Blake what’s up.  Have him come straight upstairs.”
“Will do.” Jenny spoke supportively.
Remi offered up.  “You okay?  You look a little flustered.”
Calista meekly smiled.  “I’m fine.  It’s just weird that he called here.  Cat’s out of the bag so to speak.  At least for him.  He promises not to tell Stephanie, but I know her, it won’t be long she’ll be rearing her ugly head this way.”  She paused thinking of Stephanie’s mother and her health.  “Or not.  Hard to tell.”  She passed off the comment as a nonchalant thought, but her mind was already softening over Stephanie’s mother who was a kind decent human being, unlike her daughter.
The trek up the stairs to her place felt heavy footed, but she got herself settled in on her couch after grabbing a bottled water out of the refrigerator, left her door unlocked and grabbed her cellphone out.  She was hesitant in calling but the moment her fingers dialed his cellphone number, she knew this was a long overdue phone call.
The moment Clay answered the phone with her name, the conversation felt a bit surreal.  “Calista?”  He questioned out.
“It’s me.  Now you know my new cell phone.  Use it sparingly.”  She joked, just like the painter Bob Ross might have suggested on using a color.  Bob Ross was an inside joke between them, Clay and herself, one they never let Stephanie in on.  It felt nice to hide something from her for a change.
“I will.”  Clay offered in a serious tone.  There was a long pause between them, so Calista took a sip of water and then grabbed an empty yellow notebook that was sitting on the table in front of her.  
She put Clay on speakerphone.  “Can you hear me okay?  I have some work I need to do while we talk so I put you on speakerphone.”
“I can.  Ah, ever the great multi tasker, still doing two jobs at once.”  He teased.
“You know me.”  She half joked, but he didn’t know how cold and callus she had gotten from the affair; how mangled her heart was for two years, how all the scheming left her feeling hollow instead of successful.  That was until Blake came into her life.  Blake, and all of her new friends.  In a sense, she was extremely thankful for his affair.  Before she knew it, she said the words.  “Thanks.”
“For what?”  He asked inquisitively.
She clicked a black pen to push the ink nib out and started to write the words thankful on her notebook before replying.  “Well, not to sound snide, but my life here in Kansas is great, and if it weren’t for you and the…”  She paused as a nasty foul mouth word almost slipped out of her mouth and then corrected.  “brunette.  I never would have found what I found here.”  She replied just as Blake quietly walked through the interior door to the room and shut the door soundlessly behind him.  She put a finger up to her lips and he nodded that he understood.
Clay awkwardly laughed for a second.  “Cole told me you are engaged to be married this spring.  I assume the man in all the photos you are dreamily staring at on your social media accounts is him.  Handsome.  A bit younger don’t you think?”  The room got quiet as Calista looked at her handsome man quietly walking towards her with a huge smile on his face.  He was dressed in a brown wool blazer winter coat, which he was trying to quietly take off, a pair of dark brown dress pants and a deep charcoal cashmere sweater she bought him from Tully’s with a lighter charcoal grey soft tee underneath.  He was dressed in his new normal business casual which she loved to dress him up in.  He had a business meeting earlier that day with the final payment from Randy at his old bar along with Randy’s new business partner, Jackie’s new fiancé Conner, who had money to invest.  As she looked lovingly at her new fiancé who was trying to quietly sit on the couch next to her, she heard Clay clear his throat and mumble a few words.  On the off chance he might say something she did not want Blake to hear, she decided to set the record straight.
“I don’t mean to interrupt, but you should know that Blake just showed up and he is here in our place together.”  She proudly announced.
“Oh.”  Clay paused.  “Hello, Blake.  Cole has told me a lot about you.  All good of course.  Thanks for having your friend fly him out to see his mother for a weekend.”
“No problem.  I thought it was important he was here when I officially asked for Calista’s hand in marriage.”  Blake offered and then dropped a soft kiss on Calista’s lips.  When he pulled away, he offered.  “I can give you two privacy if needed.”  Offering more to Calista than Clay.
“That won’t be necessary.” Both Clay and Calista replied in unison, while Blake raised an eyebrow out of curiosity towards Calista.  She laid her left hand on his thigh and winked.
Clay spoke up first.  “I suppose I should apologize for all that I put you through.”  He cleared his throat, but before he could continue, Calista had rehearsed what it was she wanted to say to him for so long once she found a man like Blake.
“Clay?  Sorry to interrupt but I must accept your apology and say this.  We were once happily married, or so I thought.  Yet there was always something missing.  In our marriage that is.  I guess we married young, started a family young and I just felt okay with that.  Stephanie and you both betrayed me, I have decided to forgive you for that.  Doesn’t mean I am okay with it, but let’s just say, getting back into a new life that felt so much like me has led to some pretty spectacular people.  So, your apology is accepted and please lets just start this next phase of our lives in peace.  Cole will meet someone special one day and we will see each other on and off.  Not that I want to see Stephanie ever again, but I can be polite.  If she can.”  The last sentence came out with a slight laughter to it.  
Blake stood up to excuse himself.  Calista watched him walk to the bathroom and close the door behind him.  They had been switching off staying at each other’s place almost every night since New Years Eve.  Only a week after the gala event, did Blake choose a sweet romantic setting at his house to ask for her hand in marriage.  A simple, yet perfect for them moment, made up Calista’s mind.  This was the kind of man she wanted in her future.  A strong, sweet sentimental man, that knew how to make her smile in a lot of different ways.  Then his surprise in flying Cole out to Kansas, arranging a nice family gathering at the bar while he planned for Cole to tell his mother that Blake had his approval to marry her in front of everyone.  It was a moment; she would never forget.
Clay’s voice interrupted her own internal thoughts rebounding over the memory of Blake asking her for her hand in marriage and the previous nights lovemaking.  “I guess you won’t be surprised to know, Stephanie and I are already getting a divorce.  We’re splitting assets.  I got a new job in California and Cole is trying to decide if he wants to stay here or go with me.  I asked if I could talk with you first, you know to finally apologize, tell you the news first about Stephanie and well…”  His voice trailed off.  
Calista screamed internally at him.  Well what?  You think I want you back?  Who the fuck cares if Stephanie and you are getting a divorce?  But instead of verbalizing it, she took a deep cleansing breath and blew it out.  “Probably for the best Clay.  I mean about you and Stephanie.  It was more of the thrill of the hunt then the prize at the end.  How’s Cole handling all of this?  I mean, I would hate for him to move farther away from me, but I did move away from our old…”  She paused as she almost said home, but really, she could not get herself to say the word home, because now this was her home and although Cole was not here in physical form, he was in spirit and her new home, new life, with Blake and her new friends, her café and this town.
What Calista did not know was that Blake was standing a distance behind her but could still hear the conversation pursue.  His own internal fears of the words that Clay and Stephanie were divorcing caused him to stop in his footsteps of walking towards her.  He had wanted to hear what she had to say unedited from her.
Clay spoke out to her pause.  “He’s actually just busy between classes and two part time jobs.  I tried to get him a fulltime job at the bank before I left, but he seems to like his two part time gigs.  I don’t know.  It bothers me that his work ethic for his generation seems, so different.”
Calista spoke up quickly when Clay paused.  “Well I will talk with Cole, now that you have talked to me, but by all means Clay, let’s not play the let me talk to your mother first game.  Your life, your news, is just that.  Divorcing Stephanie does not really affect me one way or another.”  She breathed in and continued as she breathed out.  “Actually!”  She spoke up at the same time as Clay interrupting him, with a voice that was rather joyous and loud.  “I am thankful.  She wasn’t really good for either of us, all three of us if you include Cole, but our marriage was not really a happy one, but an existing one.  I might have divorced you without Stephanie.”  She boldly announced.
Which must have struck a cord with Clay’s ego, not knowing that Blake was not in the room, or so Calista thought.  “So those last two years of you begging me to stay with you, were what?”  He maliciously announced with pride.
Calista calmly asserted out a firm answer without a second thought.  “A desire to save our marriage for Cole, but, in reality, once I drove every single mile away from you two Clay, you and Stephanie that is, I realized, I just didn’t want Stephanie to win, so I begged.  I didn’t want to upset Cole after another one of your affairs, so I begged.  But when I got to Kansas, I realized I deserve a new life.  One where a man does not cheat on me, and friends that don’t stab me in the back.  I guess my only surprise is how quickly I found that new life.  Cole knows how happy I am now.  I think, perhaps, after the damage you did to our lives, you should be happy for me too.”
Without hesitation, he replied.  “You are right.  I am happy for you.  Sorry.  I have a lot of things I am working through with a therapist.  Sorry, Blake.” 
The last sentence shocked Calista as she herself almost forgot that Clay may have thought Blake was in the room.  Perhaps his dig at her begging him, was a self-preservation of pride.  Although she was glad that she got to answer him just today as to why. She had not wanted to save her marriage, she had wanted to win, and then she wanted to divorce him on her terms.  How happy she is now that she had not wasted anymore of her own valuable time with him and Stephanie.  
In the moment of losing herself to his apology, and the empty sounds from the room, a bold victorious voice filled the air.  “No need to apologize Clay.  Calista and I are very much in love.”  Just then his strong firm hands landed on her shoulder as he stood behind her on the couch and he softly began to massage her knotted muscles in her neck.  “I should advise you however, that I am very protective of Calista…” a slight pause elapsed before his tone changed, “and twice your size and five times richer than you.  You’re not the only one that did your research.  However, I love your ex-wife and your son Cole.  He’s a bright young man I will be proud to call him my stepson.  I think we will all do just fine.  You in Cali and us here in Kansas.  Cole can decide where he wants to be for the time being and in the future.”
Clay spoke in a more dignified professional tone.  “Well, yes.  I should leave you two alone now.  I agree Cole has to make that decision.  Congratulations Calista.  You deserve a happy life.  If you need to communicate with me regarding Cole, please feel free.  Congratulations Blake.  I wish you two a very happy life.”
Calista heard the preservation turn into sadness in his voice towards the end; a sound that she was sure Blake could not interpret.  Sometimes when you have been with someone so long, as she had been with Clay, she knew the sadness she detected in his voice.  He brought on this loneliness and it was not hers to deal with.  She quickly rushed out.  “Sounds great.  Good bye Clay.  We’ll talk again.”  And she quickly hit the end button on her cellphone before he could reply.  
It wasn’t that she had second thoughts, it was just that emotionally she could not deal with the fact that the father of her son had major regrets, as he should, and he sounded humbled, as he should.  She also worried how much Blake heard and what he was feeling right now.
His hands stop massaging her neck gently as his voice softly filled the room.  “That was a bit awkward.  Sorry if I sounded harsh and protective there for a second.”
Calista turned her body on the couch and laid her cellphone off on to the coffee table as she looked up at the man who captivated her every thought since her first night in Kansas.  “No.  No.  You were very sweet, and I think it was strange for everyone.  That’s the first time I’ve talked to him since I left him the night before I got here.  I guess it had to happen sooner than later.”  She let out a huge sigh of relief that it was over as Blake sat down on the couch next to her.  His hands went together between his knees as his head lowered down and his body leaned forward.
Calista leaned into him, wrapped her arms around him and laid a kiss on his shoulder.  He was a larger than life man, but he was giving her the vibe of something was wrong.  Instead of prodding as she normally would have, she remained silent and just leaned her body into him.  It wasn’t long before he spoke up.
“No regrets then?  I mean, now that you know it’s not working out with that other woman?”  He quizzed as he let his eyes lift while his head turned to look at her.
“None.”  She pulled him towards her, their bodies slowly intertwining on her couch until their mouths passionately began to kiss while their hands were touching each other in a reassuring manner.  Only moments passed until they both rolled apart to be laying next to each other on the couch.  Blakes hands held her from rolling off the couch, while his smile was telling her that Clay had left the room and their thoughts.  That is until he frowned and spoke up.
“Is it too soon for you?  A spring wedding?  Do you want to take your time on all of this?  I mean I get that you like planning everything, but do you need time?”
Calista quickly laid a kiss on his lips and then pulled back to situate herself to get up off the couch.  She wanted to change out of what she was wearing, but most importantly she wanted to drag her man back to her bed, make love, pack her weekend bag to stay at his house and discuss her moving in sooner rather than later.  The shop was covered for the next few days.  Other than the shelter fundraiser, she wanted to spend the next few days with her man, planning their wedding.  She had found a special wedding planner notebook and it was already filled with ideas, with help from some of her new best friends.  When she finally stood up, she looked down at him as he rolled onto his back on the couch to look at her with his hands behind his head.  He was unreadable at the moment.
“I don’t need time to think about anything.  I would marry you tomorrow, in fact, I would marry you tonight.  But first, you have to get me naked, so I can change clothes, so I can pack for a long trip to stay at your place the next few days.”
He smiled and started to sit back up on the couch as he looked up at her while she offered her hand for him to take.  “So, let me get this straight?  You need me to get you naked so you can change clothes?  You do know what I will do to you once I have you completely naked?”
“I do.  And I am counting on it.”  She turned her body to start to pull on him to drag him to her bedroom.  “Besides.”  She cast back a taunting flirtatious glance.  “I plan on convincing you for the next few days, that moving in together now, rather than later, would make our life so much more fun.”
In one fair swoop, Blake was up off the couch, and Calista was up over his shoulder, while he laid a few gentle pats on her behind.  “You naughty girl you, making plans to ravish me are you?”  His voice held such sexual laughter, yet the fact that he was strong enough to pick her up and carry her felt so insanely sexy to her.
She let her hand rest over and down to reach his butt and she laid a hard smack against his rear-end.  “Hope your well rested cowboy, cause this Kansas girl has the next few days planned with nothing but naked entangled bodies getting hot and sweaty.”
Blake softly set her on the bed as he quickly undressed.  The moment his naked body was gently climbing on top of hers, he had a look of pure joy on his face as he finally responded to her plans.  “I’ve got nothing but ideas on what to do to your naked body, Calista, but first I want to make love to my future wife.”
With the stroke of their naked bodies touching, neither of them gave another thought to the people in their lives before they met that caused such havoc.  For now, it was just them, just two lovers connecting and a grand new future ahead of them.
Nothing is as sweet of a revenge as no revenge at all, only the completion of success for the one they thought had fallen.  Seek not the revenge against those that did you wrong, seek only the power to succeed in what is right and makes you happy.  All else will fall into place.  That is why there is karma.
THE END
Author Note: This book and my other recently published book, Finding One To Call Her Own, have a special meaning to me.  Sweet Revenge has a little bit of me in it.  It was more of statement I would make to myself as soon as I got back into writing.  I took two years off from writing to grieve the loss of a loved one.  In the chaos of ugly matters, I found that sometimes the best revenge is none at all.  Sitting back and watching Karma do its thing is serendipitous.  In the matter of months of my loss, I chose to distance myself from those that acted worse than I ever thought possible.  I won’t deny there were moments that I imagined what I wanted to do to serve a platter of revenge on those that had tried to hurt me so.  But yet, my inner peace would not let them drive me down the dark and windy road of revenge.  Instead, I witnessed revenge upon their own doing, from afar, until one day I woke up and decided to forgive them, without their apology, forgive myself for letting this consume me in a way I could be spending that energy elsewhere.  That was my new super power.  That is revenge, in a better form – live the life that suits you; do not let the ones that hurt you, destroy the incredible you.  Instead, wish them well and let them deal with their own feelings that will arise once they realize what they have done, what they have lost.  Not everyone will offer forgiveness but forgive those that hurt you and you can find your own inner peace.  That is a much better way to live.
In this book, there are metaphors for roads taken, choices made, things undone, and there is plenty of revenge being served up.  Better to write about it, then to actually do it.  
Never piss off a writer, because they will cold cock you upside the head, run you off a steep cliff, knock you down the stairs, clog up your pipes, screw up your sewer system, and maybe even find a better life – all in imaginary fun of course.
Calista who contemplated doing more than she actually did, and quickly came to realize her time was being wasted on revenge.  She spent energy on finding ways of making revenge an art, only to realize, her time was better suited doing other things – like Blake.
When I am not writing, I am running a small business.  Unlike Calista, I don’t have just twenty hours a week of work.  When I can, I like to write, and novels take time, patience, and a whole lot of work that most readers can never comprehend, only other writers.  I can write three chapters, only to kill them off my screen and replace them with something better.  And that, is what my character does, she replaces her ex with someone better.  In the meantime, she replaced her damaged soul with a renewed sense of belonging once again to something she cherished.  That is what I have done.  I found peace and tranquility in doing the things I loved, taking back my life.
Be kind to others and burn the bridge of those that try to bring you harm.
Some might say take the high road, but always be looking in your rearview mirror for karma to kick their fucking ass.  And when it does, rip that rearview mirror off that car, toss it on the long dirt road called New Adventure, and just forget about them.  Life is short and can be sweet.  Its challenges will reward you but always remember that you are someone special and no one deserves to be treated poorly, mentally or physically.  Always ask for help if you find yourself in that deep dark place.  There are kind people everywhere and they just might be your new friends or family.
As a self-published author, I appreciate you taking the time to read my romance novels or erotic short stories.  Pleasing reviews and social media claps are always invited.  Kat
Other Available Books
FINDING ONE TO CALL HER OWN – Adult Romance Novel - Allie’s life was putting her in one testing predicament after another.  First her boyfriend cheats on her, then her car breaks down, and all the while her business is going belly up.  In better days, she could handle it, but as of right now, she felt like she had just lived the worse year of her entire life.  With a huge passion for movies and cupcakes, the two things that have always kept her sane, especially through a cheating boyfriend and a failing business, Allie wanted something to call her own.  Who would believe that this is the time for finding the perfect man and quite possibly a new business?  
THE GREY SUIT CLUB – Adult Romance Novel - In Felicity’s attempts to keep her career altering plan quiet, she does just the opposite by creating office gossip that might cost her the new client she brings to the firm.  Will she tell both men to stay out of her life, or will she decide with her heart for once?  An unconventional offer that leads into a sultry mix of business and pleasure while distorting the lines of corporate business structure to one woman’s advantage.  Fate, sexual pleasures, and exchanges can sometimes work out when only two are involved, yet sometimes a woman can feel lucky when there are choices for her to make.  
JUST ONE LOOK – Adult Romance Novel – Meeting the right man at the wrong time can all change with just one look.  Romance was the last thing on Melissa’s mind after a nasty divorce from a discovered cross-dressing husband and a crazy new boss.  However, some friendly adult mind erasing sexual fun sounded like just what she needed, that is until she finds herself falling in love with the man that can change her attitude with just one look.
SINFUL DESIRES – Erotic Short Stories. Some desires are so sinful; they make you want to explore the wild side. These short erotic romance stories have women who like to make their wicked pleasures a reality. They like to pick their man and seduce him while succumbing to their desires of pleasure.
BREATHLESS - Erotica Short Story - A desire so quick it flashes through her body like a jolt of intensity. The mere sight of him left her breathless every time she saw him. The images of their naked bodies intertwined in a heated mess caused her to take pause in what she was about to do.
CAUGHT - Erotica Short Story that starts right out with the devilish deed of high-powered sex with revenge. One woman's ambition to be caught by her ex having sex with a client is all too carefully thought out. The thrill of getting caught and seeking revenge is suddenly replaced with the true feelings she has for her client. Is it love at first sight that finally wins over her determination?
INTENSE - Erotica Short Story - The moment it happens, it is so intense that it will not be forgotten and the only thing you want is for it to happen again.  When a woman sees something she wants, that the desire drives her so insanely wild she will do just about anything when she gets it, she will succumb. Even if she must be a submissive lover, far different from her dominate nature.
SWEETLY INKED - Erotic Novella - From the moment the bet was made, the sexual attraction started. One simple dare, on live radio, could not be taken lightly. Being a woman of honor, not to mention the curiosity of the attraction to the man and his voice on air that proposed the dare, the loss of the bet would only be completed once her virginal skin was sweetly inked. How far will a woman take it?
SPANKED - Erotica Short Story - From the moment, the friendly bet between two neighbors was spoken; the flirtatious teasing transpired to the point of pleasure. The sexual attraction started months ago with a desire on both their parts to be so much more. One simple dare from his gorgeous mouth taunting her at a chance meeting in a nightclub had her so frazzled with anticipation. She wondered if she could take it lightly and 
REACTION - Erotic sexual situations in a romantic setting evolving into a short story to remember. Reaction happens when two elements combine and create an explosive nature of response. Celia spent the last two weeks dealing with the reaction between her body and her new coworker Conner. Somehow, he ended up here with her in her bed, naked and sated.
A YEARNING FOR MORE - Sometimes once is not enough. Being able to experience something over again with variety makes the spice of life even more exciting. Four Erotic Romance Short Stories, steamy sultry tales that ignite a warm passionate feeling within. What's your favorite spice - Dangerous Reaction, Misbehaving, Naughty Nighttime, or City Lights, what do you yearn for?
A WILD RIDE - Erotic Short Story - Passionate glances and short words exchanged were not the sexual satisfaction they were looking for. They both needed an explosive exchange of primal carnal sex to suffice their desires. What happens when their bodies ignite with passion and nothing stops them from pure sensual satisfaction? A willing desire to have more.
IMPULSE - Erotic Short Story - A sudden impulse to take some time away from her usual surroundings can land a woman in a situation that is filled with sexual desire and lust from long ago. When a man captures your attention and your desires are not fulfilled, your desire for him will only explode once you are given another chance. A remote cabin and an early-morning surprise are a chance at a destiny unfulfilled.
WANTING HIM - Erotic Short Story - Jade had this dream before, yet each time the dream was more explicit, enticing and erotic. Every time she woke from her seductive dream, she would replay the memory so fresh on her skin. There in her dreams she saw the man of her recent desires. His thick dark-brown hair styled professionally yet it held that sexy bad-boy appeal. His honey-brown eyes that would light up... 
SENSUAL - Six erotic filled romance short stories that will ignite the fire within. Sensual erotic stories with a touch of romance that will bring you a warm tingling feeling and enough passion to light your soul on fire. Each short erotic romance has a man, just for you. Can one air force pilot fulfill a woman's dreams of doing it while a mile high? 
ONE MORE TIME - Erotic Romance Short Stories in one book that will tantalize your steamy reading needs. Several stories of hot sexual desire, fulfilling you with yearning and fantasy. Each sensual story is written to entice your need for a romantic story that leads only to fulfillment with a romantic notion of sexual fantasy and tantalizing description of each steamy scene. Leave your worries behind and let the sensual play begin.
THE WILD ONE - Adult Mystery Novella - The Wild One is an adult mystery romance written for mature audiences. With a mystery to solve, a client to protect and a past that is catching up with one very sexy female with the call sign Malcolm, there is bound to be erotic suspense in the air.
TOUCHED - Erotic Romance Novella with bonus short story. Pleasuring a woman comes in all forms; this is something every man should know. However, when you are the employee of a very attractive boss, you have to take things slow, finding multiple ways to pleasure her, before you convince her, that you are all the man she needs. So much sex in such a short time can only lead to one thing.
SENSATIONS - Erotica Short Story - There is something about a man in uniform with the emblem of a hero, muscles so big and strong you want him to rescue you. Every woman fantasizes about a hero. Summer was about to meet hers. Over nine thousand words of erotic sexual fantasy evolving from self-satisfaction to lingering longings fulfilled, as an erotic short story unfolds. 
WILLING - Erotica Short Story - Freedom of desire can have a powerful effect upon a woman. When they see something they like, are they willing to release their inhibitions and succumb to sexual desires so strong? Perhaps shyness can keep one from attempting their desires that are aching to touch. 
PERFECT COWBOY – Book One – Romance Novel.  A heart-warming, sultry experience, of a modern cowboy romance. A down-home country girl who has been given the heart wrenching task of looking for the replacement for her boss, who has been like a dad to her all her life. His recent heart attack brought new meaning to everyone’s life at the ranch. Her true dream to marry the perfect cowboy might just come in the form of her new boss!
COSMOPOLITAN MAN - Book Two – Romance Novel.  Opposites attract yet when the attraction is this hot, you just have to add fuel to the fire instead of putting it out. One simple down to earth cowgirl can't seem to work this cosmopolitan millionaire out of her system. His international experience did not prepare him for the way his body reacted to someone as sexy and explosive as her. Just when he thought the deal was done... 
LUCKY CATCH - Book Three – Romance Novel.  Some woman just cannot help but fall for the dangerous badass. Some men think the only way to get the woman is to become that badass. All Claire wanted was a good man like Joe, after years of dating the dangerous ones. All Joe offered her was friendship. Little did she know that her sexy looks and sweet demeanor was all Joe could think about.
COWBOY KISS - Can one rodeo-winning cowboy steal the heart and kiss of one Daisy May? You bet your bucking bronco. This steaming duo finally take the chance to express their sultry attraction to each other, and in more ways or positions than you can count on. In a steamy shower, old barn, handmade custom kitchen table, or in front of the fire, these two find ways to make the ecstasy elevate. 
SANTA BABY - Holiday Adult Romance Novella What do mistletoe, a sizzling hot redhead and a smoking hot bartender do if thrust upon each other with undeniable lust? They meet in the middle of course. Instant attraction and lustful illusions can lead to something so wonderful during the magical time of year.

Legal: This is a fictional story with no reference to real people or places.  Any similar names are strictly coincidental and have been created in the authors mind for pure fun or reference.  If the story lists an actual city or state, all information in the story is purely reference or to give the reader a mental idea of the location but does not in any way dictate the true nature of that area.  Any reference in a story by this author that could be seen as prejudice is not a true semblance of the author's ideals, it is strictly to create a character in the story and allows the reader an idea of how that character might think or feel.  This book cannot be given away for free on any blog or computer reader site.  This book must be purchased from a reputable site that may list the book for free for a short promotional period.  Any blog or reader site that offers the free book must link the reader to a reputable site where they have to download directly to their reader, thus giving the author credit or payment for the receipt of this book. If you need to purchase any additional copies or have fraudulently downloaded the eBook and would like to do the respectable thing and pay the small price to purchase the book, please see my web page on Smashwords.com.  Any blog or eBook site that would like to use the book cover, synopsis or place an editorial review may do so within the legal limits.  Any slanderous hater type reviews will be challenged and asked to be removed.  All honest perspectives will be considered in future writings, however reading a book is like looking at art – to each his own.  If adult romance erotica is not your thing, please do not download the book and write a bad review as that is in bad taste.  All reviews on Smashwords.com are read and considered by the author, I do not have time to search all sites for all reviews.  If you want your review to be read and considered, please log on to Smashwords.com and leave your book review on my page.  This book, under no circumstances, should appear in print in any language except English.  If this book has been bought in another language, it is a forgery and therefore an illegal copy.  The author holds the rights to reprint this book with alterations under a different author name in order to reach a broader audience.  
Cover Art:  All photos used for any cover art for the Kat Von Wild books have been purchased for use from Big Stock Photos.  Any alterations to the purchased stock photo images was made by the cover artist to create a unique book cover from the original art and in no way was meant to deface the photo art purchased.  Each stock photo purchased came with rights to alter said photo for artistic purposes, such as cropping, color change, title placement, and additional Photoshop work as needed.
Title of the book: If the title of this book matches that of other books, it is in no way meant to replicate or simulate the other book or books.  This book was written in its entirety from the writer’s mind, as was the creation of the title to match the story of the book.  Under no circumstances, should the cover and title of this book match another book as it will be seen as a forgery and legal action will be pursued.  The cover artist altered the stock photo and created a unique book cover that should not be replicated.

